 Deutsche Bank analysts led by Matthew O’Connor upgraded the shares to buy from hold on Jan.
 Last year it paid $17 billion to buy ProSiebenSat1’s SBS Nordic unit, which comprises TV networks in Norway, Sweden, Denmark and Finland.
 Michael Linenberg, a Deutsche Bank AG analyst, raised his rating on the shares late yesterday to buy from hold.
 24 to buy at least $6 billion of the local currency through the end of this month to prop it up and keep the nation’s current-account deficit under control.
 Citi upgraded its shares to buy from neutral.
 The company raised its full-year net income forecast by 18 percent to 56 billion yen and said it will spend as much as 24 billion yen to buy back shares.
 subprime-mortgage securities are overpriced as investors misjudge a court ruling last month that will limit bondholders’ ability to force banks to buy back soured loans, according to hedge-fund manager Deepak Narula.
 Hedge fund Fir Tree Partners said last week that it was offering to buy some of the securities and would seek to continue existing litigation over them.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Allianz Real Estate, the property investing arm of Europe’s largest insurer, plans to buy the Koe Galerie shopping mall in Dusseldorf from Blackstone Group LP, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 Peso Plunge The Argentine currency dropped after Cabinet Chief Jorge Capitanich told reporters yesterday the central bank isn’t intervening in the peso’s decline, allowing the market, which is mostly closed to buyers of dollars, to adjust prices.
 “There continues to be strong investor demand for new credits that will allow them to diversify their portfolios” Yield premiums on company debt last year fell to the least since 2008, as record-low Reserve Bank of Australia interest rates spurred investors hunting for higher yields to buy notes with longer maturities or ratings closer to junk.
 GPT’s unlisted funds last week agreed to buy A$12 billion of buildings held by CPA should Dexus win control of the trust.
 He’s also designing programs that comb through a customer’s purchasing history and predict what they might want to buy next.
 The judge asked Kiser who he was working for when he first looked into buying the debt in 2011.
 Board Inquiry Kiser said he didn’t use money from Dish or EchoStar to buy the debt and didn’t reply when a member of Dish’s board asked whether Ergen may have made some large purchases in May 2012.
 He said he set up an entity, Bal Harbour, named after the South Florida village, to buy the debt.
 “All of my great creative naming would have been for naught” Ergen’s lawyers have said he had the right to buy the debt personally and that he didn’t want his name to be known because it could have driven up the price.
 SP Special Opportunities is part of a group of lenders that owns about $14 billion of $17 billion in debt issued by LightSquared’s main “LP” unit and backed Ergen’s proposal to buy the airwaves.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Suntory Holdings Ltd, which last week agreed to buy Beam Inc.
 Billionaire Nobutada Saji’s whiskey and soft-drinks company denied a report by India’s CNBC TV18 network yesterday that the Osaka-based company had offered to buy Scotch whisky maker Whyte & Mackay and valued it at less than $1 billion.
 Diageo Plc, the world’s biggest distiller, last year agreed to buy a controlling stake in United Spirits that would give it control of Whyte & Mackay.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP agreed to buy the Ortho Clinical unit of Johnson & Johnson for $415 billion, a deal that would shed the health-care products company’s only diagnostics division.
 will continue to seek out innovative drugs to buy, particularly for cancer, shrugging off two previous deals totaling $78 billion in the last three years that failed to pay off for them.
 A 2009 deal to buy Medarex Inc.
 27 to buy the remaining OSK Ventures shares it doesn’t own at 58 sen apiece.
 Card-payment processor Cielo SA advanced to a two-month high after Banco BTG Pactual SA raised it to buy.
 said it expects the insurer to buy back $10 billion of stock during the next two years.
 AerCap Holdings NV agreed to buy AIG’s International Lease Finance Corp.
 More than 975,000 Americans signed up in December to buy plans under the law, which guarantees health coverage to all residents and penalizes those who aren’t insured.
 “As you see the economic recovery broaden and improve, you see some of the more stable property types get left behind” The large pool of properties to buy gives medical office investors ample opportunities to generate more income, according to Hanson of Griffin-American.
 Kinder Morgan, the country’s second-largest natural gas pipeline operator by market value, agreed to buy APT New Intermediate Holdco LLC and State Class Tankers II LLC from private-equity firms Blackstone Group LP and Cerberus Capital Management LP for $962 million in cash.
 arms export regulations and restrictions on transfers of military technology to the South Asian nation has been at the heart of the US-India relations since 2005, when the two countries improved ties and reached an agreement that allows India, a nuclear-weapons state, to buy reactors and nuclear material for its energy industry.
 Wind Mobile was expected to buy blocks in BC, Alberta and Ontario, said Dvai Ghose, a telecommunications analyst with Canaccord Genuity Group Inc.
 7 to buy the Chicago branches of Charter One Bank owned by RBS Citizens Financial Group.
 In November, the lender agreed to buy Quintillion Ltd, a Dublin-based hedge-fund administrator.
 Hurwitz also will relinquish options to buy more than 1,300 Maxxam shares, received as part of his 2012 compensation package, to resolve a Delaware Chancery Court lawsuit filed by Arbiter Partners QP LP, according to court papers.
 to buy a combined $400 million in debt from Chicago-based USG in 2008, during the housing slump.
 Nomura has the chance to generate more fees by tapping those customers to buy mutual funds and manage the assets” Brokerage commissions jumped 45 percent in the quarter from a year earlier to 1214 billion yen, yesterday’s statement showed.
 Lower Proceeds Wind Mobile was expected to buy blocks in BC, Alberta and Ontario, said Dvai Ghose, a telecommunications analyst with Canaccord Genuity Group Inc.
 Had it gone ahead, the auction rules would have allowed it to buy two of four blocks of spectrum in each region, while the Canadian incumbents would only have had access to one each.
 Mizuho raised its rating on the stock to buy from underperform on the outlook a weaker yen will boost earnings.
 UBS AG upgraded the maker of generic drugs to buy from neutral, saying the company’s doxycycline medicine will send 2014 earnings higher than the average analyst estimate.
 The carrier already spent more than $10 billion to buy Germany’s Kabel Deutschland Holding AG last year after it acquired UK.
 Apollo, the New York-based buyout firm run by Leon Black, last year agreed to buy Evo Banco from nationalized lender NCG Banco and FinanMadrid from state-owned Bankia group.
 surged 4 percent to HK$1044 after agreeing to buy International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server business for $23 billion.
 Prosecutors accused Litvak of misrepresenting sellers’ asking prices to buyers, or vice versa, keeping the difference for Jefferies.
 A year ago, BlackRock bought wind farms from REG and agreed on a five-year partnership that allows it to buy more plants from the developer.
 In August, Aurobindo agreed to buy a 57 percent stake in Silicon Life Sciences Pvt.
 Chief Executive Officer Dave Goldberg wanted to buy out investors from his Internet company and attract new ones who wouldn’t balk at his aim to stay private, he steered clear of traditional startup financiers in the venture-capital community.
 agreed to buy Cetera Financial Group from Donald Marron’s Lightyear Capital LLC for $115 billion as it seeks to build a network of brokers across the country.
 drug distributer failed to win enough shareholder support to buy its German rival.
 24 to buy a 5001 percent stake held by family-owned investment firm Franz Haniel & Cie GmbH for 23 euros a share, and began an offer for the rest.
 Since Walgreen Co’s 2012 deal to buy 45 percent of Alliance Boots, the owner of the largest UK.
 An acquisition would have allowed McKesson to buy as much as $10 billion a year in generic drugs for distribution, compared with $6 billion to $7 billion on its own.
 13 announcement that it agreed to buy US.
 In-car technology is the top selling point for 39 percent of auto buyers today, eclipsing performance measures such as horsepower, Accenture has said.
 Thompson Creek surged 19 percent after Bank of America raised its rating on the stock to buy from underperform.
 “Consumers have more confidence, they have started to buy more and open their wallets more,” Agnefjaell said today at a press conference at the Kungens Kurva store outside Stockholm.
 Aberdeen Asset Management Plc, Scotland’s largest fund company, agreed to buy Scottish Widows Investment in November for 560 million pounds from parent Lloyds Banking Group Plc.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Sysco Corp’s agreement to buy US Foods for $35 billion to bolster its preeminence as a food distributor to restaurants across North America is under review by at least two states in addition to federal regulators.
 utility owner by market value, ended talks to buy a stake in two nuclear reactors under construction in South Carolina after Scana Corp.
 Yue Xiu Group agreed in November to buy a majority stake in Chong Hing Bank Ltd.
 Verso, based in Memphis, Tennessee, was in talks to buy NewPage in 2012.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, which formed an industrial real estate company in 2010, agreed to buy warehouses and development land in nine US.
 Piling In Deutsche Bank AG forecasts that pensions will sell about $150 billion in equities this year to buy corporate bonds due in 10 years or more.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Singapore will stick to a licensing system that has made it one of the world’s most expensive places to buy a car, limiting vehicle ownership to encourage more people to use public transport.
 Among Shih’s first decisions after returning to the company was to buy a 156 percent stake in the online payments unit of Taipei-based PChome Online Inc, a Taiwanese website and e-commerce provider.
 The lender, Latin America’s biggest by market value, agreed to buy Corpbanca in a deal worth at least $22 billion in cash and stock.
 “We’ve seen a bunch of foreign investors running to buy the stock” Vale said in a regulatory filing on Dec.
 Better to buy gold or farmland or ammunition or Dogecoins1 More likely -- well, notice how close that $58 billion net notional is to Berkshire's $58 billion in derivative liabilities.
 21 it was aiming to buy a stake in Avio SpA’s space-propulsion business as part of a breakup of the Italian company by private equity firm Cinven Ltd.
 (DISH), may withdraw its $222 billionoffer to buy the wireless spectrum of Philip Falcone’sLightSquared Inc.
 He said that while LBAC, the Ergenentity offering to buy the spectrum, hasn’t yet withdrawn itsbid, it has the right to do so and is considering the move.
 raised its rating on Ctrip to overweight, equivalent to buy, from neutral yesterday in a note.
 24 to buy Haniel’s 5001 percent stake in Celesio for 23 euros a share and began a tender offer for the remaining publicly traded shares.
 Since Walgreen Co’s 2012 deal to buy 45 percent of Alliance Boots, the owner of the largest UK.
 A Celesio acquisition will allow McKesson to buy as much as $10 billion a year in generic drugs for distribution, compared with $6 billion to $7 billion on its own.
 Argentines will be able to buy dollars for savings in line with their income more than two years after first installing restrictions on foreign-currency purchases, he said today in Buenos Aires.
 agreed to buy majority owner Franz Haniel & Cie’s entire holding in the European company for 2350 euros a share.
 Hewlett-Packard and Seiko Epson may decide it makes more sense to buy their way into the industry via a Stratasys takeover, said Lewis of BB&T.
 “It’s certainly enabled more people to buy new houses” Home values in the UK.
 Buyers from Japan, India and Thailand are looking to buy as many as 11 cargoes for January to April delivery, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Intensive gas users in the south of France have to buy part of their gas on the spot market and “the price spread has catastrophic consequences on industrial sites” in the region, said Daniel Marini, director of economic and international affairs at French chemical makers federation UIC.
 Trading in the options gives the right to buy the underlying shares and profit when the stock rises.
 Deals Debevoise, Ropes & Gray on $29 Billion Deal for Aptalis Debevoise & Plimpton LLP and Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP were legal counsel to Forest Laboratories Inc, maker of the Alzheimer’s drug Namenda, which agreed to buy Aptalis Pharma for $29 billion, adding treatments for gastrointestinal ailments and cystic fibrosis.
 Richardson GMP agreed in September to buy Macquarie Private Wealth Canada for C$132 million to expand its wealth-management partnership.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP plans to buy about 100 million euros ($1362 million) of Dublin office space as Ireland recovers from Western Europe’s worst property crash, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
 is the top bidder to buy the 9,000-square-meter (96,500-square-foot) Grand Mill Quay property in the Irish capital for as much as 60 million euros from the agency, one of the people said.
 The companies plan two capital increases of 370 million euros ($507 million) each, and CSAV will also seek to raise another $200 million to buy new ships.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Retail sales rose in December as frigid temperatures prodded Americans to buy discounted winter clothing and shop online for the holidays, capping what may have been the strongest quarter for consumer spending in three years.
 A tie-up may provide ICL with a new source of potash nearer to buyers in India and China just as a government-appointed panel is leading a review of Israel’s natural-resources royalties and taxes.
 Bank of America raised its recommendation on shares of the engineering company to buy from neutral.
 Bancorp, the biggest bank in the Midwestern US, agreed to buy the Chicago branches of Citizens Financial Group Inc, according to a person with direct knowledge of the transaction.
 Ropes & Gray and Kirkland Provide Legal Counsel for Bob’s Deal Bain Capital LLC, the private-equity firm that oversees more than $70 billion in assets, agreed to buy furniture and bedding retailer Bob’s Discount Furniture Inc.
 1 deal to buy the final stake from a union health-care trust, Elkann played an active role, keeping an open line with the hard-driving CEO from his office on the fourth floor of Fiat’s Lingotto headquarters.
 Sales more than tripled to 84 billion euros, thanks largely to buying a majority of Chrysler.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the private-equity firm run by Henry Kravis and George Roberts, agreed to buy a majority stake in Sedgwick Claims Management Services Inc.
 KKR in September agreed to buy Mitchell International Inc.
 and an affiliate of Primavera Capital Ltd, which together own 76 percent of Shanda Games, sent a nonbinding proposal to buy the company for $345 an ordinary share or $690 per American depositary share, Shanda Games said today in a statement.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- GPT Group shares jumped by the most in more than three months after its unlisted funds agreed to buy A$12 billion ($11 billion) of buildings should Dexus Property Group win control of a trust managed by Commonwealth Bank of Australia.
 The Santa Clara, California-based maker of computer-chip equipment plans to buy a Japanese company this year and incorporate in the Netherlands.
 Tepco, as the company is known, is seeking to buy two spot cargoes each for February and March, two people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Emaar Properties PJSC, the developer of the world’s tallest skyscraper, jumped the most in more than four months after EFG-Hermes Holding SAE raised the stock to buy from neutral and boosted its price estimate by 68 percent.
 agreed to buy bourbon maker Beam Inc.
 The companies hope to be in a position to drill a year after Paris-based Total exercises its option to buy the stake, Mark Abbott, managing director of Egdon, said in a telephone interview.
 Vanguarda Agro SA, Brazil’s second-biggest publicly traded soybeans and grain producer, is investing as much as 600 million reais to buy 100,000 hectares (247,100 acres) of farmland in Mato Grosso and the northern state of Para because of the the outlook for improved infrastructure, Vanguarda Chief Executive Officer Arlindo Moura said in a Nov.
 “We believe that by choosing not to increase the size of the repurchase program, the directors are actually performing a great disservice to the owners, especially smaller shareholders who may not be in a position to buy more stock themselves,” Icahn said in yesterday’s letter.
 Federal Reserve Bank of Dallas President Richard Fisher, a former managing partner of a fund that bought distressed debt, said in a speech last week that he’d “have to hire Sherlock Holmes to find a single distressed company priced attractively enough to buy” Five years after the Fed started holding benchmark rates at about zero and pumping more than $3 trillion into the financial system to ignite growth, Fisher warned in the Jan.
 24 to exercise options to buy Westgate Tower, a 20-story office building that’s under construction in the western part of the island, according to a statement to the Singapore stock exchange.
 Existing shareholders would be given theright to buy shares at the price that Dongfeng and France pay intheir reserved capital increase.
 Chief Executive Officer Masayoshi Son is exploring a deal for Sprint to buy the majority of T-Mobile US Inc.
 Suntory, the closely held Japanese whiskey and beer maker, agreed to buy Beam for $16 billion including debt to create the world’s No.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Invesco Ltd, which has more than $767 billion under management, agreed to buy a 26-story office tower in San Francisco as the city retains its ranking as one of the most desirable global investment markets.
 Monster’s growth would be costly to buy, and any suitor would have to weigh the risk of betting on energy drinks at a time when health concerns about caffeine-rich products have spurred a US.
 offered to buy the company for about $13250 a share.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- The Bombay Bullion Association, a traders’ group, plans to buy a stake in the Multi Commodity Exchange of India Ltd.
 The association plans to buy 5 percent of MCX via a consortium led by the Universal Commodity Exchange Ltd, another Mumbai-based bourse, from Financial Technologies (India) Ltd, Mohit Kamboj, president of the group that represents about 1,000 jewelers and traders, said yesterday.
 Financial Technologies won’t like to comment on reports of Universal Commodity Exchange planning to buy its stake in MCX, the company said in a statement to the stock exchange today.
 Construction Bank, based in Beijing, began an e-commerce platform in November 2012 that allows users to buy products including digital gadgets, cosmetics, books and food in addition to financial services.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Industrial & Commercial Bank of China Ltd, the world’s most profitable lender, agreed to buy control of Standard Bank Group Ltd’s markets unit to expand in trading spanning commodities and interest rates to currencies.
 The option becomes available two years after the deal is completed and if ICBC takes up the right, Standard Bank can require the lender to buy the remaining stake.
 China also approved an 80 billion yuan ($132 billion) quota for investors in London to buy onshore assets, Osborne said at that time in a move aimed at bolstering the Asian nation’s efforts to internationalize the renminbi and helping London further its ambition to become Europe’s leading offshore yuan hub.
 Xcel Energy Inc’s Southwestern Public Service agreed to buy 250 megawatts of capacity from the project’s first phase under a 20-year contract.
 “The yen’s appreciation has been corrected, while consumers’ sentiment to buy homes and cars recovers,” Executive Vice President Katsuhiko Ota said today at a press conference in Tokyo.
 Last March, the company withdrew from discussions to buy a stake in electric-car maker Fisker Automotive Inc.
 French Funding President Francois Hollande said this week that the French state hadn’t been asked yet to buy a holding.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- GDF Suez SA Chief Executive Officer Gerard Mestrallet said he hadn’t bid to buy Canadian oil and gas producer Talisman Energy Inc.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the private-equity firm run by Henry Kravis and George Roberts, is nearing an agreement to buy Sedgwick Claims Management Services Inc.
 KKR in September agreed to buy Mitchell International Inc.
 The New York Post reported earlier today that KKR is close to an agreement to buy Sedgwick.
 BHP, which Citigroup raised to buy from neutral, climbed 29 percent to A$3789.
 agreed to buy majority-owner Franz Haniel & Cie’s holding in the company.
 OUE agreed to buy the US.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Suntory Holdings Ltd, the closely held Japanese whiskey and beer maker, agreed to buy Beam Inc.
 “Lloyds were swayed by political considerations” NBNK, created in 2010 to acquire bank assets, lost out to Co-Op Bank to buy 632 branches of Lloyds in 2012.
 Private-equity firms typically pool money from pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within five to six years, then sell them and return the money and a profit after 10 years.
 The city wanted to buy out the swaps to avoid the risk of a lawsuit and to keep the casino taxes, one of its best sources of revenue, from being threatened by UBS and Bank of America.
 are learning that spending lots of money to buy patents is the easy part.
 drug distributer failed to win enough shareholder support to buy its German rival.
 24 to buy a 5001 percent stake held by family-owned investment firm Franz Haniel & Cie GmbH for 23 euros a share, and began an offer for the rest.
 Since Walgreen Co’s 2012 deal to buy 45 percent of Alliance Boots, the owner of the largest UK.
 An acquisition would have allowed McKesson to buy as much as $10 billion a year in generic drugs for distribution, compared with $6 billion to $7 billion on its own.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Bank of Montreal is in talks to buy F&C Asset Management Plc, manager of the oldest UK.
 Netanyahu “replied acidly, ‘In the Middle East, the enemy of my enemy is my frenemy’” For his part, Saudi Arabia’s King Abdullah wanted to buy from the US.
 agreed to buy a Sulzer AG unit that makes coatings for machinery and airplane engines in a deal valued at 1 billion Swiss francs ($11 billion) to broaden its customer base.
 The airline’s last narrow-body order came in July 2012, when United agreed to buy 150 Boeing Co.
 “At some point, we’re going to get to the point where we won’t be able to buy them anymore” Canada and Mexico have successfully challenged earlier versions of the label rule at the Geneva-based WTO, which in 2011 and 2012 said the standard unfairly harms meat sales to the US.
 Attorney Preet Bharara with selling the virtual currency to users of the Silk Road online bazaar, allowing them to buy and sell illegal drugs anonymously.
 Ross, the founder of WL Ross & Co, has also raised $100 million to buy ships hauling coal, iron ore and grains, betting that accelerating growth in emerging markets will boost trade.
 rallied 18 percent as it agreed to buy Aptalis Pharma for $29 billion.
 in Taipei to buy the bonds of Brazil, Russia, Turkey, the Philippines and Indonesia this month, he said.
 “We are not helping people to buy flats or homes they cannot afford.
 Purchasers are seeking to buy homes costing about 160,000 pounds, below the national average of 247,000 pounds.
 announced a deal to buy Nokia’s mobile-phone unit after it succumbed to competition in smartphones.
 Job Cuts SSAB offered to buy Rautaruukki for 101 billion kronor ($156 billion) to cut costs amid falling steel prices and over capacity.
 Tickets from American Airlines Inc, Grupo Aeromexico SAB and Avianca Holdings SA became harder to buy in bolivars late last year as investment banks from Bank of America Corp.
 “An affordable rate would allow us to buy a mid-range car to share with my son,” Mekali said in a Jan.
 Previously, investors had to buy and sell futures contracts at the same exchange, a process known as the vertical silo model.
 Yelp is succeeding at getting advertisers to buy their promotions in most US.
 The bankers’ retreat has opened the door to buyout firms, venture-capital funds, insurers and pension providers.
 They didn’t properly assess the risks and didn’t include precautions in the agreement because they were under political pressure to buy the Austrian lender.
 “They acted in a ‘close your eyes and jump’ fashion, in an effort to buy Hypo Alpe at almost any price” ‘Buyer Regrets’ In the wake of the financial crisis, the deal turned into a disaster, causing the losses at BayernLB until 2009, when the unit was sold to the Austrian government for one euro.
 ‘Too Stupid’ Bavarian government officials criticized BayernLB after it lost a bid for another Austrian lender in 2006, and the then-state finance minister said the executives were “too stupid to buy a bank,” according to prosecutors.
 “But I cannot see that I committed any crime” Prosecutors claim the men committed another crime when they agreed to buy an additional 33 percent stake in Hypo Alpe in November 2007 at the same share price they paid earlier.
 Fiat SpA rallied the most since April 2009 after agreeing to buy the rest of Chrysler Group LLC, enabling the Italian and US.
 F&C Asset Management Plc jumped 61 percent after Bank of Montreal agreed to buy the owner of the UK’s oldest investment fund for 708 million pounds ($12 billion).
 Litigation Ergen Group May Drop LightSquared Bid, Lenders’ Lawyer Says An entity owned by Charlie Ergen, chairman of Dish Network Corp, may withdraw its $222 billion offer to buy the wireless spectrum of Philip Falcone’s LightSquared Inc.
 He said that while LBAC, the Ergen entity offering to buy the spectrum, hasn’t yet withdrawn its bid, it has the right to do so and is considering the move.
 The bank has faced regulatory probes, investor lawsuits and criticism from lawmakers over claims it didn’t warn shareholders about spiraling losses at Merrill before they voted to buy the brokerage in January 2009.
 It stems from increases in the value of the company’s debt, on the theory it would be more expensive to buy it back.
 jumped the most in 2 1/2 months in Mumbai trading, after a report that Vodafone Plc was in early talks to buy a majority stake in its unlisted parent from the $100 billion Tata group.
 Vodafone is in discussions to buy out the Tata group’s 5945 percent stake in Tata Teleservices, a deal that would help it overtake Bharti Airtel Ltd.
 NTT Docomo’s stake of about 25 percent gives it first right to buy Tata’s controlling stake, the newspaper reported.
 plans to buy an 18 percent stake in the utility for $15 billion, it said this month, sparking opposition in Denmark.
 Schroders Plc gained 12 percent after Barclays Plc advised investors to buy the stock.
 Schroders gained 12 percent to 2,636 pence after Barclays upgraded the asset-management company to overweight, a rating similar to buy, from underweight, which corresponds to a sell recommendation.
 “There are no short-term catalysts to justify adding to the name at current levels, and we perceive there is no real rush to buy it due to lack of top-line growth,” Conrads said in a phone interview.
 The maker of Smirnoff created a joint venture with Combs to buy DeLeon, London-based Diageo said today in a statement, without disclosing the purchase price.
 He’s spending a combined $5 billion to buy Google Inc’s Motorola mobile-phone business and International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server business.
 23, Lenovo agreed to buy IBM’s low-end server business for $23 billion, including about $2 billion of cash and the rest coming in shares of Beijing-based Lenovo, the companies said.
 “Google did not need to buy Motorola,” Greengart said.
 David Allen, the CEO of Flatirons Practice Management, a medical billing company in Boulder, Colorado, said he tried using the state’s health exchange to buy a new policy for his employees and didn’t like what he found.
 said its specialty insurance unit agreed to buy the assets of MyAssist Inc, a personal-assistance and concierge service, from Noel Group.
 Bond Prices The extra yield, or spread, investors demand to buy Cencosud’s bonds due in 2023 instead of US.
 Therefore, the SNB would have to buy a large amount of gold to meet the 20 percent requirement, were the initiative to be accepted, according to Jordan.
 The company agreed last month to buy AZ Electronic Materials SA, a specialty chemicals supplier to the electronics industry, for 16 billion pounds ($26 billion).
 If we had a pullback, this would be an opportunity for us to buy” $96 Trillion Global equities soared by $96 trillion in 2013 as central-bank stimulus helped the US.
 2, after Sergio Marchionne, chief executive officer of Chrysler and its Italian parent, reached an agreement to buy a 415 percent stake from a United Auto Workers retiree health-care trust.
 raised its rating on the lender of small, unsecured cash loans to buy from neutral.
 The probability of the rand extending its slide to 1150 per dollar this quarter is 51 percent, according to Bloomberg calculations based on prices of options to buy and sell the currency.
 “If Vodafone wants to buy ONO at any price they can and easily trump Liberty Global because Liberty is sensitive on price” Liberty shares increased 07 percent to $8196 as at 12:26 pm.
 Liberty Global’s agreement to buy Utrecht-based Ziggo came after the Dutch company rejected an initial takeover, calling it “inadequate” In mid-December Ziggo said those talks had been revived.
 Belgian Takeover? With Ziggo out of the way, Malone may also turn his attention to buying up the rest of Ziggo’s neighbor, Belgian cable operator Telenet Group Holding NV, in which Liberty Global already owns 58 percent.
 Separately, Liberty Global agreed to buy back shares worth $1 billion, which will be added to a two-year $35 billion stock repurchase program that’s under way.
 The retailer last month joined a group of institutional investors to buy 127 European shopping malls in a 2 billion-euro transaction, giving it more control of the sites around its domestic hypermarkets, its largest stores.
 The government had said AB InBev’s $201 billion bid to buy all of Modelo would give it too much control over the US.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Invesco Ltd, which has more than $767 billion under management, agreed to buy a 26-story office tower in San Francisco as the city retains its ranking as one of the most desirable global investment markets.
 European Case Joaquin Almunia, the EU’s antitrust chief, has repeatedly said the Brussels-based agency should keep the German deal, describing it is a “European case” He’s also examining Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s plan to buy Telefonica’s Irish unit, which will also merge two of the country’s operators.
 Hutchison won EU approval to buy wireless carrier Orange Austria, and merge it with its local unit, more than a year ago after it agreed to divest radio spectrum and offer network access to new rivals.
 Amgen agreed to buy Onyx Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 7 to buy the Chicago branches of Charter One Bank owned by RBS Citizens Financial Group.
 The statement means AT&T can’t offer to buy Vodafone or a stake of 30 percent or more in the company for the next six months, according to UK.
 China is pressuring bureaucrats and the military to buy locally branded cars to cut lavish spending of taxpayers’ money.
 The decision to buy intermediate-term US.
 earlier this month withdrew from an agreement to buy LNG from Woodside’s proposed Browse LNG venture in Australia after delays to the project.
 The Japanese companies, which reached a deal in 2012 to buy a 147 percent stake in Browse for $2 billion, will continue to work with Woodside to jointly sell LNG from the development to the Asian market, the Australian oil producer said when announcing the withdrawal.
 proposed to buy the company for $690 per ADR.
 ‘Million Arthur’ Shanda Games, which licenses titles such as Sega Networks’ “Chain Chronicle,” has been expanding into mobile games with titles such as “Million Arthur” In July, Shanda Games agreed to buy two units of its parent company for $8115 million to improve its cost structure.
 21 that Sistema was seeking to buy the paper producer, citing the Karelia regional administration’s press office.
 offered 993 cents on the dollar today to buy the lowest-ranked portion of a deal issued in November at par by Blackstone Group LP’s Invitation Homes, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they aren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 “I think it’s more short term, but people are looking at it” Kroton Educacional SA, Brazil’s largest operator of for-profit colleges, is planning to buy Anhanguera Educacional SA for 5 billion reais in an all-stock transaction that would create the world’s biggest education company.
 Separately, Liberty Global agreed to buy back shares worth $1 billion, which will be added to its two-year $35 billion stock repurchase program already under way.
 He has called the suit an attempt to derail his offer to buy LightSquared’s assets.
 Telkom Chief Executive Officer Sipho Maseko and human resources officials approved the 6 million-rand ($538,000) loan, which was used to buy company stock, Schindehutte said in an interview last week.
 Using the loan to buy company shares would deliver a “huge show of confidence” to the market, he said in an e-mail.
 Disciplinary Hearing Maseko was unable to buy the stock, the CEO said in a separate e-mail on Oct.
 said it asked suspended Chief Financial Officer Jacques Schindehutte to repay a 6 million rand ($555,000) loan used to buy shares because the transaction breached the terms of the Companies Act.
 Chubb also announced a plan to buy back as much as $15 billion worth of stock.
 Fosun International, the investment arm of China’s biggest closely held industrial group, is seeking to diversify its holdings overseas and won the approval in July to buy French resort operator Club Mediterranee SA with Axa Private Equity, which has since been spun off from AXA SA and is now called Ardian.
 In November 2011, refiner China Petrochemical Corp, known as Sinopec Group, agreed to buy 30 percent of the Brazilian unit of Galp Energia SGPS SA, Portugal’s biggest oil company.
 “This is a significant potential tailwind for Australian property prices” By law, non-resident foreigners can only buy new homes, with exceptions to buy existing properties granted on a case-by-case basis.
 Instant Messaging At Billbergia’s Village Quay apartment complex in Rhodes, the company sold a quarter of its units to buyers directly from the mainland and about 60 percent to Australia-resident Chinese, operations manager John Fitzgerald said.
 “Chinese are very hesitant to buy without some form of advice or comfort from someone they know and trust,” Fitzgerald said.
 Elliott offered to buy San Francisco-based Riverbed last week, two months after revealing a more than 10 percent stake in the company.
 oil and gas engineer, agreed to buy US-traded Foster Wheeler AG for $32 billion to expand foreign and fuel-product business.
 Salling, have the right to buy the remaining 19 percent that Maersk holds in the two units after five years, the company said today.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Lixil Group Corp, the Japanese company that agreed to buy bathroom-fixture makers American Standard Brands and Grohe Group last year, is studying another overseas acquisition to boost revenue from emerging markets.
 Fujimori said he almost pulled out of early negotiations to buy Grohe after disagreeing on price and will always keep the option of walking away from an acquisition.
 13 it agreed to buy Beam, the maker of Jim Beam and Canadian Club liquor, for $16 billion including debt.
 Utilities have to buy carbon allowances to cover emissions produced by power plants.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Goldcorp Inc, the world’s second-largest miner of the metal, made an unsolicited offer to buy Osisko Mining Corp.
 Goldcorp’s offer is the largest unsolicited or hostile bid for a gold company since Eldorado Gold Corp’s A$329 billion ($299 billion) attempt to buy Andean Resources Ltd.
 Tallest Skyscraper Dubai’s DFM General Index added 32 percent as Emaar Properties PJSC, the developer of the world’s tallest skyscraper, jumped after EFG-Hermes Holding SAE raised the stock to buy.
 Bankruptcy Judge Shelley Chapman in Manhattan to reject Ergen’s $1 billion claim against the company, saying he wasn’t eligible to buy the debt.
 Dish Treasurer Jason Kiser, who advised Ergen on the purchases, told the court last week that he didn’t consider whether he was acting for the company or its chairman when he first looked into buying the debt in 2011.
 Ergen said he heard from Kiser that Dish wasn’t eligible to buy the debt, removing a possible conflict.
 UBS upgraded the shares to buy from neutral, saying “robust” earnings growth will resume.
 Rizvi Traverse Management LLC and other investors are seeking to buy the stock, which isn’t traded publicly, from employees and early shareholders, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the deal is private.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Allianz SE is struggling to buy properties as competition from sovereign-wealth funds and other insurers drives up prices.
 The insurer made its first Italian investment in June and it’s nearing a deal to buy a 50 percent stake in a shopping center in northern Italy.
 He plans to seek approval from the company’s board this year to buy stock in a listed company in one of the countries that share the euro.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp’s talks to buy Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 6 it was in exclusive talks through the end of the month with Wing Hang’s biggest investors to buy the company, which has a market value of HK$36 billion ($46 billion).
 Deals Weil Advises Providence Equity in Cox Enterprise Stake Purchase Cox Enterprises Inc, the Atlanta-based media holding company, agreed to buy back a 25 percent stake in AutoTrader Group from Providence Equity Partners, restoring its full ownership of the e-commerce business.
 UBS AG’s analyst Peter Gastreich raised his rating the company to buy from neutral.
 Dreamliners and then call new bids to buy planes with more than 250 seats amid a boom in domestic traffic.
 Boeing and Airbus Group NV, the world’s two biggest planemakers, both count on Asian airlines to buy more aircraft in the next two decades as economic growth in the region enables more people to take flights.
 The Jakarta-based carrier agreed to buy 230 Boeing 737 planes in 2012 and ordered 234 planes from Airbus in March.
 ‘Ludicrous’ Offer Consumer advocate Ralph Nader, founder of Public Citizen Inc, said today that Malone’s offer to buy out Sirius at $368 is “ludicrous” and urged activist investor Carl Icahn to “take notice and interest” “I am sure that I along with other shareholders in Sirius XM will be interested in a legal challenge to John Malone’s company for lowballing Sirius XM’s shareholder value,” Nader said in a statement.
 International Entertainment agreed to buy a 70 percent stake in Sun City Gaming Promotion Co, it said in a statement to the Hong Kong stock exchange yesterday.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Montagu Private Equity LLP is in exclusive talks to buy the Rexam Plc units offering prescription retail products and devices, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 The worst start to a year for Thai stocks since at least 1988 spurred Aberdeen Asset Management Plc to buy after valuations fell to the lowest levels in 18 months.
 For acquirers, the tax benefits alone probably wouldn’t offset the price it would take to buy Jazz, he said.
 Galeries Lafayette is in advanced talks to buy House of Fraser, the Financial Times reported last month.
 BC Partners agreed to buy the Stockholm-based TV, telephone and broadband operator in July 2011 from US.
 Coupon Credits Qunar’s clients will be able to buy domestic air tickets through Weixin and earn as much as 10 yuan ($165) in coupon credits, according to 86Research.
 Steptoe has more than 500 lawyers and other professionals in offices in Brussels, London, Los Angeles, Phoenix and Washington  Deals Suntory to Buy Beam in $16 Billion Deal to Gain Maker’s Mark Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP is advising Suntory Holdings Ltd, the closely held Japanese whiskey and beer maker that agreed to buy Beam Inc.
 The AMP Capital unit of Austrlia’s largest life insurer and pension manager owns a stake in Melbourne Airport and in November agreed to buy 11 schools in Victoria state from Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc.
 Total SA also has 20 percent and, like CNPC, has agreed to buy cargoes from the project.
 Jazz, which is based in Dublin, agreed last month to buy Villa Guardia, Italy-based Gentium in a tender offer that will expire on Jan.
 analyst Michael Dudas raised the gold producer’s rating to buy from neutral with a 12-month price target of $38 a share.
 20 after Mergermarket, citing unidentified people, said that Dominion is in “advanced stages” of raising more than $10 billion in debt to buy a publicly traded Midwest utility company.
 Less Appealing NiSource also has an electric utility, which won’t appeal to buyers as much as its gas business, according to Bill Bunn, a Cincinnati-based money manager at Fort Washington Investment Advisors Inc, which owns NiSource bonds.
 He didn’t set out to buy the Seahawks, considered by odds makers a slight underdog to the Broncos in the Feb.
 Local politicians approached Allen to buy the team when it threatened to move to California.
 And only accredited investors -- such as large institutions and wealthy individuals -- will be eligible to buy stakes, limiting the pool of potential shareholders.
 oil and gas engineer, agreed earlier this month to buy US-traded Foster Wheeler AG for $32 billion to expand foreign and fuel-product business.
 F&C Asset Management Plc jumped to a 5 1/2-year high as analysts predicted that Bank of Montreal’s offer to buy the company may attract a counterbid.
 Bank of Montreal agreed to buy the manager of the oldest UK.
 The question for the institutions is whether the accounting issue would be a problem for them” Land Rights The company will sell American depositary shares and plans to use the proceeds to buy more land rights, build new warehouses, expand its distribution and make acquisitions, according to the filing.
 Swedbank AB raised its recommendation on the drugmaker to buy from neutral, citing a number of phase-three treatment studies that will help it expand its product offering in the next six to 18 months.
 “While there is certainly a window of opportunity for significant rain, it’s progressively narrowing” The loss of pastures normally used to feed cattle forced ranchers to buy more feed.
 1 that it secured full control in a $435 billion agreement to buy the remaining 415 percent stake from the US.
 agreed to pay less than $200 million to buy Intel Corp’s Internet-television startup, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 Shoppers Biggest The biggest takeovers of 2013 were in retail, led by Loblaw Cos’s July bid to buy Shoppers Drug Mart Corp, Canada’s largest drug-store chain, for $13 billion including debt, the data show.
 Some of the logjam will clear up and those assets may finally get sold” The largest energy deal was Fortis Inc’s bid to buy Tucson, Arizona-based power company UNS Energy Corp.
 India plans to buy 11 million tons of Iranian crude this financial year after the European Union eased its sanctions on insuring cargoes following a six-month accord in November between the Persian Gulf state, the US.
 And only accredited investors -- such as largeinstitutions and wealthy individuals -- will be eligible to buystakes, limiting the pool of potential shareholders.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 lowered its recommendation on the technology-outsourcing company to neutral from overweight, similar to buy.
 When the NSE sought clarification from billionaire Mukesh Ambani’s Reliance Industries regarding a newspaper report that the owner of the world’s largest refining complex was looking to buy a stake owned by Petroliam Nasional Bhd in a $20-billion Venezuela venture, the company said Jan.
 Taxpayer guarantees allowing people with minimal deposits to buy homes costing as much as 600,000 pounds “cannot make sense,” he said.
 SolarCity installs rooftop solar systems for customers who typically pay little to nothing up front and sign long-term contracts to buy the power.
 would probably have to pay more than S$5 a share to buy or take control of Super, said Maybank’s Koh.
 Asahi in 2011 laid out plans to buy assets across Southeast Asia as part of 2015 revenue goals, while Kirin failed in an effort to buy the food and drinks unit of Singapore’s Fraser & Neave Ltd.
 this week agreed to buy Beam Inc, which makes Jim Beam and Maker’s Mark whiskey, for $16 billion.
 Super may be more likely to buy assets than be acquired, said Yeo, the DBS analyst.
 The budget documents indicate that the Navy planned to buy four vessels in 2015, and then two each year in 2016, 2017, and 2018.
 “One of the key themes remains how to buy into Africa and South Africa is the platform.
 Splitting off the newspapers would give Gannett a stronger stock currency to buy more local TV stations, FBR & Co.
 daily newspapers, including the Tallahassee Democrat and Indianapolis Star, agreed in June to buy Belo for about $15 billion, and assume $715 million in debt, to help reduce its dependence on the shrinking print-news business.
 agreed to buy Responsys Inc.
 In Demand ExactTarget and Eloqua Inc, an e-marketing technology company that Oracle agreed to buy in 2012, had other potential suitors, according to regulatory filings.
 “Those guys didn’t all get a chance to buy those assets.
 Part of the enterprise business was already sold in 2011, when Permira Advisers LLP agreed to buy the Genesys call-center software unit for $15 billion.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Dassault Systemes SA, a French developer of 3D design software, agreed to buy US.
 Previously, investors had to buy and sell futures contracts at the same exchange, a process known as the vertical silo model.
 The gauge’s 14-day relative strength index fell to 1991, the lowest level since October 2008 and below the 30 threshold that some traders use as a signal to buy.
 The company has enlisted model Kate Upton and actresses Hannah Simone and Genesis Rodriguez to plug its 3-in-1 ProGlide Styler and issued a “Body Shaving 101” information sheet, which notes that “men often lack guidance when it comes to shaving below the neck” Mecum said “people care more about growing out the upstairs and trimming back the downstairs” Yet he doesn’t plan to buy the product.
 3 lost a court battle with the federal government over the mobile-phone carrier’s request for a judicial review of a decision to limit the amount of wireless spectrum the nation’s largest carriers were allowed to buy in an upcoming auction, the Globe and Mail reported.
 The company’s new, more unified portfolio of ad tools will make it easier for companies to buy and manage promotions across Yahoo’s websites, said Senior Vice President Scott Burke, who also spoke onstage.
 Had it gone ahead, the auction rules would have allowed Verizon as a new entrant to buy up to two of four blocks of spectrum in each region, which would have forced the three Canadian incumbents to fight for the remaining two blocks.
 Goldcorp Inc, the world’s second-largest gold miner, this month bid to buy Osisko Mining Corp.
 Ergen’s lawyers have said the billionaire had the right to buy the debt personally and didn’t want his name to be known because it could have driven up the price.
 Dish Treasurer Jason Kiser, who advised on the debt purchases, testified last week that he didn’t consider whether he was acting for the company or Ergen when he first looked into buying the debt in 2011.
 The company agreed to buy UK-based NaturalMotion Ltd.
 Citigroup raised its rating on the company to buy from neutral as the brokerage turned bullish on the mining sector for the first time in three years.
 agreed to buy Weyerhaeuser Co’s residential real estate unit in a deal valued at about $27 billion.
 Aveva Group Plc soared 65 percent 2,261 pence, its largest increase in almost six months, as UBS AG upgraded the stock to buy from neutral, citing better value.
 SAP Upgrade SAP AG gained 17 percent to 6255 euros after UBS raised its rating on the German maker of enterprise-resource-planning software to buy from neutral.
 “By investing in education you’re actually creating a better business environment, you’re increasing the potential income of consumers who will be able to buy products and services” Agrarian Economy Siemens’ South Africa unit says it spends 1 percent of its annual sales on social welfare initiatives and 95 percent of that goes into education.
 The Pretoria-based company gave the CFO a 6 million-rand ($555,000) loan to buy shares in the company while he was being probed for misconduct.
 This month, Total SA of France agreed to buy a 40 percent stake in the Gainsborough Trough in eastern England in which IGas has a 145 percent holding.
 Liberty Global attempted to buy Kabel Deutschland Holding AG, a German cable company, and was outbid by Vodafone Group Plc.
 Those changes stem from increases in the value of the firm’s debt, on the theory that it would be more expensive to buy back the securities.
 “Even if you have a good job, it’s very likely you can’t afford to buy a place in the city” Calling income inequality “the defining challenge of our time,” US.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP and Latham & Watkins LLP worked on Carlyle Group LP’s agreement to buy the Ortho Clinical unit of Johnson & Johnson for $415 billion.
 (CHTR) offered to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 The company has a growing business in the French West Indies and Caribbean and agreed to buy Orange SA’s Dominican Republic unit in November last year for $14 billion after reaching a deal for fixed-line operator Tricom SA in the country a month earlier.
 India, Asia’s third-largest economy, in 2012 permitted foreign airlines to buy as much as 49 percent stakes in local carriers, reversing a decade-old rule and luring investments from Malaysia’s AirAsia Bhd.
 In November 2000, they teamed up to buy 40 percent in state-run carrier Air India that government was divesting.
 “On my side of the aisle, Republicans need to resist the temptation to buy the misleading narrative that TPA would simply give away the store to the Obama administration,” Senator Jeff Flake, an Arizona Republican who supports fast track, said during a Dec.
 Why is Carl Icahn turning his attention from small situations where he can amass big, sometimes controlling, stakes and exert his will, to big brand-name companies such as Apple and EBay where he has to win public relations campaigns through nothing more than the force of his arguments and the careful editing of his tweets? (And where one obvious activist tool -- pushing the company to sell itself, or trying to buy it himself -- is pretty unrealistic.
 The Bank of Japan offered to buy 900 billion yen ($86 billion) in government bonds from market today.
 Irish Developers Bank of Ireland and IBRC’s predecessor, Anglo Irish Bank Corp, combined to lend more than 200 million euros ($273 million) to a group of Irish developers to buy and refurbish the Shelbourne in 2004, CoStar Finance reported last month.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Twitter Inc, the microblogging service that went public last year, agreed to buy 900 patents from International Business Machines Corp.
 Freed from the need to buy Shuanghui’s Campofrio holdings, Sigma would only have to spend about 116 million euros more for the remaining shares after buying a stake of more than 45 percent for about 310 million euros in 2013, Santander analysts led by Luis Miranda said in a Dec.
 “They could use it to buy another company or invest in another project” Bolanos estimated before the Shuanghui agreement that Alfa would raise about 114 billion pesos ($871 million) in a Sigma IPO.
 “They need to come into the market in greater numbers because they have to buy properties before sellers can move up” Home prices probably will rise about 53 percent in 2014, half the pace of 2013, according to the Realtors association.
 Google earlier this month said it was spending $32 billion in cash to buy Nest Labs Inc, the digital thermostat maker led by former Apple Inc.
 He’s accused of misrepresenting the asking price from sellers of residential mortgage-backed securities to buyers and vice versa, keeping the difference for Jefferies, Connecticut US.
 claims Merrill Lynch International didn’t reveal the true nature of a “highly unusual” deal in which the Portuguese company agreed to buy shares in Saipem SpA that were being sold on behalf of BlackRock Inc, according to Amorim’s documents from a London court hearing today.
 Amorim agreed to buy 150,000 Saipem shares on Jan.
 Paying Cash At the Allsop auction, about half of the bidders paid with cash as they fought to buy about 26 million euros of Irish real estate, mostly from receivers acting for banks, according to Robert Hoban, Allsop’s director of auctions.
 Contracts to buy previously owned houses fell 87 percent in December from the previous month as abnormally cold weather in much of the US.
 “This process, which involves consultation with affected companies and other stakeholders is ongoing and he will make further announcements when appropriate” In 2011, China Investment Corp, the nation’s sovereign wealth fund, agreed to buy 25 percent of Shanduka for 2 billion rand.
 “We want to offer them the possibility to buy new products and access their banking information online” The stores already carry a range of goods, such as DVD players, “Angry Birds” plush toys and spicy tamarind candy.
 in October said the software provider “is well positioned to record sector leading revenue in an improving demand scenario” and upgraded the company to buy.
 Bond Offers Ziggo offered to buy back 750 million euros of 3625 percent bonds due March 2020 at 1015 cents on the euro, according to the filing.
 The company has the right to buy back the senior secured bonds in March at 10306 cents on the euro.
 Citigroup upgraded its rating on the company to buy from neutral.
 Morgan Stanley upgraded the UK’s largest publicly traded water supplier to overweight, a rating similar to buy, from equal weight.
 Michael Linenberg, a Deutsche Bank AG analyst, raised his rating on JetBlue shares late yesterday to buy from hold.
 The billionaire has used funds from insurance units including Geico to buy stocks and make acquisitions.
 Largest Investment Senrigan started to buy Sundance shares in 2011 and the company was once one of its largest investments, said a person with knowledge of the matter in April last year.
 Michael Iavarone, a former penny stock broker on Wall Street who bought champion racehorse Big Brown, announced plans in 2008 to raise $100 million for a hedge fund to buy and sell racehorses.
 “Many people would be attracted to buy because they think it’s a good price, but the market is a long way from getting heated again” Builders New World Development Ltd.
 The former British colony is the most expensive city to buy a home, according to a Savills survey published in September that included New York, London and Tokyo.
 Vitol agreed in 2011 to buy the bulk of Shell’s downstream business in 14 African countries, alongside Africa-focused private equity firm Helios Investment Partners LLP, for about $1 billion.
 Australia’s Macquarie Capital agreed in August to buy 45 percent of Singapore’s Helios Terminal Corp.
 Mitsubishi UFJ in July offered to buy a majority stake in Thailand’s Bank of Ayudhya for $56 billion.
 Sumitomo Mitsui struck a deal to buy 40 percent of Indonesia’s PT Bank Tabungan Pensiunan Nasional for about $15 billion in May.
 to buy the Hong Kong-based bank in what would be its largest acquisition.
 “The board can take the offers seriously, if we’re sure whatever we’re going to buy will happen” San Miguel, which started making beer eight years before the Philippines declared independence from Spain in 1898, has boosted revenue fivefold to $20 billion in five years.
 Japan’s Kirin Holdings Co, which holds about 48 percent of the San Miguel Brewery unit, hasn’t offered to buy the remaining stake, Ang said.
 “The price of San Miguel is low, but if you are not selling like me, I should be very happy because I will have more opportunity to buy.
 Three large investors have offered to buy part of that stake in SMC Global, which accounts for a quarter of the Philippines’ generation capacity, he said.
 13 it agreed to buy Beam Inc.
 San Miguel isn’t in talks to buy a stake in broadcaster GMA Network Inc, Ang said, declining to elaborate.
 Ang offered to buy at least 30 percent of GMA, the Philippine Daily Inquirer reported on Jan.
 Congo’s government paid $150 million to buy it back last year, according to le Soft, a Kinshasa-based newspaper.
 in January 2013 to buy 98 percent of Aviva Plc and CIMB Group Holdings Bhd’s Malaysian insurance joint venture for 18 billion Malaysian ringgit.
 Home Secretary Theresa May proposed more than 50 amendments to her own legislation, including one aimed at terrorists that will allow the government to revoke someone’s citizenship if they gained it through naturalization, and their behavior has been “seriously prejudicial to the vital interests of the UK” The opposition Labour Party claimed the clause was an attempt to buy off rebels.
 agreed to buy the company.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Colleen Brady never had much interest in owning stocks until she received an e-mail offering the chance to buy shares last month in the initial public offering of movie-theater owner AMC Entertainment Holdings Inc.
 Loyal3 also allows retail investors to buy and sell shares of public companies, such as Amazoncom Inc.
 Eleven banks offered 18 billion euros to buy EDF’s power and Exeltium, which needs to refinance that in 2014, is seeking new terms from the utility in coming months, Roncato says.
 of Nigeria to buy lenders’ bad debts.
 The REIT may approach Keppel Land Ltd, its biggest shareholder, to buy Keppel Land’s stake in the city’s Marina Bay Financial Centre Tower 3, she said.
 The statement means AT&T cannot bid to buy a stake of 30 percent or more in the European operator for the next six months, according to UK.
 Meijer Inc, a Grand Rapids, Michigan-based family-owned retailer, agreed to buy the remaining 1,200 tickets to today’s National Football League playoff game between the Colts and Kansas City Chiefs at Lucas Oil Stadium in Indianapolis and distribute them to local military families, Colts owner Jim Irsay said on Twitter.
 8, the fund offered to buy Riverbed for $19 a share, valuing the business at $308 billion.
 Massachusetts Model The pattern of enrollment when Massachusetts opened the state insurance exchange that is the model for Obamacare’s online marketplaces suggests younger and healthier people will be the most likely to wait until the deadline to buy insurance, Mendelson said.
 In focus groups, young people were open to buying insurance once they learned plans could be found on the exchanges for $100 a month or less, with subsidies.
 Public Unaware Sixty-nine percent of uninsured adults aren’t aware that subsidies are available to buy insurance, according to a study conducted last month by the research firm PerryUndem for Enroll America.
 agreed to buy airwaves from Verizon Wireless for about $24 billion in cash as part of a spectrum swap that will give both companies more network capacity in areas where they need it.
 Maxim Group LLC raised it to buy from hold on Jan.
 Marks & Spencer Group Plc rose 26 percent as Exane BNP Paribas advised investors to buy the shares.
 Clothing retailer Lojas Renner SA climbed after Banco BTG Pactual raised its recommendation to buy.
 Brewer Ambev SA added 32 percent to 1733 after Morgan Stanley raised its recommendation on the stock to buy.
 “They will give people a better chance to buy homes and a better chance to keep those homes, and they will force mortgage lenders and servicers to compete by offering better rates and customer service, not by tricking and trapping people.
 Some of Takano’s constituents have complained the investors are making it harder to buy properties.
 agreed to buy a 20 percent stake in Chinese premium car distributor Zhongsheng Group Holdings Ltd.
 Indian Oil, which has an accord to buy 24,000 barrels a day from Iran in the year ending March 31, halted purchases after importing in the first quarter of the fiscal year.
 The South Asian nation planned to buy 11 million tons of Iranian crude this fiscal year after the European Union eased its sanction on insuring cargoes following a six-month accord between the Persian Gulf state, the US.
 The company plans to buy 4 million tons from Iran this financial year and increase purchases next year, he said.
 company to buy as much as $10 billion a year in generic drugs for distribution, compared with $6 billion to $7 billion on its own.
 “Opportunistic funds like KKR are coming back and funds like Blackstone and Carlyle are continuing to buy,” Gerard said.
 The company has a growing business in the French West Indies and Caribbean and agreed to buy Orange SA’s Dominican Republic unit in November for $14 billion after reaching a deal for fixed-line operator Tricom SA in the country a month earlier.
 last year for $16 billion and is nearing a deal to buy Dutch broadband provider Ziggo NV, people with knowledge of the matter have said.
 Altice was asked if it wanted to buy Royal KPN NV’s Belgian unit, BASE, before the Dutch owner canceled the sale, Goei said.
 agreed to buy ING Securities Investment & Trust Co.
 Fiat SpA shares surged 16 percent after the carmaker agreed to buy the remaining stake in Chrysler Group LLC that it doesn’t already own.
 Hitachi in October 2012 agreed to buy Horizon Nuclear Power, which proposes to build as many as six new nuclear reactors at two UK.
 Mulligan claims in court papers he went to visit a licensed medical marijuana dispensary in Eagle Rock to buy gel caps containing tetrahydrocannabinol, the active ingredient of marijuana.
 Mizuho, which lags behind Mitsubishi UFJ and Sumitomo Mitsui in Southeast Asian takeovers, is facing a deadlock in talks to buy a stake in PT Bank Pan Indonesia, people familiar with the matter said last week.
 Berkshire agreed to buy the assets of MyAssist Inc, a concierge and personal-assistant service, from Noel Group, according to a statement today from a unit of Buffett’s Omaha, Nebraska-based company.
 In 2010 the company agreed to buy offices from PNC Financial Services Group Inc.
 Bank of America raised its recommendation to buy from neutral, citing potential for increased earnings amid a restructuring.
 No Blackouts The Colts’ game today against the Kansas City Chiefs sold out yesterday after Meijer Inc, a Grand Rapids, Michigan-based superstore, agreed to buy the remaining 1,200 tickets.
 Green Bay season-ticket holders were offered a chance to buy tickets throughout the playoffs during the third week of November, with the money applied to next season if the team failed to reach the postseason or didn’t play at home, according to the Milwaukee Journal Sentinel.
 “In Green Bay, a lot of it has to do with season ticket holders opting not to buy when they had their chance,” Matcovich said.
 To convince motorists, it offered to buy back its Manza sedan at 60 percent of the purchase price after three years.
 raised the drugstore chain to buy.
 Avianca Brasil Chief Executive Officer Jose Efromovich said today in Sao Paulo that the airline is still in talks with the plane maker to buy about 30 aircrafts.
 Perez said that while he was “very satisfied” with the government’s economic reforms, he was concerned that “protectionist rules” forcing China’s state-owned enterprises to buy domestically produced equipment could drive foreign companies away.
 must pay for the 150,000 Saipem shares it agreed to buy from Merrill in January 2013, Judge Nicholas Hamblen said today in London, granting the bank’s request for an early ruling without trial.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- While young consumers may not be as passionate about cars as their parents, most still plan to buy or lease one within the next three years, according to a new study.
 to buy a stake in Dong Energy A/S might be renegotiated after local pension funds tried to raise a counter-bid.
 Goldman is trying to buy an 18 percent stake in state-controlled Dong, which needs fresh equity after losing money on failed natural gas bets.
 “Homes which were previously sold at a heavy discount are no longer fetching a fraction of their value; this is probably causing the index to overstate home price appreciation” Contracts to buy previously owned homes rose 02 percent in November, the first increase in six months, after a 12 percent drop in October that was larger than initially reported, the National Association of Realtors said on Dec.
 BHP Billiton rose 38 percent to 1,860 pence after Citigroup upgraded the shares to buy from neutral.
 Vodafone last year agreed to buy Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for 75 billion euros to add to its fixed-line network in Germany.
 “In order to build your business you need to keep your eyes and ears open to buy small brands that consumers already like that are not being focused on,” he said.
 New York-based Blackstone invested or committed $33 billion for distressed European mortgages and properties in 2013, while Apollo raised $54 billion to buy mainly nonperforming loans in Europe, according to a Nov.
 Verizon, based in New York, announced the deal to buy out Vodafone’s 45 percent stake in September.
 He is proposing that the company commit to buying back at least $50 billion worth of shares in fiscal 2014, something that Apple is recomending investors vote against.
 The European Union is encouraging airlines to buy cleaner fuels with a cap on greenhouse gas emissions.
 The statement means AT&T can’t offer to buy Vodafone or a stake of 30 percent or more in the company for the next six months, according to UK.
 It acquired Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for more than $10 billion in October and is seeking to buy Grupo Corporativo ONO SA, the Spanish cable operator that is preparing for an initial public offering, two people familiar with the matter said.
 takeover rules, AT&T’s statement means it can’t offer to buy Vodafone or a stake of 30 percent or more in the company for the next six months, except under certain conditions.
 Those include Vodafone’s board agreeing that AT&T’s statement is ignored, another company offering to buy Vodafone, or authorities deciding that there has been a material change of circumstances.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, overhaul then sell them, and return the funds with a profit after about 10 years.
 JSW, owned by Sajjan Jindal, is seeking to buy Stemcor assets and has submitted a second-round bid, Seshagiri Rao, joint managing director of the nation’s third-largest steelmaker, said today in Mumbai.
 agreed to buy NuPathe Inc.
 13, the last trading day before Endo said it had agreed to buy the company.
 Here: Regulators are investigating whether traders exploited the murky pricing around residential mortgage-backed securities from around 2009 through 2011 to buy or sell the investments at artificially depressed or inflated values, the people close to the inquiry said.
 It is generally illegal for traders to misrepresent to investors aspects of a transaction that are important enough to affect the decision to buy or sell.
 So what aspects of a mortgage-backed security "are important enough to affect the decision to buy or sell"? A conventional answer would be something like "the creditworthiness of the underlying borrowers, the values of the homes used as collateral, etc" And there've been lots of lawsuits about banks that misrepresented those sorts of things in the pre-crisis period and have gotten in bad trouble1 But in 2009 that was sort of a dumb answer.
 Who's to say what a thinly traded busted subprime security is "worth"? What mattered was the price at which banks were willing to buy or sell those securities.
 24 it agreed to buy the 5001 percent stake in Celesio held by Franz Haniel & Cie GmbH, a family-owned investment company, for 23 euros a share, and begin a tender offer for the remaining publicly traded shares at the same price.
 The partners at his fund have pooled personal assets, not those of the hedge fund, to buy Bitcoins.
 Teva said last week it agreed to buy NuPathe Inc.
 “We always want to buy technology,” he said.
 “I would use these recent small declines to buy the bonds as the debate is only white noise,” Jens H.
 yesterday raised its rating for the company to buy from reduced as it predicted that earnings would almost double in 2014.
 Banorte, which begantelling investors to buy the securities on Jan.
 Mexico had kept the sales tax along the border lower thanthe rest of the nation for decades to give consumers incentiveto buy products at home rather than cross into Texas,California, Arizona and New Mexico, where the rates are lowerIn the Caribbean and Pacific coast states, the lower tax ratehad been used to entice tourists to spend at stores, hotels andrestaurants.
 Last year, founder Leonard Riggio, 72, announced his intention to buy the company’s stores and website.
 LCI, owned by New York-based Libra Group, entered the helicopter market in 2012 when it committed to spend as much as $400 million to buy a fleet of Finmeccanica SpA AgustaWestland choppers.
 LCI has placed helicopters with operators including Malaysia’s Weststar Aviation Services, in which KKR agreed to buy a stake of about $200 million last year, and Avincis Group, parent of Bond Offshore Helicopters.
 Bank first offered to buy larger peer Men’s Wearhouse for $23 billion.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- SSAB, a Swedish steelmaker, offered to buy Finnish rival Rautaruukki Oyj for 101 billion kronor ($156 billion) to cut costs and improve competitiveness.
 Oman Investment Fund also agreed to buy a stake for HK$3875 million.
 In June, a group of Li companies including Power Assets agreed to buy Dutch waste processor AVR Afvalverwerking BV for 9437 million euros ($13 billion).
 Investor Accord Bank of America has agreed to pay $500 million to settle securities law claims by investors who said they were misled into buying Countrywide’s mortgage-backed securities.
 Sharp will also continue seeking partners to buy a stake in itself, President Kozo Takahashi told reporters in Osaka yesterday.
 Technology companies formed Rockstar to buy bankrupt Nortel’s patents in 2011.
 agreed to buy the Motorola Mobility mobile-phone business from the owner of the world’s largest search engine for $291 billion.
 DNB ASA upgraded the shares to buy from hold, saying earnings growth at the second-largest truckmaker will become stronger in the second half of 2014.
 Hargreaves Lansdown Plc gained 16 percent to 1,508 pence after Morgan Stanley raised its recommendation on the shares to overweight, similar to buy, from equal weight, citing the potential for higher earnings in 2014 and 2015.
 “It’s still a bargain to buy pork and chicken compared to beef,” Quiter said.
 “We are open to buying more operators for reasons such as adding a new brand, for lack of distribution or because of the economics of a deal,” Sorenson said in an interview yesterday at the Americas Lodging Investment Summit in Los Angeles.
 agreed to buy airwaves from Verizon Wireless for about $24 billion.
 T-Mobile agreed to buy airwaves from Verizon Wireless for about $24 billion in cash as part of a spectrum swap that will give both companies more network capacity in areas where they need it.
 Anworth has already repurchased at least 28 million shares in the fourth quarter and last month announced board approval to buy back as many as 5 million more.
 Goldstein called Ulm repeatedly, urging him to buy back stock, even after Javelin’s board authorized Oct.
 ‘Meaningful Value’ The firm is committed to buying back stock while it’s trading at a discount, which “can generate meaningful shareholder value without increasing risk,” President Gary Kain said on an Oct.
 climbed 18 percent as it agreed to buy Aptalis Pharma for $29 billion.
 Forest Laboratories climbed 18 percent to $6930 after it agreed to buy Aptalis, a closely held company whose shareholders include investment firm TPG Capital, to expand in gastrointestinal and cystic fibrosis treatments.
 HSBC said in July it would keep its Monaco private bank after reviewing interest to buy the unit.
 Lloyds Banking Group Plc, Britain’s biggest mortgage lender, sold its international private-banking business in May to Swiss wealth manager Union Bancaire Privee, which agreed to buy ABN Amro Bank NV’s Swiss private-banking business for an undisclosed sum in 2011.
 to $3 billion, adding to one of his biggest holdings as he continues to push the iPhone maker to buy back more stock.
 Apple then recommended investors vote against Icahn’s proposal that the company commit to buying back at least $50 billion worth of shares in fiscal 2014.
 The industry used to exceed 16 million sales per year “only by way of very heavy incentives to get people to buy cars,” Casesa said.
 1 it had reached a $435 billion deal with a union trust to buy all Chrysler stock that the Turin, Italy-based company doesn’t already own.
 Agarwal in March 2012 offered 170 billion rupees ($28 billion) to buy the Indian government’s remaining stakes in Udaipur, Rajasthan-based Hindustan Zinc and Balco.
 In 2010, Vedanta’s plan to buy Anglo American Plc’s Skorpion zinc mine in Namibia through Hindustan Zinc failed after the Indian government didn’t ratify the deal.
 American ordered 130 of the current-version A320 series planes to be leased, and agreed to buy directly another 130 of the upgraded A320neo versions.
 Rogers and its main competitor, BCE Inc, are vying to buy TV programming and repackage it for online and mobile sale.
 It stems from increases in the value of the company’s debt, on the theory it would be more expensive to buy it back.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Lindsay Corp, a manufacturer of irrigation equipment that farmers use to conserve water and energy, plans to buy back $100 million to $150 million in stock and said the company would double its dividend.
 Goldman’s European merchant banking unit is seeking to buy an 18 percent stake in state-controlled Dong, a utility in need of new equity after losing money on failed natural gas bets.
 took its fight to buy Jos.
 Sanofi, which owns about 16 percent of Regeneron, retains the ability to buy as much as 30 percent of the company.
 Comcast also is near a deal to buy cable systems in New York City, New England and North Carolina from Charter Communications Inc, if Charter succeeds in its takeover bid for Time Warner Cable Inc, people with knowledge of the matter said yesterday.
 At Franklin, he ran a global bond fund and said he was the first mutual-fund investor to buy securities issued by Mexico after it defaulted and restructured its debt.
 Investors from insurers and pension funds to buyout firms last year spent the most on German offices, stores and warehouses since 2007, broker Savills Plc estimates.
 In December, Blackstone agreed to buy three warehouse properties in Germany for about 100 million euros, a person with knowledge of the matter said.
 ThyssenKrupp AG added 15 percent after Swedish steelmaker SSAB AB offered to buy Finland’s Rautaruukki Oyj to cut its costs and improve competitiveness.
 BlackRock Inc, the world’s biggest money manager, said late last year it’s seizing an opportunity to buy Turkish stocks after the turmoil drove down prices.
 last year tried to buy the company for about $3 billion, people familiar with the matter have said.
 Fiat rose the most in almost five years in Milan trading after Sergio Marchionne, chief executive officer of Chrysler and its Italian parent, struck an accord to buy a 415 percent stake from a United Auto Workers retiree health-care trust.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Itau Unibanco Holding SA, Latin America’s biggest bank by market value, agreed to buy control of Chile’s Corpbanca for at least $22 billion in cash and stock.
 The extra yield, or spread, investors demand to buy Corpbanca’s $800 million bonds due 2018 instead of US.
 The merged bank will have 66 percent in Banco Corpbanca Colombia and will offer to buy the remaining stake for $894 million.
 There, Marchionne struck a deal to buy the 415 percent stake in Chrysler held by the UAW trust.
 It would cost Kamuloni 60 percent of his monthly security-guard salary of 15,000 kwacha ($3493) to buy a 50-kilogram (110-pound) bag of corn flour, enough to feed his family for a month.
 3 it planned to buy 150,000 tons of white corn from South Africa in addition to 150,000 tons from Zambia.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- South African Airways is in talks to buy a stake in Senegal Airlines as the continent’s biggest carrier seeks to counter expansion strategies at competitors Ethiopian Airlines Enterprise and Kenya Airways Ltd.
 The carmaker will issue as many as 241 million shares, including an overallotment of 2325 million shares, for 1,120 yen each and use the proceeds to buy back preferred stock held by companies that rescued the Tokyo-based carmaker, according to a filing yesterday.
 Billionaire Li Ka-shing’s Hutchison agreed in June to buy O2, Ireland’s No.
 Last year, in what Peltz called a Plan A, he urged PepsiCo to buy Mondelez and spin off PepsiCo’s beverages business.
 A press official for America Movil declined to comment on whether the company would continue aggressive buybacks and whether it would seek to buy part or all of Tim.
 Canpotex Ltd, the offshore marketing agent for Potash Corp, Mosaic and Agrium, agreed to sell 700,000 tons of potash to buyers in China in the first half of this year, according to a Jan.
 Coming on the heels of the slowest year for alcoholic beverages deals in almost two decades, beermaker Anheuser-Busch InBev NV announced it would spend $58 billion to buy back Korea’s Oriental Brewery.
 The Japanese company offered to buy India’s United Spirits Ltd.
 Diageo failed to buy the Jose Cuervo brand from Mexico’s Beckmann family, its owners, saying in December 2012 that they were unable to agree on the price.
 It agreed to an option to buy back the maker of Cass beer five years later at pre-agreed terms of 11 times earnings before interest, taxation, depreciation and amortization, according to people familiar with the 2009 transaction.
 “All institutional investors we’ve met have told us it’s great we’re doing this in Prague because they have a lot of clients who want to buy a new Czech stock” Trading in Prague is dominated by shares of banks and energy companies, with no brewer currently listed.
 in Toronto, unlikely to buy the shares unless the price dips.
 Homeowners will get solar systems with SunPower panels at little to no upfront cost by agreeing to buy the electricity through long-term contracts, the San Jose, California-based company said today in a statement.
 Enterprise demand is being driven in part by Microsoft Corp’s plan to end support for its 13-year-old Windows XP operating system in April, compelling businesses to buy new PCs along with software upgrades.
 agreed to buy businesses making equipment used to grow cell lines and purify DNA from Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc.
 Thermo Fisher, the world’s biggest supplier of lab testing equipment by market value, agreed to sell the businesses in November to help get European regulatory approval for its $136 billion deal to buy Life Technologies Corp, which makes genetic testing and mapping equipment.
 Waertsilae also said that talks to buy all of the company are no longer active.
 The British company teamed up with Daimler AG to buy Germany’s Tognum AG in 2011 to gain the world’s second-biggest manufacturer of high-speed diesel engines for the marine, energy and defense industries.
 Finance Minister Bjarne Corydon has said Denmark must back the deal to avoid “gambling” with Dong’s future after some lawmakers questioned the bid and a former prime minister called Goldman a “shady partner” “We want to buy shares to defend our stake in Dong if the finance committee approves the agreement with Goldman, ATP and PFA,” Gert Vinther Joergensen, chief financial officer of Syd Energi A/S, said by phone.
 An unidentified southeast Asian company wants to buy as many as 1,600 Telkom mobile towers with a plan to build another 8,400 towers, the news website said today.
 PPF agreed to buy a controlling stake in Telefonica Czech for about $34 billion from Spain’s Telefonica, returning the country’s biggest phone company to local ownership after eight years.
 that failure to meet obligations to buy clean electricity by March 31 would lead to the daily penalty.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Barclays Plc and UBS AG are telling investors to buy Bezeq shares even as the Israeli government says a planned shakeup of the telecommunications industry may cost the company more than half a million customers.
 Analysts are split on Bezeq’s stock, with five recommending to buy, five to sell, and three to hold, according to a Bloomberg survey.
 Alpha Investment Partners Ltd, a unit of Singapore-based Keppel Land Ltd, is among overseas firms interested to buy in Japan.
 CLSA Capital Partners, which has $26 billion under management including real estate, is also seeking to buy, said Tokyo-based Hirotaka Uchiyama, head of Japan for Fudo Capital, manager of CLSA’s Asian real estate investment funds.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- AerCap Holdings NV’s $5 billion deal last month to buy International Lease Finance Corp.
 I don’t think you’ll see a lot more consolidation, it’s hard to do” AerCap’s agreement to buy Los Angeles-based ILFC from insurer American International Group Inc, which gets a 46 percent stake in the merged business, will create a lessor with 1,329 planes, narrowing the gap to General Electric Co-owned market leader Gecas, which has 1,635 aircraft.
 spent $11 billion to buy Oaktree Capital Group LLC’s Jackson Square Aviation, and Babcock & Brown Aircraft Management sold a 50 percent stake to Canada’s Onex Corp.
 OUE Ltd, the Singapore developer that last year agreed to buy California’s tallest building, is weighing investments in New York and Miami as it branches into the US.
 Property companies in Hong Kong and Singapore, the most-expensive Asian cities to buy a luxury residence, are venturing overseas as governments enact tighter lending restrictions and local mortgage rates are set to rise.
 They’ll recognize Petrobras, BNDES, but they won’t be willing to buy high-yield names” ‘Offers Value’ Caracas-based multinational Corporacion Andina de Fomento, which provides international financial services to support economic development in Latin America, issued 275 million Swiss francs ($303 million) of securities due 2024 earlier this week.
 Tiger Air will nominate Cebu Air to buy the remaining 60 percent stake in Southeast Asian from other shareholders, the airline said in the statement.
 That’s prompted acquisitions such as network-equipment maker Cisco Systems Inc’s deal in October to buy Sourcefire Inc.
 QPI also teamed up with Centrica Plc in April to buy gas fields in Canada from Suncor Energy Inc.
 Qatar used income from rising LNG sales in the past few years to buy stakes in Barclays Plc, the UK’s second-biggest bank, and Volkswagen AG, Europe’s largest automobile maker.
 said it failed to gain support from enough shareholders to enable it to buy the German drug wholesaler.
 The company agreed last month to pay $290 million to buy out its partners in Hess Wilco Holdings, in which it held a 44 percent stake.
 While pot prices doubled after people waited in line to buy legal marijuana earlier this month in Colorado, retailers that previously supplied only medical marijuana face rising costs from licensing and compliance requirements, according to Brooke Gehring, owner of Patients Choice of Colorado, a four-shop chain.
 “We’re not ruling anything out” Discovery will increase its stake in Societe Television Francaise 1’s Eurosport to 51 percent from 20 percent, with a possibility to buy the rest of it should TF1 exercise a put option over the remaining 49 percent, the companies said in a joint statement yesterday.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Bank of Montreal agreed to buy F&C Asset Management Plc, the manager of the oldest UK.
 Authentic Brands agreed to buy Juicy’s intellectual property for $195 million, Fifth & Pacific said in a statement Oct.
 The company said it plans to buy back another $5 billion shares in 2014.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Suntory Holdings Ltd, the Japanese whiskey and soft-drinks company controlled by billionaire Nobutada Saji, offered to buy out the entire Whyte & Mackay business from United Spirits Ltd, CNBC TV18 reported today, citing people it didn’t identify.
 13 agreed to pay $16 billion to buy Beam Inc, to gain brands such as Maker’s Mark whiskey and create the world’s third-largest premium spirits company.
 After starting up PetroTiger in Colombia in 2007, Sigelman joined a group of investors to buy the Atlantic, Gulf & Pacific Co.
 Sergio Marchionne, Chief Executive Officer of Chrysler and its Italian parent Fiat SpA, struck a deal with workers earlier this month to buy a 415 percent stake of the carmaker from the trust.
 Last February, company founder Leonard Riggio, 72, who is also the chain’s chairman and largest shareholder, announced his intention to buy Barnes & Noble’s website and physical stores.
 Owners in Gassled, Norway’s gas-pipeline network, have said they would refuse to buy stakes in Polarled from the oil companies building it after the country’s new government maintained plans to cut the tariffs operators can charge for gas transportation by as much as 90 percent.
 Accumulators commit investors to buy securities at preset prices for a specified time.
 CVCI Stakes Rohatyn, which is interviewing advisers to manage the sales process, is exploring a deal in response to increasing market demand to buy private-equity holdings through the secondary market, said one of the people familiar with the matter.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Groupe Lactalis SA, the maker of President brand cheeses, agreed to buy Indian dairy producer Tirumala Milk Products Pvt.
 India’s cabinet in October approved a proposal by Abu Dhabi-based Etihad Airways to buy a 24 percent stake in Jet, paving the way for the first share sale by a carrier in the Asian nation to a foreign airline since restrictions were eased.
 Diageo, the maker of Johnnie Walker whisky and Smirnoff vodka, agreed last year to buy a controlling stake in Mallya’s United Spirits.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Industrial & Commercial Bank of China Ltd, the world’s most profitable lender, agreed to buy control of Standard Bank Group Ltd’s markets unit to expand in trading spanning commodities and interest rates to currencies.
 The option becomes available two years after the deal is completed and if ICBC takes up the right, Standard Bank can require the lender to buy the remaining stake.
 China also approved an 80 billion yuan ($132 billion) quota for investors in London to buy onshore assets, Osborne said at that time in a move aimed at bolstering the Asian nation’s efforts to internationalize the renminbi and helping London further its ambition to become Europe’s leading offshore yuan hub.
 “These officers absolutely didn’t do anything wrong” Mulligan, 54, testified at trial about the “pure fear” he experienced the night in May 2012 when he was trying to run from the two officers, who he said took him to a motel against his will after he went to buy some cannabis gel caps at a medical marijuana dispensary.
 company to buy as much as $10 billion a year in generic drugs for distribution, compared with $6 billion to $7 billion on its own.
 24 it agreed to buy the 5001 percent stake in Celesio held by Franz Haniel & Cie GmbH, a family-owned investment company, for 23 euros a share, and begin a tender offer for the remaining publicly traded shares at the same price.
 Since Walgreen Co’s 2012 deal to buy 45 percent of Alliance Boots, the owner of the largest UK.
 6 it was in exclusive talks with Wing Hang’s biggest shareholders to buy the bank in what would be its largest acquisition, surpassing the $28 billion OCBC paid in 2001 for Keppel Capital Holdings Ltd.
 If you want to buy something online with your Visa card for $1,000, Visa (and some banks) does that work, but it doesn't explicitly charge you a fee.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Oando Plc, a Nigerian oil producer and fuel retailer, raised $163 billion to buy ConocoPhillips’s assets in the country as foreign energy explorers retreat.
 GDF Chief Executive Officer Gerard Mestrallet said at a press conference in Paris that GDF hadn’t bid to buy the Canadian oil and gas producer.
 Pushing coffee is “probably a good idea if they can get their customer to buy more of it,” said Peter Saleh, a New York-based analyst at Telsey Advisory Group.
 added 24 percent after agreeing to buy digital-thermostat maker Nest Labs Inc.
 was boosted to buy from neutral by Goldman Sachs.
 As Miami home prices are the highest since 2008, the extra yield investors demand to buy Miami general obligations rather than benchmark munis has decreased, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The rebound is being led by overseas residents who flocked to the city to buy discounted condos after the property crash and have since financed new construction, said Peter Zalewski, owner of Condo Vultures LLC, a Miami-based brokerage and consulting firm.
 Yelp, the service for online restaurant and business reviews, is succeeding at getting advertisers to buy their promotions in most US.
 He has said he made no “falserepresentations” about the purchases and has called the suit anattempt to derail his offer to buy LightSquared’s assets.
 In 2008, Dish sought to buy spectrum of the satellitecommunications company DBSD North America.
 The small-cap measure has gotten a boost from rule changes that require investors to have existing stock holdings before participating in IPOs and allow insurers to buy shares of smaller companies.
 Citigroup upgraded its rating on the company to buy from neutral.
 “We hope to be able to have the first patient in phase three in the summer” Novartis AG is considering whether to buy the rights to the product from Illkirch, France-based Transgene, which stands to get as much as 700 million euros ($951 million) from the deal.
 Goldman Sachs raised its rating on the stock to buy from neutral, and boosted its target price to 570 yen from 485 yen.
 Pension funds and insurance companies like to buy long-dated securities to match their liabilities while utilities can align the debt with their industrial assets.
 “Times come round when 100-year bonds make sense because that’s what investors want to buy,” said Bill Blain, a strategist at Mint Partners Ltd.
 “Many other shareholders, they want to buy more, so it’s not difficult” PetroVietnam Fertilizer shares dropped 07 percent to 46,200 at the close in Ho Chi Minh City.
 BNP is also in talks with Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc to buy the British lender’s equity derivatives and retail structured products unit.
 Hayman Capital In September, the company announced an effort to buy almost half of the United Auto Workers retiree health-care trust’s preferred shares, which paid a 9 percent annual interest, and replacing it with a bond offering.
 Brian Johnson, an auto analyst for Barclays Plc, has said that GM has sufficient cash and liquidity to pay an annual dividend of 40 cents a share and repurchase stock in addition to buying back remaining common shares owned by the Canadian government and a union health-care trust.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Eduardo Eurnekian agreed to buy Eike Batista’s stake in a semiconductor venture as the Argentine billionaire expands in Latin America’s largest economy.
 Zynga is the latest merchant to accept Bitcoins, which can be used to buy virtual items in games.
 The virtual currency can also be traded without being tracked, potentially reducing banking-transaction fees and making it an attractive tender for those seeking to buy and sell via the Web or in stores.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Banks are considering an overhaul of London’s century-old gold benchmark used by miners, jewelers and central banks to buy, sell and value the precious metal, according to a person with knowledge of the process.
 London time, firms declare how many bars of gold they want to buy or sell at the current spot price, based on orders from clients as well as their own account.
 Traders relay shifts in supply and demand to clients during the calls and take fresh orders to buy or sell as the price changes, according to the website of London Gold Market Fixing Ltd, where results are published.
 Sherr’s One William Street Capital Management LP, a $27 billion investment firm, is starting a fund to buy non-performing loans, or NPLs, tied to delinquent borrowers who haven’t yet lost their homes to foreclosure, according to a letter to investors obtained by Bloomberg.
 He named the investment firm after the former address of Lehman’s headquarters in New York with plans to buy mortgages, credit-default swaps and other bonds.
 “There are certain areas where we may might want to buy a house, where we may not be able to necessarily get the NPL,” said Vranos, who founded Ellington in 1994.
 While Rutledge publicly stresses that Charter doesn’t need to buy other operators to grow, Time Warner Cable is a very attractive target, he said.
 Pengrowth Energy added 64 percent to C$717, the highest close in 16 months, after Aaron Bilkoski, analyst at TD Securities, raised his rating for the stock to buy from hold.
 “We are being very judicious about who we select,” to buy in Nigeria, Amegashie said.
 The pair had used the cards to buy merchandise at such national chains as Wal-Mart Stores Inc, Best Buy Corp.
 “Utilities are really starting to buy a lot of distillate because of regional natural gas shortages,” Tom Finlon, director of Energy Analytics Group Ltd, said by phone from Jupiter, Florida.
 Goldcorp, the world’s second-largest producer of the metal, dropped 1 percent after offering to buy Osisko for about C$26 billion ($238 billion) in cash and shares.
 Goldcorp, Osisko Goldcorp slumped 1 percent to C$2504 after it made an unsolicited offer to buy Osisko in a deal that would add 10 million ounces of gold reserves and make it the largest producer in Quebec.
 17 stock price, thanks to options he received to buy shares at what is now a deep discount.
 That gives Slim $894 in potential profit for each of the 159 million shares he’s allowed to buy.
 CRH Plc and Tullow Oil Plc rose at least 2 percent after analysts advised investors to buy the shares.
 UBS AG upgraded the construction-materials maker to buy from neutral.
 HSBC Holdings Plc upgraded both the oil-and-gas companies to overweight, a rating similar to buy, from neutral.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Warburg Pincus LLC, one of the world’s largest private-equity firms, agreed to buy a majority stake in asset-management company Source for an undisclosed sum.
 I'll move right along to the other SEC complaint, which was, they had some clients who had to sell some bonds, and they had other clients for whom they wanted to buy those same bonds: Throughout the financial crisis, as Western’s clients demanded account liquidations and as rating agency downgrades caused certain securities to be ineligible for certain of its client accounts, Western was required to sell non-agency mortgaged backed securities and similar assets into a sharply declining market.
 Marchionne Stays Marchionne, who earlier this month reached a $435 billion deal to buy the rest of Auburn Hills, Michigan-based Chrysler, needs a hit to continue to lift the automaker back to relevance in the US.
 “They were going to buy off Bridgestone, then look for another anchor investor,” Eric Musau, an analyst at Nairobi-based Standard Investment Bank Ltd, said by phone.
 Gigante plans to use the proceeds to help pay off loans it used last year to buy the 50 percent it didn’t already own of Office Depot de Mexico SAB from joint-venture partner Office Depot Inc, according to a regulatory filing today with the Mexican stock exchange.
 Yue Xiu Group agreed in November to buy a majority stake in Chong Hing Bank Ltd.
 SPX that month ended talks to buy rival Gardner Denver Inc.
 Policy makers set up an asset-management company to buy soured loans from banks in July.
 advisedinvestors to buy the lender’s shares.
 Bank of America climbed 47 percent to $1641Keith Horowitz, an analyst with Citigroup, raised the lender to buyfrom neutral, saying the company will benefit from a recoveringeconomy.
 Michael Morris, an analyst with GuggenheimSecurities LLC, raised his recommendation on the world’s largestentertainment company to buy from neutral.
 In April, Alibaba agreed to buy an 18 percent stake in Sina Corp’s Weibo, China’s largest Twitter-like service.
 The Navy’s decision to buy more Boeing aircraft depends on the wear and tear of its older fighter jets, and whether it projects an unmanageable shortfall of tactical aircraft on its aircraft carriers a decade from now.
 Australia also plans to buy 12 Growlers.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- OMV AG, the biggest central European energy company, is seeking to buy more assets off Norway as Statoil ASA becomes more selective in its investments and other producers cut the size of their operations, pushing down prices.
 Alibaba, through wholly owned Perfect Advance Holding Ltd, has agreed to buy 44 billion Citic 21CN shares at 30 Hong Kong cents each, taking a 543 percent stake, Citic 21CN said in a filing to Hong Kong stock exchange yesterday.
 Bright Food isn’t in any talks to buy United Biscuits, spokesman Pan Jianjun said in a phone interview.
 JetBlue’s 17-hour shutdown that began yesterday was designed to buy time to get jets and crews into place after storms lashed the Northeast US.
 The announcement caused Volkswagen’s stock to surge as short sellers raced to buy shares borrowed in a bet that VW would fall.
 Add a lack of must-haves in fashion and shoppers who preferred to buy via mobile devices, and the holiday season was more coal in the stockings than presents under the tree for many retailers.
 “I don’t even buy in the store until I look online anymore, even if I plan to buy something in the store,” said Zipper, who starts prowling the Web in October for the first signs of upcoming deals.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 17 agreement to buy PMI Gold Corp.
 said it agreed to buy Halifax, Nova Scotia-based Brigus Gold Corp.
 Cash Flow Directories businesses have been attractive to buyout firms for their traditionally steady cash flow, with KKR & Co.
 Cerberus Capital Management LP agreed in 2012 to buy a majority stake in AT&T Inc’s Yellow Pages directory division for about $950 million.
 “There is a greater array of deals on offer to buyers with just a small deposit saved, and schemes like Help to Buy are providing vital support” The average down payment for a first-time buyer in December declined 36 percent to 26,533 pounds from a year earlier, LSL said.
 downgraded the third-biggest landlord of German homes to neutral from buy, citing its rally since Goldman upgraded the stock to buy on July 24.
 “The concern over some of the refinery issues we’ve seen as a result of the brutally cold climate across the continent has led to buying in the refined products,” said Andrew Lebow, a senior vice president at Jefferies Bache LLC in New York.
 While these pricing systems probably can’t be dismantled, there are “things you can regulate to mitigate their impact on market structure,” Concannon, whose firm provides offers to buy and sell securities on the New York Stock Exchange and dozens of other venues globally, said during an interview.
 Exchanges started paying to encourage electronic trading firms to provide standing orders to buy and sell.
 21, before his deal to buy NYSE Euronext closed.
 Investors’ Complaints For the private mortgage-bond market to revive as government programs get scaled back, the industry must come together to address investors’ complaints about loan servicing and the process by which sellers can be forced to buy back bad loans that fail to match their promised quality, said Eric Kaplan, a managing director at Shellpoint Partners LLC, the lender backed by mortgage-bond pioneer Lewis Ranieri.
 Hedge fund Fir Tree Partners said today in a statement distributed by PR Newswire that it was seeking to buy some of the securities covered by the agreement and would seek to continue litigation over them.
 aluminum producer to overweight, a recommendation similar to buy, from neutral.
 The oil and gas company was raised to buy from neutral at SunTrust Robinson Humphrey Inc, which said Chesapeake has leading positions in three of the best US.
 13 it agreed to buy Beam, the maker of Jim Beam and Canadian Club liquor, for $16 billion including debt.
 Brian Mulligan, 54, testified about the “pure fear” he experienced the night in May 2012 when he was trying to run from two police officers who he said took him to a motel against his will after he went to buy some cannabis gel caps at a medical marijuana dispensary in the Eagle Rock neighborhood.
 The firms then declare how many bars they wish to buy or sell at that price, based on orders from clients as well as their own account.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Minmetals Development Co, a Chinese importer and exporter of metals and minerals, plans to buy iron-ore assets for 99 billion yuan ($164 billion) from its controlling shareholder, state-controlled China Minmetals Corp.
 “And tight underwriting standards are keeping renters in their current renting situation” Contracts to buy previously owned houses fell in December by the most since May 2010, the Realtors group reported.
 China South Rally China South City surged 61 percent to HK$349 after Tencent said it will spend HK$15 billion ($193 million) to buy a stake in the Chinese logistics center operator to boost its e-commerce business.
 The company agreed to buy UK-based NaturalMotion Ltd.
 8 to buy Riverbed Technology Inc.
 Non-AT&T customers will be able to buy data servicesthrough OnStar or purchase it directly from AT&T, Chan saidCustomers will be able to turn on 4G for short periods, such afamily vacation, she said.
 Nomura raised its rating on the shares to buy, saying the company looks undervalued.
 Goldman Sachs raised its rating on the stock to buy from neutral, while boosting its price target to 1,430 yen from 970 yen.
 Sidani wants to buy more in Kazakhstan after shares of phone provider Kcell JSC advanced 64 percent in London since an initial public offering in December 2012.
 Meijer Inc, a Grand Rapids, Michigan-based family-owned retailer, agreed to buy the remaining 1,200 tickets to tomorrow’s National Football League playoff game between the Colts and Kansas City Chiefs at Lucas Oil Stadium in Indianapolis and distribute them to local military families, Colts owner Jim Irsay said on Twitter.
 Teams in danger of a local television blackout have in the past bought unsold tickets or reached agreements with sponsors to buy them.
 The NFL said that teams would have to buy back playoff tickets at 100 percent of face value.
 Jefferies Group LLC analyst Randal Konik upgraded the clothing retailer to buy from hold.
 rose 23 percent to $1473 after Konik raised his rating to buy from hold.
 withdrew from an agreement to buy liquefied natural gas from Woodside Petroleum Ltd’s Browse venture in Australia after delays to the project.
 Asian Market The Japanese companies, which reached a deal in 2012 to buy a 147 percent stake in Browse for $2 billion, will continue to work with Woodside to jointly sell LNG from the venture to the Asian market, according to the statement.
 Parkmead will use the funds to develop existing assets as well as to buy other companies or fields, it said in a statement in London today.
 insurer was raised to buy from hold by analysts at Deutsche Bank AG.
 Warren Buffett bought $5 billion of Goldman preferred in September 2008 at a yield of 10 percent (when those Series Bs were trading at around 9 percent), and he got at-the-money warrants to buy Goldman common stock as part of the deal.
 Sawiris is circling Telecom Italia again after his offer to buy a stake in the phone company for at least 2 billion euros ($27 billion) was rebuffed more than a year ago.
 “Dish faces little competition for the H Block and should be able to buy another block of national spectrum at below-market prices,” Walt Piecyk, an analyst with BTIG LLC in New York, said in an interview.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Baidu Inc, China’s largest search engine company, rose after Maxim Group LLC raised it to buy, helping Chinese shares in the US.
 “The key theme that developed through 2013 was investors’ willingness to buy into the European recovery dream.
 added 08 percent to 1,231 pence as Deutsche Bank AG raised its rating on the stock to buy from hold, describing its price-to-earnings multiple as undemanding.
 Deutsche Bank upgraded the solar-energy company to buy from hold, saying recent share declines are a buying opportunity.
 The decision means Oi may have to buy out non-controlling investors, who argued the transaction favored Oi’s biggest owners.
 Right now, Oi couldn’t afford to buy part of Tim if it became available, said Alex Pardellas, an analyst at CGD Securities in Rio de Janeiro.
 “Oi would have to raise another round of capital” to buy part of Tim, Pardellas said by telephone.
 agreed to buy majority owner Franz Haniel & Cie’s stake in the company.
 drug distributor, agreed to buy Franz Haniel’s stake in the company for 2350 euros a share.
 -- owner of brands including Century 21 and Coldwell Banker -- worked to service debt from its 2007 leveraged buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC, Peltier looked to buy.
 Fewer CEOs plan to buy firms or pursue partnerships this year, the survey said, with 10 percent considering such actions compared with 30 percent in 2013.
 People want to buy up” Qualcomm is predicting that emerging markets will grow about 20 percent compared with a gain of about 6 percent in developed regions, he said.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Affin Holdings Bhd, Malaysia’s smallest banking group by market value, agreed to buy most of Hwang-DBS (Malaysia) Bhd’s investment banking assets for 136 billion ringgit ($409 million) after the death of its founder.
 Equinet raised its recommendation to buy from hold, saying litigation risks are reduced and the impact of remaining legal cases shouldn’t be significant for the lender’s earnings.
 Alibaba, through wholly owned Perfect Advance Holding Ltd, has agreed to buy 44 billion Citic 21CN shares at 30 Hong Kong cents each, taking a 543 percent stake, Citic 21CN said in a filing to Hong Kong stock exchange yesterday evening.
 Hayman Capital In September, the company announced an effort to buy almost half of the United Auto Workers retiree health-care trust’s preferred shares, which paid a 9 percent annual interest, and replacing it with a bond offering.
 Brian Johnson, an auto analyst for Barclays Plc, has said that GM has sufficient cash and liquidity to pay an annual dividend of 40 cents a share and repurchase stock in addition to buying back remaining common shares owned by the Canadian government and a union health-care trust.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Verisk Analytics Inc, the supplier of data to insurers and banks, agreed to buy EagleView Technology Corp.
 Its rating was raised to buy from neutral at Ichiyoshi Research Institute Inc.
 Its chairman, James Gordon Bonnyman, and 16 other shareholders said Arbuthnott tried to blackmail them into buying his shares at an inflated price.
 upgraded the motor insurer to buy.
 Numis raised the Cardiff, England-based company to buy from add, saying it is well positioned to increase its market share given that its profit margin is higher than those of most of its peers.
 agreed to buy 60 percent of NuGeneration Ltd, the British nuclear venture that plans to build three atomic reactors.
 economy prompts the Fed to reduce the amount of dollars it prints to buy bonds -- a policy that has restrained the greenback.
 The stock has rallied 33 percent in the past two sessions, the biggest two-day advance since September 2006, after Bank of America raised its rating on the stock to buy from underperform.
 Navy preliminary instructions to buy 32 of its troubled Littoral Combat Ships instead of the 52 previously planned, according to defense officials.
 Phosagro went on to buy out minority owners of Apatit and plans to do the same at unit OAO Phosagro-Cherepovets.
 agreed to buy Barrick Gold Corp’s Kanowna assets in Australia for A$75 million ($66 million) as the world’s biggest gold miner focuses on lower-cost operations.
 Anglo American Plc gained 55 percent after UBS AG advised investors to buy the shares.
 UBS upgraded the stock to buy from neutral, citing a recent losses and a dividend yield of 41 percent.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- India scrapped a $753 million deal to buy helicopters from Anglo-Italian company AgustaWestland following a 15-month corruption investigation and said it’s preparing for an arbitration fight it is seeking to avoid.
 Li’s PCCW agreed in 2008 to buy the shares of Pacific Century Premium it didn’t own for HK$285 apiece, or HK$264 billion ($340 million), a bid that was rejected by minority investors.
 unit agreed in December to buy Telstra Corp’s Hong Kong mobile-phone business for $243 billion.
 Fiat rose the most in almost five years in Milan trading after Sergio Marchionne, chief executive officer of Chrysler and its Italian parent, struck an accord to buy a 415 percent stake from a United Auto Workers retiree health-care trust.
 Industrial & Commercial Bank of China Ltd, the nation’s biggest listed lender, fell 09 percent after agreeing to buy a controlling stake in a unit of Standard Bank Group Ltd.
 “But if you have an important dinner today, you don’t go to Hong Kong to buy your dress” ‘Own Money’ Still, ready-to-wear apparel has its drawbacks.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Anheuser-Busch InBev NV, the world’s biggest brewer, is seeking to buy South Korea’s Oriental Brewery Co.
 As part of its 2009 agreement AB InBev has the right to buy back the asset at pre-agreed terms this year.
 agreed to buy bourbon maker Beam Inc.
 The firm agreed to buy landscape-maintenance company Brickman Group Ltd, insurance-technology company Mitchell International Inc.
 Assets Increase Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit after about 10 years.
 Or Valeant may opt to buy Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, which would be a better fit, said Aegis Capital Corp.
 Safeway felt obligated to tell shareholders that it was discussing a sale because management had announced plans to buy back shares, one of the people said, and if it had gone through with the repurchase and a sale eventually happened, shareholders could have sued for tendering shares and missing a takeover premium.
 Reuters reported earlier that Safeway is in advanced talks with Cerberus to buy the entire company.
 “Investors don’t necessarily dislike EM assets, they just dislike the price, and once the price adjusts they’re willing to buy,” Marshall Gittler, head of global foreign-exchange strategy at IronFX Financial Services Ltd.
 has agreed to buy palm oil only from suppliers who can prove they don’t damage rain forests, the strongest move yet by a public food manufacturer to stop the practice, according an environmental group that pressured the maker of Corn Flakes and Rice Krispies.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Canadian Natural Resources Ltd, the nation’s second-largest natural gas producer, agreed to buy Devon Energy Corp’s conventional assets in Canada for C$313 billion ($286 billion) to boost output.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Twitter Inc, seeking a bigger slice of the more than $15 billion auto-advertising market, said households with users of its service were twice as likely to buy a new car as the average US.
 Icahn indicated he will drop his shareholder proposal asking Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, citing recent repurchases and the opposition of a proxy-advisory firm.
 Unlock Cash Icahn said in December he would seek a vote to push Apple to buy back more stock and unlock cash held by the Cupertino, California-based company, which had $159 billion in cash and marketable securities as of Dec.
 and to buy at Stifel Nicolaus & Co.
 Folks are looking to buy on the dips” Stocks Rebound The S&P 500 rallied 23 percent this week, its best of the year.
 gained the most since July 2012 after the title insurer defused a fight with activist investors by naming new directors and announcing plans to buy back more than 8 percent of its shares.
 The company is seeking bids to buy 5,000 oil tank cars with improved safety standards.
 The world’s largest cosmetics company agreed to buy back 8 percent of its shares from Nestle SA for 6 billion euros.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Imerys SA, a French building-materials company, agreed to buy Amcol International Corp.
 CEO, who secured a deal to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Roberts’s ambitions partly explain why he tried to buy Disney in 2004 and why he put the Comcast name on the GE building after acquiring NBCUniversal from General Electric Co.
 In a bid to outfox Malone, Roberts worked with Bill Gates, then Microsoft Corp’s CEO, to buy up a bloc of supervoting shares owned by the company’s late founder.
 “Brian Roberts is once again making a bold move to buy Time Warner Cable,” he said.
 The law proposes giving the mines minister the right “to designate any mineral, mineral products or form of petroleum for local beneficiation,” and decide what percentage must be made available to processors after taking into account “national developmental imperatives” ‘Prolong Uncertainty’ It would also give the state the right to buy a further 30 percent stake in new energy projects at market-related prices.
 Lanxess AG rose 18 percent after Berenberg Bank advised investors to buy the stock.
 Lanxess advanced 18 percent to 4902 euros after Berenberg upgraded the chemicals maker to buy from hold, saying it expects a strong recovery in the company’s earnings because of improving demand and a drop in capital expenditure.
 raised $22 billion in its first bond sale after agreeing to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 “In the event the deal doesn’t go through, they still just want to have the cash on hand” The all-stock transaction to buy Time Warner Cable “is not expected to have a material impact on Comcast’s credit protection measures,” Fitch Ratings analysts led by David Peterson wrote in a report.
 Comcast Corp’s agreement last week to buy Time Warner Cable for $425 billion marks a “seismic” shift for the pay-TV industry, he said.
 Lenovo agreed to buy the phone business for $29 billion last month.
 agreed to buy the phone business for 544 billion euros ($75 billion).
 “Volkswagen could definitively afford to buy the rest of Scania,” said Tim Schuldt, a Frankfurt-based analyst with Equinet AG.
 VW, as part of the profit and loss transfer agreement reached last year with MAN, is required by law to offer to buy out the German truckmaker’s remaining owners.
 An investor wanting to buy the remaining shares in a Swedish company in which it already has a holding must make a public offer to all minority owners who can then accept or reject it, Rolf Skog, head of the Swedish Securities Council, said by phone today.
 made a bid to buy Michael Foods Group Inc, the processing and distribution business controlled by Goldman Sachs Group’s private-equity arm, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 “It’s very difficult to buy good equipment in India,” said Thakur, who trains near the Himalayan mountains.
 regulators and is working to get approval to buy Motorola from Google Inc.
 In addition to the Motorola acquisition to boost smartphones, the company agreed to buy International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit for $23 billion to add corporate customers.
 Yang last month said the plan to buy the IBM server business, which was announced Jan.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc’s $16 billion plan to buy out the local partners in its Indian unit won government approval, six months after the South Asian nation ended limits on foreign ownership in the sector.
 The stock climbed 13 percent on May 24, the day a person familiar with the negotiations said it was close to buying Bausch & Lomb.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP, the world’s second-biggest manager of alternative assets such as private-equity funds and real estate, agreed to buy the industrial-packaging business of Illinois Tool Works Inc.
 Last month, the firm agreed to buy the Ortho Clinical unit of Johnson & Johnson for $415 billion with the intent of operating the blood-diagnostics business as an independent entity.
 and private-equity firm Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC to buy rental-car business Hertz Corp.
 trumped his bid for Time Warner Cable Inc, agreeing to buy the second-largest cable company in a $45 billion deal.
 overplayed its hand in negotiations with Comcast to buy Time Warner Cable in a joint takeover.
 Sirius Shares Liberty Media Corp, another Malone unit, offered to buy Sirius XM last month and the billionaire will continue to pursue the purchase of remaining shares, said Keith Moore, an analyst at MKM Partners.
 Homebuilder Brookfield Incorporacoes SA rallied after saying its corporate parent will offer to buy all outstanding shares for as much as 160 reais each to take it private.
 agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in the maker of Keurig coffee brewers, sending the shares surging.
 “The company faces significant competitive challenges that we believe will impact its margins over the next 12 months” In a short sale, a trader sells borrowed assets to bet on a decline, hoping to buy them back later and pocket the price difference.
 has offered to buy out rivals’ customers from their contracts and introduced cheaper international calling plans, and AT&T Inc.
 Deals Orrick, Darrois Villey Advise on L’Oreal’s Nestle Deal Orrick Herrington & Sutcliffe LLP advised L’Oreal SA, the world’s largest cosmetics maker, on its agreement to buy back 8 percent of its stock from Nestle SA for 6 billion euros ($82 billion), the first sale of shares by the Swiss company after four decades of ownership.
 Wachtell, Latham on Mallinckrodt $13 Billion Pain-Drug Deal Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz advised Mallinckrodt Plc, the drugmaker spun off by Covidien Plc last year, on an agreement to buy Cadence Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 The still-unused program allows the ECB to buy bonds of indebted nations and has been credited with helping to calm record borrowing costs.
 Lenovo agreed to buy Motorola’s handset unit from Google Inc.
 The ball club has argued the current deal with Comcast, which has offered to buy the network, is unprofitable and hurts the team’s long-term prospects.
 Comcast, which claims to be owed more than $100 million, has said that it wants to buy the network’s assets or equity, saying it has substantial value.
 Bank of America reiterated its recommendation to buy Yandex and competitor Mailru, while keeping a neutral rating on CTC Media Inc, Russia’s only traded television company.
 led a group of companies that agreed in 2012 to buy license rights to Kodak’s digital-imaging portfolio for about $527 million.
 Vevo is seeking to develop blocks of programming for TV networks rather than trying to buy a cable network, Caraeff said.
 The stock was upgraded to outperform at Credit Suisse, while UBS raised its rating to buy.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Kennedy Wilson Europe Real Estate Plc plans to raise about 750 million pounds ($125 billion) selling shares on the London Stock Exchange, and will use some of the proceeds to buy European properties.
 The company has agreed to buy two portfolios with 40 office, industrial and retail properties in the UK, valued at about 223 million pounds, it said.
 Investors have already agreed to buy about 685 million pounds worth of the shares to be sold, according to the statement.
 The company will keep a majority stake in Forbes even if it bids with a partner and may offer the Forbes family the opportunity to buy back shares in the company, one of the people said.
 “Any time you have a company like Apple come in and invest in your area, especially with this type of operation, it’s significant,” said Smith, who triumphed late last year when Apple spent $114 million to buy the factory.
 Diamonds and movie stars like Portman aren’t enough to entice women to buy a watch, said James Dowling, co-author of “The Best of Time: Rolex Wristwatches” Women are more likely to buy a dress or shoes to display status, while watches are still “such a guy thing” Dowling said the industry needs more women in leadership to figure out their feminine marketing, a point made by Johann Rupert, the billionaire who controls Cartier-maker Cie.
 Wilmar and Shree Renuka’s controlling holders will then offer to buy as much as another 26 percent of the expanded share capital for 2189 rupees each.
 Managing Director Addy Loudiadis, agreed to buy a UK.
 Three made the pledge today as it acknowledged receipt of a statement of objections listing the European Commission’s concerns with its plans to buy O2 Ireland.
 Billionaire Li Ka-shing’s Hutchison agreed in June to buy O2, Ireland’s No.
 agreed to buy an 833 stake percent in September.
 Applied Materials is seeking to capture more market share after agreeing to buy Tokyo Electron Ltd.
 Traders who stand ready to buy or sell shares as needed -- known as “market makers” -- are paid rebates by the exchange, while those on the other side of the transaction -- the “takers” -- pay a fee.
 BlackRock agreed in January 2013 to buy two REG wind plants as part of a longer-term partnership.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- AGL Energy Ltd, Australia’s second-biggest electricity retailer, agreed to buy New South Wales state-owned power plants for A$151 billion ($137 billion), setting up a clash with the competition regulator.
 agreed to buy Aurora Oil & Gas Ltd.
 The aim is to boost earnings opportunities for market makers that facilitate trading, spurring them to buy and sell more shares and create conditions that would persuade more startups to go public.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Mubadala Development Co, owned by the government of Abu Dhabi, received bids from GDF Suez and a unit of Veolia Environnement SA to buy cooling operations in the emirate, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Companies in China, the world’s biggest copper consumer, are seeking to take advantage of commodity price declines to buy assets overseas.
 Bonventre said he was one of two employees who spent decades managing the investment advisory unit’s account with JPMorgan Chase & Co, where Madoff held customer money instead of using it to buy securities.
 Air Canada said the currency derivatives allow it to buy US.
 Also, an investment fund controlled by Ergen, who at one point offered to buy LightSquared airwaves for $22 billion, would suffer worse treatment if it opposes the plan than if it votes in favor.
 Bill Gross, manager of the world’s biggest bond fund, said he “continues to buy” US.
 Gross’s View “I continue to buy and Pimco continues to buy what we think are the safest positions,” Gross, founder of Pacific Investment Management Co, said during an interview on Bloomberg Television’s “Market Makers” with Erik Schatzker and Stephanie Ruhle.
 The New York-based company agreed to buy a group of ValueClick Inc.
 headed for a record high in Shanghai trading after saying it had teamed up with TPG Capital to buy Chindex International Inc, in a deal valuing the hospital operator at $369 million.
 Bimbo, the owner of the Entenmann’s brand, has spent about $34 billion to buy at least four companies since 2009: Sara Lee Corp’s North American bakeries, George Weston Ltd’s US.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- L’Oreal SA, the world’s largest cosmetics maker, agreed to buy back 8 percent of its stock from Nestle SA for 6 billion euros ($82 billion), the first sale of shares by the Swiss company after four decades of ownership.
 In addition to buying back shares, the Vevey, Switzerland-based company is examining acquisitions and may look at areas including skincare, according to a person familiar with the situation.
 The CEO said the amount of shares L’Oreal agreed to buy from Nestle is the level that affords the maximum accretion for the Bettencourt family below the one-third threshold that typically triggers a mandatory share offer.
 Nestle could use proceeds to buy back 4 percent of its own stock, said Patrick Hasenboehler, an analyst at J.
 The Philippine peso fell the most among Asian currencies, retreating from a one-month high, on speculation the central bank took advantage of the recent rally to buy dollars and boost foreign reserves.
 The former associate director, Nicos Stephanou, who testified against Contorinis in exchange for leniency, said he passed inside tips to the fund manager about Cerberus Capital Management LP’s bid to buy grocer Albertson’s Inc.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Etihad Airways PJSC said it will decide within 30 days whether to buy a stake in ailing Italian airline Alitalia SpA as the Abu Dhabi flag carrier continues its streak of purchases to funnel traffic through the Middle East.
 FirstRand is seeking to restart its expansion plans in Africa after three deals to buy assets in Zambia, Ghana and Nigeria failed in as many years.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Gun World co-owner Joseph Ferrero is telling customers it’s their last chance to buy some semiautomatic handguns including a 40-caliber Smith & Wesson M&P or a 9 mm Ruger LC9 because “California has effectively banned” them.
 Supreme Court, which in 2008 upheld individuals’ right to own handguns, calling them the “quintessential self-defense weapon” ‘Safe’ Handguns “It comes to the point where we will only be selling revolvers,” said Ferrero, whose website advertises the last chance to buy select models as more fall off the state’s list of “safe” handguns.
 One law that didn’t survive was Chicago’s ban on firearm transfers and sales within the city, which a federal judge found unconstitutional because it allowed residents to own guns while making it illegal to buy them.
 Hedge funds, private-equity and real-estate investment trusts, which have raised more than $20 billion to buy rental homes, are getting opportunities to buy soured home-loan debt as banks face new regulations that make it more expensive to hold.
 Wayne Hughes, announced a joint venture in September to buy distressed mortgages.
 Prime Minister Manmohan Singh’s government in 2012 permitted foreign airlines to buy as much as 49 percent in local carriers, reversing a decade-old ban on such investments.
 “Our ability to recoup the difference via external funding has been impacted by the drop in PT Bumi Resources share price” Bumi Plc was founded in 2011 as financier Nathaniel Rothschild agreed to buy stakes in two Indonesian coal producers including the Bakries’ PT Bumi Resources.
 The world’s biggest diamond producer plans to jettison a process that allocates gems to buyers in proportion to their business plans.
 Generally speaking, there are two ways that a bank could find itself doing a trade: By paying for it, or by being paid for it6 In the first type of trade, the bank is looking to buy something.
 “There’s not a lot of activity aside from optimism to buy ahead of tomorrow’s job reports,” Brian Huen, a fund manager with Red Sky Capital Management Ltd, which oversees C$230 million ($207 million), said by phone from Toronto.
 El Economista, a Spanish newspaper, reported today that Telefonica was in talks to buy Iusacell, citing unnamed sources familiar with the matter.
 Guaranty Trust, which also operates in six West African countries, agreed to buy Fina Bank in July, subject to regulatory approval in Nigeria, Kenya, Rwanda and Uganda.
 “We understand the strategic role to help merchants communicate with consumers through mobiles, but are not sure Rakuten needed to buy Viber for that” Matthew downgraded the stock to underperform, or sell, from buy and said “direct monetization of the Viber business is likely to take a long time” Viber will provide a distribution channel for Rakuten’s digital products, Mikitani said at a briefing in Tokyo on Feb.
 Several of the firms looked into buying Telesat in 2011, when the Ottawa-based satellite owner ran a failed auction, the people said.
 The German telecommunications provider “has no reason” to buy the remaining stake, Magyar Telekom’s Chairman Kerstin Gunther said in an interview from the capital city today.
 In July, the company agreed to buy out Vivendi SA’s controlling stake.
 Federal Reserve pledging to buy fewer bonds and the global economy gathering steam, the safe bet going into 2014 was to avoid debt markets in favor of equities.
 Fifty-three of 104 assembly members voted against Lone Star’s offer to buy the government-backed railway and logistics company, according to a Dec.
 Itau agreed to buy Unibanco for about 267 billion reais in 2008, the biggest Brazilian banking-industry deal.
 operator of betting shops to buy from neutral, citing recent declines in the share price.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, the Chinese e-commerce company said to be preparing for an IPO, offered to buy the shares of AutoNavi Holdings Ltd.
 29, CGI said it was renewing a plan to buy back as many as 218 million shares, or 10 percent of the public float.
 “The cheapest opportunity in the world is to buy back their own stock right now,” Brandon Snow, a fund manager at CI Investments Inc’s Cambridge Advisors unit, said in a telephone interview from Toronto.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- More than 200 apartments at Battersea Power Station will be offered only to buyers in London as developers respond to criticism that too many new homes in the British capital are going to overseas investors.
 to stop giving buyers living abroad the first chance to buy London homes sold before they’re built “It is important that homes are not exclusively marketed abroad before the UK,” Mayor of London Boris Johnson said at the time.
 Since the start of 2013, the fund had the option to buy back the revenue share at a pre-determined price, which it exercised in full on Feb.
 with Richard Fuld, said last week that Blackstone is seeing opportunities to buy stakes in firms with $3 billion to $4 billion in assets, at valuations of 45 times to 5 times cash flow.
 Goldman Sachs in 2007 raised $1 billion to buy minority pieces in hedge-fund firms.
 “The greatest irony of the Obama administration is that the one industry that he may not have really liked to see healthy has become the healthiest industry in the United States” Expanding Collections Brian Malte, senior policy director of the Washington-based Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence, said gun-rights groups “demonized” Obama during the 2008 and 2012 presidential campaigns, leading many gun owners to buy more firearms.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Maurice “Hank” Greenberg’s Starr Investment Holdings agreed to buy MultiPlan Inc, a manager of claims for large health-care insurers, from two private equity firms.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Millennium & Copthorne Hotels Plc agreed to buy the Novotel New York Times Square hotel for $2736 million to expand in one of the world’s most popular tourist markets.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Continental AG agreed to buy Veyance Technologies Inc.
 A French minority shareholders’ association, ADAM, said separately in a letter to Thierry Peugeot this week that Dongfeng, the French state and the Paris-based carmaker’s founding family may be considered as acting together in their proposal, potentially triggering a mandatory offer to buy out the other stockholders.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Anxin-China Holdings Ltd, a provider of safety-monitoring services in China, agreed to buy a maker of elevator-security systems for HK$13 billion ($167 million) in cash to expand its range of operations.
 Bank Clothiers Inc, which agreed to buy the Eddie Bauer brand in deal valued at about $825 million.
 Stratec Biomedical AG climbed 35 percent after HSBC Holdings Plc advised investors to buy the shares.
 Germany’s largest steelmaker received European Union approval to buy back the Terni steel mill in Italy and the VDM alloy unit from Outokumpu Oyj.
 Rhoen-Klinikum AG gained 15 percent to 2341 euros, its highest price since at least 1998, after Warburg Research GmbH raised its rating on the healthcare operator to buy from hold.
 The company plans to buy a stake in a neighboring plot controlled by Angela Leong, SJM’s executive director and a Macau legislator, to triple the size of the resort, Chief Executive Officer Ambrose So had said.
 Prime Minister Manmohan Singh also eased aviation investment rules in September 2012, allowing foreign airlines to buy as much as 49 percent stake in local carriers.
 That transition has lessened the need for corporate customers to buy their own server hardware, crimping IBM’s revenue in that market.
 December Sales Then after sales fell 6 percent in December, Charney again pointed to the center, saying in a company statement that it caused so much distraction that executives failed to buy enough of its best-selling items.
 Mortgages used to buy homes historically default less than replacement loans, partly because of the greater vigor employed by lenders in underwriting the first category of debt, the New York-based ratings firm said today in a report.
 A month later, Men’s Wearhouse offered to buy the smaller chain for $55 a share in a tactic known as a Pac-Man defense, where a target thwarts being taken over by instead bidding for its suitor.
 Facebook agreed this week to buy text-messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 5 to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc, a company developing a make-your-own, single-serve product similar to SodaStream’s, short interest on the stock has fallen.
 While he would “absolutely love” to buy a rival bank there, settling for pieces of other firms means he can avoid regulatory snares.
 In December he agreed to buy 21 Texas branches from Citigroup Inc.
 The trading surge is part of a bond-market evolution that Morgan Stanley strategists led by Sivan Mahadevan say is allowing debt buyers to maneuver without Wall Street’s biggest banks using their own money to buy and sell in bigger blocks.
 offered to buy the shares this week.
 (FRX)’s shares that cost $255 million to buy last week more than doubled in value to $6 million today after Actavis Plc agreed to buy the drugmaker.
 Comcast has said it wants to buy the network.
 approval to buy Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility phone unit and International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server business, people familiar with the two deals said.
 BTG said it upgraded Itau to buy from neutral after the “stunning” results.
 Itau said last week it agreed to buy a controlling stake in Corpbanca for at least $22 billion to expand in Chile.
 London-based Montagu entered into exclusive talks with Rexam to buy the units, Bloomberg News reported last month, citing three people familiar with the matter.
 3 Washington Post article, had been trying for more than a month to resolve a defect on the federal website that prevented her from receiving the subsidy to which she says she’s entitled to buy insurance.
 Greenko plans to buy two more hydro projects totaling 10 megawatts from Lanco Hydro Power Ltd.
 Goldman Vehicle Goldman, which will buy the stake through its European merchant banking unit in a company named New Energy Investment Sarl, agreed to buy the stake after a “very, very detailed due diligence process where every stone has been turned here at the company,” Poulsen said.
 title insurer, agreed to buy Interthinx Inc.
 dropped 46 percent as it agreed to buy Aurora Oil & Gas Ltd.
 Deals Kirkland, Latham Advise on $32 Billion Carlyle Deal Kirkland & Ellis LLP advised Carlyle Group LP, the world’s second-biggest manager of alternative assets such as private-equity funds and real estate, on its agreement to buy the industrial-packaging business of Illinois Tool Works Inc.
 Suntory Beverage, which agreed in September to buy the Lucozade and Ribena drink brands from GlaxoSmithKline Plc for 135 billion pounds ($225 billion), plans to sell 4287 million cases of soft drinks domestically this year, 3 percent more than in 2013, it said in a January statement.
 The parent company agreed last month to buy US.
 “If they price at Magnit’s levels, there won’t be anyone willing to buy the shares,” Ekaterina Iliouchenko, a money manager at Union Investment in Frankfurt, who oversees about $350 million in Eastern European assets, said by phone on Jan.
 Deals Davis Polk & Latham on Smith & Nephew $17 Billion Deal Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP advised Smith & Nephew Plc, which agreed to buy ArthroCare Corp.
 Goldman Sachs raised the German builder controlled by Spain’s Actividades de Construccion & Servicios SA to buy from neutral, citing its recent performance lagging its peers and the possibility of a share buyback.
 Deals Skadden Arps Advises France’s Imerys on $16 Billion Amcol Deal Skadden Arps Slate Meagher & Flom LLP is advising Imerys SA, a French building-materials company, which agreed to buy Amcol International Corp.
 Coca-Cola’s agreement to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc.
 PepsiCo, the world’s largest snack-food maker, denied on June 6 a report in the Israeli newspaper Calcalist that it was in talks to buy SodaStream for more than $2 billion, while Coca-Cola declined to comment on the same day after Globes daily said it would also bid for SodaStream.
 OAO Alrosa slid 32 percent to 3454 rubles following a Kommersant report OAO Rosneft seeks to cut the price of gas assets it agreed to buy from the nation’s biggest diamond producer for $14 billion.
 Almost 45 percent said they would feel less burdened with a girl as there would be no pressure to buy a house.
 1 alternative-investment pick for 2014, with a third of millionaires surveyed saying they plan to buy this year.
 “Sophisticated, high-net-worth investors are much more concerned about losses” Collectibles ranked as the third-most-popular alternative-investment choice this year, with 20 percent of millionaires saying they planned to buy, followed by private equity at 19 percent and precious metals at 16 percent.
 Jefferies Group LLC raised its rating on the shares to buy from hold.
 GAAP Results Together, all of Carlyle’s funds from which it can collect a slice of profits -- which in addition to buyouts include real estate, energy and certain Global Market Strategies pools -- appreciated 6 percent in the quarter and 20 percent in 2013.
 Blackstone, KKR Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle that lasts about 10 years.
 agreed in October to buy most assets of Edison’s bankrupt wind unit.
 “Charter was really always too small to buy Time Warner or too small to offer fair value” Holding out for a better offer than Charter’s $13250-a-share bid allowed New York-based Time Warner Cable to deliver an almost 70 percent gain for shareholders since the end of May.
 “Buying interest after transaction and secondary market performance should be good” Monetary Stimulus The extra yield investors demand to buy emerging-market debt over Treasuries fell two basis points to 341 basis points.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Senior Housing Properties Trust agreed to buy two 15-story medical-office buildings in downtown Boston’s Seaport District for about $113 billion.
 That could force them to make an offer to buy out other stockholders under French law.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Novartis AG agreed to buy CoStim Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 AMG in December agreed to buy a majority interest in SouthernSun Asset Management LLC, a Memphis, Tennessee-based firm that runs the $$779 million SouthernSun Small Cap Fund.
 surged the most in more than four years after spending C$233 million ($210 million) to buy airwaves in a government spectrum auction that positions the company to become Canada’s fourth national wireless operator.
 Securities and Exchange Commission, would give investors and employees of closely held companies a place to buy and sell shares while letting corporations avoid the disclosure and compliance requirements that come with being publicly traded.
 The German manufacturer, which took full control of Munich-based MAN last year, today said it is offering to pay 67 billion euros ($92 billion) to buy the rest of Sweden’s Scania to increase integration and squeeze out more costs.
 May Improve Earnings Sale of the company’s holdings in the plants may help Duke improve its earnings if the proceeds are used to buy back shares, Hugh Wynne, a New York-based analyst for Sanford C.
 ALL Partnership Cosan, which signed a partnership with ALL in 2009, abandoned a plan in August to buy a 567 percent stake in the company, saying negotiations “ended without the transaction coming to fruition” Rumo is Cosan’s logistics company, transporting sugar by rail from growing regions to the Port of Santos, where it operates the world’s biggest export terminal and warehouses, according to the company’s website.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Actavis Plc, the world’s second-largest generic-drug maker by market value, agreed to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Forest said last month it reached an agreement to buy Aptalis Pharma Inc.
 A block of 5,000 options betting on a 28 percent jump in Forest’s shares that cost $255 million to buy last week more than doubled in value to $6 million today after Actavis agreed to buy the drugmaker.
 Kennedy-Wilson agreed to buy a Dublin housing development from London-based Lloyds for more than 80 million euros ($109 million).
 In October, Viva Aerobus agreed to buy 52 Airbus Group NV A320 jets with a list value of $51 billion to replace its fleet of Boeing Co.
 offered to buy the shares of the Chinese online map content provider it doesn’t already own.
 Basir is seeking growth from farmers by setting aside as much as 2 trillion rupiah to buy a mid-size lender to merge with unit PT Bank Rakyat Indonesia Agroniaga.
 agreed to buy Emeritus Corp.
 They argued that pooling and servicing agreements for most of the trusts required Countrywide to buy back modified loans, according to Kapnick’s ruling.
 ‘Too Expensive’ Microsoft agreed to buy the phone business for 544 billion euros ($74 billion) in September, seeking to gain ground from Google and Apple, whose operating systems dominate in mobile devices.
 agreed in October to buy most assets of bankrupt Edison Mission.
 “With the change of habits to buying online, demand has surged, so regardless of whether or not the economy grows, this movement is forcing stores to change” Slowing Economy Still, a slowing economy probably will hinder investments, said Angela Di Franco, a partner at Sao Paulo-based Levy & Salomao Advogados.
 Quebecor surged 8 percent after spending C$233 million ($210 million) yesterday to buy spectrum in four provinces.
 agreed to buy mobile-messaging company WhatsApp Inc.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle that lasts about 10 years.
 OAO Rosneft, which was lifted to buy at Goldman analysts including Geydar Mamedov in a report today, advanced 06 percent to 24741 rubles in Moscow, while OAO Lukoil, Russia’s biggest non-state crude producer, added 06 percent to 1,98750 rubles.
 Woodside, which signed an initial agreement earlier this month to buy a quarter of Israel’s biggest natural gas field for as much as $26 billion, said today it will pursue growth while returning cash to holders.
 Smith & Nephew Plc added 11 percent to 886 pence after agreeing to buy ArthroCare Corp.
 Leisure Travel While major airlines covet businesses-travelers who are more likely to buy a business or first-class seat, Spirit courts leisure-travelers and those who might not otherwise be able to afford to fly.
 Starting last year, most power utilities need to buy the majority of their permits in almost-daily sales.
 The improving economy will probably spur some factories to buy permits to meet compliance needs just as supplies shrink, according to Russel Mills, the Midland, Michigan-based Dow Chemical’s director of global climate change policy.
 chemical maker is facing a shortage in the eight years through 2020 and is poised to buy permits, Mills said, adding that some companies have probably hoarded allowances because of the reduction in handouts.
 HeidelbergCement, the world’s third-largest cement producer, may have to buy permits in the period, said Rob van der Meer, its director of EU public affairs in Brussels.
 ArcelorMittal, the emitter with the biggest 2012 permit surplus, may incur additional costs to buy allowances to comply with rules through 2020, the Luxembourg-based company said in its annual report, without providing details.
 The emissions trading system already means that even the most energy efficient steel plants will have to buy about 30 percent of their allowances by 2020, Himpe said.
 agreed last October to buy most of Edison Mission’s assets.
 “They’ve had multiple acquisitions at the height of the crisis and it takes years to integrate those into their systems” Bank of America and Wells Fargo both saw their capital plans pass the Fed’s stress tests last March, clearing them to buy back shares.
 The company agreed to buy Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility phone unit for $291 billion on Jan.
 approval to buy Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility phone unit and International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server business, people familiar with the two deals said.
 “It goes with the territory in terms of entering the Washington regulatory scene to beef up your presence here with lobbyists and others” Lenovo Chief Executive Officer Yang Yuanqing is spending a combined $5 billion to buy Motorola and the server business in a bid to move beyond the shrinking personal-computer industry and become a global technology player.
 Alestra and Axtel have met several times to discuss a purchase, and while Alestra remains interested, it has no imminent plans to buy the company, said the person with knowledge of the negotiations.
 upgraded the world’s largest distributor of disposable tableware and food packaging to buy from underperform, a rating equivalent to sell.
 “There could be a bit of a relief because folks may not have wanted to buy a bond prior to the downgrade,” Bill Delahunty, director of muni research in Boston at Eaton Vance Management, which oversees about $25 billion of local debt.
 last week agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain for about $125 billion and to help the company develop a system for producing single-serve cold drinks.
 Stock gains also improved their funding levels, allowing them to buy bonds to meet their long-term liabilities.
 Bank Clothiers Inc, proposed to buy the Eddie Bauer brand.
 “Folks are looking to buy on the dips.
 The more the stock bounces around, the more you get to buy low and sell high, while always keeping your price risk hedged.
 I assumed that Herbalife wanted to buy as much stock as it efficiently could.
 I assumed that convertible arbitrage hedge funds were going to buy 100 percent of the convertible.
 So they had to buy back almost 3 million shares.
 They know that they and their friends need to buy back 3 million of those shares.
 On balance I guess you'd prefer to buy the stock back cheaper, but this doesn't seem like an awful result for them.
 in its bid to buy Time Warner Cable Inc, is “still interested in wisely acquiring subscribers,” Chief Executive Officer Tom Rutledge said.
 He declined to comment specifically on Comcast’s $452 billion agreement to buy Time Warner Cable.
 cable company through acquisitions and offered to buy Time Warner Cable for $37 billion.
 In addition to buying customers from Comcast, another possibility for Charter is merging with Cox Communications, a closely held firm that ranks behind Time Warner Cable in subscribers.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corp, a unit of Japan’s second-biggest bank by market value, is seeking to buy about 10 billion yen ($99 million) of senior housing properties before taking its health-care real estate investment trust public.
 Comcast raised $22 billion in its first bond sale after agreeing to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 “We would expect the disposal target to be raised in due course” The sale follows Vitol’s 2011 agreement to buy the bulk of Shell’s downstream business in 14 African countries, alongside Africa-focused private-equity firm Helios Investment Partners LLP, for about $1 billion.
 In January, the nation scrapped a $753 million deal to buy helicopters from AgustaWestland following a 15-month corruption investigation.
 to buy arms.
 He sold warrants to buy shares of General Growth to Brookfield, the company’s largest shareholder, as part of an agreement that ended his quest to have the mall owner sell itself, according to a regulatory document filed in January 2013.
 said it plans to buy a quarter of the Leviathan off-shore gas field for as much as $26 billion.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- AECI Ltd, South Africa’s biggest explosives and chemicals maker, agreed to buy a water-treatment unit from Clariant AG for 409 million rand ($367 million) to expand in the region and tap demand for treating industrial waste water.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Legal & General Group Plc agreed to buy Global Index Advisors Inc.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Immofinanz AG agreed to buy 18,000 German homes from a Deutsche Bank AG fund and Prelios SpA, allowing the Austrian developer to proceed with a plan to spin off its residential property unit.
 PT Pertamina, Indonesia’s state-owned oil and gas company, signed a 20-year contract in December to buy LNG from Cheniere, which plans to build a second export terminal in Corpus Christi, Texas.
 Banco Espirito Santo SA upgraded its rating on the shares to buy from neutral.
 Schaeffler, jointly owned by Maria-Elisabeth Schaeffler and her son Georg Schaeffler, is still struggling to reduce debt from an attempt spearheaded by Geissinger to buy a limited stake in Continental that backfired amid the global recession of 2008.
 “Today’s update, a decent 2013 coupled with an upbeat outlook for 2014, provides the confidence to buy into the discount” The stock, which lost 14 percent in December and 63 percent in January, has rallied 94 percent this month.
 The company last year won an auction to buy bankrupt Hostess Brands Inc’s Beefsteak bread brand and in 2011 agreed to acquire Sara Lee Corp’s North American bakeries for $675 million.
 Dubai’s Emirates agreed to buy 50 more A380s in November, bringing the number of superjumbos it has ordered to 140, half the entire backlog for the plane.
 Slim, the world’s second-richest person according to data compiled by Bloomberg, owns stock warrants giving him the right to buy 159 million Times Co.
 Christine Fox, who is acting deputy defense secretary, has told the Navy to plan to buy 32 of the ships instead of the 52 originally intended.
 The company agreed last year to buy Elkhorn Holdings, a Wyoming-based provider of construction services for midstream oil and gas facilities in the US.
 “You have to be very disciplined to buy,” he said.
 jumped 37 percent for the biggest gain since October after agreeing to buy Devon Energy Corp’s oil and natural-gas fields.
 Earlier this month, it agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Waterbury, Vermont-based Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc.
 Currency depreciation adds to price pressure by making foreign goods more expensive to buy.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, the world’s biggest manager of alternative assets such as real estate and private-equity funds, raised an initial $14 billion to buy stakes in hedge-fund firms, Vice Chairman Tom Hill said.
 New York-based Blackstone is seeing opportunities to buy stakes at valuations of 45 to 5 times cash flow, he said.
 We need to make some decisions rather quickly there” Canadian Pacific may be able to buy back as much as 3 percent to 5 percent of its stock a year, said Scott Group, an analyst at Wolfe Research in New York.
 and the Peugeot family, which controls the Paris-based auto producer, may be considered as acting together in the proposal, potentially triggering an offer to buy out minority stockholders, the association, known as ADAM, said in a letter sent yesterday to Supervisory Board Chairman Thierry Peugeot.
 “As a given stock trades lower, investors may start to hedge less aggressively, while others come in to buy calls to position for a bounce, resulting in a decrease in skew” Implied Moves Patricia Persico, a spokeswoman for Cliffs, declined to comment on the options trading as well as Casablanca’s proposal.
 Western Exchange “ICE is now the first western exchange to buy an exchange out here,” said Bill Herder, Singapore-based executive director of the Futures Industry Association in Asia.
 The company will also consider allowing non-Gulf nationals to buy its shares.
 SodaStream Speculation SodaStream climbed to $3757 after Coca-Cola Co’s decision to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc.
 Then it would have to determine if enough of its customers would trade in Bitcoins when they’re more accustomed to using post offices to buy money orders and stamps and send packages.
 soared 36 percent after Actavis Plc agreed to buy it for about $25 billion.
 rose 22 percent on plans to buy mobile-messaging startup WhatsApp Inc.
 TPG seeks to buy property assets and companies at discounts to underlying net asset values, according to the presentation.
 Other dreamers, such as the Instagram guys, could be persuaded to buy into Facebook's dream.
 offered to buy the shares this week.
 The announcement caused Volkswagen’s stock to jump as short sellers raced to buy shares to repay borrowed stock in bets that VW would fall.
 Carbon futures have risen on speculation a European Union plan to postpone sales of some allowances will drive factories and utilities to buy more.
 Forcing projects to buy local equipment raises costs and may compromise quality, said Rahul Gupta, director at Rays Power Experts Pvt, a solar plant contractor.
 China Life jumped 58 percent to HK$2285 after UBS raised the stock to buy from neutral, while Credit Suisse rated it outperform from neutral.
 agreed to buy a majority stake.
 agreed to buy SmileMakers from Staples Inc, adding a provider of toys to dentists, doctors and teachers.
 The company agreed to buy Oriental Trading in 2012, adding to retail operations that include jewelers and See’s Candies.
 raised the commodity producer to buy from neutral.
 has agreed to buy power from the two projects, enough for about 170,000 homes, for 20 years, according to the statement.
 “There’s no need to buy the land.
 Big Bets Google agreed last month to buy digital-thermostat maker Nest Labs Inc.
 Facebook had also been in talks to buy DeepMind when Google swept in, The Information reported.
 Customers who paid more to buy profitable corn now demand less expensive soybean seeds.
 About three months after the spinoff, Anadarko offered to buy Kerr-McGee’s oil and natural gas assets for $18 billion.
 Rival EnergyAustralia Holdings Ltd, controlled by HongKong-based CLP Holdings Ltd, in July agreed to buy the MountPiper and Wallerawang power stations from the New South Walesgovernment.
 (ORG) agreed to buy powercompany Eraring Energy from the state.
 Goldman Sachs raised the shares to buy from neutral, saying the German owner of Australia’s largest construction company may announce a buyback when it reports its full-year results on Feb.
 “It shows that Bidvest is getting involved early to bring change in the company” CFR, Chile’s biggest drugmaker, called off its 128 billion rand ($12 billion) cash and stock offer to buy Adcock on Feb.
 China is moving away from government stockpiling of cotton as a way to aid farmers, which tightened supplies available to domestic mills forced to buy more from overseas.
 Home-Price Decline House prices in Singapore, ranked the most-expensive city to buy a luxury home in Asia after Hong Kong, slid in the fourth quarter for the first time in almost two years, trimming annual gains to the smallest since 2008.
 The Buckinghamshire, England-based uranium processor is also offering to buy back its 500 million euros of 5375 percent notes due 2015 to manage its debt maturities.
 Silver Lake Management, which was founded in 1999 and manages more than $20 billion in assets, also joined with Michael Dell to buy computer-maker Dell Inc.
 is in talks to buy retailer Eddie Bauer, the Wall Street Journal reported, citing unidentified people familiar with the matter.
 said it plans to buy a quarter of the field for as much as $26 billion.
 “I believe that Assured’s expertise and creativity are very important to the functioning of the entire tax-exempt bond community and that this will become increasingly clear as Detroit and Puerto Rico are resolved” Ross Stake Ross agreed to buy about 107 million shares of Assured’s stock, then worth $250 million, in February 2008, and he committed as much as $750 million in additional capital to the insurer.
 and one of the first analysts to advise clients to buy when stocks were bottoming after the 2008 financial crisis, said in a phone interview Feb.
 Dongfeng Motor Group Co, a carmaker in negotiations to buy a stake in PSA Peugeot Citroen, rose 21 percent to HK$1154 before being suspended from trading pending an announcement.
 made its boldest move yet to buy Time Warner Cable Inc, nominating a full slate of board members as it seeks to usher the second-largest US.
 The way it works is that Herbalife enters into a five-year prepaid forward contract with one or more of its underwriters -- Bank of America Merrill Lynch, Credit Suisse, HSBC and Morgan Stanley -- to buy back some of the shares underlying the convertible.
 In five years, if the convertible is in the money (the stock is above $83ish), the hedge funds convert it, get 12 million shares, deliver 9 million of them to the banks to close out their swaps; then the banks deliver them to Herbalife to close out the forward, everyone is happy8 If the convertible is out of the money, the hedge funds get their $1 billion back, use it to buy 9 million shares (for much less than $1 billion), deliver the shares to the banks, who deliver them to Herbalife, and the hedge funds keep the rest of the money.
 For another thing, normally when companies offer convertible bonds, their stock goes down, because hedge funds are selling short to hedge the convertibles they're expecting to buy.
 On the other hand, though, among the possible stories of "someone spends a billion dollars to buy Herbalife stock," this seems like the most benign for Ackman.
 That's just the most logical number of shares to buy back -- the delta of the convertible.
 Smaller numbers are very possible, if, for instance, some non-hedge investors buy the convertible, or if Herbalife just doesn't want to buy back that much.
 and Liberty Global Plc the right to buy his stakes should he decide to sell.
 He will also have the right of first refusal to buy Malone’s 87 million Class B shares in the European cable company, according to a separate filing today.
 trumped his bid for Time Warner Cable Inc, agreeing to buy the second-largest cable company in a $45 billion deal.
 The Dubai-based carrier agreed to buy another 50 A380s in November, bringing the number of superjumbos it has ordered to 140, half the entire backlog for the plane.
 More Seats Amedeo was formed yesterday out of Doric, whose business model was managing A380 assets after finding investors to buy planes from airlines in so-called sale and leaseback transactions.
 The company is in talks to sell its Japanese personal-computer business to buyout firm Japan Industrial Partners Inc, according to a person with knowledge of the situation, who asked not to be identified before a public announcement.
 Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s Three Ireland also got objections this month over its plan to buy Telefonica SA’s Irish operations.
 Some of the biggest names in the industry are keen to buy assets at the same time as the world’s largest producers including Rio Tinto Group are shunning unwanted mines.
 For the right assets at the right price, it’s a really excellent time to buy” Ex-JPMorgan Bankers Last month Citigroup Inc.
 BTG said it upgraded Itau to buy from neutral after the “stunning” fourth-quarter results.
 Itau said last week it agreed to buy a controlling stake in Corpbanca for at least $22 billion to expand in Chile.
 Munich Re, led by Chief Executive Officer Nikolaus von Bomhard, 57, announced plans last year to buy back 1 billion euros of stock by a shareholders’ meeting scheduled for April 30.
 Ocwen agreed last month to buy servicing from Wells Fargo on about 184,000 loans, or roughly 2 percent of the lender’s residential-servicing portfolio, according to a statement.
 Five years after Brazil first started auctioning the contracts to buy power from wind farms, the delay highlights the challenges the government is facing in diversifying from dams, which account for two-thirds of national supply.
 To get there, VW needs to buy out Scania’s other investors, who this month asked for an independent auditor to examine whether ownership of the company by VW and MAN poses a conflict of interest.
 As part of an agreement with MAN to take full control, VW is required by law to offer to buy out the German truckmaker’s remaining owners.
 The fiscal 2015 request, to be released on March 4, will include funds to buy 26 of the Air Force’s model, six of the Marine Corps’ short-takeoff and vertical-landing jets and two of the Navy’s version for aircraft carriers, according to the officials familiar with the plans who asked not to be identified because the budget hasn’t been made public.
 6 on money-laundering charges after allegedly selling Bitcoin to undercover police officers who told them the digital currency would be used to buy stolen credit-card numbers.
 “Contributions from Canaccord’s nondomestic platforms were very strong and more than offset weaker-than-expected results from Canaccord’s domestic platform,” said Graham Ryding, a TD Securities analyst who upgraded the stock to buy from hold.
 raised UniCredit SpA to buy from neutral and Intesa Sanpaolo SpA, the country’s second-largest lender, to neutral from underweight, analyst Azzurra Guelfi said in an e-mailed report from London today.
 Mercuria, which was founded in 2004 and is now the fourth-largest independent commodity trader, has been seeking a strategic partner to buy a stake of 10 percent to 20 percent for more than a year.
 The Geneva-based trading house is simultaneously in exclusive negotiations to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodities unit, said one of the people.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Credit Agricole Assurances and partner private equity firm Ardian Sarl are poised to buy a majority stake in Vinci SA’s parking-lot division in a deal valuing the business at 196 billion euros ($27 billion).
 14 (Bloomberg) -- GCL-Poly Energy Holdings Ltd, the world’s biggest maker of polysilicon, plans to buy a 68 percent stake in Hong Kong-listed Same Time Holdings Ltd.
 The lenders previously proposed splitting up LightSquared while Mast had offered to buy part of it in exchange for debt.
 LightSquared has sued Ergen and SPSO for the way they bought the company’s debt before another Ergen entity made a $22 billion offer to buy its wireless spectrum, claiming they sought to hijack the reorganization.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- SAS Group, the Nordic region’s largest airline, is selling shares potentially valued at 35 billion Swedish kronor ($537 million) to buy new Airbus planes and cut its dependence on banks.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Meriton Pty, Australia’s biggest apartment developer, plans to double its debt this year from about A$300 million ($268 million) to buy land amid record low interest rates and soaring demand for apartments.
 Last month, he rejected a proposal to buy out the swaps for $165 million, saying it was too costly.
 The delay will force Eneva to buy electricity from other generators in Brazil’s North to meet its contractual obligations after spot prices surged because of a drought.
 It would make sense for Wanxiang to buy Fisker after acquiring the battery-maker, said Shifley.
 Wilmington Watching The duel is being watched in Wilmington, Delaware, where Fisker spent $20 million in 2010 to buy the abandoned GM plant.
 “Our customers simply don’t have the money to buy basic necessities between pay checks” Support from Wal-Mart helped Democrats push through the last increase in the wage floor after the party won control of both chambers of Congress in the 2006 midterm elections.
 Singh’s administration earlier this month approved Vodafone’s $16 billion plan to buy out the local partners in its Indian unit, six months after the South Asian nation ended limits on foreign ownership in the sector.
 17 statement issued after reports that Nestle had tried to buy the maker of Ferrero Rocher chocolates.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Offers to buy Spanish homes fell short of the asking prices by 23 percent on average last year, damping expectations that the nation’s residential values have reached bottom, according to Idealistacom.
 He began buying in October 2011 after Westway’s largest holder offered to buy components of its business, and he sold when the deal became public, they said.
 He “used this information” to buy shares.
 Smith & Nephew Plc climbed 11 percent to 886 pence after agreeing to buy Austin, Texas-based ArthroCare Corp.
 after Actavis Plc, the world’s second-largest generic-drug maker by market value, agreed to buy Forest for about $25 billion.
 is seeking bids to buy 5,000 oil tank cars with improved safety standards following a series of spills and explosions related to hauling crude by railroad.
 to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after the company stepped up repurchases and a proxy-advisory firm criticized his efforts as micromanagement.
 The billionaire as recently as last week publicly urged the company to buy back more stock, after saying in December he would seek a shareholder vote to unlock funds held by Cupertino, California-based Apple, which had $159 billion in cash and marketable securities as of Dec.
 took a step closer to becoming Canada’s next national wireless operator after spending C$233 million ($210 million) to buy airwaves across the country in an auction that netted the Canadian government a record C$527 billion.
 front-month gas probably will drop to as low as 55 pence by the end of next month because it’s been more profitable for utilities to buy renewable power after output from wind turbines jumped, said Nick Campbell, a risk manager at Inspired Energy in Lancashire, England.
 Ramon Ang, the billionaire chief of San Miguel, said last month he’s received several bids of as much as $6 billion for its 51 percent stake in the brewery unit, and that Kirin hasn’t offered to buy the remaining stake.
 Comcast, which plans to buy New York-based Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Exxon shares hit an all-time high last December as Murti raised his rating to buy.
 luxury-handbag maker, also is going to Hudson Yards, agreeing last year to buy 750,000 square feet at the first tower under construction.
 Apollo’s growth in credit jumped after Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc’s September 2008 failure, to $151 billion at the end of that year, from $44 billion in 2006, as the firm took advantage of frozen markets to buy corporate loans at steep discounts.
 AT&T Bid AT&T agreed to pay a breakup fee of about $6 billion in cash and assets when it tried to buy T-Mobile in 2011.
 Chief Executive Officer Aubrey McClendon, agreed to buy 56,000 acres of drilling leases from Exxon Mobil Corp.
 Securities and Exchange Commission, would give investors and employees of closely held companies a place to buy and sell shares while letting corporations avoid the disclosure and compliance requirements that come with being publicly traded.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-largest oil producer, plans to buy a quarter of Israel’s biggest natural gas field for as much as $26 billion under a revised agreement as demand rises in the Middle East.
 Frequent sealed-bid batch auctions to buy and sell stocks seems to me like not the worst idea to replace the continuous limit order book, and here is an article about an academic who is proposing them.
 Chicago trailed some other markets for attracting investor interest because Illinois is a judicial foreclosure state, meaning home repossessions require approval by a court, slowing down the process, and there were fewer opportunities to buy distressed real estate in bulk, Ramella said.
 CIM is poised to buy 2 California Plaza, an office tower in downtown Los Angeles that’s the largest asset in the auction.
 Daiwa Chief Financial Officer Mikita Komatsu said last week that the Tokyo-based company has no plans to buy back shares and has yet to decide whether to increase dividends.
 L’Oreal could use cash from a sale to buy back its shares from Nestle, two of the people said.
 Were L’Oreal to buy the stake, it could return some of the stock to shareholders, two of the people said.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Senior Housing Properties Trust agreed to buy two 15-story medical-office buildings in downtown Boston’s Seaport District for about $113 billion.
 7 to $6503 in New York after Deutsche Bank AG lifted the social entertainment website to buy from hold.
 Personal Finances The measure of consumers’ personal finances rose to 3 from 12 the prior week, while the index gauging whether it’s a good time to buy improved to minus 407 from minus 41.
 Moody’s is offering to buy as much as 265 million of the New Delhi-based company’s shares for 2,000 Indian rupees ($3219) each, a 287 percent premium to their closing level today on the National Stock Exchange of India, the New York-based firm said in a statement distributed by Business Wire.
 agreed to buy Emeritus Corp.
 Corporate landlords have raised more than $20 billion to buy as many as 200,000 homes in the past two years, creating a new institutional asset class out of the traditional mom-and-pop business of single-family rentals, according to Jade Rahmani, an analyst with Keefe Bruyette & Woods Inc.
 agreed to buy it for $452 billion.
 Activist investor Icahn dropped his campaign urging the company to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after Apple stepped up repurchases and a proxy-advisory firm criticized his efforts as micromanagement.
 Julius Baer is targeting 57 billion francs to 72 billion francs of Merrill Lynch assets after it agreed in 2012 to buy non-US.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Actavis Plc, the world’s second-largest generic-drug maker by market value, is close to an agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Forest said last month it reached an agreement to buy Aptalis Pharma Inc.
 to buy back $50 billion of stock this year was opposed by an influential proxy-voting service, which said such a motion would “micromanage” how the company uses capital.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Smith & Nephew Plc agreed to buy ArthroCare Corp.
 Motorola Mobility, which Lenovo agreed to buy for $291 billion last month, received a formal complaint in May in which the European Commission, the EU’s antitrust regulator, said it suspects the company is abusing its dominant position by “seeking and enforcing” injunctions against Apple in Germany based on its patents that are essential for products to comply with industry technical standards.
 He stashed the $300 he was allowed to buy in January in his Buenos Aires home and did the same on the first day of February.
 More than 12 years after Argentina restricted withdrawals and converted dollar savings into pesos amid an economic crisis that led to a $95 billion default, 91 percent of those who qualify to buy foreign currency from the government are paying a 20 percent surcharge to keep the cash.
 Argentines have applied to buy and take home $223 million since President Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner opened up dollar purchases Jan.
 Wealthiest 20% The tax agency has received 480,644 requests to buy foreign currency since the government allowed the wealthiest Argentines to purchase dollars for savings at the official exchange rate for the first time in 18 months.
 If you’re earning enough to qualify to buy, why would you want pesos? They’re not worth anything” Cabinet Chief Jorge Capitanich on Jan.
 agreed to buy the media provider for $452 billion, combining the two largest US.
 “Evaluation of these results is ongoing” In Latin America, the company has expanded into Colombia by agreeing to buy a 30 percent interest in the Guajira Offshore 3 Block last month, it said today.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Goldleaf Jewelry Co, a Chinese jewelry retailer with gold mining investments, plans to buy US.
 agreed in 2008 to buy $400 million of debt from USG as the cash-strapped company struggled with frozen credit markets and dwindling wallboard demand.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Mallinckrodt Plc, the drugmaker spun off by Covidien Plc last year, agreed to buy Cadence Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 jumped 37 percent to 110 yen in Tokyo after the world’s biggest camera maker announced plans to buy back 50 billion yen of its shares.
 regulators and is working to get approval to buy Motorola from Google Inc.
 Forest Laboratories surged 28 percent after Actavis Plc agreed to buy the maker of the Alzheimer’s drug Namenda.
 Deutsche Telekom, which owns 59 percent of Magyar Telekom, agreed to pay 828 million euros ($11 billion) to buy the 392 percent stake of the Czech unit it didn’t already own from Falcon Group, the seller said in a statement today.
 agreed to buy a 10 percent stake for about $125 billion.
 Coca-Cola agreed to buy 167 million newly issued shares in the maker of Keurig coffee brewers for about $7498 each, aiming to introduce a system for producing single-serve cold drinks.
 Last week, Bank of Montreal agreed to buy the company for 708 million pounds ($12 billion).
 upgraded Genting Singapore to buy today and raised its price target to S$162 because of the planned overseas investment.
 Anyone attempting to buy a Quebec-based company through a hostile bid would not be allowed to exercise voting rights attached to the shares it owned after the offer was announced.
 Coca-Cola agreed earlier this month to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc.
 fell 19 percent after agreeing to buy a mine from Goldcorp Inc.
 During the last trade dispute, Sunnova briefly refused to buy SolarWorld modules for customers, a tactic that Berger may revive.
 Chief Executive Officer Tom Ward, agreed to buy all of Royal Dutch Shell Plc’s assets in Kansas.
 “There’s a reluctance for participants to buy higher prices,” said Tom Tucci, managing director and head of Treasury trading in New York at CIBC World Markets Corp.
 The bank is only talking to buyers in the industry, not financial firms, because “they pursue a different investment strategy,” he said.
 to buy five container ships for more than $190 million, Gregory Zikos, Costamare’s chief financial officer, said in a September interview.
 Investors borrow shares to short in expectations of a price decline, hoping to buy them cheaper at a later date and cash in the difference, or to hedge another position.
 “People want to buy the dips now because the market made a bottom after Feb.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- India has put off a final agreement to buy 126 Rafale combat planes worth more than $11 billion from Dassault Aviation SA to the next fiscal year as the government has almost exhausted its annual defense budget for purchases.
 Antony said India’s Central Bureau of Investigation is in the final stages of its probe into allegations of corruption in a $753 million deal to buy helicopters from AgustaWestland.
 agreed in October to buy Oberhausen, Germany-based Oxea from Advent International for about $2 billion in October, highlighting a renewed interest from Gulf oil and petrochemical producers in making acquisitions.
 30, has sold assets and refinanced obligations since borrowing to buy and build resorts such as CityCenter in Las Vegas before the 2008 financial crisis.
 “Some funds are trying to buy relatively safer bets after heavy selling pressure in strong sectors” A report tomorrow will probably show US.
 Insurance Deal Homeowners in areas with a high flood risk have been able to buy insurance with no cap on its cost as part of the deal reached between insurers and the government in 2000.
 Licensed Goods “I spent two hours in line to buy a licensed Olympic hat, and when I got in, I was told they were out of hats,” Ekaterina Gundareva, an events organizer who came to Sochi to see the Games, said by phone yesterday.
 The New York-based firm, which started its analyst survey program in 2008, uses complex mathematical models to decide when to buy and sell securities.
 Contract Crucial KKR agreed in November to buy six solar farms in California and Arizona with Google Inc.
 “Spreads on Samurai have fallen to unattractive levels, and it will be difficult for Japanese investors to buy at the kind of rates offered by JPMorgan and GE in future” Spread ‘Unattractive’ Nakatani, who has invested in GE Capital’s debt in the past, said he didn’t buy the Norwalk, Connecticut-based company’s notes this time because the spread was “unattractive” He doesn’t invest in US.
 “Following the emerging-market shock, and possibility of spreads widening for overseas names, there appears to have been a feeling that there wasn’t a need to rush to buy GE Capital’s Samurai this time,” said Yusuke Ueda, a Tokyo-based credit analyst at Bank of America Merrill Lynch.
 “This will get retailers to spend more on security, which is good for VeriFone and Ingenico,” Luria said in an interview “These hacks will encourage retailers to buy more new chip-enabled terminals” For retailers, options include beefing up efforts to stave off phishing attacks, accelerating a move to credit cards with chips embedded, rather than magnetic strips, and encrypting data as it moves from checkout terminals to remote servers.
 It then agreed to buy Motorola Mobility for $291 billion in cash and stock, adding a brand established in the US.
 of Japan agreed to buy a minority stake in Squse Inc, a Kyoto-based maker of robotic hands, three people with knowledge of the matter said.
 “With inventory build being evidenced on the back of higher imports, this will act as a buffer to buyers in the coming months,” it said.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC, one of the oldest private-equity firms, agreed to buy Ashland Inc’s water-technologies unit for about $18 billion to operate as a stand-alone business.
 and Land Securities Group Plc, the UK’s largest real estate investment trust, are looking for well-worn office buildings from the 1980s and early 1990s to buy and refurbish as rising demand and a shortage of prime space in the City lifts prices and rents.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Hines Global REIT plans to buy 25 Cabot Square in the Canary Wharf financial district from Morgan Stanley, Property Week reported late today without saying where it got the information.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Twitter Inc, the microblogging service that went public last year, agreed to buy 900 patents from International Business Machines Corp.
 The firm will focus on opportunities to buy and build infrastructure that services horizontal wells, which exploration companies are increasingly drilling to unearth shale oil and gas, Lewellyn said.
 “Jazztel is getting quite expensive but it could still make sense for Orange to buy it” Cable IPO A move by Orange, Spain’s third-largest wireless carrier -- behind Telefonica SA and Vodafone Group Plc -- would underscore rising demand for landline assets that are needed to offer combined broadband, TV and wireless packages.
 On May 18, the country will vote whether to buy 22 Saab AB Gripen jets in a purchase valued at 31 billion Swiss francs ($347 billion).
 said it plans to buy a quarter of the site for as much as $26 billion.
 Etihad said yesterday it will decide by early March whether to buy a stake in Alitalia SpA of Italy to add to a portfolio of investments already spanning Australia to Ireland.
 After the deal to buy Warner Chilcott was announced in May, moving the company’s headquarters to Dublin, Ireland, Bisaro and other executive received a $115 million payout in early-vested stock and retention bonuses that otherwise would have been taxed by the US.
 A month later, Men’s Wearhouse offered to buy the smaller chain for $55 a share in a tactic known as a Pac-Man defense, where a target thwarts being taken over by instead bidding for its suitor.
 It’s held preliminary talks to buy the outdoor clothing retailer from private-equity owner Golden Gate Capital, said one of the people.
 Bank have slipped 5 percent this week to $5340 yesterday as investors showed disappointment that the company may be opting to buy Eddie Bauer rather than to sell itself to Men’s Wearhouse.
 They argued that pooling and servicing agreements for most of the trusts required Countrywide to buy back modified loans, according to Kapnick’s ruling.
 This company at some stage is going to be in very good shape, just maybe not this year” The extra yield, or spread, investors demand to buy Cencosud’s bonds due in 2023 instead of Treasuries swelled 079 percentage point since Argentina devalued the peso to 379 percentage points on Feb.
 They argued that pooling and servicing agreements for most of the trusts required Countrywide to buy back modified loans, according to Kapnick’s ruling.
 Deutsche Telekom has returned to buying assets outside its home country as Chief Executive Officer Timotheus Hoettges bets on a rebound in demand from the Baltic Sea to Crete.
 The German company agreed this week to buy out minority shareholders of its Czech unit for $11 billion.
 Bonn-based Deutsche Telekom also offered to buy an additional 10 percent stake in Hellenic Telecommunications Organization SA from Greece, people familiar with the talks said last month.
 Deutsche Telekom is adding landlines in countries including Poland and the Czech Republic through its agreement in November to buy Warsaw-based GTS Central Europe.
 In September, the company agreed to buy Thingsoft, an online game development studio based in Seoul, South Korea, that helped develop the FIFA Online 1 title.
 The telecommunications operator pulled out of the race to buy Vivendi SA’s stake in Morocco’s Maroc Telecom in June.
 “The model involves Chinese financing with Chinese solar panels and a commitment from us” to buy them, Froneman said.
 Sibanye last year agreed to buy a majority stake in the Cooke operations of Gold One International Ltd, which is owned by Chinese consortium BCX Gold.
 agreed to buy rival Ceradyne Inc.
 He is advising investors to buy shares of software exporters and drugmakers.
 Oman agreed in 2012 to buy 12 of the jets.
 “SoftBank does not need T-Mobile to achieve a Sprint turnaround” Son, who rose from scorned minority schoolboy to world’s 46th-richest person as of yesterday, became chairman of Sprint after spending $216 billion to buy control last year.
 The door-to-door delivery service was upgraded to buy at Nomura, which also boosted its target price to 560 yen.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Brookfield Incorporacoes SA, Brazil’s worst-performing homebuilder in the past year, surged to the highest since October as its biggest shareholder offered to buy the stock it doesn’t own and delist the company.
 Bank also raised antitrust concerns about any merger between the two companies even though it had previously offered to buy Men’s Wearhouse.
 agreed to buy Emerald Agribusiness Group Pty, gaining full control of the Australian company’s storage facilities and an export terminal in Victoria state as it seeks to expand its global grain business.
 Pierre Tegner, an analyst at Natixis Securities, advises investors not to buy L’Oreal shares only on speculation that Nestle will sell its stake.
 “I’m not sure L’Oreal is ready to spend 20 billion euros just to buy back shares,” said Tegner, who rates L’Oreal shares neutral and recommends buying Nestle stock.
 L’Oreal could use cash from a sale to buy back its shares from Nestle, two of the people said.
 Nestle CEO Paul Bulcke declined to comment in October on any interest to buy Ferrero after an article in Repubblica that the companies were in preliminary stages of talks.
 wireless carrier, meaning it can’t offer to buy a stake of 30 percent or more in Vodafone for the following six months, according to UK.
 Societe Generale SA upgraded its rating on the stock to buy from neutral, saying Europe’s largest oilfield-services provider may begin to reduce costs as it introduces tighter controls on spending.
 It's just a terrible capital markets joke1 Why would you sell stock to buy back stock? One, it's pointless -- you end up where you began.
 (KO) agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc.
 Coke bought Green Mountain shares at $7498, a discount to yesterday's price,2 and Green Mountain will use the proceeds to buy shares from the public at, I think it's safe to say, a huge premium to yesterday's price.
 It makes sense for Coke to buy a stake in Green Mountain: it "fits into Coca-Cola’s preferred strategy of taking equity stakes in promising new brands and technologies, such as Zico coconut water and Honest Tea, and helping incubate them" And it makes sense for Coke to pay more or less yesterday's price: Today's run-up is due mostly to the fact that Coke is giving Green Mountain its seal of approval.
 The board would provide “financial certification” to aboriginal groups interested in raising debt to buy equity in a resource project, according to a Sept.
 Oi SA rallied after Folha de SPaulo reported that a group of 12 banks agreed to raise as much as 8 billion reais to buy a stake in the company that will result from the merger of the phone carrier and parent Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 A single call option contract entitles an investor to buy 100 shares of a company’s stock at a set price in the future.
 Similarly, option contracts that entitle the holder to buy shares at or below the market price at the time are more expensive than out of the money options, the term for those whose exercise price is well above the current trading price.
 Even Carl Icahn has to buy a piece of Apple before he can get breakfast or dinner with Tim Cook” Meanwhile, the Nook business continues to struggle.
 David Jones Chairman Peter Mason didn’t disclose Myer’s approach when it occurred last October and two directors were given approval to buy shares one day after the offer was made.
 That optimism was misplaced because Sinopec will probably just use the proceeds to buy assets from its parent, Jefferies said.
 Sinopec will probably use the funds to buy assets from its parent at “the highest prices acceptable to minority shareholders,” Yu wrote.
 Oerlikon agreed to buy the division, which makes coatings for machinery and airplane engines in a deal valued at 1 billion Swiss francs ($11 billion) on Jan.
 Southwest recently agreed to buy additional flying rights at both LaGuardia and Reagan that were sold by American to win approval from US.
 The IFT doesn’t have any contracts that mention a Telmex option to buy control of Dish, Contreras said.
 from Astra Oil Trading NV without knowledge of a put option that in 2012 forced the company to buy the remaining stake as part of a $8205 million legal settlement.
 The offer came as it sought permission to buy NBC Universal, which it won in early 2011, adding to its stable a television network, movie studio and cable channels such as CNBC, MSNBC and USA Network.
 agreed to buy it for $15 billion.
 Energy XXI agreed to buy the company to become the largest public independent producer on the Gulf of Mexico shelf.
 Garofalo, 48, a former chief financial officer at Canadian gold producer Agnico Eagle Mines Ltd, took up his current post in July 2010, more than a year after HudBay abandoned an agreement to buy Canadian competitor Lundin Mining Corp.
 An offer could value Lorillard at more than $20 billion, though it’s unclear if Reynolds plans to buy the entire company, according to the paper.
 “Though there has been some speculation on BAT buying out Reynolds, helping Reynolds to buy Lorillard would make a lot more sense from a returns perspective,” James Bushnell, an analyst at Exane BNP Paribas in London, wrote in a March 4 note to clients.
 Japan Tobacco, which owns the Camel and Winston brands outside of the US, may seek to buy those brands from Reynolds, allowing Reynolds to acquire Lorillard and its Newport brand, David Hayes, a London-based analyst at Nomura, wrote in a March 4 report.
 cable company, had offered to buy Time Warner Cable -- the No.
 Distributors have 35 gigawatt less than needed, forcing them to buy energy at spot market prices to meet their responsibilities and then resell it at government-capped prices to consumers.
 Mengniu agreed to buy about 27 percent of Modern Dairy in May for HK$318 billion ($410 million), giving it preferential purchase rights to Modern Dairy’s milk supply.
 Rio Tinto paid $38 billion to buy aluminum producer Alcan Inc.
 The announcement caused Volkswagen’s stock to jump as short sellers raced to buy shares to repay borrowed stock in bets that VW would fall.
 “The long-term fundamentals remain intact on the product-tanker story” Private-equity firms contributed to the rush to buy product tankers as they invested the most since at least 2008 in shipping, according to Marine Money, an industry newsletter.
 The company, which intended to use the proceeds to buy 10 ships, planned to price the shares March 11.
 Ross and partners also ventured into dry-bulk commodities shipping, raising $100 million to buy as many as eight ships hauling coal, iron ore and grains through a company called Nautical Bulk Holdings Ltd, he said in November.
 An offer could value Lorillard at more than $20 billion, though it’s unclear if Reynolds plans to buy the entire company, according to the paper.
 “Though there has been some speculation on BAT buying out Reynolds, helping Reynolds to buy Lorillard would make a lot more sense from a returns perspective,” James Bushnell, an analyst at Exane BNP Paribas in London, wrote in a March 4 note to clients.
 Japan Tobacco, which owns the Camel and Winston brands outside of the US, may seek to buy those brands from Reynolds, allowing Reynolds to acquire Lorillard and its Newport brand, David Hayes, a London-based analyst at Nomura, wrote in a March 4 report.
March 25 (Bloomberg) -- Cemex SAB, the largest cement maker in the Americas, sold bonds in dollars and euros today as it looks to buy back securities due between 2017 and 2020.
 Cemex plans to use the proceeds of the euro notes to buy back 130 million euros of 9625 percent bonds due 2017 and 115 million euros of 8875 percent notes due 2017, according to a company statement.
 That includes gangs stealing identities to buy cigarettes in large quantities using fake credit cards, she said.
 At the time ofpurchase, it agreed to buy a third-generation operating licenseand frequencies from Takilant for $30 million, as well as theGibraltar-based company’s 26 percent stake in Ucell, as a“prerequisite” for entering the market, according toTeliaSonera’s website.
 Kroger, Wal-Mart The $40-a-share Cerberus offer to buy Safeway and its 1,335US.
 tried and failed to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodities trading business before a $35 billion sale was announced March 19 to Mercuria Energy Group Ltd.
 A sovereign wealth fund or private equity firm are the most probable candidates to buy a stake, said Craig Pirrong, a finance professor at the University of Houston.
 Those talks were put on hold when Mercuria won the right to exclusive negotiations to buy the JPMorgan business, one person said.
 Lloyds will also offer to buy back the bonds, known as enhanced capital notes, from individual investors who will be given the opportunity to retain them and continue to receive coupon payments.
 DBS agreed to buy Societe Generale SA’s Asian private banking business this week in a $220 million deal that will boost its high-net-worth assets under management by more than 20 percent, according to a March 17 statement.
Samena Capital, an investment firm managing about $700 million, is in talks to buy as much as 50 percent of RAK Ceramics, the world’s biggest maker of ceramic tiles, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Samena is in discussions with the ruling family of Ras Al Khaimah to buy a 25 percent to 50 percent stake, the people said, asking not to be identified as the talks are private.
 said March 2 the company and its partners will pay $16 billion in cash and assumed debt to buy two hydroelectric power plants in India, while Emirates Telecommunications Corp.
 In the memo lines of the checks, Mellon wrote notations such as “antique Charleston table” and “bookcase,” even though the funds weren’t going to buy furniture.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- Valero Energy Corp, the world’s largest independent refiner, has agreed to buy a 110 million-gallon-a-year ethanol plant in Mount Vernon, Indiana, from Aventine Renewable Energy Holdings Inc.
 Buying Opportunity “The yen tends to be bought on risk aversion and that would make you hesitate to buy into Japanese shares,” said Yusuke Kuwayama, a portfolio manager at Tokio Marine & Nichido Fire Insurance Co.
 Ciech SA climbed in Warsaw after billionaire Jan Kulczyk offered to buy Poland’s largest maker of soda for glass production.
 Carlyle agreed to buy a 55 percent stake in the company in June 2011.
March 28 (Bloomberg) -- Transaction Capital Ltd, which finances minibus taxis used by millions of commuters in South African townships, is seeking a bank loan so it can extend credit to plumbers and gardeners to buy pickup trucks.
 Rather than meld software and hardware into proprietary systems, Arista built a more modular system that can be more easily improved without the need to buy new machines and works with software from technology firms other than Arista.
 slumped 93 percent after agreeing to buy eAccess Ltd.
 The French state and Dongfeng Motor Corp, which have agreed to buy 14 percent stakes apiece in Europe’s second-largest automaker, will also each have two seats.
 Ergen had previously offered to buy some of the company’s airwaves for $22 billion, only to drop the offer amid a dispute with Falcone, whose Harbinger Capital Partners LLC controls LightSquared.
 The ratio of outstanding puts giving the right to sell GameStop shares versus calls to buy has jumped 36 percent this year to 113-to-1 on March 24, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “Emerging-market investors buy Korean paper because there are few safe assets to buy other than Korean paper,” said Whang.
 Milan-based UniCredit’s Reg S offering limits note sales to buyers based outside of the US.
 “Buybacks and an improved dividend are on investors’ minds,” said Manish Singh, who helps oversee $2 billion as head of investments at Crossbridge Capital LLP in London, adding that he plans to buy more of the company’s shares.
 Craig Sterling, managing director and global head of equity research at EVA Dimensions LLC in New York, advises clients not to buy shares in Nestle, citing its high valuation.
 You need to pick your spots and decide when you want to buy it, and it’s not a compelling valuation.
 He also has six utilities in the Los Angeles area eager to buy the desert water.
March 31 (Bloomberg) -- Samsung SDI Co, a supplier of batteries to Apple Inc, agreed to buy Cheil Industries Inc.
 Kroton offered in April 2013 to buy Anhanguera in an all-stock deal valued at 5 billion reais ($21 billion) that would form the world’s biggest education company by market value.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Suntory Holdings Ltd, which agreed to buy bourbon maker Beam Inc.
 Elliott Pressure Elliott offered to buy the company early last year for $11 a share, valuing the company at about $23 billion, and advocated for it to combine with BMC, which was also put on the block after receiving pressure from Elliott, Paul Singer’s New York-based hedge fund.
 The firm tried to buy Anaren Inc, an electronics manufacturer, in April 2013.
 Even if a GMO passes a risk analysis, a government may consider trade and bilateral relations before agreeing to buy new varieties for import, Peng Yufa, chief scientist for China’s committee on safety of biotechnology, said March 7.
 The semiconductor device maker was boosted to buy from neutral by Mizuho, with a 12-month price target of 5,400 yen.
 “Most people were expecting stronger pickup in housing this year that would lift the economy into a stronger growth pattern, and that isn’t happening” Contracts to buy previously owned homes fell for an eighth straight month in February, the Realtors group said today.
 “I was trying to buy the very best work,” Sender said in a 2011 interview with Bloomberg News.
 “This type of relationship is customary in partial IPOs and would be particularly important for EBay as currently, outside of PayPal, there does not exist a global payment processing solution competent enough to service EBay’s users” Before EBay, Icahn had targeted Apple Inc, pressuring the iPhone maker and CEO Tim Cook to buy back $50 billion worth of stock.
 UBS raised the shares to buy from neutral, citing the stock’s losses relative to the benchmarks.
 The company also is looking to buy brands to bolster its consumer health business in the categories of vitamins and supplements, cold and allergy, and pain relievers.
 The company agreed to buy AZ Electronic Materials SA, a specialty chemicals supplier to the electronics industry, for 16 billion pounds.
 Better Drugs That may motivate Merck to buy Endocyte, whose market capitalization is less than $1 billion, to get its hands on future drugs, particularly if more studies prove the technology’s capabilities, said Roth Capital’s Hazlett.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA rallied 12 percent to 961 reais after announcing a plan to buy back shares.
 “It would be enough for Gazprom to buy gas from independent producers, which supply gas to all consumer categories” at prices that give similar margins to exports based on a producer’s domestic market share.
 In January 2013, he spent $136 million to buy 332,048 shares, and in September 2012, he bought 24 million shares while ESL sold 24 million shares.
 In 2010 he teamed with billionaire James Packer to buy almost 20 percent of Ten Network Holdings Ltd, Australia’s third-largest commercial broadcaster.
 Investec raised its rating on the medical-device maker to buy from add, saying that breaking it up could create value.
 Insurers also sank on March 19 after Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne’s budget scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity.
 The Chancellor of the Exchequer yesterday scrapped rules requiring retirees to buy insurers’ annuities with their pension funds, making it more likely people will access their savings as a lump sum instead.
 Valet Parking Since agreeing to buy Stansted for 15 billion pounds in January 2013, MAG has embarked on a program of upgrades to the 23-year-old terminal building designed by UK.
 Fed Bank of Dallas President Richard Fisher, a former managing partner of a fund that bought distressed debt, said in a January speech that he’d “have to hire Sherlock Holmes to find a single distressed company priced attractively enough to buy” “Things seem somewhat calm, but that’s part of the difficulty with this job is trying to predict what might happen,” said Sabur Moini, a high-yield money manager at Payden & Rygel in Los Angeles.
 have abandoned talks to buy mobile operator Warid Telecom, two people familiar with the matter said.
 Amsterdam-based VimpelCom and Pakistan Telecommunication, part-owned by Abu Dhabi-based Emirates Telecommunications Corp, or Etisalat, held talks to buy the business as they sought to consolidate their existing operations in the south-Asian country, the people said.
 12 that it had agreed to buy Amcol for $41 a share, or about $16 billion including net debt.
 agreed last month to buy more than 1,700 of Plug’s forklift systems for six North American distribution centers.
 “Frutarom can be expected to buy a significant company for hundreds of millions of dollars soon,” Union Bank’s Dekel said.
 He last month raised Frutarom’s rating to buy from market perform with a price estimate of 104 shekels.
 surged in Istanbul trading after a private-equity group led by EMF Capital Partners agreed to buy the general insurer.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 cable said he was previously worth $5 billion and “had low-balled his true worth” Firtash’s Group DF agreed to buy Intesa Sanpaolo SpA’s Ukrainian unit Pravex Bank Jan.
 Before attempting to remove the board, Corvex and Related offered to buy CommonWealth for $2450 a share, or $29 billion.
 “The big ISPs can make these demands -- driving up costs and prices for everyone else -- because of their market position” So-called net neutrality gained attention after Comcast Corp’s agreement to buy Time Warner Cable Inc, which would concentrate Internet access.
 “It provides a positive catalyst for investors to buy domestic stocks even as the political deadlock is still unresolved” Rate Decision Stocks gained even after Morgan Stanley cut its rating on Thailand to underweight from equalweight, citing decelerating economic growth and prolonged political instability.
 “Like many international companies we are going to follow this very closely” Bombardier is also wooing Russian airlines to buy its newest and biggest jetliner, the CSeries, which the company predicts will enter service late next year.
 in 2013 agreed to buy at least 32 CSeries jets in an order valued at about $256 billion at catalog prices.
 “Why wouldn’t you look at an accretive acquisition if you could do it?” Even if Rent-A-Center paid $40 a share in cash to buy Aaron’s, the deal would immediately boost earnings per share by more than 30 percent, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The Bank of Cyprus shares received in return, one told Hourican, weren’t worth enough to buy a packet of cookies.
 “The potential of these machines is contingent upon broadening the category’s appeal with a wider variety of uses and offerings, ease of obtaining the consumables, and price” Coca-Cola last month said agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc.
 paid $2 billion to buy a similarly named company.
 added the stock to its conviction list after upgrading it to buy from neutral.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped a requirement for British retirees to buy pension annuities.
 The company will issue convertible preferred stock to Sycamore, giving it the right to buy as much as 5 percent of Aeropostale common stock at $725 a share, the closing price on March 12.
 Chairman Charles Ergen to help make the lenders’ case that Ergen was engaged in a “bait and switch” when he made an offer to buy LightSquared for $22 billion.
 canceled an agreement to buy the business at the same price.
 The buyer is using some of its $18 million secured claim rather than cash to buy the business.
 I haven’t had that” The San Francisco-based network-equipment maker is being pushed to sell itself by activist shareholder firm Elliott Management Corp, which owns about 105 percent of the company and has called it “significantly undervalued” Riverbed last month rejected an offer from Elliott to buy it for $21 a share.
 yesterday advised investors to buy shares and increased its price target by 44 percent.
 The company said yesterday it agreed to buy Citic Ltd, its parent’s main operating unit with about $36 billion of shareholder equity.
 While promoting stocks is legal -- Wall Street’s biggest banks send reports daily advising investors on what to buy, often in companies that are clients -- US.
 The option to resell LNG will allow Tokyo Gas to commit to buying larger volumes, favoring the company in price negotiations, said Hirose, who was previously an executive vice president.
 Tokyo Gas plans to buy 14 million metric tons a year of LNG from the Cove Point plant in Maryland, it said in September.
 AutoCanada Inc, which runs car dealerships in Canada, surged 86 percent to C$5499 after saying it planned to buy 10 to 12 new dealerships in the next two years.
 Dong Energy A/S, the world’s biggest offshore-wind developer, agreed to buy Centrica’s Race Bank project off England’s eastern coast for 50 million pounds, according to a December statement.
 will spend as much as $41 million to buy QS Investors, a global quantitative equity firm that split from Deutsche Bank AG in 2010.
 climbed 7 percent after agreeing to buy western Canada conventional oil and natural gas assets from Imperial Oil Ltd.
March 16 (Bloomberg) -- Allianz SE, Europe’s biggest insurer, agreed to buy Milano Assicurazioni SpA assets from Unipol Gruppo Finanziario SpA for 440 million euros ($612 million), the Munich-based company said.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- AGL Energy Ltd’s A$151 billion ($135 billion) deal to buy government-owned power plants in Australia’s most-populous state was blocked by the nation’s antitrust regulator on concern it would reduce competition.
 EnergyAustralia, a unit of Hong Kong-based CLP Holdings Ltd, in July agreed to buy the Mount Piper and Wallerawang power stations from New South Wales.
 On July 1, Origin Energy agreed to buy power company Eraring Energy from the state.
 “We’re spending money right and left to buy help and systems,” he told analysts on Nov.
 lost 11 percent after agreeing to buy Santonia Energy Inc.
 Tourmaline Oil fell 11 percent to C$4974 after agreeing to buy Santonia Energy for C$1891 million in stock.
 raised the stock’s rating to buy from hold, citing the company’s improving gross margins and strong balance sheet.
 Vodafone, the world’s second-largest wireless carrier, agreed yesterday to buy Ono for 72 billion euros ($10 billion), including debt, to boost its TV and broadband offerings.
March 31 (Bloomberg) -- Mick Davis, the former chief executive officer of Xstrata Plc, raised as much as $375 billion from investors to buy assets and turn his X2 Resources into a mid-tier mining company.
 MegaFon said it will let Chief Executive Officer Ivan Tavrin to exercise an option to buy a 25 percent stake in the company in May, a year earlier than the original vesting date.
 Banks have pitched the business to buyout firms including Blackstone Group LP and Carlyle Group LP, they said.
 GPT Group, a Sydney-based diversified property trust, in May dropped an offer to buy Australand’s commercial and development units after failing to agree on a price.
 “Even farmers who purchased import vehicles on foreign currency installments are selling them in the second-hand market to buy local brands” Turkey’s lira declined 19 percent in the past year, the second-worst performance after the Argentine peso among 24 emerging market peers tracked by Bloomberg.
 will probably announce a deal within the week to buy JPMorgan’s $33 billion commodities unit after the parties entered exclusive talks last month, according to two people with knowledge of the situation.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- NorthStar Realty Finance Corp, a New York-based property investment company, agreed to buy 60 US.
 Sinclair on March 20 said it would restructure a deal with the Allbritton family to meet FCC objections, selling a station in three markets where it proposes to buy an affiliate of Walt Disney Co’s ABC network from Allbritton.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Some of Wall Street’s biggest banks say that Venezuela’s new currency system is a signal to buy the nation’s bonds.
 The extra yield, or spread, investors demand to buy Venezuela’s bonds due in 2027 rose 02 percentage point today to 109 percentage points.
 Companies and individuals will be allowed to buy and sell foreign exchange daily in cash or bonds in the so-called Sicad 2 market through banks and brokerages that will open local accounts for them, according to a resolution published in the Official Gazette on March 11.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Thales SA, the French maker of defense electronics, is in talks to buy the stake in a joint venture with Spain’s Amper SA that it doesn’t already own, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 BG Group Plc, which has agreed to buy LNG from a Cheniere Energy Inc.
 In a 2008 letter to shareholders, he lamented his decision not to buy an NBC station in the Dallas area.
 “There will be a shortfall of allowances by 2021 and that means that even most efficient steel producers will have to buy up to 75 percent of their permits.
March 26 (Bloomberg) -- Standard Life Plc climbed to a 10-month high after its investment arm agreed to buy Ignis Asset Management for 390 million pounds ($645 million), gaining 59 billion pounds of funds.
 Aberdeen Asset Management Plc agreed to buy Lloyds Banking Group Plc’s Scottish Widows Investment Partnership unit for 560 million pounds in November.
 At the opposite end of the risk/reward continuum, real estate opportunity funds aim for returns of at least 15 percent by using large amounts of debt to buy assets in need of turnaround.
 The Treasury said in December it plans to give taxpayers the opportunity to buy Lloyds shares “when the time is right” after a sale to money managers.
 and Bain Capital LLC, two Boston-based buyout firms, and Danish pension fund ATP, which agreed to buy Nordic card-payment company Nets Holding A/S for 17 billion kroner ($31 billion).
 “If you are a long-term investor, it’s a good time to buy” Russian equities have the cheapest valuations among 21 developing countries monitored by Bloomberg, with shares on the Micex Index trading at 48 times projected earnings, compared with a multiple of 91 for the MSCI Emerging Markets Index.
 India bought six C-130J aircrafts in 2011 and plans to buy six more.
 The French lender recommends investors purchase options to buy the dollar and sell the rupee as a hedge against election-outcome risks.
 Three-month contracts offering the right to sell the rupee cost 163 basis points more than those to buy, after reaching the cheapest since July 29 on March 11.
 Oracle in February agreed to buy marketing data analysis company BlueKai Inc, and last December said it would acquire Responsys Inc, which helps companies create and track Web campaigns, for $15 billion.
 Mongolian miners “have cheap coal but the high transportation cost to get them to buyers ultimately makes them unattractive,” said Amit Jain, a credit analyst in Bangalore at SJS Markets Ltd.
 on March 27, after upgrading MMC’s bonds to buy from neutral earlier this month.
 this week agreed to buy Maker Studios, a supplier of video content to YouTube, for at least $500 million, with an additional $450 million pledged if the target meets certain performance goals.
 ProSiebenSat1 agreed to buy the stake via its production company Red Arrow Entertainment.
 said March 2 it will pay $16 billion to buy two hydroelectric power plants in India with partners, while Emirates Telecommunications Corp.
March 7 (Bloomberg) -- Indian Oil Corp, the nation’s biggest refiner, agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Petroliam Nasional Bhd’s Canadian natural gas fields and a planned export project.
 “The economy is a factor because price sensitivity is an important variable for the customers of low-cost airlines,” Montanez, who raised Aeromexico to buy from hold last month and doesn’t rate Volaris, said in a telephone interview.
March 25 (Bloomberg) -- CVC Capital Partners Ltd, one of Europe’s largest private-equity firms, agreed to buy Nordic optician Synsam Nordic A/S from Swedish investment company Alipes AB for an undisclosed sum.
 If there won’t be much stricter European Union sanctions against Russia, this is a good moment to buy Raiffeisen” The US.
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- Temasek Holdings Pte’s plan to buy a stake in the retail arm of billionaire Li Ka-shing’s Hutchison Whampoa Ltd.
 Singapore’s state-owned investment company agreed on March 21 to buy 25 percent of AS.
 The Watson investment comes a week after a Temasek unit offered to buy control of Singapore’s Olam International Ltd, one of the world’s top three coffee and rice traders, for $32 billion.
 President Dilma Rousseff, then Petrobras’ chairwoman, said directors approved the $370 million purchase of a 50 percent stake without knowledge of a clause that later forced it to buy the rest as part of a $8205 million legal settlement.
 in 2013 and agreeing to buy Dutch operator Ziggo NV in January.
 The amended 2002 Mineral and Petroleum Resources Development Act will secure the state a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and enable it to buy an unspecified additional share at an “agreed price” It will also enable the mines minister to declare some minerals strategic and force companies processing them to sell some output to local manufacturers.
 Leucadia, run by Jefferies Group LLC Chief Executive Officer Richard Handler, agreed last week to buy 23 million preferred securities from Harbinger for $253 million.
 AstraZeneca agreed in 2008 to buy esomeprazole magnesium from Ranbaxy, the companies said at the time.
 Tesla’s entry in China is closely watched by other automakers that have been trying to convince local consumers to buy electric cars.
 ‘Violence and Intimidation’ “War is a time to buy,” Anvar Gilyazitdinov, who manages a $10 million portfolio of Russian stocks, including Gazprom, at Rye, Man & Gor Securities in Moscow, said by phone March 14.
 It’s a great opportunity to buy” In Washington, the White House said in a statement the international community “will not recognize the results of a poll administered under threats of violence and intimidation from a Russian military intervention” UK.
 As part of a venture with billionaire Alexander Nesis’s ICT Group, the state-run company is seeking to buy the Tomtor rare-earth deposit.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules forcing people to buy annuities with their pension funds.
 and partners will pay $16 billion in cash and assumed debt to buy two hydroelectric power plants in India from Jaiprakash Power Ventures Ltd.
 Orient was one of four asset management firms set up by the government in 1999 to buy bad debts from the country’s biggest banks and help clean up a financial system on the brink of bankruptcy.
 Rules meant to safeguard markets after the 2008 financial crisis prompted the traditional middlemen in the bond market -- the world’s largest banks -- to pare back their operations, making it harder for investors to buy and sell debt.
 Also in 2012, Goldman Sachs began offering its clients the chance to buy and sell some debt that the bank held through its GSessions system.
 Last month the East Coast had to pay more than $100 a ton extra to buy propane from Europe because there aren’t any Jones Act tankers that could deliver domestic supplies from Texas.
 “We are no longer in the era where workers have lifetime employment and go out to buy their own home,” said Hidetaka Yoneyama, a senior fellow at Fujitsu Research Institute in Tokyo who has written five books on Japan’s housing market.
 Declining Homeownership “Non-regular workers with lower pay simply can’t afford to buy,” said Natsumi Ishino, a senior associate analyst at Macquarie Capital Securities Ltd, a unit of Australia’s biggest investment bank, in Tokyo.
 will pay $225 million to buy a 50 percent stake in Tribeca Enterprises, owners of the film festival co-founded by actor Robert De Niro in the wake of the Sept.
 If he sees one that fits with existing operations, is priced attractively and offers better than 10 percent returns, “he’s probably willing to buy,” said Cook, whose firm owns Berkshire shares.
 Tencent’s long-term performance in a market where investors have to buy the stock in multiples of 100 has made it harder to attract individuals as rival Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 WhatsApp, Viber Tencent plans to buy new content and improve services for its online video business, increase WeChat marketing outside China and boost demand for its payment services.
 agreed to buy message and calling app Viber for $900 million.
 Virtual Cards Earlier this month, Tencent agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in Chinese e-commerce website JDcom Inc.
 QR codes have been a popular feature on WeChat as part of Tencent’s push for more commercial applications for the service such as allowing users to buy game services and investment products.
 There’s no roadblock in the talks” The Minmetals-led group is nearing an accord to buy Las Bambas for more than $5 billion, people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 gathered $55 billion to buy distressed assets from US.
March 3 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP agreed to buy Tyco International Ltd’s fire and security business in South Korea for $193 billion, the country’s largest private-equity buyout deal in US.
 This month, Alibaba led a $280 million investment in TangoMe Inc, an instant messaging service, while in February it offered to buy the shares in AutoNavi Holdings Ltd.
 Grupo Financiero Inbursa SAB, controlled by Slim, announced the agreement last week to buy Standard Bank Group Ltd’s Brazilian unit as the South African company wound down the division’s operations.
 Debt’s Effect Duke Energy Progress is negotiating to buy the stakes, said Jeff Brooks, a company spokesman.
 “And that’s where we were looking to buy” Trust Preferreds Early on, the fund loaded up on trust-preferred securities issued by entities related to Bank of America Corp, Citigroup Inc.
 Timchenko’s share sale was unconditional and doesn’t provide him with an option to buy back his stake, Tornqvist said.
 agreed to buy the owner of local TV stations in a deal valued at about $16 billion.
 Investment plans won’t be hampered by Volkswagen investors’ lawsuits against Porsche stemming from the sports-car manufacturer’s bid in 2008 to buy the automaker, Hans Dieter Poetsch, chief financial officer of both companies, told journalists.
 Itau, meanwhile, has turned to faster-growing economies in Latin America in response, agreeing to buy control of Chile’s Corpbanca SA in January for $22 billion.
 Safaricom plans to buy Essar’s network base stations and transmission equipment.
 Mitsubishi UFJ completed in December the purchase of a $5 billion stake in Thailand’s Bank of Ayudhya Pcl, while Sumitomo Mitsui agreed to buy 40 percent of Indonesia’s PT Bank Tabungan Pensiunan Nasional for about $15 billion in May.
 Multiple Offers Investors have set aside $129 billion to buy European real estate, a 7 percent increase from six months earlier, broker DTZ said in a report published on March 12.
 banks, so they can offer more attractive credit terms to buyers of the best properties, Feeney said.
 CRN reported yesterday that Microsoft was in the final stages of talks to buy or invest in Xamarin.
 agreed last month to buy a 14 percent stake in Peugeot, Europe’s second-largest carmaker, to gain technology to develop its own brands.
 Possible Default “A default -- maturity extension -- on June bonds is not off the table, so we would be cautious to buy now,” said Szabo, who sold off Ukrainian debt, including corporate bonds, over the last month.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- Legg Mason Inc, the money manager that has struggled with more than five years of net redemptions, agreed to buy QS Investors, a global quantitative equity firm that split from Deutsche Bank AG in 2010.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne said this week that he was scrapping a rule requiring retirees to buy annuities with their pension plan.
 Auto buyers are taking out longer loans and borrowing more relative to the value of the cars as lenders relax debt terms, Moody’s Investors Service said in Jan.
 That makes their bonds good to buy” Looking Abroad The Tokyo-based airline will get 11 new daytime take-off and landing slots from Haneda at the end of March, compared with five for Japan Airlines, the Transport Ministry said in October.
 Firms declare how many bars of gold they want to buy or sell at the current spot price, based on orders from clients and themselves.
 Traders relay shifts in supply and demand to clients during the call and take fresh orders to buy or sell as the price changes, according to the website of London Gold Market Fixing, where the results are published.
 raised its rating on the builders’ merchant to buy from neutral, citing improving volume trends and a positive economic backdrop this year.
 The department-store chain’s 2 percent gain in fourth-quarter comparable-store sales “bodes well” for continued sales momentum, Citigroup’s Oliver Chen said today in a note raising his rating to buy.
March 26 (Bloomberg) -- Asya Katilim Bankasi AS, caught in a feud between Turkey’s prime minister and an Islamic cleric, posted a record gain after saying Qatar Islamic Bank was in exclusive talks to buy a stake.
 Qatar Islamic Bank, in a separate statement today, said it’s in negotiations to buy a stake in the Istanbul-based lender.
 Last month, Carl Icahn dropped his campaign urging Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after the company stepped up repurchases.
 APA reached a deal with Adelaide-based Envestra in December to buy the rest of the company after raising its bid.
 Maher Yaghi, analyst at Desjardins Securities, raised his rating for the stock to buy from hold due to the recent pullback in the share price.
 jumped 47 percent after the shares were upgraded to buy at Citigroup Inc.
 Refiners, meanwhile, will still be constrained to buying raw cane sugar, which closed at 1823 cents a pound yesterday, from countries that have preferential deals.
 Bill McDermott, who will take over as SAP’s sole chief executive officer in May, this spring plans to buy a home in Heidelberg, a 15-minute drive from the company’s headquarters in the town of Walldorf.
 JPMorgan has been advising clients to buy Mylan Inc, the biggest US.
 and FTSE, aren’t tied to an asset manager, presenting an obstacle to buyers wanting a pure-play benchmarking business.
 Ecopetrol is seeking to buy 415,000 barrels of diesel for delivery in April.
 Collaboration Abu Dhabi’s Mubadala Development Co, Qatar Petroleum and Oman Oil formed the group late last year to buy as much as a 40 percent stake in Occidental’s Middle East operations.
 California Business Occidental is also planning a spinoff of its California business and will use proceeds from the transactions to buy back shares.
 Centrica Plc gained 21 percent to 3348 pence after HSBC raised its recommendation on the owner of British Gas to overweight, which is similar to buy, from neutral.
 Spain’s Telefonica SA, the largest shareholder in Telco, is unlikely to buy Generali’s stake because of regulatory hurdles, Carnevale Maffe said.
 agreed to buy Maker Studios, a supplier of online video content to YouTube, for $500 million, gaining technology and experience with short-form entertainment.
 Buechele passed up the chance to buy Ashland Inc’s Water Technology division this year.
 Buyout firm Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC agreed to buy the business for about $18 billion.
 and European private equity funds to finance plans to buy or lease 20 new planes, Charalambous said.
 “For some goods including wine, users could be more inclined to buy on Tmall because offline counterfeit is even worse,” Tanner said.
 plunged 11 percent, the most since 2012, after saying it will spend $2 billion to buy Oculus VR Inc.
 The world’s largest social network agreed to buy Oculus, which makes a ski-goggles-like device called Rift that people wear to play games and access other immersive virtual-reality experiences.
 Vodafone Group Plc climbed 17 percent after the world’s second-biggest wireless carrier agreed to buy Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA.
 Statoil remains open to buying US.
 Investec Plc raised its rating on the lender to buy from hold, citing the stock’s 10 percent loss since this year’s high on Jan.
 5,000 Cars BNSF jump-started the safety debate by saying last month that it wanted to buy 5,000 sturdier tank cars.
 By announcing its plan to buy 5,000 cars with improved safety features, BNSF wants to “help accelerate the transition to the next-generation tank car,” the railroad said in a Feb.
 The underwriters also have a 30-day option to buy as much as $458 million in additional shares.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- Nomura Holdings Inc, Japan’s largest brokerage, said it will offer as much as 104 billion yen ($102 million) to buy the shares it doesn’t already own in its Thai securities unit.
 Schleifer said Sanofi had reported continuing to buy Regeneron stock as recently as March 3.
 “The IPO may attract interest from foreign investors, however the fact that the company failed to find an industry investor may be a negative factor” Industry Consolidation Europe’s communications market is consolidating as Vodafone Group Plc last week agreed to buy Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA.
(Updates with closing share prices criticism by pension group from 10th paragraph) By Sarah Jones March 19 (Bloomberg) -- British insurers led by Legal & General Group Plc and Aviva Plc plunged after Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules requiring retirees to buy annuities with their pension funds.
March 29 (Bloomberg) -- Detroit seeks $120 million to buy police and fire department vehicles as it heads toward a July trial over how to reorganize $18 billion in debt to end the biggest municipal bankruptcy in US.
 Vodafone agreed to buy Kabel Deutschland Holding AG, a German cable company, last year for 75 billion euros.
 Reuters previously reported that Vodafone has reached a preliminary deal to buy Ono.
 is in talks with Areva SA to buy an undisclosed stake in the Paris-based nuclear power company’s water desalination plant in the southern African country, spokesman Tommi Numbala said by phone.
 Wood looked to Illinois law and concluded that the arrangement was a bailment where the agent didn’t have the right to buy the cattle or keep the money.
 Ross and partners last year raised $100 million to buy as many as eight ships hauling coal, iron ore and grains through a company called Nautical Bulk Holdings Ltd, he said in November.
 “The psychology of a lot of folks is that they’re not looking to buy houses for investment anymore,” he said.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Equity International, the global real estate investment company founded by billionaire Sam Zell, sees declining values in Brazilian commercial properties as an opportunity to buy.
 will seek to buy smaller US.
 “We can certainly use our infrastructure to better manage and market those assets” By splitting off from CBS and becoming a real estate investment trust, the business will have the ability to buy competitors in the 25 biggest US.
 They have an option to buy an added 3 million CBS Outdoor shares for $28 each.
 Osisko can continue to operate as standalone company and Vancouver-based Goldcorp is trying to buy access to its Canadian Malartic gold mine without properly valuing it, Roosen said.
 Goldcorp committed not to buy any Osisko shares under the offer until April 15.
 Bankers at RBC Capital Markets misled Rural/Metro directors in 2011 about the company’s value to push the board into a quick sale to buyout firm Warburg Pincus LLC, Delaware Chancery Court Judge Travis Laster concluded in a ruling.
 Qatar Islamic Bank started negotiations to buy a stake at Asya Katilim Bankasi AS, the Istanbul-based sharia-compliant lender also known as Bank Asya said in a filing to Borsa Istanbul yesterday.
 Thornton’s pay includes $5 million in cash to be used to buy Barrick stock.
March 18 (Bloomberg) -- DLA Piper LLP advised Vodafone Group Plc, the world’s second-largest wireless carrier, on its agreement to buy Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in a 72 billion-euro ($10 billion) transaction.
 “We are ready and keen to buy again but we remain patient for the right opportunity,” Miller said in a statement today.
 SipStor gives customers a limited window to buy drink packages like Absolut Elyx vodka with six branded martini glasses for 120 pounds and Havana Club Mojito packs.
March 11 (Bloomberg) -- Royal Ahold NV, the owner of Stop & Shop stores in the US, agreed to buy Spar AG’s business in the Czech Republic for 525 billion koruna ($266 million) to become that country’s largest food retailer.
 5,000 Cars BNSF jump-started the safety debate by saying last month that it wanted to buy 5,000 sturdier tank cars.
 By announcing its plan to buy 5,000 cars with improved safety features, BNSF wants to “help accelerate the transition to the next-generation tank car,” the railroad said in a Feb.
 18 after they tried to buy a family policy through the federal health insurance exchange and were denied because Ohio doesn’t recognize same-sex marriages, according to their complaint.
 Campari agreed to buy closely-held Forty Creek Distillery Ltd.
March 28 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Wohnen AG, Germany’s second-largest residential landlord by market value, said 2013 profit rose 68 percent after the company took advantage of cheap financing to buy more homes.
 Iliad, which Niel said tried to buy SFR itself in 2012, is also open to a merger with Bouygues Telecom should Vivendi choose Altice’s bid, said a person with knowledge of the matter.
 The company, now in Nigeria, the United Arab Emirates and Oman, plans to buy ships and equipment to expand in “about 12 countries in Africa over the next five years,” Paul said in a March 7 interview.
 Japaul, based in Lagos, sees earnings rising 10 percent to 25 percent this year after slumping 59 percent to 486 million naira ($3 million) in the first nine months of 2013 as it raised short-term funds to buy assets.
 “We have not applied to buy any of the fields,” Paul said.
 The New York-based banks are advisers on Altice SA’s effort to acquire Vivendi’s SFR unit in a $28 billion deal, and also Vodafone’s agreement to buy Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for $10 billion.
 agreed in October 2012 to buy insurer and hospital chain Amil Participacoes SA for about $49 billion, while Diagnosticos da America SA is rallying after it said in December that its biggest individual investors offered to acquire all its outstanding shares.
 The value of the deal may top Fleury’s 3 billion-real ($13 billion) market value under Brazilian securities rules that require the acquiring company to buy out minority investors when control changes hands.
 plans to enter an agreement to buy $250 million in shares from the Dutch company, the document shows.
 Ukraine has an agreement, negotiated last year by Yanukovych’s government, to buy gas at a discounted rate until the end of March.
 and Airtel Kenya Ltd’s joint offer to buy Essar Telecom Kenya Ltd, two days after Safaricom threatened to pull out of the deal.
 “The parties have been notified of the decision of the authority” Safaricom plans to buy Essar’s network base stations and transmission equipment.
 Cemex plans to use the proceeds of the euro notes to buy back 130 million euros of 9625 percent bonds due 2017 and 115 million euros of 8875 percent notes due 2017, according to a company statement.
 “We are in the business to develop and produce, we’re not in the business to buy and sell” The company is the biggest owner of oil licenses in Norway after Statoil ASA, and in Europe is second to Tullow Oil Plc among the independents, or companies that don’t have refineries.
 India’s Sensex extended this quarter’s gain to 49 percent as State Bank surged after Goldman Sachs advised investors to buy the shares.
 That’s their biggest thing, confusion” Migration from analog to digital services will also be slower and more complex as the government’s position is that “even consumers with digital TV sets will be forced to buy a completely unnecessary set-top box, because the free TV signal will be encrypted,” Multichoice said in a letter in several South African newspapers.
 For columns, TOP CM) March 11 (Bloomberg) -- Bentham Asset Management, whose flagship fund beat all its Australian peers over the past five years, is avoiding the nation’s “expensive” credit markets to buy asset-backed debt offshore and foreign-currency notes of local banks.
 18 agreed to buy brand-drug maker Forest Laboratories Inc.
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- Yanzhou Coal Mining Co, China’s fourth-largest producer, abandoned a proposal to buy out its Australian unit Yancoal Australia Ltd, leading to a plunge in the subsidiary’s share price.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in a bet the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares more cheaply and pocket the difference.
 Con Edison agreed in May to buy half of two Sempra projects, the 150-megawatt Copper Mountain Solar 2 site in Nevada and a 150-megawatt solar farm in Arizona.
 It would be the largest acquisition financing for a European phone company since Telefonica SA got an 185 billion-pound ($31 billion) loan to buy UK.
March 20 (Bloomberg) -- Intu Properties Plc, the UK’s largest shopping-mall owner, agreed to buy three retail centers from Westfield Group for 8678 million pounds ($14 billion) including working capital.
 this year, agreed to buy another 726 million shares held by its parent for about $3445 a share.
 The agreement to buy back shares, announced this week, is “a favorable development,” Jay Gelb, an analyst at Barclays Plc, said in a March 18 report.
 Described by Canada’s industry minister as having the potential to be the country’s fourth national wireless carrier, Quebecor took advantage of a lack of competition in a 700-megahertz spectrum auction last month to buy access to radio waves in British Columbia, Alberta and Ontario.
 and Airbus SAS, the world’s two biggest planemakers, both count on Asian airlines to buy more aircraft in the next two decades.
 Lion Air agreed to buy 230 Boeing 737 planes in 2012 and followed that with an order for 234 Airbus planes last year.
 Liberty Broadband will include the company’s 25 percent stake in Charter, the cable provider that made an unsuccessful proposal to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Liberty, which already owns 53 percent of Sirius, had offered earlier this year to buy the satellite-radio carrier’s remaining shares.
 He acquired his Charter stake last year with an eye toward making further investments in the industry, only to be thwarted by Comcast’s surprise agreement to buy Time Warner Cable for $452 billion.
March 18 (Bloomberg) -- Societe Generale SA, France’s second-largest bank, said it is seeking to buy the free-floating shares of Boursorama SA, valuing the online bank and broker at 105 billion euros ($146 billion).
 Orion and AEW are trying to buy the 25 percent stake in Madrid-based Realia held by the Bankia Group and the 369 percent owned by Fomento de de Construcciones y Contratas, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 Arixa Capital Advisors LLC, Oaktree Capital Group LLC and Auctioncom LLC are offering short-term financing to buy and renovate properties at a time banks are reluctant to extend credit for speculative real estate deals.
 Genesis Loans Thomas James typically invests 20 percent of its own money to buy and remodel a home, with lenders providing the balance, Beadel said.
 A record of more than 16,000 call options giving the right to buy the exchange-traded fund changed hands last week as prices for bullish contracts rose to a three-year high compared with puts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The ratio of calls to buy the ETF versus puts to sell has climbed 173 percent this year with bullish contracts outnumbering bearish ones by 35-to-1, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 last year agreed to buy Continental Energy Systems LLC’s New Mexico gas operation.
 “He got closer without having to buy additional shares or engage in an expensive proxy battle” To contact the reporter on this story: Duane D.
March 10 (Bloomberg) -- Chiquita Brands International Inc, owner of the namesake banana label, agreed to buy Ireland’s Fyffes Plc to create the world’s biggest supplier of the fruit for about 403 million euros ($559 million).
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- Back in May 2011, investors were giddy about the chance to buy a piece of Renren Inc.
 Zamfotis, an analyst at evaDimensions LLC in New York, raised his recommendation on the stock to buy on March 6.
 Alibaba offered last month to buy the shares it doesn’t already own in AutoNavi Holdings Ltd, a Chinese online map content provider.
 Vodafone this month agreed to buy Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for 72 billion euros ($10 billion) including debt.
 The number of aircraft the Pentagon plans to buy is 409 fewer than called for originally.
 “That in turn further exacerbated the foreclosure crisis initially caused by the predatory subprime lending itself” HSBC Mortgage Services Inc, which used “bulk underwriters” to buy subprime loans from third-party originators, approved loans for borrowers who were gardeners or worked for McDonald’s and reported $90,000 in annual income, according to the complaint.
March 5 (Bloomberg) -- CarVal Investors LLC, the credit investment unit of commodities trader Cargill Inc, plans to raise $2 billion to buy distressed investments as banks need to sell assets to meet regulatory requirements.
 The Marine Corps plans to buy about 340 of the aircraft, which can take off like a conventional fighter and land like a helicopter.
 and Italy also plan to buy it.
 “A default -- maturity extension -- on June bonds is not off the table, so we would be cautious to buy now,” said Szabo, who sold off Ukrainian debt, including corporate bonds, over the last month.
 upgraded the shares to buy from hold as the company reached an agreement with the Prudential Regulation Authority to reduce its internal loan to 22 billion pounds by the end of 2015.
 ‘Hugely Significant’ “We view this has hugely significant for Aviva and as a consequence, combined with better-than-anticipated results, we upgrade to buy,” Barrie Cornes, a Panmure analyst, said in a note to clients today.
 Record Output The company, which is considering another overseas listing, agreed to buy Petrominerales Ltd.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- Two of Russia’s top billionaires are taking advantage of the bear-market collapse to buy back shares on the cheap.
 Mailru Group Ltd, the Internet company controlled by Alisher Usmanov, Russia’s richest man, said yesterday it plans to buy $45 million of its own stock.
 The risk is still there” Mailru agreed to buy 12 percent of Russia’s biggest social network VKontakte, raising its stake to 52 percent, and started to buy $45 million of its own stock in an employee incentive program, the company said in statements yesterday.
 “The volatility in the markets caused by political events allowed the employee benefit trust an opportunity to buy stock at what we consider a good valuation,” Mailru’s Chief Financial Officer Matthew Hammond wrote in an e-mail yesterday from Dubai.
 The program “looks to buy GDRs in the market when we consider it a good price,” he said.
 Lee, who worked for JPMorgan for 15 years, is among almost two dozen Wall Street strategists who try to predict the direction of the stock market and advise investors on which companies to buy and sell.
 Lee, who worked for JPMorgan for 15 years, is among almost two dozen Wall Street strategists who try to predict the direction of the stock market and advise investors on which companies to buy and sell.
 CTBC agreed to buy Tokyo Star from holders including Lone Star Funds, Shinsei Bank Ltd.
 to consider a takeover and offered to buy the company with an investor group for about $46 billion.
 We expect to receive the official decision” CEZ, EVN and Energo-Pro denied wrongdoing, saying the situation was created by a regulator’s decision in 2012, which enabled National Electricity not to refund the full amount paid by the distributors to buy energy from wind and solar power producers.
 “When the glass is half empty, every exploration play is deemed to be a failure until proven otherwise” Stoking Demand At PDAC, which was attended by more than 25,000 people for a fourth straight year, Grondin is looking for investors to buy as much as C$3 million ($27 million) of convertible bonds so he can make mining acquisitions.
 “They want to spend money not only to buy luxury goods, they also want quality entertainment, quality content” China Media Capital started in 2009 with an initial fund size of 5 billion yuan ($803 million) from investors including China Development Bank Corp.
 “When the music stops, everything will be real and paid for” Rilea broke ground on the British-themed project in January after 60 percent of the apartments had been sold to buyers who agreed to put down half of the purchase price.
 Within a month of starting sales, more than 70 percent of the units were under contract to buyers who put down half of the $250,000-plus purchase price, Carlos Melo said.
 With more than 20,000 units on the way, just three years after investors absorbed a similar number, McCabe said he questions if there are enough multimillionaires in the world who want to buy condos in South Florida.
 Government Pressure A deal could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Zijin Mining will spend about 8 billion yuan to buy mining companies or mines, targeting “super large mines,” it said, without giving a timeframe.
 The company is looking to buy gold projects with more than 100 metric tons of metal reserves, and copper projects with more than 1 million tons of such reserves, he said.
 NBNK, created in 2010 to acquire bank assets, lost out to Co-Operative Bank to buy 632 branches of Lloyds in 2012.
 Mexico City-based Alsea agreed in September to buy Vips, which has 362 diner-style restaurants, from Wal-Mart de Mexico SAB for 82 billion pesos ($620 million).
 The ratio of outstanding calls giving the right to buy versus puts to sell was 112-to-1, near the highest level since October, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The CBOE’s new policy affects firms known as trading permit holders, CBOE’s term for individuals and companies that have permission to buy and sell at the exchange.
 “A pledge to buy so many shares in such a short period of time will sure keep the stock rising for a while,” Joao Pedro Brugger, who helps oversee 400 million reais ($170 million) at Leme Investimentos Ltda, said in a phone interview from Florianopolis, Brazil.
 The pitch probably won’t quiet regulators’ qualms about his plan to buy T-Mobile US Inc.
 ‘Real World’ It’s not clear that Sprint, of Overland Park, Kansas, needs to buy T-Mobile to shake up the market in the “very appealing ways” Son described, John Bergmayer, senior staff attorney with the Washington-based policy group Public Knowledge, said in an e-mail.
 The deal also gave Walgreen and Alliance Boots the right to buy as much as 7 percent of AmerisourceBergen’s equity in the open market.
 The number of outstanding calls to buy the stock rose to 278,275 on March 5, near the highest since July 2012, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Sina Weibo earned a profit in the fourth quarter for the first time, as the business attracted more companies to buy advertisements on the platform.
 soared on a plan to buy its parent’s assets.
 Pension fund shareholders including Previ, which rejected a Cosan offer in 2012 to buy a stake, are pushing for better terms as they assess the value of the logistics assets that Cosan is offering as payment, said the people.
 The Charlotte, North Carolina-based bank agreed to buy Merrill in September 2008, two months before its advice to the Irish government.
 raised its rating on the financial services provider to buy from neutral.
 Cerberus Capital Management LP’s Albertsons agreed to buy the grocery-store operator for about $40 a share in a deal that may face federal antitrust review.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- Siebert Financial Corp, whose late founder Muriel Siebert was the first woman to buy a seat on the New York Stock Exchange, is exploring a sale, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The state’s three largest utilities are close to buying 20 percent of their power from renewables and have identified projects to meet their 2020 targets for 33 percent, according to a report last month from California electricity regulator.
 as power companies meet state requirements and don’t need to buy more solar energy.
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- Phoenix Group Holdings gained the most in about eight months in London trading after Standard Life Plc said it’s in advanced talks to buy Ignis Asset Management.
 Aberdeen Asset Management Plc agreed to buy Lloyds Banking Group Plc’s Scottish Widows Investment Partnership unit for 560 million pounds in November.
 government announced plans to scrap rules that forced retirees to buy annuities with their pension funds.
 acquisition last month, agreeing to buy Global Index Advisors, which will help boost its assets in North America to more than $50 billion.
 Banks issue short-term securities and use the proceeds to buy longer-maturity local-government obligations, profiting from the difference in interest rates.
 Competing Bids Bouygues wanted to buy SFR to create a carrier of more than 21 million contract wireless customers, closing a gap with market leader Orange SA.
 In Spain, Vodafone Group Plc agreed to buy cable provider Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in a $10 billion deal this week.
 The company, backed by Warren Buffett and Mario Gabelli, did spend $860 million last year to buy New Young Broadcasting Holding Co.
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- New Jersey Assemblyman Tim Eustace, a Democrat from Maywood, said he has introduced a bill to allow consumers to buy electric cars directly from a manufacturer.
March 22 (Bloomberg) -- Tencent Holdings Ltd, China’s largest Internet company by market value, agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in E-House China Holdings Ltd’s Leju Holdings Ltd, as it adds services through its messaging application.
 Tencent this month agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in Chinese e-commerce site JDcom Inc.
 FuelCell has doubled since November and Plug is up ninefold as traditional investors recognize fuel cells as a viable alternative to buying electricity from utilities.
 Plug Power Plug Power makes fuel-cell systems for forklifts, and Wal-Mart Stores Inc, already a customer, agreed last month to buy more than 1,700 of them for six North American distribution centers.
March 27 (Bloomberg) -- Babcock International Group Plc agreed to buy private equity-owned Avincis for 920 million pounds ($15 billion) to expand into helicopter services.
 Combs has offered to buy the channel for about $200 million, people familiar with the situation said this week.
 The bid makes rivals of the music moguls and former sweethearts, who dated more than a decade ago and each want to buy Fuse to gain distribution to 74 million homes, the people said.
 In this case, neither party to the suit is a so-called nonperforming entity, ie, a “troll” who has no business in the business other than to buy or own a patent that can be used to extort money from a company or person who uses technology that might fit the patent’s description.
 Expensive Chase Private-equity firms use borrowed money to buy companies, improve profits and resell them.
 A unit of the state investment firm last week offered to buy control of Olam International Ltd, one of the world’s top three coffee and rice traders, for $32 billion.
 “Direct sales to consumers, especially with the Internet now becoming the go-to vehicle for purchasing, are very important,” Jack Gillis of the Washington-based Consumer Federation of America and author of “The Car Book,” a consumer guide to buying, said in a telephone interview.
 Last month, the Department of Homeland Security canceled a plan to buy access to such records following criticism from privacy advocates.
 “Now that those efforts to buy his way to an investigation have been exposed, he is going to China.
 Instead of being pushed to buy an annuity, 13 million savers in so-called defined contribution plans will be able to withdraw their funds gradually or in full.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- L1 Energy, the investment vehicle of Russia’s fourth-richest man Mikhail Fridman, agreed to buy RWE AG’s Dea oil and gas unit, gaining assets in the UK, Germany and the North Sea.
 Industrywide, contracts to buy US.
 “If you have a short life expectancy, you are more likely to take cash” In his 2014 Budget last week, Osborne scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity, allowing them to withdraw their pension savings without being hit by a 55 percent tax rate.
 Bank of Montreal, Canada’s largest lender, agreed to buy F&C for 120 pence a share in cash on Jan.
 “There are taxes next week, so it’s a good opportunity to buy the ruble cheaply,” Vladimir Miklashevsky, strategist at Danske Bank A/S in Helsinki, said in e-mailed comments.
 Indian Oil Corp, the nation’s biggest refiner, may be in focus after it agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Petroliam Nasional Bhd’s Canadian natural gas fields and a planned export project.
 “When the music stops, everything will be real and paid for” Rilea broke ground on the British-themed project in January after 60 percent of the apartments had been sold to buyers who agreed to put down half of the purchase price.
 Within a month of starting sales, more than 70 percent of the units were under contract to buyers who put down half of the $250,000-plus purchase price, Carlos Melo said.
 With more than 20,000 units on the way, just three years after investors absorbed a similar number, McCabe said he questions if there are enough multimillionaires in the world who want to buy condos in South Florida.
 “There is upside on this stock, but it is clearly a more risky stock to buy than a few months ago” Shares of Microsoft, Cisco and Intel climbed between 1,078 percent and 3,432 percent in the five years through March 10, 2000 -- when the Nasdaq Composite Index peaked -- to become the world’s most valuable technology companies.
 Comcast Corp’s $452 billion agreement to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Last month Facebook Inc’s Mark Zuckerberg, who at age 29 has a net worth of $271 billion, made a $19 billion offer for messaging service WhatsApp Inc, and this week agreed to buy virtual reality firm Oculus VR Inc.
 Last year, the world’s fourth-richest richest man, Warren Buffett, 83, teamed with 3G Capital to buy HJ Heinz Co.
 raised 9 billion pounds in 2007, the same year RBS and its partners beat Barclays Plc to buy ABN Amro for 72 billion euros.
 A deal could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Each year they must surrender enough permits, which they get for free or have to buy at auctions, to account for their discharges or pay fines amounting to 100 euros a ton.
 In January, the London-based company agreed to buy Dutch broadband provider Ziggo NV for $67 billion.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 Babcock International Group Plc posted the biggest drop in four years after agreeing to buy private equity-owned Avincis Group.
 The engineering-services company agreed to buy Avincis for 920 million pounds ($15 billion) to expand into helicopter services.
 raised the Scottish oil explorer to buy from neutral, saying the valuation has become attractive because the shares have fallen further than rivals since late January.
 Investec Plc also increased its rating to buy from hold today.
 “Consumers may now feel compelled to buy as they hadn’t committed to much on contract as the general market consensus had been for premiums to fall,” Gayle Berry, a Barclays Plc analyst in London, said by e-mail.
 upgraded the shares to buy from neutral, saying the company will meet its revenue and margin forecasts this year.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Ardian Sarl, the private-equity firm formerly known as Axa Private Equity, is poised to buy $1 billion of stakes in buyout funds from General Electric Co, said four people familiar with the matter.
 said March 25 that it agreed to buy the virtual reality company Oculus VR Inc, based in the Orange County city of Irvine, for at least $2 billion in cash and stock.
 Facebook’s interest in the region came to light last year, when Chief Executive Officer Mark Zuckerberg unsuccessfully tried to buy SnapChat Inc, a mobile photo-sharing service in Venice, a beach community on the west side of Los Angeles.
 Babcock International Group Plc jumped 43 percent after a unit’s joint venture was selected as a preferred bidder to buy nuclear-site licencing companies.
 The Nuclear Decommissioning Authority selected Cavendish Flour Partnership as the preferred bidder to buy Magnox Ltd.
 Cutting Stakes According to yesterday’s filing, Fortress will sell 232 million newly issued Class A shares in the offering, with proceeds used to buy Fortress operating group units from the insiders.
 and Credit Suisse Group AG will have an option to buy 42 million shares from Fortress insiders if the offering is oversubscribed.
 in upgrading Tingyi to buy.
 Leucadia agreed to buy 23 million preferred securities from Falcone’s hedge funds for $253 million, the firms said yesterday.
 ‘Unique Relationship’ Leucadia agreed in 2012 to buy Jefferies Group LLC in a $32 billion deal that made 52-year-old Handler, who was running the investment bank, chief executive officer of the combined company.
 CEO Mike Brown said last week that the South African lender controlled by Old Mutual Plc would consider governance issues before deciding whether to exercise a right to buy a stake in Ecobank.
 Allianz gained the most in two months after agreeing to buy Milano Assicurazioni SpA assets from Unipol Gruppo Finanziario SpA for 440 million euros ($612 million).
 raised its rating on Europe’s largest engineering company to overweight, similar to buy, from neutral, saying that the 4 billion-euro share buyback announced in November could start soon.
 upgraded the shares to buy from neutral, citing the benefits of cost and portfolio restructuring.
 The developer said it’s raising funds to buy land in Hong Kong by giving shareholders convertible warrants.
 In February, the fund was said to buy a minority stake in Trigence Semiconductor Inc, a Japanese chip designer part-owned by Intel Corp’s venture capital arm.
 Kogas has long-term supply deals to buy LNG from countries including Qatar and Oman.
 to buy 35 million tons a year of LNG from the Houston-based company’s Sabine Pass export facility.
 Months of wooing by Boeing paid off as ANA agreed to buy 14 of the 787-9 model, 20 of the upgraded 777X jets due to debut at the end of the decade, and six current 777s to help bridge the gap.
 The Conservative-led government, which will present a white paper on the fund next month, has signaled it may be willing to expand its investment mandate to include private equity and infrastructure, in addition to the stocks, bonds and real estate it’s currently allowed to buy.
 Mailru, an Internet company controlled by Usmanov, agreed to buy a 12 percent stake in VKontakte from Russian executive Ivan Tavrin, according to a statement from Moscow-based Mailru today.
 Usmanov is also willing to buy UCP’s stake in VKontakte at a “reasonable price,” Ivan Streshinskiy, head of Usmanov’s asset-management company USM Advisors LLC, said in an interview in Moscow last week.
 He cited the gap between the two measurements as a reason to buy back the company’s stock if it trades for less than 120 percent of book value, and said he’d be “aggressive” with repurchases.
 Imerys last month agreed to buy Hoffman Estates, Illinois-based Amcol for $41 a share.
 The company described the western Siberia reservoirs it intends to begin drilling this year as a “world-class hydrocarbon system” Tillerson agreed to invest billions of dollars and allow Rosneft to buy stakes in premier North American projects in exchange for access to Russia’s vast Arctic, deep-water and shale resources.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- DBS Group Holdings Ltd, Southeast Asia’s biggest bank, agreed to buy Societe Generale SA’s Asian private banking business to bolster market share in a region where millionaires’ wealth may top North America this year.
 The stock declined 47 percent since DBS abandoned a $65 billion bid to buy PT Bank Danamon Indonesia in August.
 Former Alberta Premier Alison Redford, who resigned this month, told reporters in September on a trip to Shanghai that she wanted the federal government to specify under what conditions it would allow Chinese state-owned enterprises to buy companies in the oil sands.
 In 2010, Harper rejected Melbourne-based BHP Billiton Ltd’s bid to buy Potash Corp.
 “You had to use cash or debt to buy things.
 Vodafone climbed 17 percent as the telecommunications company agreed to buy Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA.
 Allianz SE rose the most in two months after the insurer agreed to buy assets from Italy’s Unipol Gruppo Finanziario SpA.
 The British government allows people to buy a new house or flat costing as much as 600,000 pounds ($1 million) with a 5 percent deposit under Help to Buy.
 upgraded Europe’s largest engineering company to buy from neutral.
 Ukraine, which depends on Russian gas for about half of its demand, is seeking ways to diversify supply and plans to buy more fuel from the European Union.
 Campari agreed to buy closely-held Forty Creek Distillery Ltd.
 Anglo Pacific Group Plc, with 92 percent, has an option to buy 15 percent of the company’s production for $125 million within four months.
 5 to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain for about $125 billion.
 Tilson also cited a possible alliance with Pepsi or another large beverage maker as a reason to buy SodaStream shares.
 He now believes Green Mountain’s new single-serve product is ‘‘the best way to play home carbonation” Pepsi Speculation “I don’t think Pepsi’s going to buy them, because they don’t have the mousetrap to produce a good enough drink for Pepsi,” Jagdale said by phone from San Francisco in a March 7 interview.
 announced plans to buy Oculus VR Inc, messages came pouring in at Virtuix Omni.
 “The company strongly believes its offer to the Indian tax department is fair for all sides” Microsoft agreed in September to buy Nokia’s mobile-phone division, including its factories, in a 544 billion-euro ($76 billion) deal.
 Comcast agreed to buy Time Warner last month for $452 billion in stock in a deal that combines the two largest US.
 Intesa ruled out the conversion of savings shares into common shares, and doesn’t plan to buy back hybrid securities, the CEO said.
 and Bain Capital LLC, two Boston-based buyout firms, and Danish pension fund ATP agreed to buy Nordic card-payment company Nets Holding A/S for 17 billion kroner ($31 billion).
 Private-equity firms typically pool money from pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within five to six years, then sell them and return the money and a profit after 10 years.
 AGL, Australia’s second-largest electricity retailer, is seeking Australian Competition Tribunal approval to buy Macquarie Generation in New South Wales, the Sydney-based company said today in a statement.
 agreed this month to buy more than 1,700 systems and the company said it expects orders to rise more than fourfold as it approaches profitability.
 Vodafone Group Plc this month agreed to buy Spain’s Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for 72 billion euros ($10 billion) including debt.
 An economic boom and a surge in travel demand across Southeast Asia have prompted budget airlines in Indonesia, Malaysia and Vietnam to buy new aircraft, stoking concerns about whether the industry is building more capacity than it needs.
 The Conservative-led government, which will present a white paper on the fund next month, had signaled willingness to expand the investment mandate to include private equity and infrastructure, in addition to the stocks, bonds and real estate it now is allowed to buy.
 ‘Many Questions’ The investment, the fund’s first ever in an unlisted company, raises “many questions” on whether it should be allowed to buy private equity, Hans Olav Syversen, a Christian Democrat, who heads parliament’s finance committee and is a key supporter of the minority government, said last week in an interview.
 The talks come after state-owned Cofco last week agreed to buy 51 percent of Dutch grain trader Nidera BV, which has annual sales of more than $17 billion, as it seeks to expand food supplies for the world’s most populous nation.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Promotora de Informaciones SA jumped 14 percent as Telefonica SA is nearing an agreement to buy a controlling stake in the media company’s pay-TV business for about 800 million euros ($11 billion), according to people familiar with the matter.
 This allowed Telefonica and Mediaset Espana to buy Prisa’s stake in the pay-TV business within 15 days.
 Telefonica was considering options for Prisa’s pay-TV unit including teaming up with either Mediaset Espana Comunicacion SA, which also holds 22 percent in DTS, or with Al Jazeera to buy the asset, one of the people said.
 Vanguarda, whose shareholders include JPMorgan Chase & Co’s Gavea Investimentos Ltda, is seeking to raise as much as $600 million to buy land and is studying its options, including a capital increase by current investors, Moura said.
 The Sao Paulo-based company aims to buy 100,000 hectares (247,000 acres) in the northern states of Para and Maranhao by 2019, said Moura, who previously worked as John Deere’s chief financial officer for South America and later led SLC for eight years until December 2012.
 Eurasia Drilling will continue to buy drilling rigs, ordering another 14 for delivery this year and next year at an average of $15 million per rig, Chief Financial Officer Richard Anderson said in a conference call with journalists today.
 The government will also be entitled to buy an unspecified additional share at an “agreed price” or part of their output.
 Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, China’s biggest e-commerce company, agreed in April to buy an 18 percent stake in Sina Weibo for $586 million.
March 12 (Bloomberg) -- Lucky Cement Ltd, Pakistan’s biggest cement maker, and rivals are competing to buy the local unit of Lafarge SA, a person familiar with the matter said.
March 28 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-largest oil producer, missed its target for completing a deal to buy a stake in a natural gas project in Israel, 15 months after signing an initial accord.
 “We continue to evaluate such opportunities” Philips, the world’s largest lighting company, agreed to buy a 51 percent stake in Saudi Arabia’s General Lighting Co.
 investment bank advised investors to buy shares and increased its price target by 44 percent.
 The lender was upgraded to buy from neutral at Goldman Sachs and its price target raised to 2,080 rupees.
 Goldman raised Punjab National to neutral from sell, and Bank of Baroda to buy from neutral.
 Buyback, Dividend GAM Holding said it has repurchased 74 percent of the maximum 413 million shares it expects to buy back by April 17 as part of a three-year initiative.
 bank spent a further 1 billion pounds in 2009 ($17 billion) to buy Cazenove Group, a 190-year-old British brokerage.
 Standard Life jumped 7 percent after its investment arm agreed to buy Ignis Asset Management Ltd.
 The insurer’s investment unit agreed to buy Ignis from Phoenix Group Holdings for 390 million pounds ($645 million), gaining 59 billion pounds of funds.
 The authorization, which has no expiration date, gives Dallas-based AT&T a total of 425 million shares it’s permitted to buy back, according to a statement today.
 Dah Sing Financial will offer shareholders rights to buy about 39 million shares at HK$2340 apiece, while its unit will sell at least 150 million shares at HK$8 each, they said in an exchange filing.
 Dah Sing Financial plans to use the proceeds from the sale to buy more shares in the banking unit, easing speculation that the lender may be sold.
 “As a result, some of the speculative money is leaving” Yue Xiu Group offered in October to buy a majority stake in Chong Hing Bank Ltd.
 is in exclusive talks that expire on March 31 to buy Hong Kong-based Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 The men invested more than $33 million over four years to buy securities in 13 transactions, including OfficeMax Inc.
 Of the 14 analysts who cover Pandora and share their ratings with Bloomberg, 11 advise their clients to buy the shares, two have hold recommendations and one favors selling.
March 15 (Bloomberg) -- Grupo Financiero Inbursa SAB, the bank controlled by billionaire Carlos Slim, agreed to buy Standard Bank Group Ltd’s Brazil unit for $45 million, getting a foot in the door in South America’s largest economy.
 Diminished volatility in markets around the world has driven down profits at trading firms such as Chicago-based Infinium, which use computers to make decisions to buy and sell in fractions of a second.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, the world’s biggest manager of alternative assets such as private equity and property, agreed to buy warehouses from French office landlord Fonciere des Regions for 473 million euros ($660 million).
 Jonathan Lurie, the managing director who oversees Blackstone’s European logistics portfolio, in October said the firm was in talks to buy its first logistics property in Germany as part of a plan to double the company’s warehouse holdings over the next two years.
 rose 79 percent to C$1708 after announcing an agreement to buy the drug Donnatal, a treatment for irritable bowel syndrome, from Revive Pharmaceuticals.
 Even as the central bank has started slowing its monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage-backed securities, investors are still clamoring to buy corporate bonds in the face of an escalating crisis in Ukraine and volatility in emerging-markets currencies.
 “The big ISPs can make these demands -- driving up costs and prices for everyone else -- because of their market position” So-called net neutrality gained attention after Comcast’s agreement to buy Time Warner Cable Inc, which would concentrate Internet access.
 Hutchison Interest Hutchison Whampoa Ltd, owned by billionaire Li Ka-shing, wants to buy more telecommunications assets in the Nordic region, a person familiar with the situation said in November.
 stocks dropped, ending a two-day rally, led by a slump in insurers after Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne removed rules requiring retirees to buy pension annuities.
 Dutch Position In the Netherlands last year, 1,700 Dutch households raised 13 million euros ($18 million) in 13 hours to buy shares in a wind turbine.
 Icahn prodded Cupertino, California-based Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, though he abandoned the proposal last month.
 That added to the 36 billion pounds ($6 billion) wiped off the industry’s market value on March 19, when Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne’s budget scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity.
 Warehousing Rules Aluminum from Rusal and other producers is stored by the LME, the world’s biggest industrial metals exchange, before it’s shipped to buyers.
 Qiagen NV rose 25 percent after Berenberg Bank advised investors to buy the stock.
 Berenberg upgraded the maker of medical-diagnostic equipment to buy from hold, citing an expected strong growth from key components of the business, including personalized medicine and bioinformatics.
 Regulators have greeted his ambition to buy T-Mobile with skepticism, and Son has responded by reframing his argument to say he can improve US.
 The National Rental Home Council will advocate for professional managers of single-family leased residences, after private-equity firms, hedge funds and real estate investment trusts spent more than $20 billion to buy 200,000 houses, according to a statement by the Washington-based group.
 For the next, Ballmer agreed to a $72 billion deal to buy Nokia Oyj’s handset unit in September, accelerating Microsoft’s expansion into hardware.
 The airline was offered the chance to buy a stake in Alitalia SpA several years ago that it turned down because it was “not in a position to make equity investments in foreign carriers,” Al Baker said.
 Etihad Airways is completing a study on Alitalia’s finances to make a decision on whether to buy a stake in the Italian carrier, Chief Executive Officer James Hogan and his Italian counterpart Gabriele Del Torchio said Feb.
 In January, Zynga agreed to buy UK-based NaturalMotion Ltd.
 sent the supplies of ursodeoxycholic acid after executives read how the boy’s father, Joel Correa, had to take eight-hour trips to the Colombian border to buy the medicine.
 The purchase would be Ardian’s second this month, following its agreement to buy $1 billion in buyout stakes from a division of General Electric Co.
 Temasek has been re-focusing to buy direct stakes in large companies this year.
 and has also offered to buy control of Olam International Ltd, one of the world’s top three coffee and rice traders, for $32 billion.
 Virtu Financial Inc, the New York-based automated market maker that tried and failed to buy Knight Capital Group Inc.
 Business has been good enough that Vincent Viola and Douglas Cifu, Virtu’s founder and chief executive officer, were able to buy the Florida Panthers professional hockey team last year.
 The company’s main business is market making, using software to provide standing offers to buy and sell stocks and other securities.
 Babcock International Group Plc dropped 67 percent after agreeing to buy Avincis Group for 920 million pounds ($15 billion) from its private-equity owners.
 The engineering-services company said in a statement that it will take on 705 million pounds of Avincis’s debt as part of the deal to buy the helicopter business from Investindustrial and Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.
March 10 (Bloomberg) -- Tencent Holdings Ltd, Asia’s largest Internet company, agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in Chinese e-commerce website JDcom Inc.
 Tencent also agreed to buy a further stake representing 5 percent of the company after it completes an initial public offering, it said.
 After investing $8 billion since April 2012 to buy 43,000 homes in 14 cities, the company has narrowed most of its purchasing to Seattle, Atlanta, Miami, Orlando and Tampa.
 “It’s at a much lower level than it was 12 or 24 months ago” Private-equity firms, hedge funds, real estate investment trusts and other institutional investors have spent more than $20 billion to buy as many as 200,000 rental homes in the last two years.
 Customers sign long-term contracts to buy the power and the company is pouring much of its revenue into building more systems.
 Helios Purchase Macquarie Capital agreed in August to buy 45 percent of Singapore’s Helios Terminal Corp.
 agreed to buy Maker Studios, a supplier of online video content to YouTube, for at least $500 million, gaining technology and experience with short-form entertainment.
 Woodside planned to buy a stake worth as much as $26 billion in the field.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- Cevian Capital AB, the Swedish investor that seeks to buy undervalued stocks, increased its stake in German steelmaker ThyssenKrupp AG, pressing ahead with a goal to gain a seat on the board that oversees management.
 cable companies, may seek to buy a portion, one person said.
 It’s too early to buy Indonesian shares after valuations increased this year, according to UBS’s Tanja.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- Cable tycoon Patrick Drahi’s Altice SA, which is in exclusive talks to buy Vivendi SA’s SFR phone unit, has no plan to sweeten its offer even after rival bidder Bouygues SA did, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 The agreement to buy Vivendi SA’s 53 percent stake in Maroc Telecom is subject to regulatory approvals from the five jurisdictions in which the carrier operates, Serkan Okandan said in a phone interview today.
 “Immediately after closing the transaction our financing is ready and we will move on” Axiata Stake Etisalat agreed to buy the Maroc Telecom stake for about 42 billion euros in November.
 Homebuilder MRV Engenharia e Participacoes SA rebounded from its biggest two-day slump since 2012 after saying it plans to buy back about 5 percent of its publicly traded shares.
 Alibaba agreed in April to buy 18 percent of the company, also known as Sina Weibo.
 made a conditional offer to buy Madison Square Garden Co’s Fuse TV for $350 million in cash, which would surpass offers by Jennifer Lopez and Sean “Diddy” Combs, Artist Series said.
 Combs has offered to buy the channel for about $200 million.
 Crisis is always a good opportunity asvaluations become cheap” Mailru agreed to buy 12 percent of VKontakte, Russia’sbiggest social network, raising its stake to 52 percent, andstarted to buy back $45 million of its own stock, the companysaid in statements today.
 Even if Kroger offered $45 to buy the whole company, Safeway would still be getting the lowest profit multiple for a food retail deal of more than $1 billion since 2004, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Kroger President Michael Ellis said on a conference call last week that the company likes to buy well-run companies that it admires, such as Harris Teeter.
 “It makes a lot of sense for Albertsons to buy this for a whole lot of reasons.
 “The last thing you want from a bank is for them to ask you to put funds to buy something with them.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- Orix Corp, a Japanese finance and leasing firm, said it is in talks to buy Hartford Financial Services Group Inc’s unit in the country.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- BlackRock Inc, the world’s largest asset manager, is looking to buy longer-dated municipal bonds on the view that those securities are cheap compared with federal debt.
 The State Bank of Vietnam and the Ministry of Justice are trying to “quickly” complete legislation that will be a “crucial legal basis” for a government-backed asset management company, lenders and investors to buy and sell bad-debt assets and collateral at banks, Governor Nguyen Van Binh said yesterday in e-mailed responses to Bloomberg News.
 Vodafone increased its offer to buy Ono to about 7 billion euros last week in a meeting with the Spanish company’s key shareholders, people familiar with the matter have said.
 cable operator, won’t make an offer to buy out of bankruptcy the television network it jointly owns with Major League Baseball’s Houston Astros and the National Basketball Association’s Rockets.
 “Purchasing power has declined and the regular citizens’ opportunities to buy Western goods have weakened” The ruble has dropped about 10 percent against the euro this year as markets have reacted to the conflict between Russia and Ukraine.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- Canada Pension Plan Investment Board, the nation’s largest pension fund manager, agreed to buy Wilton Re Holdings Ltd.
 “We’re going to use a major chunk of that money to buy back our shares.
 Comcast recently agreed to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 ‘Poor Country’ “It’s not the idea of if I’m a rich country I’m able to buy myself the technology that I need, if I’m a poor country I’m not able to do it,” Viedma said.
 Protea Hospitality Holdings, which Bethesda, Maryland-based Marriott agreed to buy for $186 million in January, is building five-star and three-star hotels in Lagos, Nigeria’s commercial capital, adding 400 rooms to the 700 it has in the country, Danny Bryer, director of sales, marketing and revenue for Protea, said in e-mailed response to questions.
 Morgan Stanley raised Germany’s second-largest lender to overweight, similar to buy, from equal weight.
 Altice SA, which is in talks to buy Vivendi’s SFR phone unit, has no plan to revise its bid even after Bouygues SA sweetened its rival offer yesterday, according to a person familiar with the matter.
March 5 (Bloomberg) -- Lar Espana Real Estate Socimi SA, a company that plans to buy distressed property in Spain, rose on the first day of trading in Madrid on expectations it will benefit from a recovery in the country’s real estate market.
 agreed to buy US.
 The biggest was SoftBank Corp’s agreement to buy Sprint Corp.
 AerCap in December agreed to buy International Lease Finance Corp.
 KKR, led by Henry Kravis, in November 2011 agreed to buy Samson Resources Corp.
 Three months later, with gas plunging, Leon Black’s Apollo struck a deal to buy EP Energy Corp.
 The slump put a halt to private-equity firms’ ability to buy undeveloped gas fields, bore a few wells, then flip the land to the big energy companies.
 In 2012 it raised a $125 billion fund to buy mature, fully drilled acreage that large companies no longer want to own.
 to buy Eagle Ford acreage from Chesapeake for $685 million.
 rose to a record after Sun International Ltd, South Africa’s second-biggest leisure company, said it’s in talks to buy a stake in the competitor’s slot-machine unit.
 Dentsu soared 55 percent to 3,850 yen after its rating was raised to buy from neutral at Bank of America Merrill Lynch.
 said it will spend $70 million to buy 1,000 delivery trucks powered by propane and build 50 fueling stations as it expands one of the largest private alternative-energy fleets in the US.
 “Pierre Karl is the first billionaire in PQ history,” said Nadeau, who was a vice president of the province’s state-owned pension fund manager, the Caisse de Depot et Placement du Quebec, when it teamed up with Quebecor to buy Videotron.
 Coming back from abroad, she thought, “now I need a job and I need to buy a flat immediately,” she said in an interview.
 “I feel like renting, isn’t a failure, but a downer, because you want to have your grown-up life” Meldahl said she expects to buy an apartment in the summer with help from her parents after she finds a full-time job.
 The company spent C$129 billion to bring the Kearl oil-sands project online last year and joined with Exxon, which owns 70 percent of its stock, to buy more oil-sands acreage for about C$751 million in August.
 Private-equity firms typically pool money from investors such as pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies, then sell them and return the money and a profit after 10 years.
 28 to buy F&C, the manager of the oldest UK.
 ‘Blocking Position’ Ergen was accused of seeking to manipulate the outcome of the bankruptcy through the “blocking position” he built up in LightSquared debt, by using it to buy assets on the cheap and drive away other bidders.
 LightSquared has further argued that Ergen sought to manipulate the outcome of the bankruptcy through the “blocking position” he built up, trying to use it to buy LightSquared’s assets on the cheap and keep away other bidders.
 Tricon is looking to buy communities of manufactured homes in the so-called “sun belt” of Arizona, Florida, and California, where selling prices average $60,800, the cheapest of any US.
 The Toronto-based company aims to buy assets of about C$750 million ($670 million) in the housing segment, with the first investment possibly this year, according to Chief Operating Officer Gary Berman.
 The fiscal 2015-2019 budget plan for the Missile Defense Agency calls for $439 billion for continued development of the ground system, $189 million for a new “common kill vehicle” that could replace the Raytheon warhead and $619 million to buy additional interceptors and other equipment.
 Improving “in-stocks” -- a measure of how much merchandise is available for shoppers to buy -- is a top focus for Wal-Mart, executives said at its Year Beginning Meeting, according to notes taken by an attendee that were reviewed by Bloomberg.
 Oil Search, which agreed last month to buy a stake in the same discoveries for an initial $900 million, lodged a dispute with InterOil, the Port Moresby-based company said today in a statement, without specifying the basis of its complaint.
 “We can only speculate that Oil Search feels that by bringing in Exxon, it’s a more aligned partnership” Preemption Right Oil Search’s deal to buy 228 percent of the InterOil fields from minority partners gave the company the right to preempt Total’s initial agreement in December, according to a JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 The investment firm agreed at the time to buy any rights not taken up by other investors.
 will invest as much as $100 million in a program to buy land that developers will use for large power projects and lease it back to them.
 is sticking with its recommendation to buy Chinese stocks, the biggest decliners worldwide this year, after valuations fell to the lowest level in a decade compared with global peers.
 “Once we find something to buy, it’s time to do it,” Pertti Vanhanen, group head of property, said in an interview.
 “House prices are skyrocketing, at least in London, and you need to have savings” to buy a home, he said in the March 12 interview at the MIPIM property conference in Cannes, France.
 Vodafone yesterday agreed to buy Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for 72 billion euros ($10 billion) including debt.
 UBS raised its investment rating on the stock to buy from neutral and also raised its target price to 780 yen from 550 yen.
 Prosecutors accused Litvak of misrepresenting sellers’ asking prices to buyers, or vice versa, keeping the difference for Jefferies.
 Ergen, who accumulated a $1 billion stake in LightSquared debt, at one point offered to buy some of the company’s airwaves for $22 billion, only to drop the proposal amid a dispute with Falcone, whose Harbinger Capital Partners LLC controls LightSquared.
 offered to buy the rest of the commodity trader in a deal valued at S$53 billion ($42 billion).
 The retailer will begin accepting trade-ins on March 26, and customers will be able to buy pre-owned video games later this year.
 28 that it may raise as much as HK$222 billion ($29 billion) from giving shareholders convertible warrants to buy land in the city.
 The economy’s growth should encourage investors to buy Zambia’s bond, said Charles Laurie, head of Africa at Bath, UK-based risk analysis company Maplecroft.
 said March 2 the company and its partners will pay $16 billion in cash and assumed debt to buy two hydroelectric power plants in India, while Emirates Telecommunications Corp.
 Kiser testified that he didn’t consider whether he was acting for the company or the chairman when he first looked into buying the debt in 2011.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Edison International and Sempra Energy utilities in Southern California were cleared to buy as much as 1,500 megawatts of electricity to replace the power lost when the San Onofre nuclear plant shut in 2012.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne last week scrapped rules requiring retirees to buy annuities with savings in defined-contribution pension plans.
 BAE climbed 29 percent to 4078 pence after RBC raised its recommendation on Europe’s largest defense company to outperform, similar to buy, from sector perform.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc, the world’s second-largest wireless carrier, agreed to buy Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in a 72 billion-euro ($10 billion) transaction to boost TV and broadband offerings.
 Proposed changes to the 2002 Mineral and Petroleum Resources Development Act will give the government a 20 percent free stake in all new energy projects, and the right to buy an unspecified additional share at an “agreed price” The ruling African National Congress, which wants the state to play a bigger role in the economy, is pushing for the law to be passed before May 7 elections with a National Assembly vote scheduled for tomorrow.
 recovery has investors seeking to buy the world’s mostly liquid assets.
 SEFs are aimed at giving investors a better chance to buy and sell swaps with each other rather than banks, potentially increasing competition and cutting costs.
 In the past, banks told investors what the price to buy or sell a swap would be, and it was up to the asset manager to accept or reject it.
 The issue of where most of the investors would get the money to buy the shares “didn’t come up” on the call, he said.
 Horan said he understood that most of them would finance the share purchases themselves while another, Quinn, would borrow from Credit Suisse Group AG to buy his stake.
 Munich Re also said it plans to buy back shares worth 1 billion euros before its 2015 shareholder meeting.
 It announced plans last year to buy back 1 billion euros of stock by a shareholders’ meeting scheduled for April 30.
 Facebook Inc’s agreement to buy Oculus VR Inc.
 Best Time “This is the best time to buy assets in Brazil,” said Song Seng Wun, a Singapore-based economist at CIMB Group Holdings Bhd.
 36 South is starting the fund when it’s cheap to buy protection against increases in volatility, which can also give investors a source of return separate from stocks, it said.
 Asset Pledge Partially owned by a Goldman Sachs-led consortium, IHS, which provides mobile phone infrastructure and services, has agreed to buy almost 3,000 towers from MTN in Rwanda, Zambia, Cameroon and the Ivory Coast since 2012.
 Months of wooing by Boeing paid off as ANA agreed to buy 14 of the 787-9 model, 20 of the upgraded 777X due to debut at the end of the decade, and six current 777s to help bridge the gap.
 The judge rejected Yeung’s testimony that the alleged triad member’s check was a loan to buy London property.
 “This is a serious threat to certain industries, and private equity is one of them,” said Salama, author of a forthcoming book ‘The End of Limited Liability in Brazil’’ Carlyle funds spent a total of at least $100 million to buy a majority stake in Urbplan in 2007 and to continue funding it through 2011.
 27 it has agreed to buy that stake.
 in London, rejoined Electricite de France SA to buy and sell UK.
 The investment firm agreed at the time to buy any rights not taken up by other investors.
 has agreed to buy electricity from the projects under a 20-year agreement.
 Portugal plans to buy back bonds due in October 2015 tomorrow.
 Corporate Buyers Corporate buyers such as Blackstone Group LP have descended upon the area to buy foreclosed homes and turn them into rentals.
 “It is now finally time for me to go exploring! I plan to spend the next few years traveling the planet and discovering the questions and mysteries that intrigue us all” Last month, billionaire John Malone, 73, set his own succession plans in motion by giving Discovery Communications CEO David Zaslav the right to buy 59 billion of his Class B shares of company should he decide to sell.
 Companies and individuals will be allowed to buy and sell foreign exchange daily in cash or bonds in the so-called Sicad 2 market through banks and brokerages that will open local accounts for them, according to a resolution published in the Official Gazette today.
 “We could well see a repeat of February, with ECB President Draghi adding more items to his checklist, and removing a few others, in order to buy extra time.
 “But from the ECB’s point of view, the key advantage would be to buy itself more time to assess how strong the forces of disinflation will continue, and to decide whether stronger and unorthodox -– and hence more controversial –- instruments will be needed” in the second half of the year.
 Jungheinrich AG gained 55 percent to 5499 euros as Deutsche Bank upgraded its rating on the stock to buy from hold.
 The Singapore-based commodity trader saw its stock rise 12 percent today after a unit of the nation’s state-owned investment company offered to buy it in a deal that values Olam at S$53 billion ($42 billion).
 Allianz was criticized for investing 110 million euros last month to buy an 833 percent stake in FC Bayern amid the on-going tax case against Hoeness.
 Profitability Target BNP Paribas agreed in November to buy the rest of its Belgian consumer-banking unit and three weeks later to purchase Rabobank Groep’s Polish division.
 We will scale it up” Nxasana said last month he favored organic growth after three deals to buy assets in Zambia, Ghana and Nigeria failed in as many years.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 “There isn’t likely going to be a tremendous amount of upside to growth or inflation from here, so it makes it easier to buy the long end of the curve,” said Michael Zezas, Morgan Stanley’s chief muni strategist in New York.
 agreed to buy similar messenger WhatsApp for $19 billion this year, and has 35 million users.
 Comcast’s agreement to buy Time Warner Cable for $45 billion, which is pending approval by regulators, may enable it to control high-speed broadband to the majority of American homes, Hastings said in the letter.
 The maker of Durex condoms is considered the frontrunner to buy Merck & Co’s over-the-counter health business because it would be able to generate the most cost savings and have fewer antitrust issues than competitors, people familiar with the matter said.
 Elop stepped down as CEO in September, when Microsoft agreed to buy Nokia’s handset division.
 That has led some analysts to speculate that Pfizer would seek to use some of its cash to buy foreign companies.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- Mercuria Energy Group Ltd, which in March agreed to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodity unit for $35 billion, reported the largest increase in annual revenue among big closely held commodity-trading houses.
 For Saracen Mineral Holdings Ltd, which agreed in January to buy OAO GMK Norilsk Nickel’s mothballed Thunderbox mines in Australia, the Golden Orb weaving spiders are the first challenge before production can resume next year.
 QKR Corp, which in February agreed to buy a Namibian mine from AngloGold Ashanti Ltd.
 said it’s interested in a deal to buy AstraZeneca Plc, Britain’s second-biggest drugmaker.
 Sterling also strengthened as Pfizer said it’s still interested in a deal to buy AstraZeneca in what would rank as the biggest-ever UK.
 is looking at more acquisitions after agreeing to buy ABC Holdings Ltd.
 Patrick Gallagher reached a deal April 6 to pay A$101 billion ($950 million) to buy the insurance-brokerage operation of Perth, Australia-based Wesfarmers Ltd.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, India’s largest drugmaker by market value, agreed to buy competitor Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 Sun Pharma has been is talks to buy Ranbaxy for “some months,” said Chief Financial Officer Uday Baldota.
 markets to entice more drivers to buy one.
 Deals Skadden Represents Mars in $29 Billion P&G Pet-Food Purchase Skadden Arps Slate Meagher & Flom LLP is representing Mars Inc, the closely held maker of M&M’s candies and Uncle Ben’s rice, on its agreement to buy three of Procter & Gamble Co’s pet-food brands for $29 billion.
 The SEC faces pressure to overhaul trading after Michael Lewis’s “Flash Boys” book made the claim that high-frequency traders hurt other investors by learning which shares investors plan to buy, purchasing them and selling them back at a higher price.
 2010 Trades The French regulator’s allegations pertain to trades made in 2010, when Elliott disclosed that Eiffarie, a joint venture owned by construction company Eiffage SA and Macquarie Group Ltd’s infrastructure unit, planned to buy Elliott’s APRR shares.
 Ikea has invested in wind farms in Canada, Denmark, France, Germany, Ireland, Poland, Sweden and the UK, including a November deal to buy a 46-megawatt wind farm in Alberta.
April 8 (Bloomberg) -- Sopra Group SA agreed to buy Groupe Steria SCA for about 730 million euros ($1 billion) in stock as two of France’s oldest computer-services providers combine to win customers from larger rivals.
 Aurelius AG, based in Munich, today announced a deal to buy Individual Desktop Solutions GmbH, a subsidiary of Deutsche Telekom AG’s corporate-customer unit.
 Scheer Group GmbH last week agreed to buy Software AG’s SAP consulting operations for German-speaking markets.
 The National Basketball Association franchise agreed to buy 12 acres (49 hectares) of undeveloped land from Salesforcecom Inc.
 The restart of mining may raise supplies of the steelmaking raw material in the world market, especially to China, which used to buy most of Goa’s ore before the ban.
 Prices have never been higher, feed costs are down, and output is headed for an all-time high as exports surge to buyers from Mexico to China.
 After a failed takeover of Dutch phone operator Royal KPN NV last year, the company entered an agreement last week to share control of Telekom Austria AG with the European nation’s government, triggering a bid of as much as 142 billion euros ($196 billion) to buy out minority shareholders.
 As a result, Schwartz ceased to hold any options to buy Onex shares.
 Le Blanc, Mersky and Munk received a one-time grant of 850,000 options to buy subordinate voting shares, the filing said.
 agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Keurig Green Mountain Inc, which is company developing a make-your-own, single-serve product similar to SodaStream’s, on Feb.
 On the twice-daily calls the banks declare how much gold they want to buy or sell for clients as well as their own accounts.
April 9 (Bloomberg) -- Arad Group, an Israeli developer of water meters, has reached an agreement to buy a controlling stake in Mexico’s closely held water-meter maker Cicasa, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 Even with the negative credit outlooks, investors demand about 007 percentage point of extra yield to buy 30-year New Jersey bonds rather than benchmark debt, close to the smallest gap since December, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Sports Direct International Plc Chairman Mike Ashley bought an 11 percent stake in House of Fraser from Scottish entrepreneur Tom Hunter about a week ago and tried to buy other stakes yet failed, the Sunday Times reported yesterday.
 NSK rose 36 percent to 1,083 yen as its rating was lifted to buy from neutral at Goldman Sachs.
 Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s Austrian Drei unit, in an effort to win regulatory approval for its agreement to buy Orange Austria, sold customers of Orange’s Yesss! discount brand to market leader Telekom Austria AG.
 Keating used the new money to buy high-yield junk bonds and develop more real estate.
 He was accused of misleading investors into buying high-risk bonds that were not federally insured.
 advised investor to buy the shares after it agreed to buy Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 UBS raised the stock to buy from neutral and its price estimate 9 percent to 720 rupees.
 Nomura also raised the stock to buy from neutral.
 The company said April 7 it agreed to buy Ranbaxy for $32 billion from Japan’s Daiichi Sankyo Co, which had paid 61 percent more for the company five years ago.
 UBS upgraded the drugmaker to buy from sell and boosted the price target 92 percent to 576 rupees.
 The decision to buy a stake in Formula One before a planned listing was based on an assessment that an investor can get a “considerably better” price at that point rather than waiting until “afterwards once everyone has been there,” Slyngstad said.
 Three months after Daiichi Sankyo agreed to buy the controlling stake in Ranbaxy for about $46 billion the FDA barred imports from the Indian drugmaker’s Paonta Sahib and Dewas plants because of manufacturing defects.
 The report said the Defense Department would be forced to cut 17 of the 343 fighters it planned to buy from fiscal 2016 through 2019 unless Congress repeals the automatic cuts.
 Novartis agreed to buy cancer drugs for as much as $16 billion while selling most of the company’s vaccines division to Glaxo for $71 billion and its animal-health unit to Lilly for $54 billion.
 One-month contracts offering the right to sell the rupee cost 81 basis points more than those to buy, the data show.
 Societe Generale SA recommends that investors protect themselves from election-outcome risks by purchasing two-month options to buy the dollar and sell the rupee.
 “She’s young, trendy, she likes to party and likes to buy something affordable for the weekend,” Emina Alivodic, Nelly’s head of design, said, describing the company’s typical customer.
 Novartis, based in Basel, Switzerland, agreed to buy cancer drugs for as much as $16 billion while selling most of the vaccines division to Glaxo for up to $71 billion and its animal-health unit to Lilly for $54 billion.
 offered to buy Allergan Inc.
 Ukraine will find it hard to buy all the gas it needs in European markets, he said.
 Gazprom wants more than $22 billion in back payments and an additional $114 billion for gas Naftogaz was obliged to buy under a take-or-pay contract clause, an arrangement the Ukrainian government calls unjust.
 expansion in 2004 after agreeing to buy a 51 percent stake in Portland, Maine-based Banknorth Group Inc.
 Internet portals with large consumer audiences are increasingly attractive to buyers as online advertising becomes more sophisticated and more transactions are completed on the Web.
 Weir Chief Executive Officer Keith Cochrane said in February he’s looking to buy more mining, oil, gas and valves companies following the acquisitions of drilling control company Mathena Inc.
 billionaire investor Wilbur Ross and Toronto-based Fairfax Financial Holdings Ltd, who were among five investors to buy 349 percent of the bank in 2011 for 11 billion euros, sold in part of their holdings last month after tripling their money.
 Fidelity was able to buy a chunk of debt at a “very, very attractive price” last June and July when “competitors were being hit with a lot of redemptions,” forcing them to sell, O’Neil said.
 Market Making Bankers have pushed back against some of the rule’s provisions, particularly with respect to so-called market making, the business of using a firm’s capital to buy and sell securities with customers.
 Without as much dealer involvement, it’s generally taking longer to buy and sell debt, Fuss said.
 With shades including Elephant’s Breath, Dead Salmon and Nancy’s Blushes, Farrow & Ball is an opportunity to buy into the top-end paint market as the UK.
 ‘Outstanding Portfolio’ Osisko ran a search for alternatives to Goldcorp’s offer and announced April 2 that Yamana had agreed to buy 50 percent of Osisko’s assets.
 Goldcorp responded a week later by raising its own bid, after which Agnico joined Yamana in a friendly transaction to buy the whole of Osisko.
 It offered in 2013 to buy out remaining investors for 8089 euros a share, 39 percent less than the market price when the bid was announced.
 Such a high short interest magnifies gains in the stock because short sellers may be forced to buy back the stock at the higher prices to cover their bet, she said.
 Algo Technologies claims to have the industry’s lowestlatency, a term describing how long a matching engine takes toprocess and complete requests to buy and sell.
 Heoffered to buy IEX Group Inc, the upstart trading platform thatserves as the hero in Lewis’s book, the person said.
 In February, the company spent $18 billion to buy airwaves to compete with Vodafone Group Plc, the world’s No.
 Novartis agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline’s oncology business for as much as $16 billion, to sell Glaxo its vaccines line for as much as $71 billion and to sell its animal health business to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, meanwhile, announced a bid to buy Allergan Inc.
 Goldman raised its recommendation on the stock to buy from hold.
 rental homes demanded higher relative yields to buy the debt this time around, a person with knowledge of the transaction said.
 In 2007, AT&T held talks to buy a stake in Telecom Italia, though backed down amid political opposition.
 “We saw these handbags and we wanted to buy these handbags,” Graber said, gesturing to the camel-colored leather model on the checkout counter at the company’s store on Lexington Avenue in Midtown Manhattan.
 “You have representatives of trillions of dollars of capital refusing to buy new private-label residential mortgage-backed securities because this problem of no one looking out for investors’ interest isn’t solved,” Chris Ames, a senior portfolio manager at Schroder Investment Management North America Inc, part of a global asset manager that oversees about $435 billion, said in a telephone interview.
April 22 (Bloomberg) -- Canacol Energy Ltd, Colombia’s best performing major stock in the past year, said it received two expressions of interest to buy the company last year and remains open to offers at the right price.
 The firms, which also include Goldman Sachs Group Inc, maywithdraw their commitment because Brazil’s securities regulatorCVM asked that banks be required to buy any remaining shares ofthe phone company even if there’s no demand from investors, thepeople said.
 Under the previous agreement, the banks would need to stepin to buy shares only if investors placed orders totalingbetween 1 and 13 times the offering size, according to theprospectus.
 Oi’s controlling shareholder,Telemar Participacoes SA, and an investment vehicle managed byBTG Pactual agreed to buy about 700 million euros of that total.
 Price Estimate The disposal value is probably about 1 billion euros once about 300 million euros of debt is taken into account, said Schmidt, who cut his recommendation on the stock to hold from “accumulate” Triton, which invests in medium-sized businesses in northern Europe, agreed April 1 to buy a steam auxiliary components business for 730 million euros from France’s Alstom SA.
 Virgin’s buyout-firm executives dropped plans to raise $200 million to buy energy assets in central and eastern Europe with Russia-based investment firm Rusnano Capital earlier this year following a lack of investor interest, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 is seeking to buy a stake in a unit that designs chips for liquid-crystal displays used in smartphones.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Want to buy a trailer park? Freddie Mac wants to give you a loan.
 Eneva SA, the Brazil power venture 379 percent-held by EON, is developing a recovery plan after project delays forced it to buy from the spot market, widening its losses.
 Novartis AG may move after the Swiss drugmaker agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer-drug business, form a consumer-health venture with Glaxo and sell its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Many funds that borrow money to buy stocks were forced to cut their bets on higher beta, according to a Deutsche Bank report dated April 4.
 agreed to buy Oculus VR Inc.
 to buy Essar Group’s local unit, known as Yu.
 Service Delivery The joint bid to buy Essar will see Airtel receive the company’s subscribers and licenses and Safaricom acquire the network base stations and transmission equipment.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA jumped after announcing a plan to buy back as many as 679 million shares through May 23.
April 21 (Bloomberg) -- TreeHouse Foods Inc, a maker of house-brand foods for retailers, agreed to buy Protenergy Natural Foods for about C$170 million ($154 million) to add soups and broths.
 The company owns 215,000 apartments in Berlin, Cologne and other large cities, including 41,000 units it agreed to buy in February.
 JBS Foods, the second-largest producer and exporter of poultry and pork in Brazil, was formed after JBS agreed to buy Seara food processing assets from Marfrig Global Foods SA for 585 billion reais in June 2013.
 Spain’s Real Madrid paid more to buy three players this season -- Gareth Bale, Asier Illarramendi and Isco -- than the Indian Super League is currently worth, based on BBC reports of the transfer fees.
 may see its Baa1 credit rating drop two levels to the cusp of junk after the maker of artificial hips and knees said today that it agreed to buy rival Biomet Inc.
 Allergan’s $350 million of 28 percent notes due 2023 have dropped to a record-low 893 cents on the dollar to yield 427 percent since Laval, Quebec-based based Valeant offered to buy the business in a cash-and-stock deal valued at $457 billion and supported by Allergan’s largest shareholder Pershing Square Capital Management LP.
 UBS AG upgraded the London-based oil and gas explorer to buy from neutral, saying the recent selloff is overdone.
 is in talks to buy the company, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 agreed in August to buy the Duvernay assets for an undisclosed amount.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- Forest Laboratories Inc, the drugmaker being acquired by Actavis Plc, agreed to buy Furiex Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Disney agreed to buy Maker Studios on March 24, gaining technology and experience with short-form video entertainment.
 Valeant Tax Valeant, joined by activist investor Bill Ackman, is offering to buy Irvine, California-based Allergan in a cash-and-stock deal valued at $457 billion.
 For anyone wanting to watch current hits such as “Game of Thrones,” they’ll need to buy a cable or satellite-TV subscription.
April 2 (Bloomberg) -- Vodacom Group Ltd, South Africa’s largest wireless carrier, is negotiating final details for a deal to buy local Web-access provider Neotel Pty Ltd.
 Vodacom, which said in September it had started exclusive talks to buy Neotel, is expanding in data services to offset declining revenue from its domestic voice division.
 Last year, the firm agreed to buy Lucky Brand Jeans for $225 million and was in a venture that bought Juicy Couture’s intellectual property for $195 million in cash.
 California regulators in October ordered the state’s utilities to buy 1,325 megawatts of energy storage by 2020.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Reckitt Benckiser Group Plc said it’s no longer in active talks to buy the consumer-health arm of Merck & Co, saying the purchase doesn’t meet its investment criteria.
 While sales rose almost 30-fold last year as six plants started operations, project delays have increased costs and forced the Rio de Janeiro-based company to buy on the spot market at a time of record prices, deepening its losses.
 The SEC faces pressure to overhaul trading after Michael Lewis’s “Flash Boys” book made the claim that high-frequency traders hurt other investors by learning which shares investors plan to buy, purchasing them and selling them back at a higher price.
April 15 (Bloomberg) -- Hotel Properties Ltd, owner of the Four Seasons hotels in Singapore and Bali, jumped the most in almost five years after founding shareholders agreed to buy the stock they don’t own for S$749 million ($597 million).
 A company led by Managing director Ong Beng Seng and Wheelock Properties Singapore Ltd, which jointly own 4191 percent through six stakeholders, offered to buy the shares at S$350 each, according to a statement to the Singapore stock exchange.
 Vale began discussions in August 2008 to buy part of Rio’s Simandou rights, Rio said in the complaint filed yesterday.
 We think the market can be very supportive” One-time fees for personal seat licenses, which give the purchaser the right to buy season tickets, will be “modest” compared with amounts levied by the Dallas Cowboys and New York Giants when they moved to new stadiums, he said.
 Companies have begun to buy new vessels again, taking advantage of a drop in prices.
April 23 (Bloomberg) -- Australia committed to buying a total of 72 F-35 Joint Strike Fighters, down from a 2009 plan to purchase about 100 of what has become the Pentagon’s most-expensive weapons system.
 ally is ordering 58 of the Lockheed Martin Corp- made aircraft for A$124 billion ($116 billion), on top of the 14 it pledged to buy in 2009, Prime Minister Tony Abbott said today in Canberra.
April 4 (Bloomberg) -- Ireland’s state-owned bad bank agreed to buy Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc and KBC Groep NV loans to Ireland’s largest shopping mall, its first purchase of debt that didn’t belong to the country’s bailed-out lenders, people familiar with the matter said.
 Lesiak raised his recommendation on the stock to buy from hold.
 Rice Energy’s bond offering this month was rated CCC+ by Standard & Poor’s, seven steps below investment grade, or the level above which some institutional investors, such as pension funds and insurance companies, are allowed to buy.
 Coca-Cola agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain, a company developing a make-your-own, single-serve product similar to SodaStream’s, on Feb.
 “You can just take this as another example of the commitment of the leadership regime to address some of the challenges that China does face” The Shanghai Composite Index advanced 14 percent and the Hang Seng Index climbed 15 percent after China unveiled the plan which will allow wealthy individuals to buy Hong Kong equities through the Shanghai exchange, broadening their investment options from a limited number of funds.
 Connor was seeking to double sales in Latin America when he agreed in 2012 to buy Comex for $234 billion, including the assumption of debt.
 The Beijing-based company known as Sinopec agreed to buy Lukoil’s 50 percent of Caspian Investment Resources Ltd, which holds stakes in four projects in the central Asian nation.
 Puts totaled 183,052 on April 25, more than double the number of options to buy.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- America Movil SAB is bidding as much as $196 billion to buy out Telekom Austria AG’s minority investors, seeking to cement control of the European phone carrier after striking a shareholder pact with the government.
 As a controlling shareholder group, America Movil and OeIAG have to offer to buy the shares of minority shareholders under Austrian law.
April 22 (Bloomberg) -- Arabtec Holding Co, the United Arab Emirates’s biggest listed construction company, is in talks to buy a large European company and may tap the bond market to pay for the deal, Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik said.
 Saab said on April 14 it’s in talks to buy a marine defense unit from Essen, Germany-based ThyssenKrupp AG, which would put the submarine and warship production at Karlskrona in the south of the country back into the hands of a Swedish company after 15 years of German ownership.
 The inclusion will prompt investors who track bond indexes to buy the notes to meet the new weightings.
 “The economy is plunging into recession and investors are concerned particularly with retail stocks -- who has money to buy more stuff?” Ilya Kravets, the New York-based director of investment research at Daniloff Capital LLC, said by phone on April 25.
 Their company agreed to buy printing-ink maker Flint Group Holdings Sarl for about 2 billion euros ($28 billion) last week.
 offered to buy Allergan Inc, maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment, in a cash-and-stock deal valued at $457 billion in the latest step of the Canadian company’s plan to become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 Actavis Plc in February agreed to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 In April 2013, Valeant made an offer to buy Actavis, which was rejected because the price was too low, Bloomberg reported at the time.
 Still, individual investors may be persuaded to buy Seibu stock because of the perks the company gives shareholders, said Minoru Matsuno, president of Value Search Asset Management Co.
 The protectors passed on “recommendations” from the Wylys, including to buy jewelry, specific paintings to be hung in their homes, and investments in an art gallery in Aspen, Colorado, and a horse farm in Texas, Fitzpatrick said.
 The new fuel bill from Moscow is for contracted gas that Ukraine failed to buy last year, Sergei Kupriyanov, a spokesman for the Russian state-controlled exporter, said today by phone.
 Glaxo gained 52 percent after Novartis AG agreed to buy its cancer-drug business for as much as $16 billion.
 Merrill Lynch raised its rating on the company to buy from neutral, saying the stock has the potential to gain 26 percent, backed by strong cash generation.
 While at least two offers came in above the asking price, the couple preferred to sell for less -- $115 million -- to buyers who offered cash.
April 25 (Bloomberg) -- General Atlantic LLC is in talks to buy a minority stake in closely held drug company Laboratorios Sanfer SA in its first investment in a Mexican firm, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 “It’s going to be even harder for them to buy companies of greater scale and buy them attractively,” Scholes said.
 The lease agreement gives the bank the option to buy back the buildings, including a 39-story tower, in 2017 for $2 billion.
 agrees to buy Hartford’s retirement-plans business for $400 million.
 Novartis AG agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer-drug business for as much as $16 billion while selling most of the vaccines division to Glaxo and an animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 offered to buy Allergan in a cash-and-stock deal valued at $457 billion.
Mando Corp, the biggest unit ofSouth Korea’s Halla Group, tumbled in Seoul trading after itsplan to split into two raised investor concerns that the companyis preparing to buy more shares of affiliates.
 “People want to buy midstream assets and that means they are not cheap,” Paget said.
 (BRK/A) agreed to buy HJ Heinz Co.
 Cerberus Price The 1,600 yen price compares with the 1,400 yen a share Cerberus paid to buy stock from shareholders last year when it boosted its stake to 355 percent.
 In Europe, interest rate cuts and central bank pledges to buy the bonds of crisis-hit countries have boosted business confidence.
 The biggest deal so far this year was Comcast’s $452 billion agreement in February to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Vodafone Group Plc in March agreed to buy cable provider Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for $10 billion to boost TV and broadband offerings in Spain.
 agreed to buy Beam Inc.
 The EU restrictions didn’t stop ABN Amro from agreeing to buy Credit Suisse Group AG’s German private-banking business.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd, the Bermuda-based provider of property and casualty insurance, announced a $32 billion offer to buy Aspen Insurance Holdings Ltd.
 Endurance said it plans to pay 60 percent with its shares, and that investors led by CVC Capital Partners Ltd-advised funds are prepared to buy $105 billion of newly issued common shares to help fund the cash portion of the deal.
 He said he plans to buy $25 million of Endurance shares in connection with a takeover.
 Facebook is seeking to make even more money on smartphones and tablets by testing a mobile ad network and agreeing to buy text messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 And Facebook agreed to buy Oculus VR Inc, a virtual-reality headset maker, for about $2 billion, a high-priced bet on the fledgling wearable-computing market.
 The SEC faces pressure to overhaul trading after Michael Lewis’s “Flash Boys” book made the claim that high-frequencytraders hurt other investors by learning which shares investorsplan to buy, purchasing them and selling them back at a higherprice.
 The partners agreed to buy out Eni last year, and OAO Rosneft, Russia’s state-run oil producer, acquired Enel’s stake.
 generic-drug maker, was rejected in its bid to buy Meda AB, the Swedish pharmaceuticals maker valued at about $45 billion.
 The company has also been looking at assets to buy that would help expand its global sales power, with commercial operations in new countries.
 18 it agreed to buy Forest in a deal anticipated to be completed by midyear.
 raised its ratings on both stocks to outperform, similar to buy, from market perform, citing the potential for a recovery in Europe and cheaper valuation multiples relative to rival Bayerische Motoren Werke AG.
 Hauck & Aufhaeuser Privatbankiers KGaA upgraded its rating on the stock to buy from hold, after Wirecard also confirmed its 2014 outlook for earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization.
 UBS AG raised its rating on Europe’s largest home-improvement company to buy from neutral, citing the possibility of higher profits from its potential acquisition of Mr Bricolage SA in France.
 for $29 billion and Stryker’s announcement in May 2011 of plans to buy Orthovita Inc.
 He told Lazorchak of Stryker’s plans to buy Orthovita, and Lazorchak told him about Celgene’s planned acquisition of Pharmion, authorities said.
 to buy Allergan, the maker of Botox, has renewed focus on a single rule that affects the balance of power between public companies and the activists that target them.
 Laval, Quebec-based Valeant offered last week to buy Allergan in a deal valued at $457 billion.
 CVM told the firms to buy any remaining shares of the phone company even if there’s no demand from investors if they want to keep referring to the offer as “fully underwritten” in disclosures to investors, the agency said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 Under the previous agreement, which the banks described as fully underwritten, the firms would need to step in to buy shares only if investors placed orders totaling between 1 and 13 times the offering size, according to the prospectus.
 Oi’s controlling shareholder, Telemar Participacoes SA, and an investment vehicle managed by BTG Pactual agreed to buy about 700 million euros of that total.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, the world’s biggest private-equity firm, and Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s merchant banking unit agreed to buy financial data provider Ipreo Holdings LLC from KKR & Co.
 A law approved by South Africa’s parliament that will give the state a free 20 percent stake in new oil and gas ventures and enable it to buy an unspecified additional share at an agreed price is awaiting the signature of President Jacob Zuma.
 The 750 million-euro ($104 billion) sale was oversubscribed 17 times as 700 investors lined up to buy the security.
 Reserves ‘Critical’ Even as Ukraine limited the amount of foreign currency individuals are allowed to buy, the hryvnia has lost 28 percent against the dollar this year, the most among more than 150 global currencies tracked by Bloomberg.
 If a sale of SFR is completed, it could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Sales of previously owned properties in March tumbled 75 percent from a year earlier to the slowest pace in 20 months and mortgage applications to buy homes plunged 19 percent from a year earlier, indicating slowing demand during what is typically the busiest season for deals.
 “It’s just one of those things that happens and you have to bear with it” BCE and Rogers teamed up in 2012 to buy a controlling stake in Maple Leaf Sports & Entertainment Ltd, whose crown jewel is the Leafs hockey franchise.
 is in talks to buy Alstom SA, the French builder of power plants and transmission gear, people with knowledge of the matter said, in what would be GE’s biggest acquisition ever.
 GE’s attempt to buy Honeywell International Inc.
 The only deal that would have been larger was its attempt more than a decade ago to buy Honeywell for about $53 billion, including the assumption of debt, the data show.
 Turning up the economic heat on Ukraine, Russia’s state-run OAO Gazprom presented the nation with an additional $114 billion bill for gas it promised to buy last year.
 “Prices are rising, mortgage rates are higher, and that makes it considerably more expensive to buy than it was a year ago,” said Jed Kolko, chief economist for Trulia Inc, a San Francisco-based real estate information service.
 and German reinsurer Hannover Re, agreed last week to buy Old Mutual Plc’s Skandia units in Germany and Austria for 220 million euros ($303 million) in its first deal since its creation.
 The company is seeking to buy life insurance providers that are closed to new customers in a similar way to how Clive Cowdery built up Resolution Ltd, the UK.
 “I don’t know if it’s everybody waking up at the same time and having the same thought in mind that they need to buy as many companies as they can.
 Serial acquirer Valeant is trying to buy Botox-maker Allergan, and Actavis Plc is acquiring Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Novartis agreed to buy cancer drugs from Glaxo for as much as $16 billion, while selling most of its vaccines division to Glaxo and its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly.
 Qatar Islamic Bank said March 26 that it’s in exclusive talks to buy a stake in Asya Katilim Bankasi AS, while Commercial Bank of Qatar agreed to take a 71 percent stake in Turkey’s Alternatifbank AS in March last year.
 In February, Post agreed to buy the PowerBar and Musashi sports-nutrition brands from Nestle SA to take advantage of increasing demand for health- and fitness-related snacks.
 The firm offered to buy Chindex International Inc.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 CEZ doesn’t plan to buy any generation assets in its home market and will instead focus on developing smaller co-generation units and activities including gas distribution and mobile-phone services to mitigate the falling revenue from electricity production, according to Benes.
 agreed to buy mobile-phone subscribers from Nashua Mobile (Pty) Ltd.
 The company, which abandoned a plan to buy about 630 branches from Lloyds Banking Group Plc last year as the capital hole was revealed, was damaged by “acute systemic weakness” in its governance, Myners wrote in his report.
 Sports Direct International Plc Chairman Mike Ashley bought an 11 percent stake in House of Fraser from Scottish entrepreneur Tom Hunter about a week ago and failed in attempts to buy other stakes, the Sunday Times reported April 6.
 offered to buy the rest of its mall unit to consolidate some businesses and boost returns.
April 3 (Bloomberg) -- Qatar’s national oil company has dropped out of a group of state-backed investors seeking to buy a stake in Occidental Petroleum Corp’s Middle East business amid a political dispute in the region, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The retailer’s managers, speaking in a presentation for analysts and investors last week, didn’t provide specific plans to gain new customers or lure current shoppers into buying more, Sterne Agee’s Sam Poser said in a note yesterday.
 and founder Jack Ma’s Yunfeng Capital agreed to buy a $122 billion stake in video website Youku Tudou Inc.
 This month, Alibaba agreed to buy AutoNavi Holdings Ltd.
 Previously, traders found out that their orders were completed before other CME Group customers were told, possibly giving them time to buy or sell on other exchanges with knowledge of that execution.
 That’s enough to buy a Ferrari FF in the country, according to auto pricing website Cheshicom.
 by July as the government considers reducing the amount of renewable fuel that oil companies will be required to buy.
 The central bank implemented rules in 2012 that limited financial institutions to buying a 40 percent stake in Indonesian lenders.
 in August ended a bid to buy Bank Danamon for $65 billion in what would have been Southeast Asia’s largest bank takeover, after failing to win regulatory approval for a majority stake.
 said it planned to raise funds through a private share placement to buy assets from affiliates for designing and building battleships and submarines.
May 1 (Bloomberg) -- British lawmakers mobilized against Pfizer Inc’s attempt to buy AstraZeneca Plc, demanding Business Secretary Vince Cable secure assurances on jobs and research investment.
 Stifel has been shifting staff since it agreed to buy KBW in a deal that was completed last year.
 It spent 121 billion euros ($168 billion) to buy French retailer Conforama in 2011.
April 9 (Bloomberg) -- Mars Inc, the closely held maker of M&M’s candies and Uncle Ben’s rice, agreed to buy three Procter & Gamble Co.
 “They’re unraveling some of their mistakes, and this potentially was one” While Mars didn’t want the brands’ European business, it has an option to buy operations in remaining markets in Asia and Africa, said Paul Fox, a P&G spokesman.
 Falling Prices While the electronic-goods market in France is showing signs of returning to growth after years of decline, the main risk to business is falling prices as growing numbers of shoppers choose to buy cheaper products, Schultz said.
 There were 122 million calls giving the right to buy the stock, 40 percent more than puts to sell, according to data compiled by Bloomberg as of April 1.
 Pure uses special software loaded on its devices that can compress customers’ data so they need to buy less flash storage, which is pricier than disk-based systems.
 were among investors to buy into GM.
 “It’s very difficult to buy this stuff as a consumer in the US.
 consumers the opportunity to buy goods they otherwise wouldn’t have access to because the logistics are too complicated.
 Cosan, the sugar maker controlled by billionaire Rubens Ometto, won approval from ALL-America Latina Logistica SA controlling shareholders to buy the train operator for about $3 billion in an all-stock deal, ALL-Logistica said in a filing yesterday.
 Price Premium Previ, which rejected a Cosan offer to buy a stake in ALL in 2012, is part of the group that approved the 696 billion-real ($31 billion) takeover offer valuing ALL’s shares at 10184 reais each.
 “The exchanges don’t provide efficient pricing as there’s always a huge gap between bid and ask prices” Market makers bridge the information gap in over-the-counter exchanges and bring down expenses, as they have access to buyers and sellers.
 Jefferies raised its rating on the stock to buy from hold, with analyst David Reynolds citing signs of a pickup in US.
 It’s still a better time to sell than to buy” Black, Rowan and Josh Harris founded New York-based Apollo in 1990.
 Novartis agreed to buy London-based GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer drugs for as much as $16 billion while selling most of the Swiss company’s vaccines division to Glaxo for $71 billion and its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
April 17 (Bloomberg) -- PZU SA, central Europe’s largest insurer by market value, agreed to buy RSA Insurance Group Plc’s four units in the biggest foreign acquisition by a Polish financial company.
 It failed to buy Croatia Osiguranje dd as well as Polish lenders Bank Gospodarki Zywnosciowej SA and Alior Bank SA last year.
 In Poland, the company is seeking to buy health insurers belonging to state energy companies, KGHM Polska Miedz SA and PKN Orlen SA.
 agreed to buy Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 Sun Pharmaceutical agreed to buy Ranbaxy Laboratories for $32 billion in stock.
 We need the money for their medical bills and to buy a home for my child.
 Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, China’s biggest e-commerce company, agreed in April to buy an 18 percent stake in Weibo for $586 million, and plans to exercise an option to raise that stake to 30 percent, according to the filing.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- Emaar Properties PJSC, Dubai’s largest publicly traded developer, said it expects profit to more than triple in the next five years as it hands over completed properties to buyers.
 ADIB agreed to buy the conventional retail assets of Barclays Plc in the United Arab Emirates for 650 million dirhams ($177 million), the Abu Dhabi-based lender said in a statement yesterday.
 The deal to buy Barclays’s operations is “a perfect fit” as part of the bank’s strategy to expand into the expatriate market, it said.
 added 42 percent after proposing to buy AstraZeneca Plc for about 588 billion pounds ($987 billion).
 Weir Chief Executive Officer Keith Cochrane said in February he’s looking to buy more mining, oil, gas and valves companies following the acquisitions of drilling control company Mathena Inc.
 In July, Manila Water failed to win approval to buy a 51 percent stake in PT PAM Lyonnaise Jaya, which supplies water to western Jakarta.
 The company has also been looking at assets to buy that would help expand its global sales power, with commercial operations in new countries.
 18 agreed to buy brand-drug maker Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Now he’s building a new life with plans to buy a car and find his own place to live.
 Investors can apply to buy seven new shares for every 12 shares already held, Peugeot said.
 A Defense Department report this month said it would be forced to cut 17 of the 343 fighters the agency planned to buy from fiscal 2016 through 2019 unless Congress repeals automatic cuts.
 economy remain intact in markets” Carry Trade UBS AG’s V24 Carry Index was at its highest since April last year, when the gauge reached a level unseen since August 2012, signaling increased gains for those who borrow in low interest-rate currencies to buy into markets offering higher yields.
 The chairmen of congressional tax-writing panels say they’re considering a short-term infusion into the trust fund to buy more time.
 Namwater has “to look for finance to buy the plant,”Solomons said yesterday during a tour of the Subiaco, WesternAustralia-based company’s mine.
 KKR, which acquired a 635 percent stake in Visma in 2010, has offered a number of its larger investors the chance to buy shares, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 The New York-based asset manager is also offering outside bidders the chance to buy the stake and may also seek an initial public offering for the Oslo-based company, said the people.
 More Accessible Futures are contracts to buy or sell assets at a set price, allowing them to create a position, or a view, on the market.
 Options give the buyer the right, but not the obligation, to buy or sell a security at a set price.
 dollars intoloonies to buy Canadian stocks at the end of last year and thensold on March 20, you’d be down 03 percent once you convertedback to the greenback.
 Hedge funds and other money managers boosted bullish wagers the most since February, betting that refineries will need to buy more crude to accelerate gasoline output before the peak US summer driving season.
 UBS raised its rating on the carrier to buy from neutral, predicting a benchmark measure for revenue will grow at a faster pace, starting in the second quarter of this year.
 Novartis yesterday agreed to buy cancer drugs from Glaxo for as much as $16 billion, while selling most of its vaccines division to Glaxo and its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Advantage filed for bankruptcy last year, and now Hertz has agreed to buy back 10 Advantage locations, according to an FTC statement yesterday.
 has agreed to buy 12 locations, while six remain unsold, the FTC said in the statement.
 Hertz’s deal to buy the locations stems from the November bankruptcy filing of Advantage.
 Shareholders in insurance firms had already lost around 36 billion pounds ($6 billion) on March 19, when Osborne scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity.
 jumped 37 percent after Japan’s largest mobile-phone company by subscribers announced plans to buy back as much as 500 billion yen ($49 billion) in shares.
 Several companies including Mondelez International Inc’s Cadbury’s unit have offered free mobile airtime credit to buyers.
 this month agreed to buy a stake in state-owned Development Bank of Rwanda, while KKR & Co.
 is competing with Abraaj Group to buy a stake in Saudi Arabian restaurant business Kudu, two people familiar with the deal said in September.
 AT&T announced plans today to spend more than $500 million with partner Chernin Group to buy or build video-streaming services, setting it up to compete with Netflix.
 offered HK$384 billion ($5 billion) to buy Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 That offers a more comparable valuation to Yue Xiu Group’s $15 billion offer to buy a majority stake in family-owned Chong Hing Bank Ltd, since the two lenders use different methods for valuing their properties.
 and Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s private-equity unit agreed to buy Flint Group from CVC Capital Partners Ltd.
 Residents Preferred Rob Tincknell, chief executive officer of the Battersea Power Station Development Co, said in an interview that the company’s staff called all 13,000 people who registered to buy the project’s 3,500 homes and intends to give preference to those who said they intend to live in the homes they buy.
 Spending by non-British investors spread from luxury properties in neighborhoods such as Chelsea and Knightsbridge to new houses and apartments as builders used advance sales, many to buyers from Asia, to finance projects amid tight lending for development.
 “Even with that, we save about 1,000 pounds a month and every time we reach what we think is a milestone, we look at the prices in London and realize we just can’t get close to buying anything” No Help Programs such as Help to Buy “just fuel the fire by pushing prices up further,” Haycroft said.
 In Australia, by contrast, non-residents are unable to buy existing homes and can only invest in property that adds to the housing stock.
 has held talks to buy the trainmaker.
 Volkswagen, which owns a majority, plans to pursue its bid to buy out minority shareholders only if acceptance reaches 90 percent, the threshold needed under Swedish law to force remaining owners to sell their holdings and delist the company.
 Glaxo gained 62 percent after Novartis on April 22 agreed to buy the UK.
 held informal, now-discontinued talks to buy the drugmaker.
 Investors including pension plans and endowments give their money to buyout firms, expecting them to return a profit over a 10-year cycle.
 There were 246,313 calls giving the right to buy the stock as of April 15, or 22 percent more than puts to sell, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The money is usually locked up for about a decade, and the firms have a mandate to buy companies, improve their value, and sell them with a profit.
 The deal comes after state-owned Cofco agreed in February to buy 51 percent of Dutch grain trader Nidera BV, which has annual sales of more than $17 billion, as it seeks to expand food supplies for the world’s most populous nation.
 agreed to buy ABC Holdings Ltd.
 The ministry, which needs to buy about 174 billion rubles for the fund, suspended the purchase of 212 billion rubles ($6 billion) on March 4 after the ruble fell to a record.
 Future Uncertain Facebook is now seeking to make even more money on gadgets, agreeing to buy text messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 And Facebook agreed to buy Oculus for about $2 billion, a high-priced bet on the fledgling wearable-computing market.
 AMG today agreed to buy a majority stake in Veritas Asset Management LLP, a global equity manager with $17 billion in assets, adding to its collection of boutique managers specializing in stocks, hedge funds and private equity.
 After Schiller raised the idea of getting a new agency, Apple Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook, who took over after Jobs died in October 2011, responded: “If we need to do this, we should get going” In another e-mail displayed for the jury, Schiller, who was on the witness stand for a second day, was discussing with Vincent a Wall Street Journal article from January 2013 titled “Has Apple Lost its Cool to Samsung?” Samsung’s campaign, including some ads that ran before last year, mocked loyal iPhone users for waiting in line to buy new models and Apple for touting features that were already available in other smartphones including Samsung’s Galaxy.
 Richman, accused Maxwell of “pressure tactics to buy Kraft on the cheap,” according to the Times.
 In February, Post agreed to buy the PowerBar and Musashi sports-nutrition brands from Nestle SA to take advantage of increasing demand for health- and fitness-related snacks.
Grupo BTG Pactual SA and 13 banksmanaging Oi (OIBR4) SA’s stock offering, part of a capital increase ofas much as 242 billion reais ($106 billion), will no longercommit to buying the shares should investor demand fall short.
 The change in terms, published today, followed a requestfrom the Brazilian securities regulator to clarify whether theunderwriters were fully committed to buying all shares or notUnder the original terms, the banks said they offered firmguarantees to the deal while setting minimum investor demandconditions for that to happen.
 The Rwanda Energy, Water & Sanitation Authority has agreed to buy electricity under a 25-year contract from the power plant, which will increase the country’s total generating capacity by at least 8 percent, according to the statement.
 said it’s interested in a deal to buy AstraZeneca Plc, Britain’s second-biggest drugmaker.
 Lenovo is working to get approval to buy Motorola Mobility from Google Inc.
 The company also agreed to buy International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit for $23 billion to add corporate customers.
 Separately, Novartis AG said today it agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer-drug business for as much as $16 billion, form a consumer-health venture with Glaxo and sell its animal-health operation to Eli Lilly & Co.
April 22 (Bloomberg) -- Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc’s $444 billion bid to buy Botox maker Allergan Inc.
 to buy the US.
 The key challenge is finding assets to buy” Claritin, Coppertone Merck has identified its veterinary unit as one that isn’t big enough on its own, meaning it needs either to sell it or bulk it up.
 BofA’s Countrywide unit last year settled a class-action, or group, lawsuit by investors who said the lender duped them into buying $500 million worth of the securities.
 In a separate $85 billion settlement, the Charlotte, North Carolina-based bank resolved investor claims it failed to buy back delinquent mortgages packaged in the securities.
 the company also raised its forecast as sales gained in North America and halted its dividend to buy back more stock.
 Arabtec soared to 871 dirhams after it announced plans to buy a European company and said it may tap the bond market to pay for the deal.
 said it’s interested in a deal to buy AstraZeneca Plc, Britain’s second-biggest drugmaker, while the US’s General Electric Co.
 generic-drug maker, was rejected in a second bid to buy Meda AB, the Swedish producer of the Dymista allergy medicine.
 Mylan’s attempt to buy Meda comes as the generic drug industry is undergoing a wave of consolidation, with the US.
 Actavis Plc, a Dublin-based drugmaker with operations in New Jersey, agreed in February to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Valeant teamed up on April 22 with Bill Ackman, the billionaire hedge fund manager, in a $457 billion bid to buy Allergan Inc, the maker of the Botox cosmetic treatment.
 Valeant proposed to buy it for about $48 billion in the Canadian company’s plan to become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 The maker of artificial joints agreed to buy rival orthopedic-device maker Biomet Inc.
 While Marois has worked hard to downplay the chances of another vote, saying she wouldn’t call a referendum as long as Quebeckers didn’t want one, Couillard told voters not to buy it.
 The Liberal website also promises support for small- and medium-sized businesses and the province’s forestry sector, and says a Liberal government would protect company head offices in Montreal by allowing a provincial fund to buy as much as 10 percent of companies facing hostile takeover bids.
April 16 (Bloomberg) -- Four of the nation’s largest banks, led by JPMorgan Chase & Co, are driving a surge in borrowing from the Federal Home Loan Bank system as they raise funds to buy assets that meet new liquidity requirements.
 led declines after agreeing to buy its parent’s financial assets.
 The steelmaker and property developer agreed to pay 2269 billion yuan ($36 billion) to buy Chinese banking and brokerage assets from its state-owned parent.
 Its limited presence in commodities and energy trading also made it the most likely candidate to buy JPMorgan’s business in its entirety and bring Masters and her team on board to run it, the people said.
 report showed contracts to buy previously owned houses increased 34 percent in March, more than economists had predicted.
 is in talks to buy a 10 percent stake in the maker of home soda machines.
April 25 (Bloomberg) -- Swisscom AG offered to buy stakes in two directory businesses it jointly owns with PubliGroupe SA for 230 million Swiss francs ($261 million), rivaling Tamedia AG’s bid for the advertising company.
 offered to buy Allergan Inc.
 was providing $250 million in initial capital for the unit to buy projects from SunEdison and other companies.
 Yesterday’s announcement that Pfizer is seeking to buy AstraZeneca Plc in a new $100 billion megamerger is putting the industry on notice that a company that was once the world’s biggest drugmaker is seeking to quickly reclaim its title.
 Atlas agreed to buy BancABC, which offers financial services in Botswana, Mozambique, Tanzania, Zambia and Zimbabwe, for as much as $265 million and will use the company as a springboard for further acquisitions.
 Atlas Mara, which raised $325 million in an initial public offering in December, plans to buy another bank with a “multi-country platform,” high-quality management and good earnings at a reasonable valuation, Diamond said.
 Lilly is expanding in veterinary medicine, and on April 22 agreed to buy Novartis AG’s animal unit for $54 billion.
 agreed to buy Indian rival Andhra Pradesh Paper Mills Ltd.
 In January, the company agreed to buy 80 percent of the insurance unit of Portugal’s Caixa Geral de Depositos SA for 1 billion euros ($139 billion).
 Thornton’s pay includes $5 million in cash to be used to buy Barrick stock.
 The Sunday Independent reported on March 2 that the executives, as well New York-based securities firm Cantor Fitzgerald LP, were contenders to buy Merrion, put up for sale for about 10 million euros ($138 million).
 Hitachi is leading the race to buy the stake controlled by the founding family of Crompton Greaves, the Economic Times reported citing two people familiar with the development.
 Gerry Jordan, president of Hellman Jordan Management Co, said the recall crisis was an opportunity to buy.
 is in talks to buy a 10 percent stake in the maker of home soda machines.
 agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Keurig Green Mountain Inc, which is developing a make-your-own, single-serve product similar to SodaStream’s, on Feb.
April 2 (Bloomberg) -- The European Union paused its review of Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s bid to buy Telefonica SA’s O2 unit in Ireland as the regulator seeks revisions to concessions the company made to win approval for the tie-up.
 The Singaporean lender already agreed to buy shares amounting to a 25 percent stake in Wing Hang from Aberdeen, OCBC said yesterday.
 “It’s trading at dangerous levels” DoubleLine Capital LP’s Jeffrey Gundlach trimmed allocations to the debt earlier this year, saying last month that “if they start to suffer losses, you really wonder who’s going to buy them” As investors have learned over the past five years, it hasn’t paid to fight Federal Reserve stimulus, which is still supporting values that by any historical measure seem expensive.
 Etisalat agreed in November to buy Vivendi’s 53 percent stake in Maroc Telecom, Morocco’s biggest wireless carrier, for about 42 billion euros.
 owner of single-tenant buildings, isn’t in discussions to buy NorthStar Realty Finance Corp, according to statements from both companies today.
 The Swiss drugmaker agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer-drug business for as much as $16 billion, sell most of its vaccines business to Glaxo for as much as $71 billion and sell its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Loeb contends Sotheby’s decision to trigger the pill if activist investors buy more than 10 percent of its shares, while allowing passive investors to buy as much as 20 percent, leaves the measure open to attack.
 Nomura will spend as much as 70 billion yen to buy back shares, it said.
 Residents Preferred Rob Tincknell, chief executive officer of the Battersea Power Station Development Co, said in an interview that the company’s staff called all 13,000 people who registered to buy the project’s 3,500 homes and intends to give preference to those who said they intend to live in the homes they buy.
 Spending by non-British investors spread from luxury properties in neighborhoods such as Chelsea and Knightsbridge to new houses and apartments as builders used advance sales, many to buyers from Asia, to finance projects amid tight lending for development.
 “Even with that, we save about 1,000 pounds a month and every time we reach what we think is a milestone, we look at the prices in London and realize we just can’t get close to buying anything” No Help Programs such as Help to Buy “just fuel the fire by pushing prices up further,” Haycroft said.
 In Australia, by contrast, non-residents are unable to buy existing homes and can only invest in property that adds to the housing stock.
 Charter had made its own offer to buy the company for $37 billion in cash and stock and had held talks with Comcast about dividing Time Warner Cable up as part of that bid.
 It’s unclear whether Pfizer’s approach, which comes after Novartis AG agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer business for as much as $16 billion last week, is a harbinger of things to come, according to Viehbacher.
 Price Range The 1,600 yen price compares with the 1,400 yen a share Cerberus paid to buy stock from shareholders last year when it boosted its stake to 355 percent.
 Investors rushed to buy the funds, helping drive up State Street Corp, Wells Fargo & Co.
 Busiest Dealmaker Valeant, the drug industry’s busiest dealmaker since 2010, last week offered to buy Allergan for $457 billion in stock and cash, with support from Allergan’s largest shareholder, Pershing Square Capital Management LP, the fund run by Ackman.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA jumped after announcing a plan to buy back as many as 679 million shares through May 23.
 One day last month, dealers sold $15,000 of steel company ArcelorMittal SA’s bonds maturing in 2041 for 35 cents on the dollar more than they paid to buy $25,000 of the same securities an hour later.
 agreed to buy it and Twitter Inc.
 Facebook CEO Mark Zuckerberg clinched his deal to buy WhatsApp, the mobile messaging service, for $19 billion in February after taking hour-long walks around Silicon Valley with WhatsApp co-founder Jan Koum.
 “It’s almost scary that the money comes in as the return profile is coming down” Valeant, Microsoft Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 Goldman Sachs Asset Management, which oversees $30 billion in such products, agreed this week to buy Westpeak Global Advisors LLC, without disclosing terms.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 added 42 percent after proposing to buy AstraZeneca Plc for about 588 billion pounds ($987 billion).
 “Part of the logic behind a falling currency is it sends a signal to people to buy locally rather than offshore,” said Shane Oliver, head of investment strategy at AMP Ltd.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years of raising the money, overhaul and then sell them.
 Charter couldn’t acquire the new company immediately, though it will also be difficult for other companies to buy it without Charter’s blessing, one person said.
 agreed to buy it.
 nuclear operator, agreed to buy Pepco in an all-cash deal for $68 billion.
 Moelis may raise as much as $2435 million by selling 84 million shares for $26 to $29 each, assuming underwriters exercise an option to buy more stock, according to a filing today.
 “When we are thinking 20 years out, it doesn’t matter a whole lot” That’s because George believes that QVC’s template of what he calls “high integrity” product pitches can win in any market that has people with enough disposable income to buy everything from a $400 Vitamix blender to $25 sandals.
 French laws require a foreign company to buy a minority stake in a domestic company to broadcast over the air.
 Bulls including Abhay Laijawala, the head of research at Deutsche Equities India, point to a recovery in Asia’s third-biggest economy as another reason to buy stocks.
 Oil Search, which agreed in February to buy part of the same discoveries for an initial $900 million, lodged a dispute last week with InterOil.
 Preempt Accord Oil Search’s deal to buy part of InterOil’s fields from minority partners gave the company the right to preempt Total’s initial agreement in December, according to a JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 “There is a mentality in Israel that everybody needs to buy their own home and people get a lot of help from their families,” said Tzvi Shapiro, general manager of First Israel Mortgage brokerage in Jerusalem.
 “There’s no more space to buy, everything has to be demolished and the only way to build is up” Low mortgage rates have fueled the surge in purchases.
April 21 (Bloomberg) -- Hillshire Brands Co, the maker of Jimmy Dean sausages and Ball Park hot dogs, agreed to buy Van’s Natural Foods from private-equity firm Catterton Partners for about $165 million to add healthy breakfast foods.
April 10 (Bloomberg) -- Brasil Pharma SA surged the most since 2011 as controlling shareholder Grupo BTG Pactual pledged to make up the difference if other investors fail to buy all the stock in a planned 400 million-real ($182 million) sale.
 BTG Pactual agreed to buy all remaining shares if demand for the securities falls short of the offering’s target, according to the filing.
 this month agreed to buy Michael Foods Inc.
 Chinese suppliers are also filling the gap, but North American food companies are reluctant to buy from them due to food safety concerns, according to Hoogenkamp.
 For-profit college operator Gaec Anima Educacao SA may be active after agreeing to buy Universidade Sao Judas Tadeu for 320 million reais.
 If a transaction is completed, it could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc, making it the second-biggest acquisition announced this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The company is the frontrunner to buy Merck & Co’s over-the-counter drugs business, people with knowledge of the matter have said, which would push its health division to more than one-third of sales from about 30 percent.
 The selloff opened the door for new money by giving investors a chance to buy pricey biotechnology shares at a discount, according to BMO Capital Markets Corp’s Max Breier.
 Glencore, based in Baar, Switzerland, this week agreed to buy Caracal Energy Inc.
 Monsanto could explore the sale of its Agricultural Productivity segment, which makes Roundup herbicide, said Zekauskas, who raised his rating on the stock to buy from hold.
 Louis-based company could also take on $11 billion in debt to buy back shares, he said.
 For Jacques Porta at Ofi Gestion Privee in Paris, the selloff is a chance to buy stocks at a discount.
 Unjustified Losses “There’s a good opportunity to begin to buy,” Porta, who helps oversee $780 million at Ofi Gestion in Paris, said on April 11.
 CarMax also said it plans to buy back $1 billion in stock after reporting its biggest annual jump in comparable-store sales in more than a decade.
 “It is better to buy Greece than buy Spain, as they carry about the same story” Greek government securities returned 30 percent this year through April 22, more than double the next-best performance among the 34 sovereign markets tracked by the Bloomberg World Bond Indexes, extending their world-beating returns into a third year.
 Still Buying The investor rush for the sovereign bonds sold this month left some, including Sturgeon Capital, unable to buy the notes.
 So, when the coffee comes to chase down those last swigs of wine, the conviviality at the table a dims a bit and the uncomfortable conversation is about to start, just accept that your dad’s not going to buy your argument.
 In other words, the reasons to buy or sell gold today may not be the same reasons to buy or sell it tomorrow.
 Anzengruber confirmed reports that the company is seeking to buy Kelag Kaerntner Elektrizitaet’s 10 percent stake in Verbund’s hydropower unit, which would boost ownership to 90 percent.
 “We’re gladly ready to buy that 10 percent,” Anzengruber said.
 Selling Point Technology to keep drivers connected in their vehicles is the top selling point for 39 percent of auto buyers, more than twice the 14 percent who say their first consideration is traditional performance measures such as power and speed, according to a study consulting firm Accenture released in December.
 The price has slumped 35 percent since Sesa agreed to buy the mines for $90 million from Elenilto Minerals & Mining LLC in August 2011.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Ryanair Holdings Plc agreed to buy five more Boeing Co.
 Yamana’s C$147 billion offer for 50 percent of Osisko’s assets probably spells the demise of Goldcorp’s plan to buy the whole company, said Adam Graf, a New York-based analyst at Cowen & Co.
 RBS can use the extra capital to repurchase common stock without needing to buy back the Class B shares at 650 pence apiece, more than twice their current value, Jefferies said.
 Head Offices The Liberal website promises support for small- and medium-sized businesses and the province’s forestry sector, and says a Liberal government would protect company head offices in Montreal by allowing a provincial fund to buy as much as 10 percent of companies facing hostile takeover bids.
April 8 (Bloomberg) -- SunEdison Inc, the solar developer and polysilicon supplier formerly known as MEMC Electronic Materials Inc, closed the first $150 million of a $300 million credit facility to buy and develop projects in the US.
 to buy Allergan for about $46 billion in a cash-and-stock deal.
 In February, Actavis agreed to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
April 25 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP is the preferred bidder to buy about 18 billion euros ($25 billion) of Irish, German and UK.
 upgraded the shares to buy from hold.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 In May, Petrobras said it rejected offers to buy other assets in Argentina.
 Now the rally is morphing into a bet the ECB will either print cash to buy bonds or allow inflation, which slowed to a more-than four-year low of 05 percent in March, to remain subdued and preserve the value of fixed-income payments.
 agreed to buy WhatsApp for as much as $19 billion, while Rakuten Inc.
April 10 (Bloomberg) -- BNP Paribas SA, France’s biggest bank, agreed to buy South African credit provider, RCS Investment Holdings Ltd, from Standard Bank Group Ltd.
 annuity sales fell 50 percent in the weeks after the government unveiled its budget that scrapped rules forcing retirees to buy such products.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne last month in his 2014 budget scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity, allowing them to withdraw pension savings without paying a 55 percent tax.
 In 2011, Google spent about $700 million to buy ITA Software Inc, a provider of flight information, and the company has a service called Hotel Finder that scans prices and availability from numerous online travel agents.
 Wachtell, Latham on Mallinckrodt’s $56 Billion Questcor Deal Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz and Arthur Cox advised Mallinckrodt Plc, which agreed to buy Questcor Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Bathiya & Associates advised Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, India’s largest drugmaker by market value, on its agreement to buy competitor Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 Investors are reluctant to let go of bonds they already own, even if they’re losing value, since they don’t know whether they’ll be able to buy them back, the Barclays strategists said in today’s report.
 After all, with the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index returning 17 percent after a choppy start to the year and an escalating conflict in Ukraine, what else are investors going to buy? To contact the reporter on this story: Lisa Abramowicz in New York at labramowicz@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story: Shannon D.
 The SEC faces pressure to overhaul trading after the book, “Flash Boys” by Michael Lewis, a columnist for Bloomberg View, made the claim that high-frequency traders hurt other investors by learning which shares investors plan to buy, purchasing them and selling them back at a higher price.
 Fed Sanctions Missouri Banker for Misusing TARP Bailout Money The Federal Reserve prohibited a former Missouri bank chairman from involvement in any bank management after he admitted to using federal bailout money to buy a luxury condominium.
 American Water’s California subsidiary also said today it intends to buy the operating assets of Meadowbrook Water Co.
 He said the system more accurately rewards the desired behavior than options, which give the holder the right to buy a specific number of shares for a set price in a defined period.
 Edison International’s Southern California Edison has agreed to buy electricity from the Adobe solar farm under a 20-year contract.
 agreed to pay 2269 billion yuan ($36 billion) to buy Chinese banking and brokerage assets from its state-owned parent, underscoring China’s push to loosen control over the economy.
 turned to National Bank to co-lead a C$500 million share sale to help finance its March 17 agreement to buy Western Canadian oil and natural gas assets from Imperial Oil Ltd.
 agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in Petroliam Nasional Bhd’s proposed liquefied natural gas facility in Canada for an undisclosed amount.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 Deal’s Backers Underwriters have the option to buy more than 14 million shares.
 auto-parts maker agreed to buy Air Distribution Technologies for $16 billion, seeking to lessen its reliance on the cyclical auto industry by adding ventilation products by purchasing Air Distribution Technologies from the Canada Pension Plan Investment Board.
 The company has offered 13 billion euros ($18 billion) to buy Diana Group, a French flavors and pet-food additive maker.
 In December, the companies extended their first-look programs, which place homeowners at the front of the line to buy the houses, by five days.
 “Our Zimbabwe subsidiary is one of the businesses where the proceeds of the bond will be used” Diamond, who quit as Barclays Plc CEO in July 2012 after the British bank was fined for manipulating benchmark interest rates, this week agreed to buy ABC Holdings Ltd.
 Pfizer, which paid $64 billion to buy Wyeth in 2009 in the biggest pharmaceutical takeover, is considering its AstraZeneca bid options after the UK.
 The resellers in turn sold the information to others who encoded it onto magnetic strips on blank plastic cards that were used to make unauthorized withdrawals from automated teller machines or to buy goods, according to the indictment.
 Banco Santander Brasil SA gained the most on record after its parent company offered to buy out minority shareholders.
 In deals with the attorney general’s office in February and March, Berkshire Hathaway Inc’s Business Wire and Toronto-based Marketwired agreed to stop allowing high-speed firms to buy direct access to their services.
 Bank lawsuits against Neo have locked up his remaining Blumont shares, leading Alexander Molyneux, who has been appointed to succeed Neo as chairman, to abort a plan to buy 135 million shares of the company.
 Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, which agreed in 2013 to buy an 18 percent stake in Weibo, will exercise an option to raise that stake to 32 percent, according to the filing.
 ‘Aggressive’ Returns H&R Block will be able to buy back stock without Fed approval after the bank sale, which would “lead to aggressive shareholder returns,” Moody’s Investors Service said in November.
 As part of about $23 billion of funding in euro and dollar bonds and loans to buy SFR, Drahi is paying 775 percent in interest on $29 billion of eight-year junk notes with a preliminary B rating from Standard & Poor’s.
 The announcement followed its agreement to buy Lincoln Benefit Life from Allstate Corp.
 The debt sparked fan protests and attempts to buy the team, with thousands of supporters wearing green and gold to represent the club’s origins as Newton Heath.
 Adding Talent The club has no option but to spend on talent if it is to retain its status and value, according to Jim O’Neill, the former Goldman Sachs executive who led a consortium that wanted to buy the team following fan dissatisfaction with the Glazers in 2010.
 Spain’s Real Madrid paid more to buy three players for this season -- Gareth Bale, Asier Illarramendi and Isco -- than the current value of the Indian competition, based on British Broadcasting Corp.
 law firms and two from Canada advised on Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc’s deal to buy Allergan Inc, maker of the blockbuster Botox wrinkle treatment.
April 17 (Bloomberg) -- Hapag-Lloyd AG agreed to buy most of Chilean rival Cia.
 “And risk-free bonds for them to buy are long-dated UK.
 GE also bought 50 megawatts of projects in Ontario from First Solar last year and is in talks to buy more, said Kevin Walsh, the company’s head of power and renewable energy.
 And despite the record in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index earlier this month, the so-called Fed model of stock valuation signals it’s still a decent time to buy.
 on April 24 after it agreed to buy Biomet Inc.
 nuclear operator, agreed to buy Pepco Holdings Inc.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- South Korea’s biggest pension funds are cutting holdings of local debt to buy stocks in the US.
 Mark Zuckerberg’s company is focusing on wireless device users, from increasing mobile-advertising sales to buying the messaging application WhatsApp Inc.
 The ratio of outstanding puts giving the right to sell Wynn shares versus calls to buy fell to 143-to-1 on April 7 after reaching a high of 383-to-1 on Jan.
 Relative yields on the drugmaker’s 675 percent notes due 2018 narrowed as much as 44 basis points to 255 basis points after the Laval, Quebec-based company offered to buy Botox maker Allergan yesterday, suggesting a one-level rating upgrade.
 “Opportunities to buy real estate here won’t last much longer” Paulson & Co, which is based in New York and oversees $228 billion, is adding to its Puerto Rico investments as the commonwealth and its agencies wrestle with a $73 billion debt load and an economy that’s shrunk in five of the past seven fiscal years.
 BSkyB and Discovery are close to buying Channel 5 for 350 million pounds ($585 million), according to Broadcast magazine.
 I myself as a businessman would be interested to buy” The price of palladium has risen 11 percent this year and platinum 34 percent, while copper has fallen 8 percent.
 “I am not looking for this opportunity on purpose, and don’t seek to buy from the market, but if any investor were selling, I would buy” The stock has advanced 19 percent this year, even as Moscow’s benchmark Micex Index declined 13 percent.
 If you’re a firm that’s looking to buy something and fix it, there’s an opportunity here” Kellogg also could appeal to PepsiCo and Nestle, said Yarbrough, who estimated a potential takeout price of $80 to $90 a share, or at least a 24 percent premium from yesterday’s close.
 While it may make more sense for Nestle to buy General Mills because of the companies’ cereals joint venture, a takeover of Kellogg instead can’t be ruled out, Yarbrough said.
 Vivendi can’tstart selling its 20 percent stake for one year, and must giveAltice a first chance to buy it.
 Telecoms Consolidation The deal could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buyForest Laboratories Inc.
 That reluctance is a signal to buy the cheapest shares in the stock market in the developing world, according to Sberbank Asset Management and Prosperity Capital.
 “It’s a good time to buy.
 “People don’t understand and refuse to buy butcher’s meat,” he said.
April 2 (Bloomberg) -- Plug Power Inc, the fuel-cell company that’s the best performer on the Nasdaq in the past year, agreed to buy a supplier of fuel-cell components.
 “We’re still in the early stage of knowing if the resources are there, let alone knowing the cost of transporting the resources” Santos agreed in December 2012 to buy a 14 percent stake in Tamboran for A$10 million and acquire as much as 75 percent of its Northern Territory shale permits.
 “Cigna, when they’ve talked about acquiring businesses, they’ve talked about not necessarily wanting to buy only Medicaid,” Carter said in a phone interview from New York.
 “In order for Humana to be a bigger participant in duals, as more states create models, it feels to me like they’re going to have to buy somebody,” the analyst said.
 If a sale of SFR is completed, it could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc, making it the second-biggest acquisition globally announced this year, data compiled by Bloomberg showed.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Samena Capital, an investment firm managing about $700 million, agreed to buy a 31 percent stake in Ras Al Khaimah Ceramics as the owners of the world’s biggest maker of ceramic tiles seek to raise funds.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Stabilis Energy, the closely held company proposing to build five liquefied natural gas facilities with Koch Industries Inc, agreed to buy most of Encana Corp’s US.
 Today’s data was seen as critical for the ECB as it decides whether to embrace policies ranging from negative interest rates to buying debt, known as quantitative easing.
 Housing Target Leung in September 2012 announced a plan giving only citizens the right to buy apartments at some sites built by private developers to ensure local needs are met.
 Kendall said he didn’t have any indications that the eight countries that were original partners for the F-35 will be “substantially reducing” their planned quantities, though “there have been some adjustments for budget reasons” “Everybody is still there and everybody still plans to buy the airplanes,” he said.
 The firm repurchased at least 28 million shares in the fourth quarter when their stock was trading at the lowest levels since 2007, and in December announced board approval to buy back as many as 5 million more.
 ‘Knock-Out Punch’ Osisko rejected Goldcorp’s initial bid as too low and announced April 2 that Yamana had agreed to buy 50 percent of Osisko’s assets.
 The judge yesterday also approved a $120 million loan to buy emergency vehicles and remediate blight in the city of about 700,000 people.
 IMS, a 60-year old company that sells data on prescription use to drugmakers and analysts, is asking investors to buy shares in its initial public offering at as little as one-seventh the earnings multiple its digital peers fetch.
 Together, all of Carlyle’s funds from which it can collect a slice of profits, which in addition to buyouts include real estate, energy and certain Global Market Strategies pools, appreciated 6 percent in the quarter.
 Carlyle funds spent at least $100 million to buy a majority stake in Urbplan in 2007 and to continue funding it through 2011, and that investment was worthless as of the end of 2012.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 The company is part of a group which last month agreed to buy Chinese online-gaming developer Giant Interactive Group Inc.
 Paul Flowers later stepped down as chairman after the Mail on Sunday reported that the Methodist minister had sought to buy crack cocaine and crystal methamphetamine.
 for $29 billion; and Stryker’s announcement in May 2011 of plans to buy Orthovita Inc.
 For-profit college operator Gaec Anima Educacao SA jumped the most on record after agreeing to buy Universidade Sao Judas Tadeu for 320 million reais.
 Underwriters of the sale will have a 30-day option to buy as many as 375 million more shares.
 Orix may seek to team up with another investor to buy PrimeCredit Ltd, said one of the people, asking not to be identified because the information is private.
 surged 55 percent to 530 pence after Glencore Xstrata Plc agreed to buy the oil and gas explorer with assets in the Republic of Chad for $135 billion, or 550 pence a share.
 agreed to buy a 89 percent stake in the owner of department-store group House of Fraser.
 The company has similar growth plans for baseball after closing a $330-million deal to buy Easton-Bell Sports Inc’s baseball and softball unit, Chief Executive Officer Kevin Davis said.
 More Acquisitions The deal to buy the baseball unit closed today, and will add to the company’s adjusted earnings per share in the first year of ownership, Bauer said.
 “Maybe they will get enough together to buy shares” The move comes as Ecclestone prepares to stand trial on bribery charges in Munich, and as lawmakers in Norway examine whether the state-owned investment fund broke its own rules in buying a stake in the sport.
 Oil Search agreed earlier this year to buy a stake in the same discoveries for an initial $900 million.
 Twitter would successfully raise $182 billion in its IPO and later settle with IBM in January by agreeing to buy 900 patents from IBM.
 Triton, which invests in medium-sized businesses in northern Europe, on April 1 agreed to buy a steam auxiliary components business for 730 million euros from France’s Alstom SA.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- IMC Financial Markets is in talks to buy Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s New York Stock Exchange market-making unit, two people familiar with the matter said.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Transgene SA shares had the steepest decline in more than three years after Novartis AG decided not to buy the rights to the French drug developer’s experimental lung cancer therapy TG4010.
 IMC Financial Markets is negotiating to buy the floor-trading business, according to two people familiar with the matter, who asked for anonymity because talks are private.
 pledged to preserve the trading floor in lower Manhattan when it agreed to buy the exchange in 2012.
 Getco LLC, now part of KCG Holdings Inc, agreed to buy Bank of America Corp’s business in 2011.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Bank AG’s asset management unit started the first US-based exchange traded fund that allows investors to buy Chinese stocks trading in both the domestic and foreign markets.
 Foreign investors are not allowed to buy local Chinese shares unless they are granted licenses and individual quotas by regulators.
 Market making is the banking practice of keeping an inventory of securities on hand so that their customers can always find someone to buy from or sell to.
 Deals Slaughter & May Advises OCBC $5 Billion Wing Hang Bank Bid Slaughter & May is advising Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp, which offered HK$384 billion ($5 billion) to buy Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 “After looking at the success of our deal, it became easier for other regional banks to follow” Sales of convertible notes, which combine a fixed-income security with an option to buy stock, have surged since Abe’s stimulus program sparked a 515 percent gain in the Topix benchmark index last year.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- OAO Gazprom, Russia’s state gas exporter, presented Ukraine with an additional $114 billion bill for fuel it promised to buy last year, increasing pressure on the government in Kiev as the prospect of supply cuts looms.
 Naftogaz was obliged to buy at least 416 billion cubic meters of Russian gas last year under the contract, whether or not they took the volumes, according to Gazprom.
 agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in gas reserves and a proposed liquefied natural gas facility in British Columbia from Petroliam Nasional Bhd.
 Sinopec also agreed to buy 3 million tons a year of LNG for 20 years from Petronas, making it one of the Malaysian state-owned company’s largest buyers of the fuel.
 Under a plan announced yesterday, wealthy individuals will be allowed to buy Hong Kong equities through the Shanghai exchange, broadening their investment options from a limited number of funds.
 The deal, which also allows overseas investors to buy mainland shares through Hong Kong, furthers China’s push to reduce capital controls after policy makers pledged the biggest expansion of economic freedoms since the 1990s and widened the yuan’s trading band.
 Pilot Program Under the pilot program due to start in about six months, Chinese institutions and investors with at least 500,000 yuan ($80,483) in their securities accounts will be able to buy Hong Kong shares using yuan through mainland brokerages, which will place their orders through Hong Kong’s exchange, according to a statement from the city’s Securities & Futures Commission.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Northern Star Resources Ltd, an Australian gold producer that’s agreed deals to buy assets from Barrick Gold Corp, is seeking further acquisitions after raising about A$130 million ($120 million) in share sales.
 to drop a bid to buy British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc.
 Mortgage applications to buy homes plunged 19 percent from a year earlier, indicating slowing demand during what is typically the busiest season for deals.
 “There’s not much out there and if there’s something you might consider, it’s gone in an hour” Nelson would like to buy a smaller home with a lower mortgage payment than the 4,600-square-foot (427-square-meter) house she bought in 2010, moving before her daughter goes to college in two years.
 In late 2012, Amber and Ben Hodge, working with Realtor Mike Caruso, quit their search to buy a home in Queen Creek, about 38 miles (61 kilometers) southeast of Phoenix, because competition was so heavy that agents for sellers didn’t even bother to call back when they made offers.
 Heritage Oil Plc surged 23 percent after Qatar’s royal family offered to buy the company for 924 million pounds ($156 billion).
 Geothermal Inc, an energy project developer whose shares have doubled in the past year, agreed to buy Ram Power Corp’s proposed Geysers California geothermal project for $64 million in cash.
 “If they were to buy something else in health care, it would be a good move” Bayer exited large parts of its specialty chemicals portfolio a decade ago by spinning off its Lanxess AG subsidiary.
 Dekkers wouldn’t say during Bayer’s quarterly earnings analyst call today whether he wants to buy the Merck unit or sell the plastics division.
 The Netherlands isn’t planning to buy a stake, Dutch newswire ANP reported today, citing Finance Minister Jeroen Dijsselbloem.
 In December, Pearson agreed to buy Grupo Multi, an English-language training company in Brazil, for about 440 million pounds to accelerate growth in its education business.
 To reduce dependence on the automotive industry, Continental agreed in February to buy Veyance Technologies from the Carlyle Group for 14 billion euros to strengthen its ContiTech plastics and rubber division.
 “I have no legislation pending before Congress, so why would I want to buy anybody? What would I do with them?” he asked, adding that his political donations reflect his patriotism.
 Bank of America and the former executives were accused of failing to disclose mounting losses of billions of dollars at Merrill Lynch as it prepared to buy the brokerage firm at the peak of the financial crisis.
 The bank has faced regulatory probes, investor lawsuits and criticism from lawmakers over claims it didn’t warn shareholders about spiraling losses at Merrill before they voted in December 2008 to buy the brokerage, an acquisition that was completed the following month.
 gained 13 percent to 1,674 yen in Tokyo as UBS AG lifted its recommendation to buy from neutral on the ham and sausage maker.
 “If you look at the year-over-year increase in home prices being in the low teens, our folks think probably a third of that increase was due to the impact of investors as buyers” Institutional Landlords Private-equity firms, hedge funds, real estate investment trusts and other institutional landlords have spent more than $20 billion to buy as many as 200,000 rental homes in the last two years.
 In December, AerCap Holdings NV agreed to buy International Lease Finance Corp.
 At the start of his trial in the Tokyo District Court today, Echigo accepted prosecutors’ argument that he bribed a pension fund executive to buy investment products.
 Underwriters have a 30-day option to buy an additional 34 million shares.
 When a local currency is suffering, people tend to spend savings on long-term goods such as appliances and materials for property repairs, in order to buy before their money doesn’t go as far, said Mikhail Burmistrov, head of St.
 In-vehicle technology is the top selling point for 39 percent of auto buyers, more than twice the 14 percent who say their first consideration is traditional performance measures such as power and speed, according to a study by the consulting firm Accenture released in December.
 agreed to buy 407 megawatts of wind power from Warren Buffett’s MidAmerican Energy Holdings Co, the technology company’s largest deal to date for renewable energy.
 Google has agreed to buy more than a gigawatt of clean power.
 Separately, Amazon said it agreed to buy New York-based ComiXology, which offers a library of digital-comic books and graphic novels.
 Sbarro’s secured lenders already have a proposal to buy the company under a reorganization plan that provides for an auction to test the market for higher bids.
 Telenor ASA of Norway last year agreed to buy the Bulgarian unit of Hellenic Telecommunications Organization, also known as OTE.
 Deutsche Telekom has also offered to buy the Greek government’s 10 percent stake in OTE, people familiar with the talks said in January.
 The hedge-fund manager, who last year considered relocating to Puerto Rico to take advantage of new tax laws, said opportunities to buy real estate in the region won’t last much longer, and he’s looking to purchase sites that can be developed to serve people he expects to move here because of the legislation.
 raised its rating on Babcock to buy from hold, saying it is in a strong position to beat earnings forecasts due to improved margins and yesterday’s announcement that a unit’s joint venture was named a preferred bidder to buy nuclear-site licencing companies.
 Herbalife will use cash from the discontinued dividend to buy back $216 million more of its shares than previously planned.
 Orix may seek to team up with another investor to buy PrimeCredit Ltd, said one of the people, asking not to be identified because the information is private.
 Orix said last month that it’s in talks to buy Hartford Financial Services Group Inc’s Japan operations.
 The Swedish firm may reach a deal to buy LTS Lohmann for about 12 billion euros ($17 billion) within the next month ahead of French investment firm Wendel SA, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 Evonik held talks to buy the company and then dropped out in February, the people said.
 Private-equity firms typically pool money from pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within five to six years, then sell them and return the money and a profit after 10 years.
 “Stabilizing growth and disinflationary pressures in recent data globally have been the signal to buy stocks,” said Daniel Weston, a portfolio manager at Aimed Capital GmbH in Munich.
 Natixis SA raised the network-equipment maker to buy from neutral, saying that telecommunications companies will increase their capital expenditure.
 As part of about $23 billion of funding in euro and dollarbonds and loans to buy SFR, Drahi may pay about 775 percent ininterest on $29 billion of eight-year junk notes with apreliminary B rating from Standard & Poor’s.
 Mitsui Fudosan Residential Co, a unit of Mitsui Fudosan, plans to explain the details of the defects to buyers of the apartments from April 10, the city said.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Glencore Xstrata Plc, the global commodities trading and mining group, agreed to buy Caracal Energy Inc.
 Caracal, which last month agreed to buy TransGlobe for about C$696 million ($635 million) in stock, said it paid a fee of $925 million for terminating that deal.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Saab AB, the maker of the Gripen fighter jet, said it’s in talks to buy a marine defense unit from ThyssenKrupp AG, which would put the submarine and warship production into the hands of a Swedish company.
 Saab Chief Executive Officer Hakan Buskhe told TV4 on April 8 that the company is prepared to buy ThyssenKrupp’s Karlskrona shipyard to add the capacity and knowledge to build submarines.
 President Dilma Rousseff, then Petrobras’ chairwoman, said last month that directors approved the $370 million purchase of a 50 percent stake without knowledge of a clause that later forced it to buy the rest as part of a $8205 million legal settlement.
 While the company has had offers to buy the refinery, Foster said the board doesn’t recommend divesting Pasadena after years of investments and a federal investigation into the deal.
 In 2012, Toyota announced a three-year plan to buy the Tesla components for 2,600 vehicles, sales of which totaled 1,525 through March.
 Multiple Managers Limited partners, the pension systems and other financial institutions that supply the money buyout firms invest, have curbed commitments to buyout funds raised since 2009, shrinking sponsors’ capital.
 Partners plans to buy ground-mounted plants in northern and central Italy, Daum said.
 The maker of Barbie dolls and Fisher-Price in February agreed to buy Mega Brands Inc.
 Former Barclays Chief Executive Officer Diamond saidhis investment firm Atlas Mara, which this week agreed to buyBancABC for as much as $265 million, will spur investor interestby helping to develop African capital markets.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Roche Holding AG agreed to buy the rights from Spain’s Oryzon Genomics SA to an experimental drug that’s meant to switch on genes that block the growth of cancer, a new area in the crowded field of potential oncology therapies.
 Deals V&E, Gibson Dunn, Bingham on ETP $18 Billion Deal for Susser Vinson & Elkins LLP advised Energy Transfer Partners LP, the pipeline company run by billionaire Kelcy Warren, which agreed to buy Susser Holdings Corp.
 Seven Firms Advise on Forest Laboratories Acquisition of Furiex Covington & Burling LLP was legal counsel for Forest Laboratories Inc, the drugmaker being acquired by Actavis Plc, which agreed to buy Furiex Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Simpson Advises Alibaba on $122 Billion Stake in Youku Tudou Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP’s Katie Sudol is leading a team advising Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, which along with founder Jack Ma’s Yunfeng Capital agreed to buy a $122 billion stake in the video website Youku Tudou Inc.
 Joint Bid Prelios is jointly bidding with Fortress for UniCredit SpA’s bad loan management unit and they also offered to buy a majority stake of Banco Popolare SC’s bad bank called Release, Serrini said.
 Maloni said it was prudent for the league to buy time as it investigated the veracity of the recording; Johnson said the NBA waiting until today before issuing any kind of discipline has allowed the story to grow and dominate the news cycle without resolution.
 In their complaint, they alleged that in 2007, the CBOT and CME began letting high-frequency traders peek “at all orders to buy and sell futures contracts before they were reflected” to the rest of the market.
 Hochtief’s offer to buy three of every eight shares held by minority investors closes May 9.
 In Spain, where Vodafone Group Plc agreed to buy cable provider Grupo Corporativo Ono SA last month, Orange sees “no urgency” to make a move on a target like Jazztel Plc, Pellissier said.
 ‘Buying Opportunities’ “People are hesitant to buy,” Chris Osborne, the New York-based chief executive officer at Sberbank CIB’s subsidiary in US, said by e-mail yesterday.
 The largest of those deals was Actavis’s agreement in February to buy Forest Labs for about $21 billion.
 today announced an offer to buy Botox wrinkle treatment maker Allergan Inc.
April 11 (Bloomberg) -- A contract for France’s largest natural gas company to buy the commodity from Azerbaijan shows the decades-old structure of Europe’s energy market is starting to crumble.
 For the first time, GDF Suez SA signed a 25-year contract to buy gas from BP Plc and partners in the former Soviet republic at prices tied to those in Western Europe’s domestic gas markets, a person with knowledge of the matter said, asking not to be named because the terms are confidential.
 “They are trying to buy what they think is feasible, not necessarily what is most strategic” Pfizer’s interest has surprised some analysts and investors, given that AstraZeneca faces the loss of patent protection on some of its best-selling drugs.
 Unless Pfizer thinks they are the experts on dealing with patent cliffs, I can’t see why they would want to buy them” Cancer Focus Pascal Soriot, AstraZeneca’s CEO, joined the company in October 2012 from Roche Holding AG, where he was head of pharmaceuticals at the world’s biggest maker of cancer drugs.
 Valeant this month offered to buy Allergan Inc, maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment, in a cash-and-stock deal valued at about $457 billion.
 Novartis also agreed to buy London-based GlaxoSmithKline’s cancer drugs for as much as $16 billion while selling most of its vaccines division to Glaxo for $71 billion and its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 jumped to the highest level on record after the biggest traded construction contractor in the United Arab Emirates said it plans to buy a European company and spin off a unit.
 agreed earlier this month to pay 2269 billion yuan ($36 billion) to buy Chinese banking and brokerage assets from its state-owned parent.
 Gerry Jordan, president of Hellman Jordan Management Co, said the recall crisis was an opportunity to buy.
 Valeant climbed 73 percent to $13515 at 3:26 pm, after Canada’s largest drugmaker offered to buy Allergan Inc, maker of Botox wrinkle treatment, in a cash and stock deal valued at $457 billion.
 The book’s hero, Robert Fairchild, sums it up: “What was it about the international shipping business that was so appealing? Robert wondered as he listened to his former investor bemoan the fact that there weren’t enough shares for Eurkea! Capital to buy.
April 22 (Bloomberg) -- Permira Advisers LLP agreed to buy German manufacturer CABB International from Bridgepoint to tap demand for chemicals used in pesticides, cosmetics and food.
 24 it agreed to buy BRFkredit A/S for about 74 billion kroner ($14 billion) to expand in mortgage lending.
 Spar Nord Bank A/S, Denmark’s fourth-largest listed lender has “expressed its interest” to buy parts of Copenhagen-based FIH Erhvervsbank A/S, it said last month.
 CapitaLand is realigning its business to focus on more profitable opportunities in Singapore and China by offering to buy the rest of its mall unit to consolidate some businesses and boost returns.
 CapitaLand earlier this month offered to buy CapitaMalls Asia -- whose Singapore malls include ION Orchard and Plaza Singapura along the city’s famed Orchard Road shopping strip -- for S$306 billion.
 S&P cut its grade two levels to AA, citing ADP’s plan to use the proceeds to buy back stock, while Moody’s lowered its ranking one step to Aa1, saying the diminished scale of operations and variety of ADP’s products increases the company’s credit risk.
 Cosan, the Sao Paulo-based company controlled by billionaire Rubens Ometto, last week won the blessing of ALL’s controlling shareholders including pension fund Previ to buy the train operator for about $3 billion in an all-stock deal.
 said they agreed to sell most of a 217 billion-euro ($30 billion) loan book to buyers including Lone Star Funds LP and Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Investors agreed to buy more than 90 percent of the loan book from Irish Bank Resolution Corp, liquidators at KPMG LLP said in a statement today, without disclosing how much the loans sold for.
 Lone Star in February won an auction to buy about 85 percent of IBRC’s 63 billion-pound ($105 billion) UK.
 and Telefonica SA have said they would adopt a separate currency system called Sicad I, which was created last year for importers of non-essential products and closed at 10 per dollar yesterday, Brink’s said it didn’t anticipate being able to buy dollars in that market.
 Bancorp said April 14 it will purchase Ally Financial Inc’s custodian bank, adding 40 employees, and in January announced plans to buy 94 branches from RBS Citizens Financial Group Inc.
 by as soon as next year, Musk, 42, will attempt to accomplish what the Chinese government has struggled to do: get people to buy electric cars.
 to buy Eike Batista’s 33 percent stake in SIX Semicondutores SA for 40 million reais ($18 million).
 It was able to buy Strides Arcolab Ltd’s injectable drug unit Agila Specialties for less than $2 billion in December.
 Amsellem of Piper Jaffray said Perrigo or Valeant may also want to buy Mylan.
 Actavis Plc, a Dublin-based drugmaker with operations in New Jersey, in February agreed to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Valeant this week teamed with Bill Ackman, the billionaire hedge fund manager, in a $457 billion bid to buy Allergan Inc, the maker of the Botox cosmetic treatment.
 Hartford Talks Orix said last month that it’s in talks to buy Hartford Financial Services Group Inc’s Japan operations.
 “If there is any good deal, we would be willing to spend as much as we did to buy Robeco,” said Inoue, who has been president since 2011 and became co-chief executive officer with incumbent Yoshihiko Miyauchi, 78, on Jan.
 company aiming to buy its energy assets, which generate more than 70 percent of sales.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 The figures on sentiment also showed fewer people plan to buy automobiles in the next six months as prices at the pump climbed.
 In 2012, Bright Food agreed to buy 60 percent of British cereal maker Weetabix Ltd.
 Salzgitter advanced 12 percent to 3081 euros after Citigroup upgraded the steelmaker to buy from neutral and raised its price forecast to 36 euros from 31 euros.
 Tullow Oil Tullow Oil climbed 62 percent to 800 pence after UBS raised its recommendation on the shares to buy from hold, citing a strong portfolio of assets and an attractive price.
 Vivendi can’tstart selling its 20 percent stake for one year, and must giveAltice a first chance to buy it.
 If the deal is completed, it could surpass Actavis Inc’sagreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 agreed to buy Texas Industries Inc.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Mallinckrodt Plc agreed to buy Questcor Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Price Leverage Mylan, for example, agreed last year to buy India’s Agila Specialties for $16 billion.
 Mallinckrodt in February agreed to buy Cadence Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Zheng Jianming, also known in Cantonese as Cheng Kin Ming, has spent or pledged about $533 million to buy assets that at their peak were worth almost $20 billion, according to regulatory filings in the US.
 He also owns 30 percent of the Hong Kong-based panel maker Shunfeng, which is seeking to buy Wuxi Suntech.
 has held talks to buy the French train maker.
 Scania Soars Scania AB surged 86 percent to 18780 kronor, the biggest gain since Volkswagen offered in February to buy out the Swedish truckmaker’s minority shareholders.
 and its founder Jack Ma’s Yunfeng Capital agreed to buy a $122 billion stake in the video website.
 Naeem raised the stock to buy with a share price estimate of 61 pounds, taking the tally of similar recommendations to seven against four sells and one hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
April 8 (Bloomberg) -- Mando Corp, the biggest unit of South Korea’s Halla Group, tumbled the most in a year in Seoul trading as its plan to split into two raised investor concern that the company is preparing to buy more shares of affiliates.
 raised its equity rating to buy from outperform.
 The company also agreed to buy 175 million of its shares from Blackstone.
 Facebook Inc, the world’s largest social network, agreed to buy mobile-messaging startup WhatsApp Inc.
 The stock has 35 recommendations equivalent to buy, versus five holds and one sell.
 Asset Buyout The two governments in February agreed to pay a combined 965 billion ringgit ($3 billion) to the water concessionaires to buy out their assets.
 Transaction Capital distributed 210 rand a share to investors on March 17 after last year selling its stake in unsecured lender Bayport Financial Services for 133 billion rand and disposing of Paycorp Holdings to buyout firm Actis LLP for 937 million rand.
 may seek to buy new assets in Asia after they agreed on a A$800 million ($739 million) deal to combine their operations stretching from China to Malaysia.
 The transaction comes amid an acceleration of acquisitions in the sector, led by L1 Energy’s agreement to buy RWE AG’s Dea oil and gas unit that valued the assets at about 51 billion euros ($71 billion).
 agreed to buy IBM’s low-end server business for $23 billion.
 Liberty offered to buy Barnes & Noble in 2011 for about $1 billion, spurring speculation that a takeover battle would emerge.
 “The question has always been: Liberty doesn’t own a lot -- are they going to buy more? It takes away that aspect of the story” Today’s move puts pressure on Barnes & Noble to find new allies.
 Katzenberg, chief executive officer of the studio that made the “Shrek” films, said that within 10 years or so consumers will be able to buy or rent movies 17 days after their release in cinemas.
 Wesfarmers, which operates supermarkets and sells coal, chemicals and industrial equipment, said Gallagher agreed to buy its brokerage operations for A$101 billion ($935 million) as the Perth, Australia-based company scales back from insurance.
 “Our combined operations will become one of the largest insurance brokers in Australia and New Zealand” Gallagher, which raised funds in June for acquisitions, announced an agreement in September to buy the Giles Group of Companies for 237 million pounds ($393 million) to expand in the UK.
 Medical-services provider Fleury SA slipped 17 percent to 1704 reais after Valor Economico reported that private-equity firm Gavea Investimentos may review its bid to buy a controlling stake after finishing an audit.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 Sweden proposed measures to buy more fighter jets and submarines amid an increase in geopolitical tensions.
April 2 (Bloomberg) -- EverPower Wind Holdings Inc, backed by British private-equity financier Guy Hands, plans to buy one of Illinois’ biggest wind farms from indebted Indian turbine-maker Suzlon Energy Ltd.
 Home appliances retailer Magazine Luiza SA may be active after announcing a plan to buy back as many as 5 million shares, or 8 percent of free float.
 In a separate investigation, Huseyin Aydin, CEO of Turkey’s largest government-owned bank, was overheard by police approving loans to businessmen who said they were under orders from Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan to buy a media company.
 Leaked Recordings In leaked recordings of phone calls allegedly made in October, Aydin can be heard talking to businessmen who say they have been ordered by Erdogan to buy Turkey’s Sabah newspaper and ATV television network.
 Munich Re, which completed a 1 billion-euro share buyback before today’s shareholders meeting, plans to buy back shares worth another 1 billion euros before next year’s gathering.
 Policy makers are also weighing a proposal that would make it easier for foreigners to buy homes in the country.
 The government is restricting imports to tackle a record current-account deficit and stop a decline in the rupee after housewives and retail investors rushed to buy gold at the same festival last year as prices slid into a bear market.
 The festival is considered by the country’s more than 900 million Hindus as a traditional day to buy precious metals.
 “It’s an auspicious day, so people who have to buy will buy, but they will have to deal with unnecessarily high premiums,” Prithviraj Kothari, vice president of the India Bullion and Jewellers Association Ltd, said by phone from Mumbai on April 25.
 “As our results improve -- now with net profit and savings in all areas -- there are more people looking to buy shares” Juan Valdez has seven shops in the US, including New York and Washington, and plans to open its first in Florida this year.
 UBS raised its rating for the company to buy from neutral, citing the possibility of higher profits from its proposed acquisition of Mr Bricolage SA in France.
 Facebook also has a separate Messenger software and agreed to buy messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 announced a deal to buy Viber Media Inc.
 The penalty was placed on the CEO after Telkom awarded a 6-million rand interest-free loan to CFO Jacques Schindehutte to buy shares in Telkom.
 Regulations that will impose stricter capital rules are prompting banks to buy more government debt and fuel demand for Treasuries regardless of whether loan growth increases.
 It also may be why New York-based Pfizer, which has a handful of promising oncology drugs, tried to buy AstraZeneca Plc, the London-based drugmaker with a complementary cancer portfolio.
 To that end, Novartis yesterday agreed to buy Glaxo’s oncology business for as much as $16 billion, to sell Glaxo its vaccines line for as much as $71 billion and to sell its animal health business to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Valeant, meanwhile, announced a bid to buy Allergan Inc.
 Valeant proposed to buy the maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment for about $15289 a share in the Canadian company’s plan to become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 The bid comes as Novartis AG agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer drugs as part of a series of deals among major pharmaceuticals makers.
 Technology to do that is the top selling point for 39 percent of auto buyers, more than twice the 14 percent who say their first consideration is traditional performance measures such as power and speed, according to a study consulting firm Accenture released in December.
 has agreed to buy the electricity under a 20-year agreement.
 Chief Executive Officer Jack Welch’s retirement when it prevented his $53 billion plan to buy Honeywell International Inc.
 GE may announce plans to buy the French builder of power plants as soon as next week, according to people with knowledge of the proposed deal.
 That’s prehistory and not relevant today” GE Lessons GE’s painfully gained experience shone through when Immelt, 58, successfully steered through a complex deal to buy Italian aerospace company Avio SpA in 2013.
 “The complexity of this new offer is far less than that of the previously announced Yamana partnership” Today’s deal replaces a transaction announced April 2 in which Yamana agreed to buy 50 percent of Osisko’s assets.
 Enghouse is “good at utilizing their cash to buy things,” said Jason Donville, CEO of Donville Kent Asset Management, whose DKAM Capital Ideas Fund holds the company among its top five stocks.
April 6 (Bloomberg) -- Robert Diamond, former head of Barclays Plc, has agreed to buy a stake in state-owned Development Bank of Rwanda through his new financial-services venture Atlas Mara Co-Nvest Ltd.
 It follows Atlas Mara’s agreement last week to buy Gaborone, Botswana-based financial services company BancABC for as much as $265 million.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander Brasil SA surged as much as 21 percent, the most since the company went public in 2009, after its Spanish parent offered to buy the 25 percent of the bank it doesn’t already own.
 The fact that Santander is offering to buy out minority shareholders in Brazil doesn’t mean it will do so in other markets where it has listed banks, Marin said.
 More than 25,000 contracts giving investors the right to buy the stock changed hands as of 4 pm.
 agreed to buy HJ Heinz Co.
 Mercuria agreed in March to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodities business for $35 billion.
 surged 12 percent after it agreed to buy Biomet Inc.
 People with knowledge of the matter said the company is in talks to buy France’s Alstom SA in what would be its biggest-ever acquisition.
 “If consumers are unlikely to buy a car built by the government, why on earth would they want to buy an insurance policy underwritten and adjusted by folks who act more like bureaucrats than business people?” he said in a 2009 conference call.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Alfa Laval AB agreed to buy Norwegian pumpmaker Frank Mohn AS for 13 billion kroner ($22 billion) to capture spending in offshore oil and gas drilling.
 company aiming to buy its energy assets, which generate more than 70 percent of sales.
 Le Nouvel Observateur reported that the government was studying selling some of its holding in EDF to raise funds to buy Bouygues SA’s stake in Alstom and also inject funds.
 DuPont said in January it planned to buy back $5 billion of its shares, including at least $2 billion this year.
 Vivendi can’t start selling its 20 percent stake for one year, and must give Altice a first chance to buy it.
 Telecoms Consolidation The deal could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Valeant in April offered to buy Allergan Inc, the maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- Eurosic, a French real estate investment trust, agreed to buy a 59 percent stake in SIIC de Paris from Spain’s Realia Business SA and may acquire the rest of the property-rental company.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- Man Group Plc, the world’s largest publicly traded hedge-fund manager, is in talks to buy Numeric Holdings LLC in a deal that would diversify its computer-driven investments after the company’s biggest fund posted losses over the past three years.
 Deutsche Wohnen AG, Germany’s second-largest residential landlord by market value, said yesterday that first-quarter profit rose 91 percent after it took advantage of higher share prices to buy more homes.
 DirecTV CEO Mike White has decided not to transform the direction of his company in recent years, as opposed to Dish’s Ergen, who has spent billions of dollars acquiring wireless spectrum and attempted to buy Sprint Corp.
 That may explain why Dish’s stock rose more than 6 percent this week after the report that AT&T is looking to buy its rival.
 That gives SFR, a Vivendi SA unit which Altice SA agreed to buy last month in a $23-billion deal, more room to cut prices.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC, the New York-based buyout firm, is nearing an agreement to buy German industrial packager Mauser from Dubai International Capital for $17 billion, three people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Siemens yesterday agreed to buy some Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc energy assets for $13 billion, while saying it will list its hearing-aid unit and manage its health-care business separately.
 The lender, which is looking to buy a 40 percent stake in an Indonesian bank, reported May 1 quarterly profit of 6366 million dirhams.
 “Brands help people find inspiration and discover things they care about, whether it’s ideas for dinner, places to go or gifts to buy,” Joanne Bradford, head of partnerships at Pinterest, said in the blog post.
 Puts give the right to sell a security, while calls convey the right to buy.
 The fund recently lost out to money manager Blackstone Group LP in a bid to buy a stake in Italian luxury brand Versace and was beaten by private equity firm CVC Capital Partners in the contest for a stake in Spanish olive oil-maker Deoleo SA.
 There were 79,354 bids to buy wind, hydropower and biomass credits, the least since September, according to data from trader REConnect Energy Solutions Pvt.
 Companies have until March 31, 2015 to buy credits to comply with their obligations.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-biggest energy producer, may step up its hunt for acquisitions after scrapping a deal to buy a stake in Israel’s Leviathan natural gas project for as much as $26 billion.
 The distributor of petroleum products was raised to buy from hold at Canaccord Genuity Corp.
 “It’s a good route to get to India and that’s a growing market,” Laut said about Energy East in a May 9 telephone interview, noting Indian buyers of crude have contacted Canadian Natural and are “keen” to buy its oil.
 climbed the most in almost two months after KKR & Co, the buyout firm run by George Roberts and Henry Kravis, offered S$14 billion ($11 billion) to buy the provider of bulk containers.
 In the Asia-Pacific region, KKR’s A$305 billion ($28 billion) proposal to buy Melbourne-based Treasury Wine Estates Ltd, whose labels include Stags’ Leap, Wolf Blass and Beringer, was rejected as too low earlier this month.
 Nomura said yesterday that it plans to buy back as much as 26 percent of outstanding shares after net income climbed to an eight-year high in the year ended March.
 “In the long term, it will be hard for investors to buy into the securities industry unless market conditions take a favorable turn” The drop in Nomura’s quarterly earnings was the first since the three months ended June 2012, as lower brokerage commissions overshadowed gains from investment banking and trading.
 Ryanair agreed to buy five more Boeing Co.
 The companies’ partnership gives Rosneft the ability to buy stakes in Exxon’s North American projects in exchange for Exxon’s access to the Russian Arctic.
 Barclays Plc reiterated a rating equivalent to buy in a note dated yesterday.
 “We deserve a livable wage,” said Topel, who receives government assistance to buy food.
 to buy clean energy at premium prices is poised to fuel the spread of panels to more farms.
 Two members of the group are combining, with Samsung SDI Co, a supplier of batteries to Apple, agreeing to buy chemical and electronic materials maker Cheil Industries Inc.
 Beats Headphones Apple is in talks to buy Beats Electronics LLC, the closely held headphones maker and music streaming service co-founded by Dr.
 “The board undeniably is comprised of a majority of independent directors” Loeb contends Sotheby’s decision to trigger the pill if activist investors buy more than 10 percent of its shares, while allowing passive investors to buy as much as 20 percent, leaves the measure open to attack.
 Loeb complains he’s being unfairly denied the right to buy more shares that could help him win the proxy contest.
 Abel completed the $56 billion acquisition of NV Energy, Nevada’s largest electric utility, in December and announced a deal May 1 to buy SNC-Lavalin Group Inc’s AltaLink for about $29 billion to expand in electricity transmission in western Canada.
 Nomura raised its rating on the shares to buy from neutral.
 “It makes you wonder whether a breakup is more likely to be in the cards” Safran, a Paris-based company that makes aircraft engines, landing gear and cockpit controls, would be more interested in B/E’s cabin business, although it’s large enough to buy the whole company, said Rob Stallard, an analyst with RBC, in a May 6 report.
 General Electric Co, which is seeking French government support of its offer to buy the power business of Alstom SA, can’t be ruled out, according to Stallard.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 Language was added to the bill, dealing mainly with rules for all-terrain vehicles, to explicitly require consumers to buy vehicles only through franchise auto dealerships.
 Proceeds will be used to buy back $126 million of Qantas’s 605 percent notes due April 2016 from one investor and to repay other shorter term debt maturities, according to the statement.
 Biggest Share Temasek in March agreed to buy a 25 percent stake in the retail arm of Hutchison Whampoa Ltd.
 VW, which said separately today that it has enough shareholder backing to buy full control of truckmaker Scania AB, increased 03 percent to 19230 euros.
 Osisko ran a search for alternatives and announced April 2 that Yamana had agreed to buy 50 percent of Osisko’s assets.
 After Goldcorp responded a week later by raising its own bid, Agnico joined Yamana in a friendly transaction to buy the whole of Osisko.
 Mortgage applications to buy homes plunged 19 percent from a year earlier, indicating slowing demand during what is typically the busiest season for deals.
 “Croatia is underrated and a good credit story,” Lutz Roehmeyer, a money manager overseeing $11 billion at LBB Invest, who is seeking to buy the new securities, said by phone from Berlin on May 19.
 The Frankfurt-based company will seek a premium of about 50 basis points over the current secondary-market rates to buy the new notes, he said by phone yesterday.
 Archipelago maintains the error account to trade securities that it acquires when computer malfunctions require it to buy or sell stock to maintain an orderly market.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Amid a wave of consolidation in the drug business, Meda AB is ready to buy and double in size.
 In March, Atlas Mara agreed to buy BancABC, which offers financial services in Botswana, Mozambique, Tanzania, Zambia and Zimbabwe, and said it will use the company as a springboard for further acquisitions.
 Yuedong Xu, Junefield’s Ecuador country manager, declined to comment yesterday on whether the company was in talks to buy the concession.
 The company, which earns money from sales of in-game items, plans to spend as much as 10 billion yen ($98 million) to buy back as many as 125 million shares, it said yesterday.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Polymetal International Plc, the gold and silver producer part-owned by Russian billionaire Alexander Nesis, agreed to buy the Kyzyl project in northeast Kazakhstan for $6185 million to add 50 percent to its reserves.
 The gold producer planned to buy the Bakyrchik mine from companies owned by Timur Kulibayev, a son-in-law of Kazakh President Nursultan Nazarbayev, Kommersant reported in October.
 In February, Brookdale agreed to buy Seattle-based Emeritus.
May 9 (Bloomberg) -- Tullett Prebon Plc, facing a decline in revenue, agreed to buy oil broker PVM Oil Associates Ltd.
 rebounded from its lowest level in three years after winning regulatory review to buy assets from its parent.
 The China Securities Regulatory Commission will review a private share placement by the company to buy mining assets from its parent company, according to an exchange statement.
 Since the financial crisis, Blackstone has formed a warehouse-property landlord, IndCor Properties, and a company to own shopping centers, Brixmor Property Group Inc, by taking advantage of opportunities to buy assets at discounts from distressed sellers.
 Lenovo, which agreed to buy IBM’s low-end server business this year, advanced 1 percent.
May 13 (Bloomberg) -- Axa Real Estate Investment Managers and Danish pension fund ATP agreed to buy the Belgian Finance Ministry’s headquarters in Brussels in a transaction that values the property at 475 million euros ($654 million).
 Axa is partnering with European pension funds to buy commercial properties as large investors seek to boost returns amid low interest rates.
 In November, the insurer agreed to buy Munich’s SZ Tower with Norway’s sovereign wealth fund Norges Bank Investment Management.
 In recent months, Tencent agreed to buy a $500 million stake in Seoul-based mobile game developer CJ Games and purchased exclusive rights to the Chinese version of Candy Crush Saga from King Digital Entertainment Plc, of Dublin.
 By agreeing to buy a 28 percent stake in CJ Games in March, Tencent returned to one of its most reliable sources of overseas hits: South Korea.
 Oracle agreed to buy Sun in 2009 for $74 billion and sued Google a year later.
 homebuilders haven’t done much to ease the supply problem for lower-income families because they’re increasingly catering to buyers who can afford larger, more expensive properties and have an easier time getting mortgages.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 programmer who has achieved celebrity in the debate surrounding high-frequency trading, says traders use them to cloak plans to buy or sell shares, giving them an advantage over other investors.
 During apartheid, black people weren’t allowed to buy clear or full-strength beer, leading to the emergence of illegal bars known as shebeens.
 Bent on reversing that, SABMiller is also paying bar owners to buy from them.
 Instead, the company will encourage clients to buy IBM-made offerings, the memo said.
 Compliance Policy Japan’s FSA Moves to Loosen Rules for Insurers, Sankei Reports Japan’s Financial Services Agency submitted an amendment to a bill that will allow insurance companies to buy competitors with units that operate non-insurance businesses, Sankei reported, without attribution.
 The new rule, which will take effect as early as this year, will enable insurers to buy the assets as long as they divest non-insurance units within five years of acquisition, the newspaper reported.
 “It’s time to buy,” Jack Arnoff, a partner at Elbrus Capital Partners in London, said by e-mail today.
 The company is considering selling bonds to buy back more expensive debt and extend maturities, he said.
 He was also threatened by some who incorrectly speculated that he assisted in the investigation and prosecution of Silk Road, the billion-dollar online website where customers used bitcoins to buy and sell drugs, according to the US.
 Repsol has said it is seeking to use cash to buy assets.
 Fiat SpA, the carmaker that agreed to buy the rest of Chrysler Group LLC in January, surged 46 percent for the second-biggest rally in the index.
 Expanding the portfolio will provide more revenue to buy more projects, both from TransAlta Corp.
 is in talks to buy the company, just months after Ergen approached DirecTV about a combination.
 Last year, Ergen offered to buy Sprint, only to be outbid by SoftBank Corp.
 He’s competing for DirecTV’s attention with AT&T, which is in talks to buy the company, people with knowledge of the situation said this week.
 Orix agreed last month to buy US.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in his March budget that pushed retirees to buy an annuity and allowed them to withdraw pension savings without paying a 55 percent tax.
(Corrects name of Csathy’s company in second paragraph) May 10 (Bloomberg) -- Apple Inc’s plan to buy Beats Electronics LLC for $32 billion highlights the attractiveness of streaming companies such as Pandora Media Inc.
 Pandora, seen as a potential acquisition target, rose 19 percent to $2262 yesterday, following reports of Apple’s discussions to buy Culver City, California-based Beats.
 The company last month offered to buy stakes in directory businesses it jointly owns with PubliGroupe SA as it seeks to strengthen its position in advertising.
 The golf courses and beaches of Los Cabos are luring Americans who are able to get home-equity loans to buy in Mexico as US.
 The railroad said in February that it planned a record $5 billion outlay this year to buy locomotives and maintain track as it hauls more crude oil drilled in shale fields.
 agreed to buy IBM’s low-end server business for $23 billion.
 Old Dominion, based in Thomasville, North Carolina, added $25 million to its budget to buy additional tractors and trailers, raising its planned 2014 equipment investment to $188 million “as a result of our strong volume for the first quarter and our expectation for the remainder of the year,” CEO David Congdon told analysts on an April 24 conference call.
 The recent TV spots are designed to educate consumers to come to Groupon when they want to buy anything, any time, anywhere.
 agreed to buy Argentine government bonds from oil producer Repsol SA for $2 billion, bringing its purchases of the country’s securities to about $5 billion in less than a week.
 agreed to buy the 49 percent stake Singapore Air held in Virgin Atlantic for $360 million.
 Lenovo, which in January agreed to buy Motorola Mobility for $29 billion, plans to triple the number of countries where it sells phones by adding 20 new markets in the Middle East, Africa and Latin America.
 In January, the company announced plans to buy Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility handset unit for $291 billion in cash and stock.
 Yang also is expanding in other types of hardware and in January announced plans to buy International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit for $23 billion.
 Then, in 2011, Republic also agreed to buy planes from Airbus’s A320 family, the type used at Frontier.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-biggest oil and gas producer, scrapped an agreement to buy a quarter of Israel’s largest natural gas field for as much as $26 billion after talks to complete the deal collapsed.
May 2 (Bloomberg) -- Mercuria Energy Group Ltd, which agreed to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodity unit for $35 billion in March, is offering jobs to about 200 people, or half the unit’s staff, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 “We have a ways to go until there is enough confidence out there for more and more people to come out to buy” Income Growth Wage gains have been slow to materialize, and may be needed to help galvanize consumer activity.
 government owns warrants to buy 799 percent of the equity in Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy mortgages and package them into securities.
 “You give me a commercial bank that’s willing to sell itself to Valley at the type of multiples we’re getting in Florida, with the potential growth this bank has, and we’ll be only too happy to buy it,” Lipkin said in a phone interview.
 Last month, Vodafone agreed to buy out Piramal Enterprises Ltd’s stake in its Indian unit for about $15 billion, winning full control of its biggest market by customers.
 “Dividends are a very important part of the puzzle for us but ultimately what we’re looking for at Templeton is to buy a stock that offers us a double over a five-year period including dividends,” said Tuttle, whose group manages C$143 billion in assets.
 Accor SA rose 13 percent after Europe’s largest hotel operator agreed to buy hotels in Germany and the Netherlands for about 900 million euros ($123 billion).
 abandoned its effort to buy the UK.
 Trade Secrets/Industrial Espionage Hon Hai to Buy Huawei 4G Equipment If Safety Can Be Guaranteed Hon Hai Precision Industry Co’s application to buy 4G telecom equipment from Huawei Technology Co.
 offered to buy Aquila Resources Ltd.
 agreed in February to buy a 13 percent stake in Alumina Ltd.
 While those austerity plans were overshadowed last month by news the company failed to buy its biggest competitor, Newmont Mining Corp, Sokalsky says those talks are “finished” and Barrick is focused on its strategy as a standalone entity.
 Earlier this month, Hillshire agreed to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 Traders are betting that an even higher offer will emerge for Hillshire and that its plans to buy Pinnacle are probably dead.
 It would have been tricky for a suitor to buy Hillshire before that anniversary because of rules imposed by the US.
 That’s before it borrows an additional $15 billion to buy Allergan.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in a bet the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares more cheaply and pocket the difference.
 “I get no better feeling in the stomach about the development anywhere at Carlsberg,” and “I’m struggling to find any reason to buy, even if it’s cheap,” Michael Friis Jorgensen, an analyst at Alm.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- Rio Alto Mining Ltd, owner of the La Arena gold mine in Peru, agreed to buy Sulliden Gold Corp.
 The Fed said today it plans to buy about $25 billion of Treasuries during June.
 bonds surged to a record after Sabine Oil & Gas LLC agreed to buy the energy producer, which has been struggling with dwindling cash flow.
 The S&P 500 climbed for a fourth day yesterday after durable-goods orders unexpectedly rose and JBS SA offered to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 is in talks to buy Skybox Imaging Inc, a provider of high-definition imagery that could enhance the Web company’s maps, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 Siemens plans to list its hearing-aid unit and agreed to buy some Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc energy assets for $13 billion.
 Billionaire Li Ka-shing’s Hutchison agreed last year to buy O2 Ireland, the country’s No.
 The agreement to buy 45,500 net acres (18,413 hectares) in Texas’s oil-rich Eagle Ford basin from Freeport’s energy unit gives Encana “the opportunity to accelerate the rebalancing of our portfolio” to higher-priced crude, Encana Chief Executive Officer Doug Suttles said today on a conference call.
 AerCap has jumped since agreeing in December to buy AIG’s International Lease Finance Corp.
 Man Group Plc advanced 5 percent after saying it’s in talks to buy Boston-based money manager Numeric Holdings LLC.
 The world’s biggest publicly traded hedge-fund manager said it is in discussions to buy Numeric.
 Exane BNP Paribas downgraded the French utility to neutral from outperform, similar to buy, saying the company will find it difficult to pass on increasing costs to consumers.
 is seeking European Union antitrust approval for its plan to buy WhatsApp Inc, according to a person familiar with the company’s plans.
 Sony previously agreed to sell its PC division, which produces notebooks under the Vaio brand, to buyout firm Japan Industrial Partners Inc.
 “I had to buy it,” Swatch Chairwoman Nayla Hayek said in a statement.
 After the Sprint deal, Son last December sought about $20 billion in bank loans to buy Deutsche Telekom AG’ s 67 percent stake in T-Mobile, the smallest of the four national carriers, people familiar with the matter said at the time.
 “They want T-Mobile to get scale” Still, a similar attempt by AT&T in 2011 to buy T-Mobile was blocked by regulators, arguing consumers were better off with more choices.
 He could look to buy the second- or third-tier operators in Europe, according to Hideki Yasuda at Tokyo-based Ace Research Institute.
 bonds that investors showed up in droves to buy last month.
 Such terms are attractive for an issuer that expects to be acquired, because it allows them to buy back the notes at a cheaper price than the so-called make-whole premium they normally would have to pay, Canale said.
 Novartis agreed last month to buy Glaxo’s oncology business for as much as $16 billion, to sell Glaxo its vaccines line for as much as $71 billion and to sell its animal health business to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Bayer AG agreed this month to buy Merck & Co’s consumer unit for $142 billion, solidifying its position near the top of the market for over-the-counter health products.
 Actavis, the world’s second-largest generic-drug maker by market value, agreed to buy Forest in February to add branded medicines including Alzheimer’s treatment Namenda and blood-pressure pill Bystolic to its lineup.
 offered to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 Hillshire Brands jumped 18 percent after Tyson made a $68 billion offer to buy the company, trumping a competing bid from Pilgrim’s Pride Corp.
 Shale Gas Siemens’s proposal to buy Alstom’s energy business will probably entail swapping some of its rail assets for the French company’s energy division and creating two European leaders in their respective fields, people familiar with the matter have said.
 The company has quickly accumulated a large user base and attracted the attention of Internet giants including Facebook Inc, which last year offered to buy Snapchat for about $3 billion.
 Chairman Weng Xianding agreed to buy 80 percent ILFC for about $423 billion.
 16, 2013: AerCap Holdings NV agrees to buy ILFC for about $54 billion in cash and stock, replacing the failed China deal.
 Just like good comedy, timing is the key to buying and selling momentum stocks.
 In ICBC’s case, “the buyer’s motive was to buy a bank license ticket to enter Turkey,” he said.
 agreed to buy 112 acres (45 hectares) from Union Pacific Corp.
 Montebourg, which unsuccessfully backed Bouygues’s bid to buy SFR, is pushing Alstom, in which Bouygues has a 29 percent stake, to reject General Electric’s offer for its energy units.
 A rail option would have much lower upfront costs than the pipeline -- the company would have to build some infrastructure and may have to buy some tank cars to fulfill customer needs, he said.
 That means bondholders aren’t really being compensated for the risk that there might be no one who wants to buy their obscure securities if demand dries up and they’re forced to sell.
 In the past, dealers would purchase bigger clumps of bonds than they could immediately sell, allowing investors to get out of positions even if a broker didn’t have a client on the other side looking to buy.
 scrapped an agreement to buy a quarter of Israel’s largest natural-gas field for as much as $26 billion.
 Laursen sold HDFC Bank shares this year to buy ICICI Bank, the country’s No.
 In the week ended April 25, applications for loans to buy homes dropped 44 percent and were down 21 percent from a year earlier, according to data from the Mortgage Bankers Association.
 Contracts to buy existing homes climbed by the most in almost three years in March, a sign that the market is starting to stabilize as it enters the key spring selling season, the Realtors group said three days ago.
 dropped 1 percent after agreeing to buy DirecTV, the largest US.
 The undated notes will convert to equity if the bank’s capital falls to 5125 percent of assets weighted by risk and the company has the right to buy them back after five years, the person said.
 He repeated a recommendation to buy the stock.
 The fund will primarily allocate its capital to buyout and special situation funds, with the latter term referring to vehicles that make loans and invest in distressed debt.
 Leading investor Telefonica last September tightened its grip on Telecom Italia, increasing its holding in Telco to 66 percent, with an option to buy out remaining Telco partners.
 If you’re going to buy a high-flier, I would rather own Tesla” Musk, 42, Tesla’s chief executive officer, is the 121st richest person in the world with an estimated net worth of $98 billion, according to the Bloomberg Billionaires Index.
 and the Shanghai Stock Exchange agreed to allow as much as 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily trading, opening up the mainland market to foreign investors while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 There’s really room for arbitrage” The through-train allows individuals to buy Hong Kong equities via the Shanghai exchange and investors to buy mainland shares through Hong Kong’s bourse.
 Favorable market conditions have led to multibillion-dollar valuations as hedge funds, private equity and corporate investors compete with venture capital firms to buy stakes in high-growth companies before they go public.
 dropped on plans to buy a stake in Greentown China Holdings Ltd.
 Greentown China climbed 28 percent to HK$803 after Sunac China said it plans to buy a stake of as much as 30 percent in the developer.
 The Canada Pension Plan Investment Board will invest about 2064 million euros, and shareholders will be offered a chance to buy 1965 million euros in stock in a fully underwritten rights issue.
 “The risk versus reward makes lots of sense for us” The shopping-mall owner partnered with the Canada pension board in 2012 in a 46 billion-krona ($700 million) deal to buy Kista Galleria, outside Stockholm.
 as a way to further a $100 billion-plus bid to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 Jones Day Advises Koch Unit on PetroLogistics $21 Billion Deal Jones Day advised the Flint Hills Resources LLC unit of Koch Industries Inc, controlled by billionaire brothers Charles and David Koch, on an agreement to buy PetroLogistics LP for $21 billion.
 Simpson Thacher Advises KKR on Goodpack $14 Billion Bid Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP is representing KKR & Co, the buyout firm run by George Roberts and Henry Kravis, on its $14 billion ($11 billion) offer to buy Goodpack Ltd, a provider of bulk containers.
 mobile-phone carrier, is in talks to buy satellite-television company DirecTV, people with knowledge of the situation said.
 The talks with DirecTV come as AT&T is restricted from making an approach to buy Vodafone Group Plc, Europe’s largest mobile carrier, by UK.
 “Rather than buy back the stock, they want to buy back congresspeople” The government’s top 10 suppliers, most of which rely heavily on defense spending, made $137 million in PAC contributions during the first 15 months of the current two-year election cycle, which began Jan.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 Review Options Air Canada had been evaluating the CSeries as a replacement for its Embraer jets since announcing in December an order to buy Boeing Co.
 The agreement called for Boeing to buy as many as 20 of Air Canada’s E190s, with the airline leasing larger, narrow-body aircraft until taking delivery of the 737s.
 Calgary-based Encana raised C$146 billion from the sale and may receive a total of C$167 billion if the underwriters exercise their option to buy more stock.
 Encana sold 52 million shares and the underwriters have an option to buy an additional 78 million, according to a statement today.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Herbalife Ltd, which suspended its dividend last month to increase share repurchases, agreed to buy back $266 million of its stock from Bank of America Corp.
 He accused Republicans of aligning themselves with “insurance companies that jacked up people’s premiums with impunity, and denied care to the patients who were sick; Mortgage lenders that tricked families into buying homes they couldn’t afford; A financial sector where irresponsibility and lack of basic oversight nearly destroyed our entire economy” 2010 Villains During the 2010 midterm elections, Obama cited the battle against “special interests,” “Wall Street banks,” “corporations,” the “oil industry,” the “insurance industry” and “credit-card companies” He even went after specific corporations, saying the Republican agenda was “written by a former lobbyist for AIG and Exxon Mobil” Political and policy considerations are taking Obama’s usual targets out of play for this year’s elections.
 were among investors to buy into GM.
 If you’re going to buy a high flier, I’d rather buy Tesla” Twitter fell 18 percent yesterday to $3185 after restrictions were lifted on sales of shares by insiders and early investors.
 Metso, Ahold Metso Oyj fell 22 percent to 2843 euros after Weir Group Plc abandoned its attempt to buy the Finnish maker of rock crushers.
 Regulators are skeptical of SoftBank’s ambition to buy T-Mobile, and Son has reframed his argument to say he can improve US.
 JBS Foods, the second-largest producer and exporter of poultry and pork in Brazil, was formed after JBS agreed to buy Seara food processing assets from Marfrig Global Foods SA for 585 billion reais in June 2013.
 While the program has business critics -- including Atlanta-based Delta Air Lines Inc, which says taxpayers shouldn’t make it easier for foreign competitors to buy jets -- Hensarling’s position puts him at odds with some of the biggest industry groups.
 Katara, which bought Le Royal Monceau in Paris in 2012, plans to more than double its properties by 2030 and was in talks to buy “iconic” hotels in London and Rome, Chief Operating Officer Christopher RJ Knable said last year.
 Odd-lot trades, orders to buy or sell fewer than 100 shares, were included in the data starting in December.
 Contracts to buy previously owned houses in the US.
May 9 (Bloomberg) -- Todd Vitale, a personal trainer who opened his own gym last year, said he was having difficulty getting a mortgage of more than $700,000 to buy a home in Greenwich, Connecticut, because his new business was untested.
 “They are taking their toys and playing elsewhere right now where they expect more volatility” Total Assets Backwardation allows USO to buy more barrels of crude each month as it sells the expiring futures and rolls over to the less expensive second-month contract.
 Shoda, 65, was Daiichi Sankyo’s chief executive officer in 2008, when it agreed to buy the Indian maker of generic medicines.
 Since Daiichi Sankyo agreed to buy a controlling stake in Ranbaxy for about $46 billion six years ago, the Indian drugmaker has had four plants banned from exporting drugs to the US.
 Three months after Daiichi Sankyo agreed to buy the controlling stake in Ranbaxy, the FDA barred imports from the Indian drugmaker’s Paonta Sahib and Dewas plants because of manufacturing defects.
 Network upgrades, driven by mobile devices, are making up for weaker demand as companies build their own equipment, using software to buy fewer machines.
 Bavaguthu Raghuram Shetty, an Indian-born entrepreneur, Centurion Investment and Infinite Investment LLC, two firms owned by Abu Dhabi’s bin Butti family, are in talks to buy a controlling stake in the chain of currency-exchange centers, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 Private-equity firms typically pool money from pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within five to six years, then sell them and return the money and a profit after 10 years.
 “We’ve made it easy for you to buy against our top content and talent,” Susan Wojcicki, who was recently promoted to run YouTube, said at the event.
 “Although we have continued to see meaningful levels of quote volumes for individual annuities, it is too early to predict the eventual impact of the budget” Shares of Partnership have slumped 60 percent since Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy annuities with their pension savings.
 sank 75 percent after agreeing to buy Sulliden Gold Corp.
 Gold Deal Rio Alto Mining slumped 75 percent to C$197, the lowest since January, after agreeing to buy Sulliden Gold to expand its production of the precious metal.
 agreed to buy Beats Electronics LLC for $3 billion, its biggest-ever acquisition, nabbing a popular line of headphones and a nascent subscription music-streaming service as the iPhone maker seeks to rev up growth.
 Public Offers EPSO-G and Lietuvos Energija, as required by law, will make a public offer to buy all remaining shares of Dujos and Amber Grid, for which they’ve foreseen financing, Lietuvos Energija Chief Executive Officer Dalius Misiunas and EPSO-G Chief Executive Officer Virgilijus Poderys told reporters today.
May 26 (Bloomberg) -- Atos of France offered to buy rival Bull for about 620 million euros ($844 million), underscoring demand for cybersecurity and cloud-computing services.
 The system of offering wealthy parents the opportunity to buy a place at the school of their choice is entrenched in the former British colony and “will flourish for as long as the demand for places at the best schools exceeds supply,” said Nicholas Brummitt, chairman of the international-schools consultant.
 rose 36 percent as TD Securities raised its recommendation on the stock to buy from hold.
 Baidu agreed to buy the remaining shares in January, without disclosing a price.
 Mumbai-based Essar Group wants to buy all the shares it doesn’t already own in its listed units as it considers them undervalued, the people said.
 offered in March to spend $793 million to buy the remaining stake the brothers don’t already own in Essar Energy, as well as the company’s outstanding convertible bonds.
 Recurring revenue from selling electricity provides funds for the yield companies to buy more power plants as they’re built, and provide investors with dividends.
 They are finding things to buy, but they sort of buy them begrudgingly” Fed policy makers are watching progress toward their goal of full employment as they consider the timing of the first interest-rate increase since 2006.
 agreed to buy the company for about C$38 billion.
 Unless they announce sales of the TV business, the market won’t think Sony is serious” Hirai issued the earlier forecast in February as the company announced the sale of its PC business, which produces notebooks under the Vaio brand, to buyout firm Japan Industrial Partners Inc.
 “Trading in Melco has been misplaced, and it’s created an incredible opportunity to buy the shares at a very low valuation, especially when you look out to 2015 and 2016 numbers with new properties online,” Bryan Maher, a senior analyst at Craig-Hallum Capital Group LLC who has a buy recommendation on Melco with a $50 price target, said by phone on May 16.
 Options traders are betting on a rebound in Melco’s shares, pushing the number of outstanding calls to buy the stock to almost 153,000 contracts, the most since April 2013 and up from about 55,000 at the end of March, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Elliott had disclosed that Eiffarie, a joint venture owned by construction company Eiffage SA and Macquarie Group Ltd’s infrastructure unit, planned to buy Elliott’s APRR shares.
May 2 (Bloomberg) -- Berkshire Hathaway Inc’s energy unit agreed to buy SNC-Lavalin Group Inc’s AltaLink for about $C32 billion ($29 billion) in cash to expand in electricity transmission in western Canada.
 Last month, Vivendi SA snubbed Bouygues’s offer to buy SFR, France’s second-largest phone operator, and agreed instead to sell it to Altice SA in a deal valued at more than 17 billion euros.
 The company called off a $12 billion offer to buy South Africa’s Adcock Ingram Holdings Ltd.
 China Hongqiao Group Ltd, the nation’s largest non-state aluminum producer, said this month it’s in talks to buy a bauxite mine in Africa to secure supply for as long as 30 years.
 in March and today’s announcement by Old Mutual Wealth to buy Henderson Group Plc’s 50 percent stake in multi-asset firm Cirilium.
 “Most money managers are generally fully invested and so one of the issues is that for these mega ones, the buy side has to free up some liquidity to buy the new IPO,” Skip Aylesworth, a portfolio manager for Hennessy Funds in Boston, tells Lu Wang.
 Gordon Runte, a spokesman for Fortress, didn’t respond to e-mail and telephone messages last week seeking comment on potential plans to buy the property.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Siemens AG agreed to buy some Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc energy assets for $13 billion and plans to list its hearing-aid unit as Europe’s largest engineering company aims to close a profitability gap with rivals General Electric Co.
 Kaeser, 56, is also preparing an offer to buy parts of Alstom SA’s energy businesses to counter a $17 billion bid by GE.
May 5 (Bloomberg) -- Bendigo & Adelaide Bank Ltd, an Australian regional lender, agreed to buy Rural Finance Corp.
 “TIG Advisors believes that both issues could have been addressed with an equity component to the consideration” Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 stocks advanced, with the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index extending a record, after durable goods orders unexpectedly rose and JBS SA offered to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 drugmaker yesterday stopped its attempt to buy AstraZeneca for 694 billion pounds ($117 billion), saying the bid rejected by its London-based competitor represented full value.
 rose 08 percent to $2471 as Deutsche Bank AG boosted its recommendation on the maker of networking equipment to buy from hold.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- China Hongqiao Group Ltd, the nation’s largest non-state aluminum producer, is in talks to buy a bauxite mine in Africa to secure raw material.
 It also has signed a three-year supply contract with Rio Tinto Group to buy at least 3 million tons of the ore annually from Australia and has supply agreements with India, she said.
 Hapag-Lloyd last month agreed to buy most of CSAV’s assets in an all-share transaction to become the world’s fourth-largest container liner with about $12 billion in sales.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA may be active after announcing plan to buy back shares.
 The insurer has to buy from private-equity firm PPF Group NV the remaining 24 percent stake it doesn’t own in their eastern European joint venture by the end of this year for about 12 billion euros.
 Yesterday, Pfizer offered to pay 694 billion pounds ($117 billion) to buy the London-based drugmaker.
 Wall Street bond traders lost commissions after Trace was implemented when the difference between bids to buy and offers to sell corporate bonds narrowed in the first year of the price reporting rules, according to a study published in the Journal of Financial Economics in 2006.
 “Pfizer could have had softer manners when approaching AstraZeneca” Pfizer ended its six-month effort to buy AstraZeneca yesterday following the London-based company’s May 19 rejection of its last bid of 55 pounds a share in cash and stock.
 In April, Novartis AG agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer drugs while selling most of the company’s vaccines division to Glaxo and its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co, in an industrywide shake up.
 offered to buy Allergan Inc, maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment.
 Tow Truck Nick Frederick, 38, a tow-truck driver in Sykesville, Maryland, said the Islamic lender solicited him by e-mail and phone last year when he needed $15,000 to buy a trailer.
 Home prices in the capital’s most desirable areas have jumped more than 60 percent since 2009, making central London the second-most expensive place in Europe to buy a house after Monaco, according to broker Knight Frank LLP.
 To compensate, the traders widened the spread between prices they were willing to pay to buy and sell shares, making it more expensive for most investors to trade stocks.
 The warrants, which traded as low as $466 in October of that year, allow investors to buy AIG common stock at $45 apiece by Jan.
 raised its rating on the stock May 21 to buy from neutral and lifted its 12-month price target by 26 percent to $63 a share.
 South Korea also is expected this year to commit to buying its first Global Hawk reconnaissance drones made by Northrop Grumman Corp, according to a person familiar with the matter who asked not to be identified discussing military planning.
May 6 (Bloomberg) -- National CineMedia Inc, the largest supplier of commercials in movie theaters, agreed to buy its closest competitor for $375 million in cash and stock.
 Eneva, which was listed by Batista as a startup in 2007, dropped to a record low on May 2 amid project delays that increased costs and forced it to buy higher-cost energy on the spot market, deepening its losses.
 The utility also said in today’s statement it will sell at least 50 percent of its Pecem II project in the northeast, with EON offering to buy up to 50 percent of the power plant for as much as 400 million reais.
 The Ontario Power Authority agreed to buy electricity from the three plants under a 20-year contract.
 agreed to buy US.
 satellite TV company DirecTV for $485 billion in cash and stock, which may indicate that the Dallas-based phone company has less capacity to make an offer to buy Vodafone.
 Vodacom agreed to buy local Internet provider Neotel Pty Ltd.
 That means that Vodafone needs to buy or build broadband and TV infrastructure for fixed services in its biggest markets.
 In March, Vodafone agreed to buy Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for 75 billion euros ($103 billion), including debt.
 The country’s middle-income earners are set to double by 2020, according to the Boston Consulting Group, leaving more disposable income for residents to buy insurance products.
 Sino-French Holdings also granted an option to a company owned by gambling tycoon Stanley Ho pledging to buy a 9 percent stake in Macau Power from Ho’s company, NWS said.
May 14 (Bloomberg) -- Huntington Bancshares Inc, the Ohio lender that agreed in April to buy 11 Michigan branches from Bank of America Corp, plans to buy 13 more.
 “So far, the market takes it as his sincere desire to avoid a war and some investors are beginning to buy Russia” Autonomy Votes The Market Vectors Russia ETF, the biggest US.
 “Russian equities are cheap, but that doesn’t mean it’s time to buy,” Ilya Kravets, the New York-based director of investment research at Daniloff Capital LLC, said by phone on on May 9.
 Buffett is constantly on the prowl for companies to buy with his cash pile.
 Two other members of Samsung Group are combining, with Samsung SDI Co, a supplier of batteries to Apple, agreeing to buy chemical and electronic materials maker Cheil Industries Inc.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- Cobham Plc agreed to buy Aeroflex Holding Corp.
 “Anti-Tesla” language was added to a state House bill at the request of car dealers that explicitly requires consumers to buy vehicles through franchise dealerships, Tesla said yesterday in a statement.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 Accor SA climbed after agreeing to buy hotels in Europe.
 abandoned its effort to buy the drugmaker.
 drugmaker, ended its six-month effort to buy the UK.
 Nova has now secured an agreement to buy Hess Corp.
 made an unsolicited $62 billion offer to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 Four investors have agreed to buy 31 percent of the stock on offer.
 The 150-year-old lender is raising the money to plug a capital deficit that was uncovered after its failed attempt to buy branches from Lloyds Banking Group Plc.
 The system of offering wealthy parents the opportunity to buy a place at the school of their choice is entrenched in the former British colony and “will flourish for as long as the demand for places at the best schools exceeds supply,” said Nicholas Brummitt, chairman of the international-schools consultant.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Flipkart, India’s largest multibrand online retailer, agreed to buy competitor Myntracom as it seeks to widen its lead over Amazoncom Inc.
 that year, and by 2010 agreed to buy shares it didn’t already own in fund manager DundeeWealth Inc.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- China Southern Airlines Co, Asia’s biggest carrier by passenger numbers, agreed to buy 80 single-aisle jets with a list value of at least $73 billion from Airbus Group NV, as a growing economy fuels travel demand.
May 30 (Bloomberg) -- Singapore Airlines Ltd, Asia’s biggest carrier by market value, will spend S$400 million ($319 million) buying stock in budget carrier Scoot Pte, boosting the capital of its subsidiary which plans to buy Boeing Co.
 “It’s fun to see what well-known people have collected over the years and then have the chance to buy the wine” Romanee-Conti The top lot of Ferguson’s collection is a six-liter methuselah of Romanee-Conti Domaine de la Romanee-Conti 1997 with a high estimate of HK$1 million.
 He raised Qiwi to buy from hold on May 23, setting a price target at $5237 per share.
 has agreed to buy the power under a long-term contract.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- Numericable Group, the cable carrier that agreed last month to a $23 billion deal to buy operator SFR, is in exclusive talks to also take over Virgin Mobile in France from Virgin Group Ltd.
May 12 (Bloomberg) -- Ramsay Health Care Ltd, Australia’s biggest operator of private hospitals, and Credit Agricole SA offered to buy most of Generale de Sante for about $11 billion to gain private hospitals in France.
 T-Mobile ‘Interest’ Ergen last year also offered to buy wireless provider Sprint Corp, only to be outbid by SoftBank Corp.
 Czech billionaire Petr Kellner’s PPF Group NV, which bought 66 percent of the phone company from Spain’s Telefonica SA last year, said yesterday after the stock market closed it will offer to buy the rest of the company for 29515 koruna a share.
 Market Consolidation Europe’s communications market is consolidating as Vodafone Group Plc in March agreed to buy Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA.
 Dodd-Frank Act’s Volcker Rule, which limits the amount of their own money they may use to buy and sell riskier securities.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 The firm this month agreed to buy 20 percent of the financial-services business of retailer Canadian Tire Corp.
 Now they’re telling investors to buy insurance against a potential plunge in the shares.
 are among those seeking to buy Telecom Italia SpA’s mobile-phone towers in Brazil, according to people familiar with the matter.
 “There is no offer of any kind to buy Tim,” Abreu said to reporters in Brasilia today.
May 27 (Bloomberg) -- Accor SA agreed to buy hotels in Germany, the Netherlands and Switzerland for about 900 million euros ($123 billion) as part of a plan to boost the company’s real estate holdings.
 Accor, Europe’s biggest hotel operator, set up its HotelInvest unit to buy properties last year after reversing a previous plan to sell assets and focus on management.
 “We have consistently denied such rumors in the past and continue to do so” Teva made its latest offer in November and it may potentially seek to buy as much as 568 percent of Cipla, the publication cited an unnamed merchant banker as saying.
 in April agreed to buy smaller competitor Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 LSE confirmed last week that it is in exclusive talks to buy the indexing and fund-management unit of Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co.
 Professional money managers, meanwhile, are still piling in and using borrowed money to buy them up.
 Professional investors are using borrowed cash to buy top-rated bonds of collateralized loan obligations that are backed by the risky debt, the Barclays strategists wrote.
 AT&T’s bid this week to buy satellite-TV provider DirecTV for $485 billion comes three months after Comcast proposed a $452 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Bond Buyback Covalent clinched a deal with its bondholders in October 2012 to buy back some of the securities and extend their maturity, after finding it was unable to repay about 53 billion yen in bonds, according to the company.
May 14 (Bloomberg) -- AT&T Inc’s plan to buy US.
 Setting aside grand visions of European expansion, AT&T is in advanced talks to buy DirecTV for about $50 billion, people with knowledge of the situation said this week.
 tries to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Now, with AT&T courting DirecTV, its ambitions to buy Vodafone are probably postponed for at least a year, said John Hodulik, an analyst with UBS AG.
 as it tries to win regulatory approval to buy T-Mobile, said Bienenstock.
 Vodafone has used the funds from its Verizon sale to buy fixed assets of its own, agreeing to pay about $10 billion for Spain’s Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in March, following a takeover of Germany’s Kabel Deutschland Holding AG last year.
 Telefonica had considered options for DTS including teaming up with Mediaset Espana Comunicacion SA, a unit of former Italian Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi’s Mediaset SpA that holds the remaining 22 percent of DTS, or with Al Jazeera to buy the asset, a person familiar with the matter said in March.
 Watt, the overseer of Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, is loosening rules that have forced banks to buy back billions of dollars worth of flawed home loans in an effort to spur the housing market.
 Money Manager Admits to Operating $96 Million Ponzi Scheme A New York money manager pleaded guilty to running a $96 million Ponzi scheme that was used to buy luxury homes and cars and to finance an unprofitable resort in eastern Long Island, prosecutors said.
 Two Houses Prosecutors said Frederick and Hough, who was convicted of filing false returns for 2005, 2007 and 2008, used funds in undeclared offshore accounts to buy an airplane, two houses in North Carolina and a condominium in Sarasota, Florida.
 is in talks to buy a stake in Ivanhoe’s Kamoa copper project in the Congo, people with knowledge of the matter said in March.
 securities arm recently created a group to buy home loans from other lenders.
 Bond investors are getting a chance to buy housing debt without government backing, though those offerings are coming through Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac.
 Network upgrades, driven by mobile devices, are making up for weaker demand as companies build their own equipment, using software to buy fewer machines.
 The British bank is looking for investors to buy a stake inits operations in the Republic or for another bank to merge withthe division, allowing RBS to dilute its holding, after rackingup 17 billion pounds of losses from bad loans in the worst real-estate crash in western Europe.
 North American operations posted a loss due to buying the rest of Chrysler Group LLC.
 Paramount Holdings Services Ltd, an investment vehicle owned and controlled by former Qatari Prime Minister Sheikh Hamad Bin Jassim Bin Jabr Al Thani, agreed to buy 60 million Deutsche Bank shares at 2920 euros apiece, the bank said late yesterday.
 after agreeing to buy the equivalent of 49 percent of the bank in 2007.
 In the same way Apple and Amazon use digital entertainment to get people to buy higher-margin electronics, Nike’s ultimate aim is to persuade its customers to buy more shoes, shirts and sweats.
 agreed to buy Argentine government bonds from oil producer Repsol SA for $2 billion, bringing its purchases of the Latin American country’s securities to almost $5 billion in the past week.
 Nordex SE gained 41 percent to 1220 euros after Deutsche Bank AG raised the German turbine maker to buy from hold.
 The company agreed to buy oil broker PVM Oil Associates Ltd.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- John Malone’s Liberty Global Plc reported quarterly revenue that beat estimates while saying the European Union will probably extend a probe into its agreement to buy Dutch cable operator Ziggo NV.
 Succession Plans Liberty Global said it bought back almost $400 million of its stock in the first quarter and is committed to buying back a further $31 billion in the period from April 1 through December 2015.
 In February, Malone set succession plans in motion by giving Fries and the CEO of Discovery Communications Inc, David Zaslav, the right to buy his stakes should he decide to sell.
 Part of the loan that IVG’s fund used to buy its share of the building was in Swiss francs, which have gained about 67 percent against the pound over the last seven years.
 Tongling city in the eastern province of Anhui will give tax breaks to buyers of homes that are 144 square meters or less if they are the family’s only home, according to a statement from the city’s government yesterday.
 AGL’s A$151 billion ($141 billion) deal to buy government-owned power plants in New South Wales was blocked in March by the nation’s antitrust regulator on concern that it would reduce competition.
 Valeant is trying to buy the Botox producer with the help of Bill Ackman’s Pershing Square Capital Management LP, Allergan’s biggest shareholder.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- Kindred Healthcare Inc, a provider of long-term medical care, made an unsolicited offer to buy Gentiva Health Services Inc.
 and 125 Summer St, and team with JPMorgan Chase & Co’s asset-management unit to buy three other properties: 60 State St, 225 Franklin St.
 “It’s more difficult to buy than it was two or three years ago,” said Matthias Wildhaber who manages the Julius Baer fund.
 Pfizer Inc, the largest US, drugmaker, yesterday abandoned its effort to buy AstraZeneca Plc for 694 billion pounds ($117 billion), saying the public bid rejected by its London-based competitor represented “full value” AstraZeneca said it welcomed “the opportunity to continue building on the momentum we have already demonstrated” Under UK.
 There are likely shareholders on both sides that want this to happen” Pfizer has declined to say if it will try again to buy AstraZeneca after the UK.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in his March budget that pushed retirees to buy an annuity with their pension savings.
 Watt also announced he was loosening rules that have forced banks to buy back billions of dollars worth of flawed home loans they sold to the two mortgage financiers, a move designed to spur the housing market.
 Pooling Money Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc, 39 percent owned by Rupert Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc, said this week it’s in talks to buy the Italian and German pay-TV assets of Fox.
 If you’re going to buy a high flyer, I’d rather buy Tesla” Elon Musk, chief executive officer of the Palo Alto, California-based Tesla, is planning to add a mass-market electric car in about three years, powered by battery packs.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Investors demanded mostly higher relative yields to buy securities tied to rental houses managed by Blackstone Group LP’s Invitation Homes as the largest single-family landlord completed the new market’s biggest deal.
May 28 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP is in talks to buy Oyatsu Co, the 65-year-old Japanese maker of crispy snacks, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 mobile-phone carrier, made an approach to buy DirecTV.
 Investors rushed to buy the shares in the city’s bourse last month after the city’s regulator and China Securities Regulatory Commission unveiled plans on April 10 to connect the stock exchanges of Hong Kong and Shanghai for cross-border trading.
 Ren acknowledges that Huawei faces a challenge to convince customers to buy its smartphones amid intense competition.
 Wells Fargo In 2009, Fannie Mae asked lenders to buy back $124 billion of mortgages, according to a regulatory filing.
 The trust fund “is quickly running toward insolvency” Both Wyden and Camp say they’re seeking a long-term funding solution, while also considering some kind of stopgap patch to buy more time this year.
 That may present an obstacle to buyers that want a specialist benchmarking business.
 RBC Capital Markets raised its recommendation on Germany’s biggest utility to outperform, similar to buy, from underperform.
 Co-Operative Bank Plc pulled out of a 700 million-pound deal to buy the operation in April 2013, forcing Lloyds to seek an extension of the deadline.
 “This is a business that we expect investors to buy and hold as we grow,” Pester said on the conference call.
 Irish Case The lack of a new market entrant would set the German case apart from Ireland, where Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s attempt to buy Telefonica’s local unit may be facilitated by Liberty Global Plc stepping in to offer mobile-phone services in the country.
 The Dublin-based airline agreed to buy five more Boeing Co.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- Sullivan & Cromwell LLP represented AT&T Inc, which plans to buy DirecTV for $485 billion, gaining more than 38 million video subscribers at home and in Latin America.
May 23 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co’s offer to buy Treasury Wine Estates Ltd.
 In 1950, in a bid to diversify away from Bertelsmann’sreligious roots, Mohn founded the “Lesering,” a book club inwhich customers committed to buy multiple titles annually at adiscount.
 In 2010, Alibaba agreed to buy online marketplace companies Vendio Services Inc.
 The idea was broadly to know if GE would be welcome if talks with Alstom were to start” For all Gaymard’s political savvy, GE was unsuccessful in a 2009 attempt to buy Areva T&D, which makes power-grid equipment.
 Our shares will benefit from a recovery in mining as well” Cochrane said in February he’s looking to buy more mining, oil, gas and valves companies following the acquisitions of drilling control company Mathena Inc.
 Technology to do that is the top selling point for 39 percent of auto buyers, more than twice the 14 percent who say their first consideration is traditional performance measures such as power and speed, according to a study consulting firm Accenture released in December.
May 12 (Bloomberg) -- Freddie Mac, which along with Fannie Mae has forced home lenders to buy back tens of billions of dollars of flawed mortgages, said the companies are loosening rules that made banks more cautious about extending credit.
 While expanding beyond the suburbs into the countryside will cost more money, AT&T could make up for that by getting customers to buy bigger service packages with wireless, TV and home-security systems.
 Corporate landlords are looking to the debt market for capital to buy more houses and increase returns by adding leverage to the properties they purchased with cash.
 “Results of utilities were better than expected, and this encourages investors to buy Brazilian stocks,” Paulo Brito, an investment manager at the brokerage firm HPN Invest, said by phone from Recife, Brazil.
 Brokers are seeking to buy overseas firms as property investment rises and more buyers are willing to purchase assets outside their region.
May 12 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks rose to their highest level in more than six years, as mining companies advanced, and Sky Deutschland AG rallied after British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc said it’s in talks to buy the company.
 companies trying to buy a foreign company and relocate their headquarters to a lower-tax country would have to ensure that shareholders of the non-US.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Sullivan & Cromwell LLP represented Bayer AG in its agreement to buy Merck & Co’s consumer unit for $142 billion.
 Novartis has agreed to buy cancer drugs from GlaxoSmithKline PLC for as much as $16 billion, while selling most of its vaccines division to Glaxo and its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 abandoned its attempt to buy the drugmaker.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA led an advance of raw-material producers after announcing a plan to buy back shares.
 “The American markets are closed, so investors prefer to buy stocks of commodity producers, which are always a safe haven,” Sandro Fernandes, a trader at the brokerage firm Geraldo Correa, said in a phone interview from Belo Horizonte, Brazil.
 CSN plans to buy back as many as 583 million shares by June 25, according to a regulatory filing after the market closed May 23.
 The CEO said he’s keen to find more deals like the agreement this month to buy most of Rolls-Royce Inc’s energy assets for $13 billion.
 He said that he sees no good reason to buy a robot-maker, prompting shares in KUKA AG to decline yesterday as much as 34 percent.
 and Ellerston Capital Ltd, to buy as much as 98 percent of its shares if the bid is recommended.
May 6 (Bloomberg) -- Ultratech Cement Ltd, India’s biggest maker of the material, is looking to buy the local assets of Holcim Ltd.
 The company was in talks to buy a second cement unit in Himachal Pradesh from India’s only Formula One track builder, the person said.
 Second-Tier Markets “We are determined to transform Awas into a clearinghouse for other lessors,” Sisson said, meaning companies that want to move older planes out of the portfolio can turn to Awas as a partner to buy them, find new airline customers to rent the jets, or even have the aircraft scrapped for parts.
 The Irish government set up NAMA to buy 712 billion euros of property loans from Irish banks as part of a bid to save the country’s economy from collapse.
May 9 (Bloomberg) -- NorthStar Realty Finance Corp, a property investor and lender, agreed to buy a majority stake in 47 US.
 investors are learning a hard lesson today: The chain isn’t the only place to buy organic kale anymore.
 The fund Ergen used to buy the debt, SP Special Opportunities LLC, wasn’t technically prohibited from making the purchases because it was owned by him and not Dish, Chapman said.
 The insurer, which changed its name from Resolution Ltd, has slumped 15 percent this year after Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy annuities with their pension savings.
 The subsidiary completed its acquisition of Nevada’s largest electric utility in December and announced a deal this week to buy SNC-Lavalin Group Inc’s AltaLink for about $29 billion to expand in electricity transmission in western Canada.
 It agreed to buy SeeWhy, a Boston-based maker of marketing software designed to increase e-commerce sites’ conversion of visitors into buyers, for an undisclosed price yesterday.
 In March it agreed to buy Fieldglass Inc, a maker of online human-resources software.
 Goldman Sachs upgraded its rating on the shares to buy from neutral, saying volume growth may offset pricing challenges.
 The idea was broadly to know if GE would be welcome if talks with Alstom were to start” For all Gaymard’s political savvy, GE was unsuccessful in a 2009 attempt to buy Areva T&D, which makes power-grid equipment.
 pork producer, made an unsolicited $62 billion offer to buy Hillshire Brands Co, trumping a competing bid from Pilgrim’s Pride Corp.
 The proposed takeover is subject to Hillshire terminating a $52 billion agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, owner of the Birds Eye frozen foods brand.
 Merger Wave Comcast’s $45 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable, announced in February, and AT&T’s May 18 deal to buy DirecTV for $485 billion are part of a wave of merger activity in the telecommunications industry.
 That is not good, but it’s not nearly as bad as the forecast of the death of the annuity industry” Shares of Just Retirement have slumped 40 percent since Chancellor Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in his 2014 budget that pushed retirees to buy annuities with their pension savings.
 Abandoned Proposal The miner abandoned a proposal to buy out its Australian unit, Yancoal Australia Ltd, in March, with the company’s chief financial officer saying the privatization wasn’t in the interests of shareholders.
 Sony previously agreed to sell its PC division, which produces notebooks under the Vaio brand, to buyout firm Japan Industrial Partners Inc.
 agreed to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 “Today you need at least 20 percent of the property’s value saved up before you can attempt to buy it” His Madrid-based firm, Acuna & Asociados, estimates that 40 percent of unsold housing units will never find buyers due to their undesirable location and because workers earning 1,000 euros a month -- known as “mil euristas” -- aren’t able to stump up deposits.
May 13 (Bloomberg) -- Skadden Arps Slate Meagher & Flom LLP is advising Hillshire Brands Co, the maker of Jimmy Dean meats, on its deal to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 Telefonica had considered options for DTS including teaming up with Mediaset or with Al Jazeera to buy the asset, a person familiar with the matter said in March.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- Russia is preparing to buy palladium from local producers, chiefly OAO GMK Norilsk Nickel, Interfax cited the head of the state metals depositary as saying.
 I myself as a businessman would be interested to buy” Palladium pared losses and traded 06 percent higher at $81675 by 1:32 pm.
 rose 3 percent to C$339 after its board approved a plan to buy back as much as 10 percent of the company’s public shares.
 Last month, Vivendi SA snubbed Bouygues’s offer to buySFR, France’s second-largest phone operator, and agreed insteadto sell it to Altice SA in a deal valued at more than 17 billioneuros.
 Salamander Energy Salamander Energy Plc jumped 10 percent to 1475 pence, the highest price since July, after saying it has held formal talks with bidders after receiving approaches to buy some or all of its assets.
 mobile-phone operator from offering to buy Vodafone until the end of July.
May 12 (Bloomberg) -- German stocks advanced, extending two weeks of gains for the benchmark DAX Index, as Sky Deutschland AG rallied after British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc started talks to buy the company.
 The company may be close to buying Brazilian sugar assets from Bunge, Exane said.
 Analysts at Citigroup led by Alexander Robarts raised the recommendation on the meatpacker to buy from the equivalent of hold, citing productivity gains and expectations for higher sales with the World Cup in Brazil, according to a note to clients dated yesterday.
 “Investors don’t like it” as it costs more for London-based investors to buy Class B shares, which are not subject to Dutch withholding tax, said Iain Reid, an analyst at BMO Capital Markets Ltd.
 “We are working hard on solutions to give us the flexibility to buy back both A and B shares” Shell increased first-quarter dividends by about 4 percent to 47 cents a share from a year ago, it said April 30.
May 13 (Bloomberg) -- Northern Star Resources Ltd, an Australian gold producer, plans to buy a Newmont Mining Corp.
 earlier this week maintained its underperform recommendation on Bumi’s notes, with a high-yield analyst at the debt researcher, Sandra Chow, saying “nobody really knows what’s going on there, whether they are genuinely out of cash and trying to buy some time” Distressed debt from Indonesia has fallen 149 percent this quarter, the worst performance in an index of 17 developing nations tracked by Bank of America Merrill Lynch.
 ADIB last month agreed to buy the conventional retail assets of Barclays in the UAE.
 Mortgage applications to buy homes plunged 19 percent from a year earlier, indicating slowing demand during what is typically the busiest season for deals.
 Nunes said he didn’t know yet where or how much the company would spend to buy additional timberlands, from which it can sell logs and in some cases develop into real estate.
 counterparts in questioning the economic impact of the drugmaker’s push to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 Read is set to speak about his proposal to buy AstraZeneca at two separate UK.
 Last year, Apollo acquired FinanMadrid, an auto and consumer loan provider, from Bankia and in September agreed to buy Evo Banco, part of the banking business of nationalized Spanish lender NCG Banco SA, for 60 million euros.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Millhouse LLC, billionaire Roman Abramovich’s investment company, and OAO Pharmstandard, Russia’s biggest drugmaker, plan to buy Biocad, a biotechnology firm.
 An affiliate of Millhouse will purchase 50 percent of Biocad while Pharmstandard is set to buy 20 percent, the companies said in a joint statement today.
 Millhouse plans to buy its stake from OAO Gazprombank, Russia’s third-largest lender, according to John Mann, a spokesman for the investment company.
 California regulators in October ordered the state’s utilities to buy 1,325 megawatts of energy storage by 2020.
 and Ellerston Capital Ltd, to buy as much as 98 percent of its shares if the bid is recommended.
 Patrick Gallagher announced a deal in April to buy brokering operations from Australia’s Wesfarmers Ltd.
 SodaStream Competition Under today’s agreement, Coca-Cola owns about 195 million shares and has the right to buy as much as 65 million more.
 make a rival offer to buy Hillshire Brands Co, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Vinmar International Ltd, a closely held company based in Houston, signed a 15-year contract in January to buy all the plant’s production and take a 10 percent stake in the facility.
 Management led by former Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s co-head of Brazilian investment banking Fabio Bicudo is seeking to bolster finances amid project delays that have increased costs and forced the company to buy on the spot market at a time of record prices, deepening its losses.
 You have to buy on the dips” ‘New Normal’ China’s President Xi Jinping said this month that the nation needs to adapt to a “new normal” in the pace of economic growth.
 Beef with the component can be cheaper than meat without it, which may appeal to buyers seeking less pricey options, he said.
 Novartis agreed to buy Glaxo’s cancer business for as much as $16 billion, form a consumer-health joint venture with Glaxo, sell its veterinary unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Landesbank Hessen-Thueringen Girozentrale and other lenders said 400 million pounds in loans used to buy the property should be repaid ahead of money owed to Bayerische Landesbank under the swaps, according to court documents at a hearing yesterday.
 agreed to buy it for about $66 billion including debt.
 Renewable Energy agreed on May 21 to buy Tyson Foods Inc’s 50 percent stake in Dynamic Fuels LLC.
 agreed in December 2012 to buy a 49 percent stake in Virgin Atlantic.
 While its repurchase program lets it acquire shares once owned by AT&T when they’re in the open market, America Movil has no plans to buy any significant portion of AT&T’s stake, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the matter is private.
 ‘Positive Message’ Slim could also opt to buy shares directly, Legarreta said.
 has agreed to buy the UK’s Channel 5, according to a person with knowledge of the situation who asked not to be named because the deal hasn’t been announced.
 offered to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 Last week, Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy a portfolio with a par value of 18 billion euros from McDonagh’s organization, the National Asset Management Agency.
 Goldman Sachs Hibernia last week agreed to buy two offices, with tenants including Goldman Sachs Group Inc, in Dublin’s city center, in a deal which valued the buildings at 60 million euros.
 That goes against the playbook of Apple co-founder Steve Jobs, who never paid more than a few hundred million dollars for an acquisition, choosing to buy small companies designed to bring in technology and talent.
 The biggest-ever acquisition was the $400 million Apple paid in 1997 to buy Next Computer Inc.
 Modus Operandi A deal to buy Beats would be unlike anything Jobs ever did, and shows that Cook is taking his predecessor’s advice to heart.
 agreed in February to buy more than 1,700 Plug systems for six North American distribution centers.
 Accor agreed to buy hotels in Germany, the Netherlands and Switzerland for about 900 million euros, according to a statement today.
 He took advantage of relaxed rules on foreign ownership to buy out other investors in the Indian unit to bring the holding to 100 percent last month.
 Still, AT&T’s agreement this week to buy US.
May 26 (Bloomberg) -- Kakao Corp, South Korea’s largest mobile messaging service, agreed to buy Daum Communications Corp.
May 14 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Wohnen AG, Germany’s second-largest residential landlord by market value, said first-quarter profit rose 91 percent after the company took advantage of rising share prices to buy more homes.
 Transportation Secretary Anthony Foxx said last week a short-term infusion of general funds will probably be needed to buy more time for a long-term solution.
 It acquired Wuxi Suntech Power in April for 3 billion yuan ($480 million), the biggest panel maker in 2012, and this month agreed to buy an inverter company.
 Both homebuilders were raised to buy at Citigroup Inc, which cited an improved outlook for valuations.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 Oil Search has contested Total’s agreement to buy part of InterOil’s project, saying the deal breached its pre-emptive rights.
 Investors from outside the six-nation Gulf Cooperation Council aren’t allowed to buy Saudi listed shares directly, and instead access the market through equity swaps and exchange-traded funds.
 made a $68 billion offer to buy the company, trumping a competing bid from Pilgrim’s Pride Corp.
 Man Group Plc rose 5 percent after saying it has held talks to buy Boston-based money manager Numeric Holdings LLC.
 IMI added 3 percent to 1,608 pence as UBS raised its rating on the maker of valves for liquified-natural-gas projects to buy from neutral.
 While Sony rejected the plan in August, it said in February it would sell its PC business to buyout firm Japan Industrial Partners Inc.
 SolarCity installs rooftop solar panels at little to no upfront cost to customers who sign long-term contracts to buy the power.
 that year, and by 2010 agreed to buy shares it didn’t already own in fund manager DundeeWealth Inc.
 drugmaker, yesterday abandoned its effort to buy AstraZeneca Plc for 694 billion pounds ($117 billion), saying the public bid rejected by its London-based competitor represented “full value” AstraZeneca said it welcomed “the opportunity to continue building on the momentum we have already demonstrated” Under UK.
 ‘Compelling’ Offer Pfizer has declined to say if it will try again to buy AstraZeneca after the UK.
May 5 (Bloomberg) -- Emperador Inc, the brandy maker that gets almost all its revenue from the Philippines, fell the most in five months in Manila trading after confirming talks to buy Scottish spirits company Whyte & Mackay to expand overseas.
 Banco Santander Brasil SA, the Brazilian unit of Spain’s biggest bank, may move as magazine Veja reported that it’s negotiating to buy Banco Bonsucesso.
 Randstad Holding NV advanced 31 percent as UBS AG advised investors to buy shares in the biggest Dutch staffing company.
 UBS raised its rating on the stock to buy from neutral, saying the company will witness profit growth if the economic recovery continues.
 Adecco advanced 09 percent to 7315 Swiss francs after UBS raised its rating on the world’s largest supplier of temporary workers to buy from sell.
 dealers have long been protected by state laws requiring drivers to buy from franchised stores.
 In April, the Oakbrook, Illinois-based company agreed to buy Protenergy Natural Foods, a developer and maker of private-label soups and broths, to expand its offerings.
 Fitch Ratings called the deal a medium-term positive for China’s gas sector, while Bank of America Merrill Lynch raised China Gas to buy from neutral, saying it will improve the company’s sales after northeastern China begins to receive the new supply from 2018.
 raised its recommendation on Beijing Enterprises to buy from hold with a target price of HK$80.
 “We’re very pleased with the ability to get a securitization done and lower our cost of capital, which will enhance our opportunities to buy attractive assets and enhance the returns to our stakeholders along the way,” American Homes Chief Executive Officer David Singelyn said.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 agreed to buy for $291 billion earlier this year, is introducing the Moto E, an affordable smartphone aimed at emerging markets.
 A measure of personal finances retreated for the third time in four weeks, and a gauge of whether this is a good time to buy goods and services dropped to the lowest point since mid-February.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 Under its proposal, a group of states would set a price for carbon that would be added to the cost to buy and sell electricity on their regional wholesale market.
 “From an antitrust standpoint, it might become rather difficult for anybody else in orthopedics to buy them” other than Stryker, the analyst said in a phone interview.
 He never sold anything” He’s still buying -- and a sale of the Clippers would bring hundreds of millions of dollars to buy even more.
 Rent Growth “The Westside is very pricey, but it does make sense to buy there still because you’re seeing a lot of rent growth,” Palmer said.
 While Sterling may be able to afford to buy more if he sells the Clippers, he probably won’t always get a warm reception, said Dean Zander, a senior partner at Hendricks-Berkadia, the apartment investment-banking unit of Berkadia Commercial Mortgage LLC.
 Mitsubishi UFJ purchased Thai lender Bank of Ayudhya Pcl for about $5 billion in December, its biggest acquisition in Asia outside of Japan, and Sumitomo Mitsui agreed to buy 40 percent of Indonesia’s PT Bank Tabungan Pensiunan Nasional for about $15 billion last May.
 nuclear operator, on its agreement to buy Pepco Holdings Inc.
 for opportunities to buy discarded assets.
 Eduardo Cortes, who helps manage $16 billion of debt at GIA Partners LLC, including America Movil dollar bonds, said he’s unlikely to buy the peso securities because their performance is too dependent on swings in the exchange rate.
 and Fox businesses, attempted to buy the remaining 61 percent of BSkyB.
 Legg Mason that same month agreed to spend as much as $41 million to buy QS Investors, a global quantitative equity firm that split from Deutsche Bank AG in 2010.
 Patrick’s administration requested $50 million in additional funding from the federal government in March for the Connector, and plans to buy technology from hCentive Inc, a Reston, Virginia-based company with products that are used by functional exchanges in Colorado and Kentucky, Iselin said.
 Officials in Maryland, whose exchange also failed, have asked for $45 million to buy replacement technology for their system to try to fix their system.
 The company will issue convertible preferred stock to Sycamore, giving it the right to buy as much as 5 percent of Aeropostale common stock at $725 a share, the closing price on March 12.
 Contracts to buy previously owned houses in the US.
 I wouldn’t be surprised if this became a staple use of funds for the Canadian market” Canadian companies spent $356 billion to buy other firms this year, and $133 billion this quarter, on pace for the slowest quarter since the first three months of 2011, Bloomberg data show.
 Parkland spent at least $7102 million to buy 13 companies since 2007, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The Dubai-based bank, the oldest Sharia-complaint lender in the world, said at the start of the month that it was planning to buy a stake in a Indonesian bank as part of its strategy to expand into Asia and Africa.
 You sign a 20-year contract, agreeing to buy back the electricity your system generates at rates 20 percent to 30 percent below the local utility rates.
 BHP, the world’s largest mining company, is contracted to buy 12,000 tons a year and Jinchuan purchases 13,000 tons annually under its current contract.
 Nomura raised its rating on the stock to buy from neutral, citing expectations of a higher success rate for the company’s nano-drug delivery system formulations.
 made the $5 billion investment in Bank of America in 2011, receiving preferred stock and warrants to buy 700 million shares for $714 apiece.
 In 2008, Buffett paid $5 billion for a preferred stake in Goldman Sachs and warrants to buy $5 billion of stock for $115 a share.
 Dropped Bid CFR, Chile’s biggest drug maker, called off its 128-billion rand cash and stock offer to buy Adcock on Feb.
 jumped 31 percent after reports that Rupert Murdoch’s British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc is in talks to buy European pay TV assets from Fox.
 agreed to buy it for about $66 billion including debt.
 BSkyB, 39 percent owned by Fox, said today it’s in talks to buy the Italian and German pay-TV assets of Fox.
 The loan must be repaid within five years, unless the money was used to buy a primary residence.
 The proposed deal that piqued congressional interest this month was Pfizer Inc’s bid to buy AstraZeneca Plc, take advantage of the lower UK.
 made the $5 billion investment in Bank of America in 2011, receiving preferred stock and warrants to buy 700 million shares for $714 apiece.
 That would depend on whether the funds used to buy it were community property.
 Alibaba agreed in April to buy mapping service AutoNavi Holdings Ltd.
 APA reached a deal with Envestra in December to buy the rest of the company after raising an earlier offer.
 To improve profitability, the brewer is selling more expensive beers and reducing costs in regions including Mexico, where it agreed to buy the rest of Corona maker Grupo Modelo SAB in 2012 for about $20 billion.
 will exercise an option to buy closely held CardioMEMS after US.
 Jude initially took a 19 percent stake and the option to buy the remainder of CardioMEMS for $60 million in September 2010.
 Options are derivatives that give the right to buy or sell assets at a set price by a specific date.
 Saudi Arabia pulled out of talks to buy Turkish Anka drones, which would have been the first overseas sale of the aircraft, Cumhuriyet newspaper reported on March 18.
 ‘Going Eastward’ Qatar Islamic Bank is in talks to buy a stake in Turkey’s Asya Katilim Bankasi AS.
May 23 (Bloomberg) -- Atlas Mara Co-Nvest Ltd, the investment firm backed by Robert Diamond, agreed to buy a 77 percent stake in the commercial arm of the Development Bank of Rwanda from the government to expand in East Africa.
 In March, Atlas agreed to buy Sub-Saharan African bank ABC Holdings Ltd.
 He told his family office to buy land -- a bare patch of hillside that he named Decero, or Spanish for “from scratch” “It’s the only place I know where you are the total master of your destiny,” he said of the vineyard.
 natural gas producer, must pay $121 million to three Texas lease holders after failing to persuade an appeals court to overturn a verdict that it reneged on deals to buy mineral rights when prices plunged in 2008.
 He moved to London to be global head of fixed-income sales and trading for UBS the following year and offered to buy a controlling stake in the Swiss bank during the 2008 financial crisis.
 That would depend on whether the funds used to buy it were community property.
 It’s impossible for most investors to pick the right moment to buy and sell shares and during the past two years, the market has quickly rebounded from any decline.
 “Any time you’ve stepped out of the market with the intent to buy it lower, it’s been a very, very challenging thing to do” In the past year, the S&P 500 declined 48 percent from June 18 to June 24, slipped 58 percent from Jan.
 Applied Materials is seeking to capture more market share after agreeing to buy Tokyo Electron Ltd.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA led an advance of raw-material producers, rallying 37 percent after announcing a plan to buy back shares.
 Reckitt, which dropped out of the race to buy Merck’s assets, will “continue to be a predator,” Scheske said.
 agreed to buy the portion of the Hotel del Coronado it doesn’t already own from joint-venture partner Blackstone Group LP in a deal that values the property at $787 million.
 “In South Korea, a lot of the end-users want to buy their own LNG and not go through Korea Gas Corp, so there may not be room for a lot of of long-term contracts,” according to Fesharaki.
 Calls giving owners the right to buy Yahoo’s shares are near the most expensive level ever relative to puts, according to data on six-month options compiled by Bloomberg.
 BSkyB lost 24 percent after saying it has held talks to buy the German and Italian pay-TV assets of 21st Century Fox Inc.
 raised the UK’s largest oil-and-gas engineer to buy from hold after the shares tumbled 20 percent last week.
 The mortgage insurer announced this week that it had agreed to buy Clayton for $305 million to expand outsourcing services for the home-lending industry.
 agreed to buy a 98-year lease for the Port of Newcastle, the world’s biggest export harbor for coal.
 The returns also may attract China’s State Grid, which last year agreed to buy almost 20 percent of Australian power company SP AusNet, said Adrian Atkins, a Sydney-based analyst at Morningstar.
 “There’s an incentive to convert and some holders have” Dana Gas stock soared about 70 percent in the past 12 months, helping prompt investors to buy bonds to exchange for equities, as the company boosted cash flow from Egypt and began arbitration against the government of Iraqi Kurdistan to recover more than $400 million.
May 26 (Bloomberg) -- General Electric Co, seeking France’s approval for its $17 billion bid to buy Alstom SA’s energy division, pledged to keep the power-equipment maker’s nuclear operations in the country.
 French President Francois Hollande and Economy Minister Arnaud Montebourg have called on GE to improve its offer to buy Alstom, which is based in the Paris suburb of Levallois-Perret.
 The transactions came as Temasek in March agreed to buy a 25 percent stake in Hong Kong-based Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s retail arm AS.
 “You had to buy lots of quality paper, the ink, the printing press.
 The Secret Service unraveled a much larger counterfeiting scheme in the months after a convicted armed robber was caught in 2012 trying to use 10 fake $100 bills to buy a Dell laptop at a Brandsmart Store in West Palm Beach.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Bank AG said European shipping lenders may accelerate sales of distressed loans to buyers such as US.
 to buy for $45 billion.
 raised their ratings on the stock to hold from sell, while OCBC Investment Research and AmResearch upgraded to buy from hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
May 28 (Bloomberg) -- Koch Industries Inc, the holding company controlled by billionaire brothers Charles and David Koch, agreed to buy PetroLogistics LP for about $21 billion including debt to gain raw materials used to make plastics.
 The company, based in the Los Angeles suburb of Manhattan Beach, said today it may lead a group to buy part of the National Basketball Association team.
 announced its plans to buy London-based AstraZeneca Plc and become a British company.
 The benchmark rallied the most this month yesterday as Sky Deutschland AG climbed after British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc started talks to buy the broadcaster of Bundesliga soccer games.
 Societe Generale upgraded its recommendation to buy from hold, predicting that the broadcaster will pay a special dividend.
May 1 (Bloomberg) -- Dubai Islamic Bank is in talks to buy a 40 percent stake in an Indonesian Islamic bank as it seeks expansion abroad.
 The aim? Lock in customers by incentivizing them with loyalty points to buy everything from mortgages to grapes from the Cheshunt, England-based retailer.
 The Hudl comes with a raft of Tesco apps to encourage users to buy everything from new release movies and e-books via Tesco’s BlinkBox to its F&F clothing and then pay off their mortgage via a Tesco home loan.
 Users can still obtain Macau currency beyond the legal limit through pawnshops that let customers use UnionPay cards to buy watches, which the stores then repurchase.
 electricity producer, is providing power to 50 residential and commercial users in Vermont who agreed to buy all the output from a local solar farm.
 The customers signed 10-year contracts to buy the electricity.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Bank of Nova Scotia agreed to buy a 20 percent stake in Canadian Tire Corp’s financial-services business for C$500 million ($460 million) in cash, giving it access to the retailer’s customers.
 And earlier this week, the Federal Housing Finance Agency, which oversees the two government-backed mortgage companies, unveiled plans to spur lending by reducing the risk to banks of having to buy back loans that default.
 Bond offerings have been met by feeding frenzies of investors seeking riskier assets, who’ve been tripping over each other to buy and are largely unwilling to sell once they’ve gotten a piece.
 So, there is a time to sell, and a time to buy.
 “We have provided resources to the other talented professionals at Batterymarch and thank them for their professionalism during this transition time” Legg Mason is spending as much as $41 million to buy QS Investors, which split from Deutsche Bank AG in 2010, according to a regulatory filing in March.
 The Tennessee Valley Authority has agreed to buy electricity from the pair of 16-megawatt projects in McNairy County under a long-term contract.
 “There aren’t any reasons to buy Japanese shares at the moment, so investors are excessively reactive to movements in the yen,” said Masaru Hamasaki, a Tokyo-based senior strategist at Sumitomo Mitsui Asset Management Co.
 The company agreed in March to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodity business for $35 billion.
 An acquisition became more likely after Zimmer’s agreement to buy Biomet changed the landscape “pretty dramatically,” Clive said in an e-mail.
 “That needs to be addressed immediately if investment is to be reestablished” The call comes weeks before the commission is set to decide on the combinations of Telefonica SA’s German unit with Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus and Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s bid to buy Telefonica’s Irish unit.
 Vodafone and SFR, the French operator that billionaire Patrick Drahi’s Numericable Group SA agreed to buy last month, extended an alliance today to provide fixed and mobile services for multinational businesses in France.
 The talks follow Comcast Corp’s agreement this year to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 UBS AG raised its rating on the lender to buy from neutral, saying its valuation is attractive and the bank will benefit from an improving Irish economy as retail and commercial lending activity pick up.
 gained 25 percent to 204 pounds as the company agreed to buy assets from Orascom Development Holding AG.
 Barlavi said two of them are hedge fund managers who used year-end bonuses to buy the properties: a $22 million two-bedroom apartment in Midtown, selling for $150,000 above the asking price; and $15 million for a one-bedroom in Tribeca.
 Private-equity firms, hedge funds and other institutional investors have spent more than $20 billion to buy as many as 200,000 rental homes in the last two years.
 The shares plunged by 64 percent to the lowest level in more than three months on March 28, the day after Yahoo Japan said it had agreed to buy eAccess.
 to buy for $45 billion.
 Lawyers for the joint venture that Microsoft, Apple and Sony formed to buy the patents in 2011, Rockstar Consortium Inc, will be following the trial along with Ericsson AB, which bought Nortel’s wireless unit for $1 billion.
 Citigroup had argued the fraud claim should be dismissed because Loreley hasn’t shown that it relied on bank documents to buy the securities.
 The recent TV spots are designed to educate consumers to come to Groupon when they want to buy anything, any time, anywhere.
 It would’ve made a lot more sense to buy that last sweet woody station wagon made by Dodge for less than three grand and drive away to someplace nice.
 So here are a few more freshly made-up rhymes for your consideration: • “Always remember to buy in November” This is the ying to the sell-in-May yang.
 Wack Nasdaq • “If you don’t think January is time to buy Nasdaq, you are wack” Best month by far for the Nasdaq Composite Index with an average 3 percent gain since 1971, twice the S&P 500’s advance, according to the Almanac.
 Buying Helicopters The company, which currently operates in Nigeria and Cameroon, plans to buy seven new helicopters and one fixed-wing aircraft by the third quarter to boost its aviation support services, Makanjuola said.
 The book’s hero, Robert Fairchild, sums it up: “What was it about the international shipping business that was so appealing? Robert wondered as he listened to his former investor bemoan the fact that there weren’t enough shares for Eurkea! Capital to buy.
 mobile-phone carrier, is in talks to buy the satellite-television company, people with knowledge of the situation said.
 The “anti-Tesla” language was added to a state House bill that explicitly requires consumers to buy vehicles through franchise dealers, the company said in a statement.
 The camera maker plans to buy back as many as 17 million shares between today and July 29, it said.
 Fed, ECB An April 2013 survey of 60 central banks by Central Banking Publications and Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc found that 23 percent either owned shares or planned to buy them.
 Customers sign long-term contracts to buy the electricity.
 “It’s a good, old-fashioned squeeze” as investors who bet on lower prices for Treasuries have been forced to buy them as the debt rallied, said David Ader, head of US.
 The securities’ appeal goes beyond their extra yield: The $94 billion corner of the market offers bonds that are easy to buy and sell in relatively large amounts.
 Berkshire’s strategy has been to buy companies ranging from See’s Candies to the Burlington Northern Santa Fe railroad, keep their management and hold them forever.
 The drugmaker being acquired by Actavis Plc agreed to buy Furiex Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 made an unsolicited $62 billion bid to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 “One of the two companies is going to have free capacity to buy something and so the speculation obviously is rampant around Maple Leaf,” said Sam La Bell, a Toronto-based analyst at Veritas Investment Research.
 agreed to buy for $291 billion earlier this year, will shutter the plant in Fort Worth by the end of the year, the company said in an e-mailed statement today.
 who prefer to buy locally made products.
 Emboldened by improving bank creditworthiness, investors are eager to buy their higher-yielding debt after more than five years of near-zero interest rates from the Fed.
 KKR & Co, the buyout firm run by George Roberts and Henry Kravis, offered S$14 billion ($11 billion) to buy the Singapore-based provider of bulk containers.
 Yamada Denki rose 64 percent to 399 yen in Tokyo after saying it will sell convertible bonds and use the proceeds to buy back shares.
 Mobile Assets In April, Frontier agreed to buy 49 percent of Phoenix Aviation in Kenya for $14 million.
 Investcorp agreed to buy a majority stake in Esmalglass from 3i Group Plc in August 2012 in a deal valued at about 200 million euros, the people said.
 “Inflation hasn’t been a concern” A short squeeze is when traders are forced to buy back a security whose price is rising after they sold it short, betting the price would fall.
 Piraeus Bank SA jumped 65 percent to 148 euros as Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch unit upgraded its rating on the stock to buy from underperform, or sell.
 Alpha Bank AE advanced 5 percent to 63 euro cents as the brokerage raised its rating to buy from neutral.
 The company is negotiating final details for a deal to buy local Web-access provider Neotel Pty Ltd.
 Morgan Stanley’s brokerage, the world’s largest by number of advisers, didn’t distinguish in its policy between a client’s indication of interest in an IPO and a conditional request to buy, the industry-funded watchdog group said today in a statement.
 “Customers must understand when they are entering a contract to buy shares in an IPO,” Brad Bennett, Finra’s chief of enforcement, said in the statement.
 “There must not be ambiguity regarding the customer’s obligations given the significant legal differences between an indication of interest and a conditional offer to buy” Brokers often gauge clients’ interest in IPOs before the offering’s registration.
 ITV has an option to buy the remaining 20 percent of Leftfield after three years and the maximum consideration for the entire company is $800 million, including the initial payment.
 Deutsche Bank AG said last week European shipping lenders may accelerate sales of distressed loans to buyers such as US.
 Loeb had contended Sotheby’s decision to trigger the pill if activist investors buy more than 10 percent of its shares, while allowing passive investors to buy as much as 20 percent, was unfair.
 jumped to a record after Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, China’s biggest e-commerce company, agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in the company to develop its logistics in Southeast Asia.
 to buy distressed assets from the Resolution Trust Corp.
 These so-called carve-outs are giving private-equity firms something to buy and clean up, at a time when leveraged buyouts of entire companies have all but stopped, as US.
 “In an environment where it’s difficult to pay a premium to buy publicly traded companies, divestitures are one of the most attractive deals for private equity,” said Chris Sullivan, head of the Americas financial sponsors group -- which is charged with advising private-equity firms on deals -- at Barclays Plc.
 Recent carve-out transactions include Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC’s agreement in February to buy Ashland Inc’s water technologies business for $18 billion, and TPG Capital’s deal to acquire energy company Encana Corp’s Jonah Field natural gas properties for $18 billion in March.
 “If business growth slows, companies have to buy things,” he said.
 announced in February that Carlyle agreed to buy its industrial packaging business for $32 billion after shareholder activist Relational Investors LLC pushed management to consider shrinking the business.
 ambulatory surgery centers, agreed to buy Sheridan Healthcare for $235 billion to add the country’s biggest provider of anesthesia services.
 Ford, which yesterday announced plans to buy back $18 billion of its shares, saw its stock rise 23 percent to $1581 today at the close in New York.
May 19 (Bloomberg) -- Vodacom Group Ltd, the wireless operator with the most South African customers, agreed to buy local Internet provider Neotel Pty Ltd.
 That compares with a 32 percent drop on May 12, the day Hillshire offered to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, which makes Birds Eye frozen vegetables.
 The undated notes will convert to equity if the bank’s capital falls to 5125 percent of assets weighted by risk and the company has the right to buy them back after five years, the person said.
 bank, got permission to buy back an additional $500 million shares for a total of $65 billion, and to raise its dividend by 2 cents.
 *** Remember at the start of the year, when the common wisdom was to buy stocks and sell bonds? Neither does the bond market.
May 14 (Bloomberg) -- Comcast Corp’s bid to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Sprint/T-Mobile Dish, which failed to buy Sprint last year, would be interested in acquiring T-Mobile if regulators block Sprint’s efforts, Ergen said.
 fails to win regulatory approval for its plan to buy T-Mobile, which is controlled by Deutsche Telekom AG, Ergen said last week.
 “When he brought Apple back from its near-death he didn’t use the profits from the new line of Macs or the iPods to buy Dell.
 BDO funds will prepare to buy when the gauge falls to 6,600, he said.
 “There’s a lot of liquidity in the Philippines and if you use that up just to buy Philippine assets, they become overvalued very fast,” Abrogena said.
 producer of biodiesel from animal fats and grease, agreed to buy Tyson Foods Inc’s 50 percent stake in Dynamic Fuels LLC.
 State-run Abu Dhabi Investment Council also offered to buy the Astir Palace resort in Athens, WAM reported, while Abu Dhabi National Energy Co.
 EON climbed 75 percent after RBC raised its recommendation on the shares to outperform, similar to buy, from underperform.
 agreed to buy the Indian partner of Viacom Inc.
 In February, the company spent $18 billion to buy airwaves to compete with Vodafone Group Plc, the world’s No.
 Transaction Capital last year sold its stake in unsecured lender Bayport Financial Services for 133 billion rand and sold Paycorp Holdings to buyout firm Actis LLP for 937 million rand.
 The company was told by the FBI in March 2009 that hackers had broken into the beverage maker’s computer systems and pilfered files related to its aborted plan to buy China Huiyan Juice Group for $24 billion, according to three people familiar with the situation and an internal company document, Bloomberg News reported in 2012.
 agreed to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 Hillshire, which had about $4 billion in revenue in fiscal year 2013, agreed to buy Van’s Natural Foods for about $165 million last month.
 The long bonds gained as pension funds continued to buy the securities after their yield reached as high as 347 percent following the payrolls report, said David Ader, head of US.
 Pilgrim’s and JBS were puzzled by Hillshire’s agreement to buy Pinnacle because they believed the deal’s promised cost savings were aggressive -- especially considering Pinnacle’s private-equity owners had already made cuts, according to the person.
 agreed to buy its outstanding shares as part of a takeover of Latin American drugstores.
 The agreement, announced last month, will allow overseas investors to buy mainland shares through Hong Kong, while wealthy individuals will be allowed to buy Hong Kong equities through the Shanghai exchange.
 The Hong Kong market requires investors to buy shares in multiples of 100.
 agreed to buy message and calling app Viber for $900 million.
 Atos climbed the most since November 2011 after the French computer-services supplier offered to buy rival Bull for about 620 million euros ($845 million).
 said it had abandoned its effort to buy the UK.
 The dearth of residential listings nationwide is now feeding on itself, with homeowners such as Adler reluctant to sell because of the difficulty in finding a place to buy.
 ‘Shadow Demand’ The “inventory of homes for sale that buyers actually want to purchase is even less than what’s on the market now, and many people who are looking (and qualified) to buy a home are holding off because they can’t find the right one,” Fleming wrote.
 Homebuilders are increasingly catering to buyers who can afford larger, more expensive properties near employment hubs and are cautious about creating housing on more-plentiful land on the outskirts of cities.
 “They are naturally going to approach this up market more conservatively because, for anyone looking at new construction over the last decade, one thing you don’t want is to get out over your skis” Adler, the homeowner, said a local builder approached her a few months ago and said his client wanted to buy her house, built in the 1940s, and renovate it.
 “It would take me inheriting a million dollars to buy something first -- or winning the lottery.
 The offer to buy as many as 104 million shares for 1,030 yen apiece will begin in early November and was approved by both companies, Tokyo-based Mitsubishi Chemical said today in a statement to the Tokyo Stock Exchange.
 Existing shareholders will be given priority to buy the new stock, though some portions will be set aside for financial institutions and the general public, Emaar said.
 BSkyB, 39 percent owned by Fox, said today it’s in talks to buy the Italian and German pay-TV assets of Fox.
 ambulatory surgery centers, which agreed to buy Sheridan Healthcare for $235 billion to add the country’s biggest provider of anesthesia services.
 Front-running was normal,” he said, referring to traders using knowledge about client orders to buy and sell securities for their own books in advance.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- After two months of looking for a home to buy, Brittani Kaufman walked into a townhouse under construction in Glen Burnie, Maryland, in April.
 Raymond Baldwin, 28, pays about $450 a month in fees for the $380,000 FHA loan he and his wife used to buy a house in Sykesville, Maryland, in November.
 Kaufman, the dental hygienist, said she may have to wait to buy a home until she saves more money.
 By comparison, Americans are expected to buy 161 million new cars and trucks this year, according to the average of analyst estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
May 28 (Bloomberg) -- Stockland, Australia’s biggest diversified real estate trust, sweetened its proposal to buy Australand Property Group in an all-share offer valuing the smaller rival at A$25 billion ($23 billion).
 The Netherlands’ benign environment for bitcoin doesn’t stem from its potential as a currency that Dutch citizens might use to buy their bitterballen, a sort of deep-fried meatball that is a national dish.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- A trader paid almost $13 million to buy call options that pay off if the Chicago Board Options Exchange Volatility Index rises at least 56 percent in the next four months.
 Fuel Tax EON climbed 32 percent to 1384 euros after RBC raised its recommendation on the shares to outperform, similar to buy, from underperform.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- Verizon’s top executive scoffed at a report that his company wants to buy a satellite-TV company, calling it “someone’s fantasy” Take note, AT&T.
 spent $130 billion this year to buy out its joint-venture partner in one of the nation’s most advanced wireless networks.
 Sumner Redstone’s company will pay cash to buy the broadcaster from Northern & Shell, the publishing company owned by Richard Desmond.
 oil explorer with a focus on Asia said it has received approaches to buy the company out.
 Siemens also said it agreed to buy some Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc energy assets for $13 billion.
 drugmaker abandoned efforts to buy AstraZeneca Plc for 694 billion pounds ($117 billion) in what would have been the biggest deal ever in the drug industry.
 Atos rose 62 percent after the French computer-services supplier offered to buy rival Bull for about 620 million euros ($844 million).
 One way of looking at it is that maybe they are trying to clean up everything so that they’re more appealing to someone willing to buy them” Shire rose 21 percent to a record 3,450 pence in London.
 Pfizer is seeking to buy London-based AstraZeneca Plc to redomicile in the UK, while Actavis based itself in Ireland after an acquisition six months ago.
 While that means their day-to-day activity doesn’t have to change, it gives them an edge in raising after-tax profits and more cash to use for deals to buy assets or pay dividends.
 The foreign companies they might like to buy will be cheaper for lower-tax rivals, such as Actavis and Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 announced last month that it was buying Tekstilbank AS and Qatar Islamic Bank said on March 26 that was nearing the end of exclusive talks to buy a stake in Asya Katilim Bankasi AS.
 Herbalife, which suspended its dividend last month to increase share repurchases, said May 7 that it had agreed to buy back $266 million of stock from Bank of America Corp.
 The producer may have failed to find assets to buy so far because it may be too “conservative” in its approach, Chief Financial Officer Miguel Martinez said in an investor conference call today.
 “We don’t think investors should be in a rush to buy Brazil,” the analysts wrote.
May 6 (Bloomberg) -- First Reserve Corp’s Sabine Oil & Gas agreed to buy struggling Forest Oil Corp.
 In February, Facebook agreed to buy WhatsApp Inc, which has 500 million users, for about $19 billion.
 sought to buy a piece of Naver Corp’s Line, a similar app that is popular in Japan.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Gold imports by India, the world’s second-biggest user, will probably rise after the Reserve Bank of India allowed more companies to buy the metal from overseas.
 ‘Soft Underbelly’ Poland, which already spends above the European average on defense, plans to sign a deal to buy 70 long-range tactical transport helicopters and to take a share in a missile-defense partnership.
 A non-NATO member, Sweden wants to buy more Jas 39E fighter jets, two more submarines and medium-range anti-aircraft artillery.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Glencore Xstrata Plc is considering an offer to buy manganese assets from Eurasian Natural Resources Corp, the Kazakh miner taken private by its founding shareholders, according to people familiar with the situation.
 While its repurchase program lets it acquire shares once owned by AT&T once they’re in the open market, America Movil has no plans to buy any significant portion of AT&T’s stake, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the matter is private.
 Slim could also opt to buy shares directly, Legarreta said.
 The two companies also joined forces in a failed attempt to buy an indirect stake in Telecom Italia SpA in 2007.
 are leading the sale and the banks, have an option to buy an additional 108 million shares at the closing.
 won European Union approval to buy Telefonica SA’s O2 Irish unit after it pledged to offer access to a smaller mobile operator.
 Hutchison agreed last year to buy O2, Ireland’s No.
 Antinori also today that even with 90 superjumbos still to be delivered, Emirates would be prepared to buy further planes should Airbus commit to adding new engines to improve the jet’s fuel burn by 8 or 9 percent, just as it has done with the re-engined A320neo version of its narrow-body family.
 Berkshire announced in January that it agreed to buy the assets of MyAssist Inc, a concierge and personal-assistant service, from a company founded by Noel.
 PanAust agreed last year to buy Glencore Xstrata Plc’s stake in Frieda River in a deal it expects to be concluded before September, estimating the development costs at as much as $18 billion.
 The spread has widened to 153 basis points as of yesterday, down from a high of 178 basis points following reports of Son’s ambitions to buy T-Mobile in a bid to take on AT&T Inc.
 Previously, only banks got to buy and sell the derivatives on interdealer platforms run by firms such as GFI.
 The new trading systems are aimed at giving investors a better chance to buy and sell swaps with each other rather than banks, potentially increasing competition and cutting costs.
 Sheikh Hamad completed the deal to buy 60 million Deutsche Bank shares without hiring an external advisor, a person with knowledge of the transaction said, asking not to be identified as the details aren’t public.
 Instead, the group may try to raise the value of shares that Eui Sun owns or lower the value of those he needs to buy to take over, Chae said.
 jumped to a record after Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, China’s biggest e-commerce company, agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in the company to develop its logistics in Southeast Asia.
 Third Point expects opportunities to buy assets being divested by banks that need to conform with new regulations, he said.
 plans to buy DirecTV for $485 billion, gaining more than 38 million video subscribers at home and in Latin America and stepping up an acquisition-fueled overhaul of the $110 billion US.
 agreed to buy an NT$117 billion ($388 million) stake in Taiwanese carrier Asia Pacific Telecom Co.
 will purchase 583 million new APT shares in a private placement at NT$20 apiece, a 12 percent premium to its previous closing price, and could introduce international strategic investors to buy a further 244 million new shares, the companies said in exchange filings yesterday.
 “Dividends are a very important part of the puzzle for us but ultimately what we’re looking for at Templeton is to buy a stock that offers us a double over a five-year period including dividends,” said Tuttle, whose group manages C$143 billion in assets.
 Dish and DirecTV have attracted merger speculation as Comcast Corp’s offer to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 mobile-phone carrier, is in talks to buy DirecTV, people with knowledge of the situation said.
 is seeking to buy sugar companies in the Philippines to expand its footprint in Southeast Asia and tap opportunities from a free-trade agreement in the region.
 That strategy depends on signing new deals as it completes construction on projects that power companies have already agreed to buy.
 would have tried to buy the building even if Peter Bren’s company wasn’t the property’s owner, Holte said.
 Vagit Alekperov, the company’s billionaire chief executive officer, also said May 23 that he’d use his 2013 dividend payout of about $600 million to buy Lukoil shares.
 Transactions in the interbank market include loans to other financial institutions and resale agreements, or pacts between two banks under which one borrows from another by using assets as collateral and agrees to buy them back at a later date.
 agreed to buy a 199 percent stake in 58com Inc.
 Tencent in March agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in JDcom and transfer some of its own assets to build a stronger competitor to Alibaba.
 Another option under discussion is for Vnesheconombank, the state development lender, to buy Mechel shares or bonds rather than the creditor banks, the people said.
 “It’s apparent that these are issues from the previous government and the current emir is trying to weather these events” Under the 34-year-old emir’s father, Sheikh Hamad Bin Khalifa Al Thani, Qatar used the world’s third-largest gas reserves to buy stakes in Barclays Plc, Volkswagen AG and purchased London’s Harrods department store.
 health-care real estate investment trust by market value, on its agreement to buy American Realty Capital Healthcare Trust Inc.
 Aviva Life & Annuity Co, based in Des Moines, Iowa, alleged in a complaint filed in December that it was induced to buy the secured notes in April 2010 by Steven Davis, Dewey’s former chairman; Stephen DiCarmine, its former executive director; and Joel Sanders, the ex-finance chief.
 The company tried and failed to buy a casino in Atlantic City.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Dai-ichi Life Insurance Co, Japan’s second-largest life insurer, is in talks to buy Protective Life Corp.
 agreed to buy the Irish company for $429 billion.
 jumped 19 percent after agreeing to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP for $6 billion.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- The biggest surge in oil prices in a year would usually be a reason to buy the securities of energy producers.
June 9 (Bloomberg) -- Man Group Plc, the world’s largest publicly traded hedge-fund firm, agreed to buy a New Jersey investment firm that manages about $1 billion as it tries to add clients and assets in the US.
 With trading profits so thin, few people can transact shares in the volume necessary to keep exchanges supplied with offers to buy and sell.
 Merlin is a new company formed to buy and manage real estate as the Spanish market emerges from a crash.
 Oracle agreed to buy Micros for $53 billion on June 23.
 In this model, the yieldcos sell electricity from power plants, using the revenue to buy more projects, typically from their developer parent companies and other ventures.
 has closed its second deal this month to buy solar power from renewable-energy developer First Wind Holdings Inc.
 Manufacturers including Boeing and Airbus will deliver to buyers about 1,600 aircraft worth $100 billion this year, according to an analysis by Bloomberg Industries.
 Calls to buy the shares this week reached the most expensive since at least 2006 relative to puts to sell, data on six-month options show.
 reached an agreement to buy the rest of Augusta Resource Corp.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- Agrokor dd, Croatia’s largest company, reached final agreement to buy a majority of Slovenian rival Mercator Poslovni Sistem, in a deal worth 13 billion euros ($18 billion), the largest takeover in the Balkans.
 Ping An Insurance, the second biggest, agreed to buy in July 2013 the Lloyd’s of London building from a Commerz Real AG-managed fund for 260 million pounds, according to people familiar with the matter.
 The bond- and derivatives-trading network is seeking to offer investors a way to buy and sell corporate debt at a time when asset managers are struggling to transact in the $98 trillion US.
 Regulatory Squeeze New regulations and declining profits have spurred banks to hold fewer debt securities, making it harder for money managers to find the bonds they want to buy or sell.
 The change is an alert that notifies any investor on the MarketAxess or BlackRock system if an incoming order matches a bond they want to buy or sell, the person familiar with how it works said in November.
 can proceed with a $1 billion plan to build a new vehicle for New York City’s taxi fleet in an appeals court defeat for cab operators who opposed being forced to buy a specific model.
 The commission in September 2012 designated the Nissan NV200 as the official “Taxi of Tomorrow” and required owners of medallions, which confer the right to operate yellow cabs in New York, to buy the $29,700 vehicles.
 Taxi fleet operators sued the city in December 2012 seeking to block the requirement, and a judge halted the program five months later, saying it violated the administrative code because it didn’t allow medallion owners to buy hybrid vehicles.
 Mitsubishi also offered to buy as much as 10 percent of Alstom, a stake valued at about 900 million euros.
 “With fuel costs where they are, no one will drive out of town to buy groceries” Rental costs average 15 percent of sales for Indian retailers, compared with the 8 percent global average, according to consultant Technopak Advisors Pvt.
 By comparison, Americans are expected to buy 161 million new cars and trucks industrywide this year, according to the average of analysts’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Medtronic Inc’s deal to buy Covidien Plc will make the medical device maker No.
 It said March 26 it plans to buy back 360 billion yen of stock, its first such purchase in five years.
 Brokerages are touting stock-picking based on who’s next to buy back shares.
 are working to bridge a $1 billion valuation gap with the owners of Formula One, as they seek to buy a 49 percent stake in the auto-racing series, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 “We advise people to buy cheaper stocks because those have a more reasonable margin of safety” Check Point trades at 176 times estimated profit, compared with an average of 158 over the past five years, Bloomberg compiled data show.
 Tencent Holdings Ltd, Asia’s largest Internet company, added 26 percent in Hong Kong after SocGen-Ji Asia raised it to buy from neutral.
 Apple last month agreed to buy Beats Electronics LLC for $3 billion, partly because of the Beats Music service that gives the iPhone maker a foothold in Internet-based streaming.
 The insurer, which is majority-owned by a fund managed by Apollo, also plans to buy at least some of AmeriHome’s loans that aren’t eligible for government-backed programs, known as non-agency debt, they said.
 and Angel Oak Capital Advisors LLC in seeking to buy new mortgages or invest in originators.
 drugmaker, agreed to buy Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 In April, Kenya’s telecommunications regulator granted approval for Safaricom and Airtel to buy yuMobile and it’s considering awarding licenses for at least three more telecommunications companies.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in his March budget that pushed retirees to buy an annuity with their pension savings.
 Numis raised its recommendation on the shares to buy from hold, saying that first-half earnings will probably climb 16 percent.
 Exane BNP Paribas raised its recommendation on European personal and household-goods companies to overweight, which is similar to buy, from underweight, citing the industry’s growth potential.
 “It is the right next step that will give time for a more considered process that can protect not only the bondholders, but also the tenants and the city” Fortress Investment Group LLC was preparing a $47 billion bid to buy the complex, a person with knowledge of the plan said last month.
 China Central Television, the national broadcaster, said a provincial government was told not to buy computers with Microsoft’s Windows 8, and it quoted a professor calling the software a potential threat to China’s information security.
 The company’s strong brand may appeal to buyers, said Craig Johnson, president of Customer Growth Partners LLC, a New Canaan, Connecticut-based consulting firm.
 Still, suitors may be hesitant to buy a company that’s so unstable financially, said Jaime Katz, a Chicago-based analyst at Morningstar Inc.
 Berkshire agreed last year to buy Hartford’s UK.
 “We still feel like we have the superior, best VR out there” Prototype Devices Facebook said in March that it planned to buy Irvine, California-based Oculus for $2 billion.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- ReNew Power Ventures Pvt, majority owned by Goldman Sachs Group Inc, has agreed to buy 101 megawatts of wind turbines from Suzlon Energy Ltd.
 about a joint bid to buy Alstom SA’s energy business and counter a $17 billion offer by General Electric Co.
 One option being discussed is for Mitsubishi Heavy to buy Alstom’s steam turbine and grid business and Siemens to get the gas turbine operations, people familiar with the matter said earlier today, asking not to be identified because the matter is not public.
 Siemens’s plan to buy Alstom’s energy assets comes as the German company is cutting jobs to slash about 1 billion euros ($135 billion) in costs.
June 12 (Bloomberg) -- Nokia Oyj agreed to buy analytics firm Medio Systems Inc, the Finnish wireless-technology company’s second acquisition in two weeks to bolster its Here mapping unit against Google Inc.
 Slim’s attempt to buy The Hague-based KPN floundered after an independent foundation built a blocking stake, causing the Mexican company to withdraw its plans in October.
 As a market technician, Mamis focused on price movement and trading volume for clues on when to buy or sell stocks, rather than economic data and company earnings, which drive fundamental analysis.
 that it’s time to buy.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Loews Corp, the holding company controlled by New York’s Tisch family, agreed to buy the InterContinental Chicago O’Hare Hotel to expand its portfolio in the US.
 The company has plans for a separate Chicago hotel, in the city’s downtown, to open next year, and announced weeks ago that it reached a deal to buy a 255-room property in Minneapolis from Graves Hospitality Corp.
 yesterday agreed to buy Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Iliad SA made an informal offer to buy Bouygues Telecom for 4 billion euros to 5 billion euros within the last few weeks, people familiar with the matter said late yesterday.
 Monte Paschi’s investors can exercise rights to buy stock from June 9 to June 27, while the rights can be traded from June 9 to June 20.
 agreed to buy ABB Ltd’s Meyer Steel Structures unit for about $600 million as the Swiss company sells assets acquired in the purchase of Thomas & Betts Corp.
 Even if GoPro can’t boost revenue from the videos, they function as advertisements that encourage more users to buy the hardware, said Mediatech Capital Partners LLC’s Porter Bibb.
 30, and is instead focusing on short-term fixes to buy time.
 Depending on the portfolio, one way to express that is to buy puts, derivative contracts that bet on a decline in the underlying security, he said.
 agreed to buy it.
 Dai-Ichi Life Insurance Co, Japan’s second-largest life insurer, is in talks to buy Protective Life for about 500 billion yen ($49 billion), said people with knowledge of the matter.
 Leucadia agreed to buy Jefferies in 2012 and made Handler, who was running the investment bank, CEO of the combined company.
 Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch raised its rating on the shoemaker to buy from underperform.
 The company also will seek to buy high-balance mortgages from other members of the government-chartered system through a new facet of the Chicago FHLB’s mortgage partnership finance program, according to a statement today.
 Electricite de France SA’s renewables unit agreed to buy 88 megawatts of equipment, Aarhus, Denmark-based Vestas said today in a statement on its website.
 agreed to buy for $23 billion.
 Deutsche Bank AG fell 38 percent after offering shareholders a discount of more than 20 percent to buy new stock.
 Yet when financial markets convulsed in 2008, the bank had to buy back the debt and the utility was locked into paying a higher rate.
June 21 (Bloomberg) -- Canada Pension Plan Investment Board is close to buying a 49 percent stake in Manhattan’s 1 Park Ave, a prewar office tower controlled by Vornado Realty Trust, according to a person with knowledge of the deal.
 “Canadians, particularly institutional money managers, REITs, pension funds, are flush with capital due to the strong environment in Canada, and frankly they’ve run out of things to buy,” Fasulo said in a telephone interview.
 Customers could buy the music or purchase a retailer package enabling them to sell music and earn rewards to buy more music.
 has agreed to buy electricity from the solar farms under a 15-year contract.
 Cornerstone Investors So-called cornerstone investors have committed to buy as much as A$17 billion of stock in the offering, Cooke said.
 lost 34 percent to C$253, the lowest since January, after agreeing to buy Papillon Resources Ltd.
 In September, Norway’s sovereign-wealth fund agreed to buy a 45 percent stake in nearby 7 Times Square for $684 million from Boston Properties.
 The company reiterated its willingness to buy platinum mines following South Africa’s longest and most costly strike that’s been running since Jan.
 agreed to buy a 199 percent stake in the company.
 Cash in the fund has built to almost 15 percent from 7 percent as of March 31, because there are fewer attractive things to buy, said Gaffney.
 The transaction’s contracts included an “untested and rigid” process for forcing JPMorgan or other originators of the underlying loans to buy back misrepresented debt, S&P said.
 That’s the message Ornskov offered yesterday in saying why his board and the company’s investors should leave Shire’s day-to-day management to him instead of handing it over to AbbVie Inc, which has bid to buy it.
 The contracts give investors the right but not the obligation to buy or sell a security at a certain price.
 Calls to buy Whole Foods shares are near the most expensive level since 2007 relative to puts, according to data on three-month options compiled by Bloomberg.
 Proceeds from the phone operator’s debut bond sale will go toward refinancing a 21 billion-euro bridge loan taken to buy the 53 percent stake in Maroc Telecom in November, Chief Financial Officer Serkan Okandan said in April.
 The company also operates in Nigeria and in November, it expanded its presence in Africa by agreeing to buy Vivendi SA’s stake in Morocco’s biggest wireless carrier for about 42 billion euros.
 Woodside also agreed to buy back shares for A$3649 each, a 15 percent discount.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Level 3 Communications Inc, which helps route traffic across the Web, agreed to buy TW Telecom Inc.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- Canada’s two largest pension funds are expanding their holdings of New York real estate, announcing separate deals today to buy stakes in Manhattan office towers.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- Validus Holdings Ltd, the Bermuda-based reinsurer, agreed to buy Western World Insurance Group Inc.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- LGT Group, the bank owned by the family of the prince of Liechtenstein, agreed to buy more than 10 billion Swiss francs ($112 billion) of client assets from HSBC Holdings Plc’s Swiss private bank.
 stocks we’re trying to buy came down on the negative news, and now it’s up,” said Michael, whose firm oversees C$900 million.
 “After all, many international strategic investors are limited to buying stakes in Hong Kong, and are restricted in the mainland.
 Instead, to meet the estimates, he entered into a secret side deal with EMC to buy more of the ZeusIOPS product than the customer had intended, in exchange for an undisclosed discount, the agency said.
 It will use the revenue from selling electricity to buy more power plants and to pay dividends.
 NextEra will own about 83 percent of NextEra Energy Partners following the offering, the prospectus shows, excluding an overallotment option for the underwriters to buy additional shares.
 The relationship isn’t a conflict of interest because it’s reviewed by independent directors at both companies, and it’s common for oil and gas companies to buy services from affiliates, Evans said.
 On June 17 it agreed to buy Lumina Copper Corp.
 increased 3 percent to $21015 after agreeing to buy Consorcio Comex SA for about $23 billion, picking off the Mexican coatings and paint company that competitor Sherwin-Williams Co.
 failed to buy.
 Sherwin’s attempt to buy the Mexican portion of the company was blocked by local antitrust regulators.
 Geberit gained 17 percent to 3093 Swiss francs after Goldman Sachs raised its rating on the company to buy from sell, citing the likelihood of further market-share gains in Europe and emerging markets.
 AT&T last month announced a $485 billion bid to buy satellite-television company DirecTV.
 Eugene Gourevitch, a former friend and adviser to Maksim Bakiyev, the son of ex-Kyrgyzstan President Kurmanbek Bakiyev, was given a 63-month sentence today in federal court in Brooklyn, New York, for his role in a 2012 fraud involving a plan to buy shares in Facebook Inc.
 There were 139,184 bids to buy wind, hydropower and biomass credits, the most since March, according to data from trader REConnect Energy Solutions Pvt.
 Regulators have imposed fines on distribution companies in northern Uttarakhand state and the Union Territory of Dadra and Nagar Haveli in western India, prodding the government-run utilities to buy credits to meet their obligations.
 Standard General will loan Charney funds to buy at least 10 percent of outstanding shares, according to the SEC filing yesterday.
 discount retailer, borrowed $2 billion in a two-part offering to buy back as much as $1 billion of notes.
 The IPO followed an earlier agreement by institutional investors -- including ABN Amro Group NV and BNP Paribas SA -- to buy 33 percent of Euronext at a 4 percent discount to yesterday’s offering price.
 Carl Icahn Investigators are reviewing large option trades in Clorox ahead of Icahn’s attempt to buy the company in 2011, as well as trading by golfer Phil Mickelson and sports gambler William Walters in Dean Foods in 2012, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 and 3G Capital agreed to buy HJ Heinz Co.
 China Modern Dairy Holdings Ltd, the nation’s largest raw-milk producer, added 36 percent to HK$320 after being raised to buy from hold at Jefferies Group LLC.
 It agreed to buy SeeWhy, a Boston-based maker of marketing software, on May 20 and earlier last month completed its acquisition of Fieldglass Inc, a maker of online human-resources software.
 Verizon closed a deal earlier this year to buy out Vodafone Group Plc’s stake in their wireless venture for $130 billion.
June 27 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Bank AG and ECE Projektmanagement GmbH, Germany’s largest shopping-center operator, are in talks to buy the Palais Quartier complex in Frankfurt for more than 800 million euros ($11 billion) from Rabobank Groep, according to two people with direct knowledge of the matter.
 Deutsche Bank, in a joint bid with ECE, plans to buy the commercial property for investment funds managed by its Deutsche Asset & Wealth Management unit, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 The issue for investigators is that if all of that is legal, is it illegal to buy a stock based on the information?” Is this just a case of the SEC and Justice with a new law and itchy trigger fingers, or is it all really this bad? *** All this over the see-through pants? Lululemon goofed with those too-sheer yoga pants a little more than a year ago, and it’s been downhill ever since.
June 10 (Bloomberg) -- China Mobile Ltd, the world’s largest mobile-phone company by subscribers, agreed to buy an 18 percent stake in Thailand’s True Corp.
 China Mobile last year scrapped an agreement to buy a stake in Taiwan’s Far EasTone Telecommunications Co.
 In February, Facebook agreed to buy startup WhatsApp Inc.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks were little changed, with the Stoxx Europe 600 Index capping its fourth straight quarterly gain, as contracts to buy previously owned US.
 Medtronic’s Deal The prospect of lower tax rates through a tax inversion are a reason in Medtronic Inc’s $429 billion purchase of Covidien Plc and Pfizer Inc’s more than $100 billion effort to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 fell 8 percent as the miner announced a pact to buy Cadillac Mining Corp.
 Amaya Gaming jumped 42 percent to C$20 after announcing the $49 billion deal to buy PokerStars.
 Indian Airlines agreed to buy the Airbus planes after it got guarantees that the aircraft sold by the manufacturer would not cost more than those bought by Southeast Asian carriers.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP represented Element Financial Corp, the Toronto-based equipment finance company, on its agreement to buy PHH Corp’s North American fleet-management business for $14 billion.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Numericable Group, the cable carrier that agreed in April to the $23 billion acquisition of mobile operator SFR, agreed to buy Virgin Mobile in France from Virgin Group Ltd.
 A BNDES official said that the loan is part of the bank’s program called Special Agency for Industrial Financing, known as Finame, which requires companies that borrow money to buy their equipment from local producers.
 It has committed to buy 87 jetliners, with a list value of about $487 billion, for deliveries scheduled through 2021.
 to buy 76 shopping centers from American Realty Capital Properties Inc.
 In January, Blackstone teamed up with DDR to buy 46 US.
 DDR has the right of first offer to buy 10 of the assets, according to the statement.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the SEC.
 agreed to buy the life insurer for 5822 billion yen ($57 billion).
 scrapped an agreement last month to buy a quarter of Leviathan, Israel’s largest gas field, for as much as $26 billion.
 People who saw it said they were 30 percent to 40 percent more likely to buy the product.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- Neste Oil Oyj, a Finnish oil refiner, agreed to buy algae oil from US-based Renewable Algal Energy to turn into clean diesel.
 Amaya Gaming Group Inc, a maker of gambling equipment and systems, is near an agreement to buy the parent of PokerStars, the world’s biggest poker website, according to a person with knowledge of the process.
 agreed to buy DBApparel, a French lingerie and underwear maker, from Sun Capital Partners Inc.
 advised investors to buy shares in the Spanish lender.
 New York time today its commitment to buy Tower for $250 a share, as the company faces increased supervision from a Massachusetts regulator.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Linn Energy LLC agreed to buy oil and natural gas-producing acreage across six US.
 Linn was formed to buy already producing oil and gas fields and seek to boost output.
 Boeing’s talks with Emirates are at an early stage, and Wojick didn’t say how many aircraft the gulf carrier may want to buy, speaking in an interview in Doha, Qatar, at the annual general meeting of the International Air Transport Association.
 More Jumbos Even with 90 superjumbos still to be delivered, Emirates is prepared to buy additional double-decker jumbos should Airbus commit to adding new engines with better fuel efficiency, Emirates Chief Commercial Officer Thierry Antinori said in a May 20 interview.
 Arabtec is in talks to buy a large European company and may tap the bond market in the second half to pay for the deal, Ismaik said in April.
 Palo Alto Networks, based in Santa Clara, California, and founded by former Juniper employees, will pay $75 million in cash as well as $100 million in common shares and warrants to buy common stock, according to a May 28 statement from Juniper.
 Insurer Allianz SE in February agreed to buy an 833 percent stake in Bayern Munich for 110 million euros, deepening its sponsorship of the Bundesliga title-holder.
 Investors will be able to buy 18 stapled securities for every 100 they already own at subscription price of HK$684 a share, the company said in a filing.
 HKT agreed in December to buy the CSL mobile-phone business in Hong Kong as Li seeks to boost scale in a market with about twice as many subscribers as people.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Yandex NV, Russia’s largest web search engine, agreed to buy car information and advertising site Autoru for about $175 million to expand into the classifieds business.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 The arrangement comes as Medtronic is seeking to buy Dublin-based Covidien Plc for more than $40 billion, according to a person familiar with the talks.
 This has made it more important for investors to find alternative ways to buy and sell, and to glean accurate information on their own about what prices they can feasibly attain.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA is in talks to buy Mediaset SpA’s 22 percent stake in Distribuidora de Television Digital SA to gain full ownership of the Spanish pay-TV company, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Telefonica said on June 2 that it agreed to buy a 56 percent stake in DTS from Promotora de Informaciones SA for 750 million euros to increase its holding to 78 percent.
 Mediaset Espana has 15 days from when the DTS board informs it of terms of the deal to exercise a preferential right to buy the asset.
 offer alternatives to paying for a cable subscription, though require customers to buy hardware that can cost hundreds of dollars and limit users’ ability to watch live broadcast programming.
 company will use proceeds from the sale of energy assets to Siemens AG to reward shareholders and that “no material acquisitions are planned” Rolls-Royce said in January it had failed to buy Waertsilae Oyj, the No.
 1 maker of marine engines for tankers, cruise vessels and warships, while Daimler AG in April compelled it to buy full control of a diesel-engine venture at a cost of 243 billion euros ($33 billion).
 Armstrong has also faced suits by consumers claiming they were misled by him into buying energy drinks and his autobiographies.
 “We consider it a net positive development since we prefer New World Development to focus its investment on Hong Kong rather than China properties” New World Development, controlled by the family of Hong Kong billionaire Cheng Yu-tung, proposed in March to buy shares of the China unit for HK$680 each, a 32 percent premium to the last price before the offer.
 The company also will seek to buy back a warrant for more than 2 million shares that was given to the Treasury as part of the bailout package that allows the holder to buy common stock at $67 each.
 The serious gamer is “the person who is going to buy the console today” The focus on TV, music and movies put off some gamers who fretted they were no longer the priority.
 It will seek to buy equity or debt in distressed or stressed businesses with an eye toward eventually taking control of the companies.
 Under the new proposal, Mitsubishi would offer to buy 40 percent of Alstom’s grid and renewables units instead of 20 percent, and Siemens would offer to create a rail-signaling joint venture with Alstom, said Claude Mandart, a representative of the CFE-CGC union who met with the minister.
 Spurred by such App Store downloads, people keep coming back to buy the latest iPhones and iPads, which generate more than 72 percent of Apple’s annual $171 billion in revenue.
 “You need to spend hours in line to buy milk, corn flour and now pants” Consumer Shortages The situation showcases the hardships of doing business in Venezuela, where a shambolic economy has led to shortages in everything from dollars to toilet paper and medicines as the country grapples with 61 percent annual inflation, the highest in the world.
 “It was good to buy here today as I could buy three blouses for 1,000 bolivars when it’s only possible with that money to buy one from street vendors in downtown Caracas,” she said.
 Investors have been awaiting these additional details as they weigh whether or not to buy shares in the IPO.
 “My concern is that we are being asked to buy stocks now at price-earnings multiples and price-to-book values significantly higher than the levels of, say, 18 months ago,” Ambrose said.
 Prior to either company making a bid, Hillshire had itself made a $66 billion offer to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, producer of brands including Vlasic pickles.
 A condition of both the Tyson and Pilgrim’s earlier offers is that Hillshire scrap an agreement to buy Birds Eye frozen-foods maker Pinnacle Foods.
 Beltone Financial Holding SAE and two other investors is seeking to buy a 20 percent stake in EFG-Hermes Holding SAE a day after Saudi Arabia’s King Abdullah called for an international effort to raise funds for the country’s battered economy.
 Another e-mail from April 2007 shows that managing director Peter Sack said that he was inclined to securitize loans that are “close calls or marginally non-compliant” and risk having to buy the loans back “rather than adding to sludge in inventory” Financial Crisis Credit Suisse is one of a group of lenders sued by MBIA in the wake of the financial crisis and accused of making misrepresentations about the characteristics of loans underlying mortgage-backed securities in order to induce the insurer to guarantee the bonds.
 Valeant has twice raised its bid to buy Allergan as part of its strategy to become one of the world’s five biggest drugmakers.
 Williams Cos, the company that controls Williams Partners, agreed to buy control of Access Midstream from Global Infrastructure Partners II, Williams said in a statement today.
June 12 (Bloomberg) -- Saudi Arabia’s Olayan Group is in talks to buy a majority stake in beverage maker Gulf Union Food Co.
 ‘Oil prices drive energy stocks’’ ETFs, which allow investors to trade shares that represent a broader index of stocks, are gaining popularity as a way to invest in industries such as oil and natural gas without having to buy multiple equities.
 Among 24 analysts tracked by Bloomberg, 17 say to buy the stock and only three say sell.
 agreed to buy 112 acres (45 hectares) from Union Pacific Corp.
 The banks knew the loans underlying trillions of dollars of residential mortgage-backed securities were misrepresented and failed to invoke their rights to force the sellers to buy them back or act against servicers, causing billions of dollars in losses, according to complaints filed June 18 in New York State Supreme Court in Manhattan.
 corporate legal case at the time, Texaco struck a 1984 deal to buy Getty for $101 billion after Pennzoil, formed from a company co-founded by George HW.
 Bush, claimed it had a prior agreement to buy Los Angeles-based Getty.
 “Japanese tend to see any yen strength as an opportunity to buy Australian assets” At 382 percent for 10 years, Australia’s debt has the highest yield of bonds holding top credit grades from the three main rating companies.
 We’ll use that to invest much more aggressively in the US” Under the terms of its agreement to buy Covidien, Medtronic has the right to cancel the takeover if Congress changes the tax laws in a way that results in the combined company being considered a US.
 New York-based Pfizer also agreed to buy about 10 percent of the French biotechnology company’s capital through newly issued shares at 925 euros apiece, 49 percent above yesterday’s close.
 Families and investors have more cash to buy a second home as a booming real estate market increases the value of their residences, according to a report Re/Max released today.
 “Before coming to buy a project here, Chinese companies will now do more research before making a decision,” Gao said in an interview.
 aluminum producer agreed to buy UK.
 solar-panel manufacturer, agreed to buy Skytron Energy from AEG Power Solutions GmbH to gain access to European photovoltaic power-plant control systems and expertise.
 Traders who are ready to buy or sell shares as needed, known as market makers, are paid rebates by an exchange.
 In May he announced that he is loosening the rules under which banks are forced to buy back loans with origination flaws.
 And while we’re not anywhere near where we need to be yet, millions of families have been able to come up for air because they’re no longer underwater on their mortgages” Obama then introduced Castro, who recalled that his mother of Mexican descent had raised him and his twin brother Joaquin in rental housing because she couldn’t afford to buy a home.
 “I think it is great if someone wants to buy us,” Gehl said of comments from the head of Emirates Group’s Dnata ground-handling operation.
 BRF completed the $649 million purchase of Abu Dhabi-based Federal Foods in April and agreed to buy 40 percent of Al Khan, a Sadia distributor in Oman, for $685 million in February.
 It doubled its stake in Bank of East Asia Ltd, Hong Kong’s largest family-run lender, to 95 percent in 2012 and agreed to buy 40 percent of Indonesia’s PT Bank Tabungan Pensiunan Nasional for about $15 billion last year.
 won EU approval to buy Telefonica’s Irish business by pledging to help a virtual operator transform into a network operator.
 Leverkusen-based Bayer is seeking to buy Merck’s unit as it shifts its focus to brand-name treatments that can be sold directly to consumers.
 offered to buy Australian developer Australand Property Group for A$26 billion ($24 billion) in the Singapore real-estate company’s biggest proposed acquisition, trumping a bid by Stockland.
 The lender last year approved 3,842 requests to buy US.
 “There’s a lot of resource development going on across the country and communities see where they are on the sidelines waiting, when in fact they would perhaps be able to buy an equity portion,” she said.
 Goel said he and Raj Rajaratnam were “very good friends” and that Raj, a billionaire, loaned him $100,000 to buy a home in 2005 and $500,000 more the next year when Goel needed to support his ailing father.
 Retail investors are in a frenzy to buy” Infosys Ltd, India’s second-largest software maker, rose 19 percent, the most in two weeks.
 The unit was formed after JBS agreed to buy Seara food-processing assets from Marfrig Global Foods SA for 585 billion reais ($26 billion) in June 2013.
 The IPO would follow Facebook Inc’s plans to buy WhatsApp Inc.
 companies to buy overseas counterparts in part to lower their bills.
 The desire for such an arrangement, known as a tax inversion, is a factor in Medtronic Inc’s $429 billion purchase of Covidien Plc and Pfizer Inc’s more than $100 billion effort to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 Aerion already has 50 letters of intent to buy, backed up by deposits of $250,000, Nichols says.
 That leaves some industry insiders doubtful that even billionaires will clamor to buy one.
 Valeant dropped 23 percent as regulators rejected a drug being developed by Allergan Inc, which Valeant is trying to buy.
 ended an effort to buy AstraZeneca last month after the London-based company rejected its last bid.
 Daiichi Sankyo rose 17 percent to 1,765 yen after Mizuho Securities raised the company’s rating to buy from neutral, saying new products will drive earnings growth.
 16, 2011, the day Peltz offered to buy the company for up to $60 a share.
 The same question from 2011 remains: Who’s going to buy it? Analysts said at the time that Peltz’s offer could spur interest from Dollar General.
 drugmaker bidding to buy Shire Plc, raised its outlook for 2014 on prospects for its experimental cancer and multiple sclerosis drugs.
June 11 (Bloomberg) -- Here’s a brain twister: Some investors have grown tired of junk-rated loans, but others are more eager than ever to buy the same debt bundled together and sliced into pieces.
 Those figures are indicative of the race to buy riskier assets that’s permeating almost every corner of the global debt markets.
 With little growth in food sales, Tyson was salivating to get one of the few large, brand-name meat producers left to buy, the people said.
 “A lot of these legacy brands just can’t build, they need to buy it” Combining Tyson and Hillshire will create a company with $394 billion of annual sales and $12 billion of net income, according to data compiled by Bloomberg based on trailing 12-month figures.
 Three months later, on May 12, Connolly announced an agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, maker of Birds Eye frozen foods and Vlasic pickles, among other brands, for $66 billion.
 While investors didn’t like the deal, pushing down Hillshire shares 32 percent the day it was announced, it sent a signal to JBS and Tyson that they needed to act quickly if they wanted to buy the company.
 Meanwhile, Hillshire said it hasn’t yet changed its agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods or made any recommendation on the Tyson offer.
 Debt stripped of protections for lenders is being raised for private-equity firms seeking to buy companies including Gates Global Inc.
 Smith & Wesson had benefited as concerns of tighter regulation following the December 2012 massacre at Sandy Hook Elementary in Newton, Connecticut, spurred enthusiasts to buy more guns.
 The outlook comes as the number of background checks carried out on people seeking to buy firearms declined in February, March and April, from the year earlier period, according to figures from the FBI’s National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS).
 Mitsubishi also offered to buy as much as 10 percent of Alstom, a stake valued at about 900 million euros, while Siemens will explore combining its rail assets with Alstom’s.
 Billionaire John Malone’s holding company, Liberty Media Corp, had offered to buy Barnes & Noble for about $1 billion in 2011, then dropped the bid in favor of buying $204 million in preferred shares.
 The firm also offered to buy 51 percent of the Nook business as an alternative deal.
 OAO Uralkali, the world’s largest potash producer, climbed 2 percent after Sberbank CIB raised the stock to buy on valuations and bets the potash market is recovering.
 Qatar Holding was part of an investor group that agreed to buy a stake in American Express Co’s business-travel unit for $900 million in March, while former Qatari Prime Minister Sheikh Hamad Bin Jassim Bin Jabr Al Thani is providing Deutsche Bank AG with a 21 billion-euro ($29 billion) cash infusion.
 before subsidies are reduced and is considering whether to buy new panel-making equipment.
 “Farmers are spending less bags of soybean to buy the same amount of fertilizer, so they are anticipating the purchases to hedge their cost of production” After tumbling 13 percent against the dollar last year, the Brazilian real is the best performer among major emerging-market currencies this year, gaining 44 percent.
June 15 (Bloomberg) -- Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd, a Japanese industrial group, is offering to buy a stake of about 10 percent in Alstom SA, the Nikkei newspaper reported.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- While AT&T Inc’s $95-a-share bid to purchase DirecTV puts a lid on prices of contracts to buy the stock, options traders are willing to dish out more for protection in case the deal falls apart.
 In October, toward the end of his tenure, Time Warner Cable agreed to buy DukeNet Communications LLC for $600 million.
 Some banks, which typically own the highest-rated slices of CLOs, are trying to induce managers to alter the terms of their existing funds by refusing to buy their new ones unless they do, according to Sajid Zaidi, global head of CLO origination and structuring at Morgan Stanley in New York.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA offered to buy Mediaset SpA’s 22 percent stake in Distribuidora de Television Digital SA for 295 million euros ($400 million) to gain full ownership of the Spanish pay-TV company.
 Telefonica said on June 2 that it agreed to buy a 56 percent stake in DTS from Prisa for 750 million euros to increase its holding to 78 percent.
 Aabar Investments in 2010 canceled a plan to buy most of Arabtec for an estimated $17 billion, saying they would work instead on a “strategic partnership” Aabar delisted from Abu Dhabi’s exchange the same year.
 agreed to buy last month to become one of the largest shale explorers, has acreage in the Forth Valley of Scotland.
 is preparing to buy Protective Life Corp.
 A judge ruled in March that bankers at RBC Capital Markets misled Rural/Metro directors about the ambulance company’s value, seeking to drive a quick sale to buyout firm Warburg Pincus LLC and generate fees for the bank.
 The Boston-based startup hosts an online marketplace where apps that attract few users or fail to make much money -- including an animal-hunting game and a program that lets people send drawings to one another -- can try and sell themselves to buyers such as other app makers.
 Analog Devices jumped 5 percent after agreeing to buy a chipmaker for about $2 billion.
 agreed to buy the drugmaker.
 Those investors have also agreed to buy 113 billion euros of subordinated ING notes that are convertible to NN stock in three tranches.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- France sold a 15 billion euro ($2 billion) stake in GDF Suez SA, the country’s largest natural-gas distributor, as it seeks cash to buy a holding in Alstom SA.
 France has proposed to buy as much as a fifth of Alstom from Bouygues SA as part of a $17 billion deal for General Electric Co.
 to buy Alstom’s gas-turbine unit.
 France has 2 billion euros from sales of holdings in Safran SA, a maker of aircraft engines, and Aeroports de Paris that may also be used to buy the Alstom stake, Montebourg said yesterday.
 insurer Prudential Plc, which is also a top pension provider, earlier this year bought 25 percent of NextEnergy Solar Fund Ltd, a newly-listed 856 million pound ($144 million) fund that seeks to buy plants in the UK.
 You can invest large volumes over long periods with interesting returns” While institutional investors generally seek to buy parks starting at 5 megawatts to 10 megawatts, they “also invest indirectly via securitized vehicles of pooled smaller parks,” Seherr-Thoss said by phone from Berlin, where the company is based.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- Hachette Book Group agreed to buy Perseus Books, a trade publisher, in a deal that strengthens the company’s nonfiction portfolio with a business that produces about 700 new titles a year.
 “I’m a tinkerer, I need to see under the hood,” said Mike Dawson, an Indianapolis-based networking consultant who used to buy equipment from Cisco and Juniper until he decided last year to set up a cloud-computing company for schools, businesses and government agencies.
 Still, the company requires customers to buy its hardware.
 It also frees buyers from being locked into buying new equipment from the same vendor to ensure that network machines work together.
 “The risk/reward of going long at current levels is poor over the next one to two months,” Krinsky wrote, citing the prospects for anyone wanting to buy shares.
 Any weakness will be an opportunity to buy before the group’s advance resumes, the report said.
 While revenue and subscriber rolls are improving, Wind couldn’t afford to buy more capacity in the government’s last spectrum auction and hasn’t been able to count on financial backing from its main investor, Amsterdam-based VimpelCom Ltd, Lacavera said today in a speech at an industry event in Toronto.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Medtronic Inc, the second-largest maker of medical devices, agreed to buy Covidien Plc for $429 billion in cash and stock as it transforms into a broader-based company bolstered by new tax advantages.
 Government-run Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac limit themselves to buying loans that conform to some of those requirements.
 Legg Mason Inc’s Western Asset plans to buy mortgages made to self-employed borrowers who may not have the documentation for qualified mortgages as well as interest-only loans, said Travis Carr, chief operating officer of the firm’s mortgage real estate investment trust.
 Energy Transfer was nearing a deal to buy the companies for more than $15 billion in cash and stock, people familiar with the situation said.
 Analog Devices jumped 5 percent after agreeing to buy a chipmaker for about $2 billion.
 agreed to buy the drugmaker for $39 billion.
 “With the merger activity, I think people are trying to buy growth” Six of the 10 main S&P 500 groups advanced today, with industrial shares adding 06 percent to pace gains.
 Jefferies Group LLC raised its rating on the stock to buy from hold after Icahn’s purchase of Family Dollar shares.
June 21 (Bloomberg) -- Want to buy Shire Plc? Get in line.
 Three Times AbbVie said in a statement dated June 19 that Shire rejected three escalating offers to buy the maker of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder drugs.
 agreed to buy Namo Media Inc.
 will extend a plan to buy back its US.
 The central bank will start to buy asset-backed securities within a year, according to three-quarters of 33 respondents in a Bloomberg Monthly Survey published on June 16.
 “It is an excellent opportunity for foreigners to buy quality state-run companies,” Jagannadham Thunuguntla, chief strategist at SMC, said by phone from New Delhi.
June 9 (Bloomberg) -- OAO MegaFon, Russia’s second-largest wireless operator, agreed to buy at least $600 million of equipment from Huawei Technologies Co.
 of Tokyo, is nearing an agreement to buy T-Mobile, which has become the fastest-growing US.
 “Our biggest focus right now is on the 85 million Xbox 360 customers to give them enough to make them want to buy Xbox One this holiday,” Yusuf Mehdi, vice president for Xbox marketing and strategy, said in an interview.
 agreed to buy the Irish company for $429 billion.
 jumped 19 percent after agreeing to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP for $6 billion.
 supported the drugmaker’s attempt to buy Allergan Inc.
June 20 (Bloomberg) -- Vontobel Holding AG, an investment bank and asset manager based in Switzerland, plans to buy back a 125 percent stake owned by Swiss Raiffeisen amid legal wrangling concerning a cooperation agreement.
 Raiffeisen said Vontobel has the right to buy the stake in an e-mailed response to questions.
 The world’s second-largest maker of commercial-aircraft engine, which last month agreed to sell its energy assets to Siemens AG for $13 billion, said it will use the proceeds to buy back shares.
 Man Group Plc climbed 6 percent to 1051 pence, a two-month high, after agreeing to buy Numeric Holdings LLC.
June 6 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the private equity firm run by billionaires Henry Kravis and George Roberts, led a group that agreed to buy a stake in a meat-processing unit of China’s Cofco Group for $270 million, a person with knowledge of the matter said.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP and A&L Goodbody advised Medtronic Inc, the second-largest maker of medical devices, on its agreement to buy Covidien Plc for $429 billion in cash and stock.
 Willkie, Wachtell on Level 3’s $57 Billion TW Telecom Deal Willkie Farr & Gallagher LLP acted as legal counsel to Level 3 Communications Inc, which helps route traffic across the Web, on its agreement to buy TW Telecom Inc.
 LSE climbed the most since July 2013 as it agreed to buy Frank Russell Co.
 The exchange agreed to buy the Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co.
 So things happen” Valeant wants to buy Allergan as part of its plan to join the ranks of the world’s top five drugmakers.
 rallied to its highest level since August 2011 on report that the gas supplier plans to buy stake in more shale-gas assets in the US.
 “Any major correction should be utilized to buy” Indian Oil and Hindustan Petroleum Corp.
 are among companies vying to buy the debt.
 For much of its 111-year history, Harley sold choppers as fast as it could to buyers it knew well: wealthy, middle-aged American white men.
 “We, in return, want to have economic LNG and more flexible terms” Chubu Electric agreed in May to buy about 720,000 metric tons of LNG annually for 20 years from Royal Dutch Shell Plc through its third long-term portfolio contract.
 utility owner, agreed to buy a 20-megawatt solar farm in central California from a US.
June 10 (Bloomberg) -- Nigerian mobile-phone manufacturer Tingo Mobile agreed to buy a majority stake in Mass Telecom Innovation Nigeria Plc for about 4 billion naira ($25 million) to develop rural broadband in Africa’s most populous country.
 He cut the fees on six existing ETFs and added four new products that created a lineup of low-priced, broad market funds designed to appeal to buy-and-hold retail investors.
 jumped 34 percent to 1,059 yen after the regional lender said it will spend as much as 12 billion yen ($118 million) to buy back shares.
June 14 (Bloomberg) --China Eastern Airlines Corp, the nation’s third-largest carrier, agreed to buy 80 737 jets valued at $74 billion, marking the Asian country’s biggest order from Boeing Co.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Saab AB agreed to buy the Swedish marine defense unit of ThyssenKrupp AG for 340 million kronor ($50 million), expanding the maker of Gripen jet fighters’ business to manufacturing submarines and stealth corvettes.
 Woolworths will pay A$17 a share to buy out Lew and other minority shareholders in clothing retailer Country Road, the Cape Town-based suitor said today.
 Responding to its May 2009 fine, the company said it “has never required a customer to agree not to buy from AMD in order to obtain a discount, nor raised a customer’s prices when it decided to buy from AMD” Intel went on to argue at hearings two years ago that EU regulators ignored exonerating evidence to build an “extreme case” The European Commission was also faulted by the EU’s ombudsman for failing to take notes of a meeting with an executive from Dell Inc.
 to buy all the palladium the US.
 Williams Cos, the company that controls Williams Partners, agreed to buy control of Access Midstream from Global Infrastructure Partners II, Williams said in a statement yesterday.
 may improve its $17 billion offer as it competes with Siemens AG to buy energy assets of power-equipment maker Alstom SA.
 The Tokyo-based company is offering to buy a stake of about 10 percent in Alstom, the Nikkei newspaper said today.
 French Plan? Economy Minister Arnaud Montebourg presented union representatives with a plan for the government to team up with Mitsubishi Heavy to buy a stake in Alstom, Gabriel Artero, chairman of the metal-worker federation of the CFE-CGC union, said June 13.
 Valeant has twice raised its bid to buy Botox maker Allergan as part of its strategy to become one of the world’s five biggest drugmakers.
 The SEC “is wrong on this” because the investors “hadn’t committed to buying the securities,” he said.
 Kristin Wilhelm, the SEC’s lawyer, told Cogburn the bank was misinterpreting the rules, and that Bank of America was required to turn over all documents given to investors both before and after the investors decided to buy the securities.
 In 2010, the government rejected Melbourne-based BHP Billiton Ltd’s bid to buy Potash Corp.
 The company was stripped of its AAA at S&P in 2010 after agreeing to buy railroad Burlington Northern Santa Fe for $265 billion.
 The billionaire has used funds from insurance units including Geico to buy stocks and make acquisitions.
 By sending clients requests to buy or sell shares to markets that pay the most, rather than those offering the best price, brokers get a bad deal for their customers, Battalio said in his testimony.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Tencent Holdings Ltd, Asia’s largest Internet company, agreed to buy a $736 million stake in a Craigslist-like site to bolster its online content as it seeks to compete with Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 Tencent in March agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in JDcom and transfer some of its own assets to build a stronger competitor to Alibaba.
 Enerflex soared 79 percent to C$1762, the biggest increase since 2011, after agreeing to buy Axip’s international contract compression and processing business as well as its after-market business.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP is close to an agreement to buy a group of select-service hotels from Clarion Partners LLC for about $800 million, according to a person with knowledge of the deal.
 In September, an affiliate of the New York-based company agreed to buy 16 hotels from Hersha Hospitality Trust for $217 million.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 The banks knew the loans underlying trillions of dollars of residential mortgage-backed securities were misrepresented and failed to invoke their rights to force the sellers to buy them back or act against servicers, causing billions of dollars in losses, according to complaints filed yesterday in New York State Supreme Court in Manhattan.
 Men’s Wearhouse agreed in March to buy its smaller competitor for about $18 billion in cash after a five-month takeover battle.
 The maker of mining equipment was raised to buy from neutral by Bank of America Merrill Lynch.
 The consumer-review website was raised to buy from neutral at Bank of America Corp.
 Quebecor took advantage of a lack of competition in a government auction this year to buy access to spectrum in British Columbia, Alberta and Ontario.
 “People are rushing to buy their second car, not to mention those who haven’t gotten their first one” to beat potential curbs, said Guotai Junan’s Chen.
 has agreed to buy power from both solar plants under 25-year contracts, according to the statement.
 meat company, agreed to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 Both Pilgrim’s Pride and Tyson had insisted when agreeing to enter the talks that Hillshire would drop its earlier agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, the producer of brands including Vlasic pickles, for $66 billion including debt.
 “It makes a lot of financial sense to buy Hillshire now that they have low debt levels, they have very strong cash flow,” Bryan Agbabian, San Francisco-based sector head for agricultural equities for Allianz Global Investors, said by phone earlier.
 Boliden Upgraded Boliden climbed 35 percent to 9525 kronor after Nordea upgraded the Swedish company’s shares to buy from sell, citing earnings growth from the second quarter that will exceed market expectations.
 slid 39 percent to $1,18930 after agreeing to buy OpenTable Inc.
 jumped 29 to a record $8578 after agreeing to buy Renesas SP Drivers Inc, a maker of chips for smartphones and tablets.
 Schaeffler is seeking to reduce debt from an attempt to buy a limited stake in Continental that backfired amid the global recession of 2008.
 said it remains committed to buying six Airbus A350-800, a rare vote of confidence for a jet that’s rapidly lost in popularity in recent years as customers migrate to the two larger variants.
 He described plans to borrow about $4 billion, using $3 billion to buy forestry assets in China, and $1 billion to buy “a portfolio of marketable securities” He said the cash flow from the investments, after making repayments on the debt, would go to the charity.
 Contracts to buy Amazon shares are the most expensive since at least 2006 relative to bearish wagers, according to data on six-month options compiled by Bloomberg.
 The nation’s third-biggest steelmaker plans to buy as much as 6 million metric tons, or about a quarter of its needs, in the year ending March 31 from overseas, compared with a “few thousand tons” last year, Group Chief Financial Officer Seshagiri Rao said in an interview.
 Authorities are curbing money flows to the world’s largest gambling hub by making it harder for bettors to buy expensive items that they exchange for cash.
 Moody’s reduced the Memphis, Tennessee-based company’s rating today to Caa3 from B3 and expects a distressed exchange or a bankruptcy filing if Verso is unable to close on its $14 billion deal to buy paper company NewPage Holdings Inc, according to a statement from the credit grader.
 Investors have been content to buy the notes since the easing in the sovereign debt crisis in mid-2012, the ECB said in its review.
 In 2012, Chinese state-owned Aluminum Corp of China Ltd, also known as Chalco, offered to buy SouthGobi for $926 million.
 Current shareholders will be given a 30-day rights period to buy the convertible bonds, with the proceeds going to pay debt, according to a presentation on the company’s website.
 Areva is still discussing a proposal for Namwater to buy a stake in the facility, Mbako said.
 “The bond market has a lot of momentum here and it’s a well-known brand that people know and most like their business model” Ryanair agreed to buy five more Boeing Co.
 Under the new proposal, Mitsubishi would offer to buy 40 percent of Alstom’s grid and renewable units instead of 20 percent, and Siemens would offer to create a rail-signaling joint venture with Alstom, said Claude Mandart, a representative of the CFE-CGC union who met with the minister.
 companies looking to buy other firms for their addresses in lower-taxed jurisdictions has doubled in proportion to all overseas deals, according to data compiled by Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 agreed to buy biotechnology firm QLT Inc.
 Concordia’s status as an inversion target may be forefront in investors’ minds because of recent Canadian inversions, including Endo Health Solutions Inc’s purchase of Paladin Labs and Valeant, which has soared since it announced plans to buy Biovail Corp.
 A more balanced market, including a wider selection of properties, smaller price gains and still-low borrowing costs, may encourage more Americans to buy as employment strengthens.
 is in talks to buy cement assets from Jaiprakash Associates Ltd, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 UltraTech agreed last year to buy a Jaiprakash cement unit based in Gujarat state for an enterprise value of 38 billion rupees.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc’s agreement to buy Cobra Automotive Technologies SpA marked the mobile-phone company’s first foray into automotive software as more cars are connected to the Internet.
 Vodafone said today it agreed with the main shareholders of Varese, Italy-based Cobra to buy their combined 74 percent stake, and offered to buy the rest.
 Vodafone also agreed with some shareholders of Cobra’s telematics unit to buy their 20 percent holding if the bid for the parent is successful.
 Delta has asked for changes in the rules to limit the ability of its foreign competitors to buy wide-body Boeing jetliners more cheaply.
 China Shipping Development Co, a Shanghai-based commodities transporter, jumped 66 percent to HK$483 after UBS AG upgraded the stock to buy from neutral.
 Chinese-Australian billionaire William Han paid A$12 million for Lindeman Island in 2012, a 10th of what Club Mediterranee SA had spent to buy and expand it in the early 1990s.
 “It’s just the start of summer and guys are kind of out there flogging the old reliable story that Exxon’s about to buy somebody really cool,” Andrew Coleman, a Houston-based analyst for Raymond James & Associates Inc, said in a phone interview.
 SunEdison said in a filing today that it’s in talks to buy solar developers and power plants in the US, Canada, Chile and the UK.
 last month offered to buy Aquila in a deal that valued the Australian company at A$14 billion and that would give them a half stake in the West Pilbara project.
 telecommunications deals if he decides to buy T-Mobile US Inc.
 Telephone-service provider AT&T last month announced its $485 billion bid to buy satellite-television company DirecTV.
 closed a deal earlier this year to buy out Vodafone Group Plc’s stake in their wireless venture for $130 billion.
 Hess, Bunge Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 AT&T plans to buy DirecTV, the largest US.
 Rolle, Switzerland-based Ineos had a call option to buy its German partner’s share in the partnership under an agreement reached in 2011, they said.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- France is seeking buyers for as much as 179 billion euros ($244 billion) of shares in GDF Suez SA, the nation’s biggest natural gas distributor, as the government seeks to raise funds to buy a stake in Alstom SA.
 Man Group Plc rallied 6 percent after agreeing to buy Numeric Holdings LLC.
 Man Group jumped 6 percent to 1051 pence after the world’s largest publicly traded hedge-fund manager agreed to buy the Boston-based equity manager for as much as $494 million.
 and last month agreed to buy Vinnolit, a German maker of PVC, from Advent International Corp.
 According to Jakob Magnussen, an analyst at Danske Bank A/S, Dong’s hybrid bonds have also benefited from a general appetite from investors for yields and “risk-taking” He recommends investors to buy into Dong’s two most recent hybrid bonds with call options in 2018 and 2022, respectively, as the bonds carry a limited risk to get extended.
 “Not only do you alienate the men, you actually alienate a lot of women, because a lot of women won’t want to buy a feminine brand” The strategy helps show the variety of ways automakers are seeking to carve out their place in the world’s biggest auto market, with more than 100 nameplates targeting an estimated 1 billion drivers within a decade.
 “I didn’t intend to buy a Mini,” said Chen, 32, who nicknames his car “Little Blue” “After I test drove one, I changed my mind within half an hour.
 People use Pinterest to gather online pictures related to what they’d like to buy, make or do.
 “It’s a consensus that young people can’t afford to buy a home,” said Stanley Su, an analyst at Sinyi Realty Co, Taiwan’s only listed real estate broker.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- Angola’s government plans to buy trains and power generators from General Electric Co.
 Koch subsidiary Georgia-Pacific LLC announced yesterday that it agreed to buy Dallas-based paper-goods supplier SPG Holdings LLC for an undisclosed sum.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- Marubeni Corp, a Japanese trading house that offers water services to more than 6 million people globally, said it agreed with a partner to buy a Portuguese utility that also owns Brazilian assets.
 The partnership gives Rosneft the ability to buy stakes in Exxon’s North American projects.
 agreed to set up a $125 billion fund to buy energy infrastructure assets.
 First Reserve, a Greenwich, Connecticut-based company that was one of the earliest private-equity firms to focus on energy, agreed to buy an interest in Petrofac’s floating production facilities in Malaysia and Thailand for about $450 million.
 “You could have very low bank capital requirements; it still doesn’t mean that end investors are going to want to buy the product, and if that is the case it doesn’t bring any new credit into the system,” he said.
 For now, he’s happy to wait and see whether anyone actually wants to buy them.
 said it will pay $6 billion to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP, the pipeline operator taken public in 2010 by Chesapeake Energy Corp.
 ‘Off Guard’ “Even though it’s an old number, people were still caught off guard, and that led to buying in the Treasury market,” said Ian Lyngen, a government-bond strategist at CRT Capital Group LLC in Stamford, Connecticut.
 Bank of America Corp, which agreed to buy Merrill in 2008 as the investment bank was close to collapse, left behind about 3 million square feet of offices at the former World Financial Center complex, renamed Brookfield Place.
 In the case of Abril, firms including KKR & Co, Carlyle Group LP and Apax Partners LLP had been in talks to buy a stake in the company, two people involved in the negotiations told Bloomberg in February.
 Last year KKR agreed to buy a 249 percent stake in Nephila Capital Ltd, a Bermuda-based firm that makes reinsurance-related investments.
 Barrick Gold Corp, the world’s biggest producer, last month failed to buy its largest competitor, Newmont Mining Corp, a merger that was partly driven by cost savings.
 Japan’s biggest beverage producer by market value will spend as much as 50 billion yen to buy back as much as 432 percent of outstanding shares, the company said.
 agreed to buy the Dublin-based company for $429 billion in cash and stock.
 climbed 22 percent after agreeing to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP for $6 billion.
 That spurred BlackRock, whose $44 trillion under management makes it the world’s biggest money manager, to buy eastern European stocks like Turkiye Halk Bankasi AS on valuations not seen since the financial crisis.
 At the time, CBS Outdoor Chief Executive Officer Jeremy Male said the company would seek to buy smaller US.
 By splitting off from CBS and becoming a REIT, the business will have the ability to buy competitors in the 25 biggest US.
June 12 (Bloomberg) -- Shunfeng Photovoltaic International Ltd, which is planning a HK$6 billion ($770 million) share sale to build solar plants, said it is in negotiations to buy additional clean-energy assets as the company expands.
 Shunfeng is in “advanced” talks to buy geothermal-pump, energy-storage and hydrogen-power technologies in addition to a solar services provider, the Hong Kong-based company said in a filing today.
 Shunfeng is controlled by Hong Kong real estate tycoon Zheng Jianming, who owns a 30 percent stake and has spent or pledged more than half a billion dollars to buy solar assets once worth almost $20 billion.
 “Whether that plays out or not remains to be seen but the knee jerk is to buy Germany on these aggressive actions.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- DTE Energy Co, the Detroit-based utility owner, agreed to buy a 75-megawatt wind farm from a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Inc.
June 3 (Bloomberg) -- B2Gold Corp, the Vancouver-based miner that has announced at least one acquisition in each of the past three years, agreed to buy Papillon Resources Ltd.
 won France’s support to buy Alstom SA’s energy assets, beating Siemens AG and putting Chief Executive Officer Jeffrey Immelt a step closer to the company’s largest acquisition ever.
 GE’s attempt to buy US.
 Makers of mid-priced and cheaper smartphones tend to buy modems combined with another component, the application processor, to reduce costs, said Roger Sheng, an analyst at Gartner Inc.
 Under the new proposal, Mitsubishi would offer to buy 40 percent of Alstom’s grid and hydro units instead of 20 percent, using one single holding company rather than the three joint venture structure originally proposed.
 It still proposes to buy 40 percent of Alstom’s steam business.
 Pershing Square Capital Management LP, which is working with Valeant to buy Allergan, agreed that Allergan’s poison pill wouldn’t be triggered by a special shareholders’ meeting.
 This month, it agreed to buy its partner Promotora de Informaciones SA, also known as Prisa, out of the venture for 750 million euros.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Henderson Group Plc agreed to buy US-based Geneva Capital Management Ltd.
 pipeline company, is in advanced talks to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP for about $3 billion, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 Investors have been awaiting additional details as they weigh whether or not to buy shares in Alibaba’s IPO -- which could be the largest ever in the US.
 “They don’t have to do anything with it, but as it sits there on the balance sheet, it’s unproductive” CIT said Tuesday it agreed to buy Direct Capital Corp, a Portsmouth, New Hampshire-based lender with assets of about $500 million.
 “We see any selloff as an opportunity to buy as we are still positive about this market” Portuguese 10-year yields rose nine basis points, or 009 percentage point, to 365 percent at 4:45 pm.
June 10 (Bloomberg) -- Green Plains Inc, which just became the first major ethanol producer to buy its own cattle-feed yard, has plans to milk it for more -- by buying the cattle too.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- Dufry AG agreed to buy Nuance Group for about $17 billion, unifying the Swiss duty-free store operators and securing growth in the Mediterranean, the world’s largest travel destination.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire John Gokongwei is scouting chains of mom-and-pop outlets to buy into faster-growing Philippine towns as part of a plan to compete with retail stores controlled by the nation’s richest man, Henry Sy.
 The companies announced the agreement as negotiations continued for France to buy a 20 percent stake in Alstom from shareholder Bouygues SA.
 Reddy’s +15% * CNX Nifty -04%; BSE 100 -07%; BSE 500 -07% * BSE 100 gainers: Kotak Mahindra Bank +32% after stk raised to buy from hold at Deutsche Bank; Godrej Cons +3%; Glenmark +19%; Hero MotoCorp +15%; Asian Paints +14% * BSE 100 losers: HDIL -84%, Unitech -72%, Jaiprakash Associates -54%; GMR -53%; DLF -53% * Index movers incl.
 The speech also said the Pensions Tax Bill will allow people over 55 to withdraw savings without the requirement to buy an annuity, as announced in Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne’s budget in March.
 Voting Rights Bouygues said today its deal with the state would allow the French government, or any other entity of its choice, to buy as much as 20 percent of Alstom.
 GE’s attempt to buy US.
 to buy properties that fall outside the company’s typical investing parameters.
 The partnership plans to buy, renovate and lease homes, the company said, without specifying the types of residences that would qualify.
 Shareholders will have the right to buy three new shares for every 17 they hold, the Basel, Switzerland-based company said in a statement today.
 Dufry said June 4 it agreed to buy Nuance for about $17 billion, its biggest-ever purchase.
 Colbun will holdan option to buy stakes once its complete.
 WinWater, created last year to buy jumbo mortgages to package into bonds, sold $81 million of top-rated notes paying 35 percent coupons at 1004 cents on the dollar, according to a person with knowledge of the offering who asked not to be identified citing a lack of authorization to speak publicly.
 Mitsubishi UFJ added 12 percent to 602 yen after its rating was raised to buy from neutral at Merrill, which raised its price target to 810 yen from 710 yen.
 He settled with his father’s creditors in 1975, and formed Jay Paul Co, which he used to buy up inexpensive office properties in places such as Long Beach, California.
 has agreed to buy DirecTV, the largest satellite provider, for $485 billion, and wireless companies Sprint Corp.
 Investors may demand a yield of about 7 percent to buy the securities, less than the 748 percent yield on similarly rated Zambian bonds, according to Raza Agha at VTB Capital Plc in London.
June 20 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Kelcy Warren’s attempt to buy Targa Resources Corp.
 “I assume Pinnacle will continue to try to improve their brand positioning and there are maybe other suitors out there that would want to buy them” Phone calls seeking a comment from Thuy-An Wilkins, a spokeswoman for Pinnacle, weren’t immediately returned.
 The transcript on Wprost’s website shows Belka allegedlydiscussing options for the central bank to buy government bondsin an emergency situation by providing liquidity to state-ownedlender BGK and state-controlled PKO Bank Polski SA.
 The government’s agenda shows the cabinet will discussamendments to the central bank law, including allowing thecentral bank to buy bonds on the secondary market outside ofopen-market operations, at its June 17 meeting.
 A few years ago, her card was used to buy $25,000 in party supplies in New York, while she was more than 2,000 miles away on a trip in Seattle.
 31 said it agreed to buy a stake in the operator of the existing pipeline operator, Transportadora de Gas del Peru.
 Casa dos Ventos will make a decision within two weeks whether to buy an additional 150 megawatts of turbines, worth 525 million reais, from GE for a wind park it may acquire from Industrias Metalurgicas Pescarmona SA, or Impsa, said two people.
 “If you don’t have a low tax rate, you can’t bid against the other guy with the same aggressiveness” in seeking to buy future products, said Samuel Isaly, a managing partner at OrbiMed Advisors, which owns shares in both AbbVie and Shire.
 Consumers’ Claims Armstrong has fared better defeating consumers’ claims that they were misled by him into buying energy drinks and his autobiographies.
 Buyers of Armstrong’s books, who claimed they were misled into buying what were really works of fiction, last year dropped a lawsuit filed in Sacramento after the judge in that case dismissed the claims against the publishers.
 Chief Executive Officer Larry Ellison is nearing a deal to buy Micros Systems Inc.
 Oracle made another acquisition in cloud computing today, with an agreement to buy LiveLOOK, a real-time technology for co-browsing and screen-sharing.
 The companies said last month that First Reserve Corp’s Houston-based Sabine Oil agreed to buy Denver-based Forest Oil in an all-stock transaction, without giving a value for the deal.
 Last month, Atos offered to buy rival Bull for about 620 million euros, underscoring demand for cybersecurity and cloud-computing services.
 of South Africa agreed in April to buy Australian retailer David Jones Ltd.
 During the silver fix, the three member banks declare how much metal they want to buy or sell for clients as well as their own accounts.
 Chief Executive Officer Larry Ellison is nearing a deal to buy Micros Systems Inc.
 The currency has advanced to a near three-year high since policy makers kept borrowing costs unchanged at 075 percent on June 23, prompting the bank to buy about $400 million four days later, according to a report by Mizrahi Tefahot Bank Ltd.
 Because the purchase had a limited effect on the currency, weakening it by 01 percent, “the bank is either going to have to buy dollars more aggressively, or in the end will be forced to cut the rate,” said Yshai Shilo, a bond trader at Israel Brokerage & Investments Ltd.
 FXCM, a trading firm based in Tel Aviv, said the decision to hold interest rates unchanged “gave speculators incentive to buy the shekel” “Even if the decision was correct, the bank will have to deal with the risk inherent in the shekel’s appreciation,” it said.
 5 that Deutsche Securities provided officials from three pension funds with benefits totaling 63 million yen from 2010 to 2012 to persuade them to buy financial products.
 for about $5335 million last year and was in talks to buy Billabong International Ltd.
 Exchanges in Shanghai and Hong Kong agreed in April to allow as much as 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily trading, opening up the mainland market further to foreign investors while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 China will expand its programs to allow foreign investors to buy local shares and will scrap quotas when conditions allow, the People’s Bank of China reiterated in its annual report for 2013 posted on its website today.
 Nomura raised its rating on the company to buy from neutral, citing expectations for greater improvement in the glass business over the next three years.
 AT&T agreed in May to buy satellite provider DirecTV for $485 billion, an acquisition that could quickly turn the company into one of the largest TV distributors in the US.
 It would also be politically-charged amid questions -- especially in Germany -- over whether the ECB has the authority to buy sovereign debt and could flop given government bond yields are already at record lows.
 agreed to buy 76 percent of Turkey’s Tekstil Bankasi AS for $316 million in April, while Commercial Bank of Qatar bought Alternatifbank AS last year.
 Proprietary traders who use computers to buy and sell stocks in milliseconds would have to register with the SEC under recommendations made public yesterday by White in New York.
 Mercuria agreed in March to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s commodity unit for $35 billion.
 Overseas Expansion The game maker partnered with its biggest shareholder, SoftBank Corp, last year to buy a controlling stake in Supercell Oy, developer of games Clash of Clans and Hay Day.
 Others who were ready to buy couldn’t because there wasn’t enough stock available to satisfy demand.
 “If approached by any government entity to buy my stake, I would consider the offer,” Ismaik, who was appointed CEO in February 2013, said by telephone.
 locations in Mexico, agreed last year to buy Vips restaurants from Wal-Mart de Mexico SAB for 82 billion pesos.
 Redomiciling in a lower rate country means “you have a bigger wallet to do things” Valeant has performed the best among tax-inversion companies, gaining 707 percent since it announced plans to buy Biovail Corp.
 Canada’s second most populous province will also create a C$1 billion ($914 million) fund to buy equity stakes in mining and oil and gas companies, many of which operate in the province’s remotest regions, Leitao said yesterday in Quebec City as he unveiled his budget for the fiscal year that began in April.
 Apart from agreeing to buy WhatsApp, Facebook has said it will acquire virtual-reality goggles maker Oculus VR Inc.
 Prior to agreeing to buy WhatsApp, Facebook was struggling with the rise of mobile messaging, as the apps threatened people’s usage of the social network.
 “It’s the credits that developed-market investors tend to buy which have done the best, and that trade has largely played out,” Barclays strategist Aziz Sunderji said in a June 4 telephone interview from New York.
 Her next address, on June 18, might provide as good a reason as any to buy stocks.
 Soriot cited the forecast last month in rejecting Pfizer Inc’s bid to buy his company for $117 billion (694 billion pounds).
 Pfizer ended its six-month attempt to buy AstraZeneca May 26, the deadline imposed by the UK.
 Meanwhile, the business model of hackers has evolved, with the ability to buy and sell malware packages in black markets, which enables anyone to perform cyber espionage, she said.
 upgraded the British maker of Mr Kipling cakes to buy from neutral.
 Bank of America Corp, which agreed to buy Merrill in 2008 as the investment bank was close to collapse, left behind about 3 million square feet of offices at the former World Financial Center complex, renamed Brookfield Place.
 Bad Timing The group aged 35 to 44 fared badly in part because its members had taken on debt to buy real estate at just the wrong moment, said William Emmons, senior economic adviser at the St.
 “Consumers don’t want to just buy a product, they want to buy a set of values,” Beccari said.
 Imperial is better placed to buy any Reynolds-Lorillard brands that may become available than most of its peers, including Japan Tobacco Inc, which has also been named as a potential buyer, said Chris Wickham, a tobacco analyst at Oriel Securities in London.
 While it may make sense for Imperial to buy brands that might be sold after a Reynolds-Lorillard merger, it could depend on which brands end up for sale and the company’s finances.
 Financial Stretch While it could be a financial stretch for Imperial to buy any brands that may shake loose from a Reynolds-Lorillard deal, the chance to increase the company’s presence in the US.
 “They’ve got plenty of balance sheet to buy a wide variety of firms,” Knight, a New York-based analyst, said in a phone interview.
 That’s the company’s longest stretch without a deal of that size since it agreed to buy Radiometer A/S in 2003, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Both deals ended up going to buyout firms.
 GE’s attempt to buy US.
 Better Reputation “We were able to buy a company almost entirely based on our reputation,” Schwartz said.
 Esteves gained recognition after he joined former partners in 2009 to buy UBS AG’s Brazilian investment bank, UBS Pactual, at a 19 percent discount to the $31 billion they had sold it to the Swiss bank for in 2006.
 They also can generate losses when interest rates fluctuate, especially if the desk borrows to buy assets and juice profits, according to Josh Siegel, a former Citigroup banker and now CEO of StoneCastle Partners LLC in New York.
 The company has already entered into binding agreements to buy an acute-care, multidisciplinary hospital in Switzerland and is in talks to acquire outpatient facilities in the country.
 Murphy’s estimates for his report are based on the assumption that consumers swayed by new products are drawn to dealer lots to buy vehicles.
 About two weeks before the first bid from Pilgrim’s, Hillshire had itself made an offer to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, producer of brands including Vlasic pickles, for $66 billion including debt.
 A condition of both Tyson and Pilgrim’s Pride’s earlier offers was that Hillshire scrap an agreement to buy the Birds Eye frozen-foods maker.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- Starwood Capital Group, the investment firm run by Barry Sternlicht, agreed to buy seven US.
 agreed to buy Karoon Gas Australia Ltd’s stake in a ConocoPhillips natural gas project for about $800 million, giving the seller’s shares the biggest gain in more than five years.
 would probably appeal to buyers in China, Japan and South Korea as a feedstock for gasoline and petrochemical production, according to Ehsan Ul-Haq, senior market consultant at KBC Energy Economics.
 One of the best things you could do in the stock market over the last three years has been to buy shares from short sellers, who borrow stock with the aim of replacing it once the price falls.
 is legal, an appeals court ruled, overturning a judge who said the city’s Taxi and Limousine Commission overstepped its authority by requiring owners to buy a specific vehicle.
 The commission in September 2012 designated the Nissan NV200 as the official “Taxi of Tomorrow” and required owners of medallions, which confer the right to operate yellow cabs in New York, to buy the $29,700 vehicles.
 Taxi fleet operators sued the city in December 2012 seeking to block the requirement, and a judge halted the program five months later, saying it violated the administrative code because it didn’t allow medallion owners to buy hybrid vehicles.
 offered to buy it for a $68 a share.
 and one of the first investors to buy when stocks were bottoming after the 2008 financial crisis, is also skeptical of the idea stocks valuations will falter amid low market breadth.
 Value Traded Record prices may contribute to a drop in the number of shares changing hands because it takes more money to buy the same amount of stock.
 offered to buy the Botox maker for about $54 billion.
 pipeline operator agreed to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP for $6 billion, creating one of the biggest natural-gas transporters.
 offered to buy it for a $68 a share.
 Buying Plans More Americans indicated in today’s confidence survey that they plan to buy automobiles, appliances and previously owned homes in the next six months.
 While the company that Sprint is negotiating to buy only operates in the US, parent Deutsche Telekom also sells the T-Mobile brand in Europe.
 T-Mobile has been the fastest-growing carrier of late, yet the company only started its “un-carrier” marketing initiatives a little more than a year ago when it was still reeling from AT&T’s failed attempt to buy the company.
 housing market is getting a boost from low borrowing costs and government incentives to buyers as well as an improving economy.
 6 that the department had blocked its deal to buy $39 billion of servicing rights from Wells Fargo.
 “We’ll do a handful of condo conversions this year” Lenders may not offer mortgages to buyers in condo buildings with large numbers of renters.
 “There is no obvious target they need to buy” Investment Writedowns Losses from NTT Docomo’s US.
 NTT Docomo in 2000 announced deals to buy stakes in AT&T Wireless Group, KPN Mobile NV in the Netherlands and Hutchison 3G UK Holdings Ltd.
 Few Opportunities To be sure, NTT Docomo may fail to find anything to buy.
 this month agreed to buy an 18 percent stake in the Bangkok-based company.
 Credit Suisse advised clients to “await a better entry point” to buy shares of BNP, said Barclays’s weak capital position will weigh on its strategic plan, and said compounding issues at HSBC Holdings Plc “create significant tail risks” Legal ‘Nightmare’ US.
 On July 15, 2011, shares in Oakland, California-based Clorox rose after Icahn offered to buy the company for about $102 billion.
 Contracts to buy previously owned houses in the US.
 Google agreed to buy digital-thermostat maker Nest Labs Inc.
 in May agreed to buy the company for $48 billion.
 Like other value investors, Klarman is willing to hold cash when he cannot find enough things to buy.
 agreed to buy Consorcio Comex SA for about $23 billion, picking off the Mexican coatings and paint maker that competitor Sherwin-Williams Co.
 failed to buy because of antitrust issues.
 agreed to buy the life insurer for 5822 billion yen ($57 billion).
 The sportswear retailer was raised to buy from hold at Jefferies, which cited its long-term sales potential, the brand’s growing popularity among young people and women, and its valuation after recent declines.
 CSN, controlled by Brazil’s Steinbruch family, last year was a leading contender to buy two unprofitable steel mills in Alabama and Brazil’s Rio de Janeiro state from ThyssenKrupp.
 The bank offers loan guarantees and other financing to foreign companies that borrow money to buy American products, which were valued at $374 billion in 2013 alone.
 Gail, which agreed to buy US.
 Gail agreed to buy 35 million tons of LNG a year for two decades from Cheniere’s Sabine Pass terminal in western Cameron Parish, Louisiana.
 One option being considered is for Mitsubishi to buy Alstom’s steam turbine and grid business and Munich-based Siemens to get the gas turbine operations, people familiar with the matter said.
 would no longer be able to buy engines from his country to launch the satellites.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- The New Jersey Assembly approved a bill to allow consumers to buy electric cars directly from a manufacturer.
 drugmaker, which agreed to buy Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 The market was expecting them to buy next fiscal year, but it looks like they’re already doing it” Sumitomo Mitsui Trust Bank Ltd, Mitsubishi UFJ Trust & Banking Corp.
 “Once you get a couple of people starting to buy, you’ll quickly get a few follows because they think it’s a value buy” Prices have slumped 30 percent this year, reaching $9180 on May 30, the lowest since Sept.
 Blackstone Group LP’s deal to buy the Cosmopolitan resort and Genting Bhd’s proposed resurrection of an abandoned project on Las Vegas Boulevard are further signs of investor confidence in the nascent recovery.
 “Over the last year we really got the blood pumping now, and things are moving fast” Blackstone, the world’s largest alternative-asset manager, agreed last month to buy the two-tower Cosmopolitan complex on the Las Vegas Strip from Deutsche Bank AG for $173 billion.
 Billionaire investor Carl Icahn won court approval in January 2010 to buy the casino resort for $156 million after it went into bankruptcy.
 The handset features 3-D viewing and image-recognition technology to make it simpler for users to buy items from Amazon’s Web store.
 “I’m going to buy a whole lot more things with this technology than I ever have before,” said Ralph De La Vega, head of AT&T’s mobile business, at the event.
 A decade of currency controls has made dollars scarce in the South American country, making it harder for importers to buy goods and foreign companies to repatriate their cash.
 In their version of the story, dark pools serve as havens for institutional investors tired of seeing orders to buy and sell stocks front-run on public exchanges.
 insider trading investigation of Carl Icahn’s attempt to buy Clorox Co.
 In July 2011, Bloomberg News reported that options traders who bought Clorox calls on July 11 could profit almost eightfold just days after Icahn bid to buy the bleach maker.
 Most Active More than 16,000 calls to buy the Oakland, California-based company changed hands on July 11, the most since October 2010 and 10 times the number of puts to sell, as the shares rose 28 percent.
 Barratt advanced 12 percent to 3616 pence as Goldman Sachs upgraded its rating on the housebuilder to buy from neutral, citing the stock’s recent weakness.
June 19 (Bloomberg) -- A partnership including Thor Equities LLC agreed to buy a 26-story office and retail building on Manhattan’s Fifth Avenue for $595 million.
 Iliad SA made an informal offer of between 4 billion and 5 billion euros in recent weeks to buy Bouygues Telecom, people familiar with the matter said.
 Numericable SA in April agreed to buy SFR from Vivendi SA, adding a mobile arm to its broadband services.
 Traders speculate the moves are likely to boost the region’s bond and stock markets, bolstering their appeal and the currency needed to buy them.
 QE refers to quantitative easing, or when a central bank resorts to buying bonds to lower borrowing costs and inject cash into the financial system.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- British Airways parent IAG SA plans to buy new aircraft for its Iberia arm after the Spanish unit cut losses, according to Chief Executive Officer Willie Walsh, who had made fleet renewal contingent on improved earnings.
 IAG closed a deal to buy Deutsche Lufthansa AG’s UK-based BMI in 2012, securing scarce operating slots at BA’s London Heathrow base, and completed its takeover of Vueling last year.
 Others who were ready to buy couldn’t because there wasn’t enough stock available to satisfy demand.
 “We’ve had a number of requests from overseas hedge funds saying they’d like to buy the bonds if they come on the market” Informal Agreement Goldman Sachs and Aiful have reached an informal agreement that the US.
 In November, the pension fund contributed $200 million to an alliance with the Shapoorji Group to buy office buildings in major Indian cities.
 “We can use the joint venture to buy other toll road assets,” he said.
 To keep settlements difficult to manipulate, the LME records ring sessions with microphones and video cameras to capture traders barking at one another to buy and sell aluminum, copper and zinc, among other metals.
 This month, it agreed to buy Labrys Biologics Inc, a US.
 Among Indian peers, only Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, India’s largest drugmaker by market value, has the financial clout to buy Cipla, said IIFL’s Pathiparampil.
 Such a deal is unlikely after Sun agreed to buy rival Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 The private-equity firm, which spent about 84 million pounds to buy a minority stake in the firm from founder Norman Foster in 2007, will receive about 108 million pounds from the sale of its minority stake to his partners and the repayment of loans, according to a statement today.
 Woolworths Bid Woolworths agreed to buy David Jones for A$4 a share on April 9, and the Sydney-based company’s shareholders are due to vote on the deal July 14.
 While shares of David Jones traded as low as A$379 this month on concern Lew may block the deal, they climbed 4 percent to A$394 yesterday after Woolworths offered to buy Lew’s shares and other remaining minority stakes in Country Road.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Roche Holding AG agreed to buy Genia Technologies Inc.
 The European Central Bank said on June 5 it’s preparing plans to buy the debt to boost lending in the region.
June 3 (Bloomberg) -- OC Oerlikon AG, a Swiss maker of textile machinery, closed its $11 billion deal to buy the coatings units of crosstown rival Sulzer AG earlier than planned and raised its full-year sales forecast.
 executive Koch has been tasked with integrating Sulzer’s coatings division, which Oerlikon agreed to buy earlier this year for 1 billion Swiss francs.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander SA, Spain’s biggest bank, agreed to buy GE Money Bank AB, the consumer finance business of GE Capital in Sweden, Denmark and Norway, for about 700 million euros ($953 million).
 “The deal is positive since it allows Santander to diversify both geographically and in terms of the type of business lines they buy” The bank agreed to buy 51 percent of the finance unit of El Corte Ingles SA, Spain’s largest retailer, for about 140 million euros in October.
 and Canada from which it may need to buy power and real-time data on fuel supplies at power plants.
 is nearing a deal to buy Micros Systems Inc.
 agreed to buy Fusion-io Inc, which provides storage to Facebook Inc.
 into the luxury-car segment show that wealthy drivers are ready to buy upscale green cars, if they get noticed.
 Global investors, through the Hong Kong Stock Exchange, will be able to buy into Citic’s diverse lines of business.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- Henkel AG agreed to buy France’s Spotless Group SAS for 940 million euros ($13 billion) as the maker of Loctite glue and Persil detergent overcame concerns about overpriced deals to seal its second takeover in a week.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 Payment Due The utility, which raided its capital budget last month to buy fuel, has $86 billion of debt, with about 70 percent not covered by bond insurance, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The cabinet today approved speeding up plans to buy anti-tank rockets from the US, authorizing Defense Minister Sven Mikser to hold talks to purchase the missile systems “in a somewhat bigger scope and on a quicker timetable than initially planned,” the government press office said by e-mail.
 Providing Standard General’s funds are able to purchase at least 10 percent of outstanding shares in the retailer, it will loan Charney funds to buy the stake, charging annual interest of 10 percent, according to a filing yesterday.
 A similar deal for Cencosud to sell the credit-card units to Itau Unibanco Holding SA was called off in December, and the next month the Brazilian lender agreed to buy Chile’s Corpbanca.
 Global Leadership The change in policy, which would exempt new entrants from having to buy an existing automaker, is necessary because the window of opportunity for China to seize global leadership in electric vehicles is closing fast, he said.
 The company has also agreed to buy Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility unit.
 Investors have asked for about 24 percentage points of extra yield on average since April 1 to buy the debt instead of benchmark securities.
 GE’s attempt to buy US.
 The stock sale “should bring some calm to the constant concern the bank is weakly capitalized as it deals with its litigation bills,” said Ingo Frommen, an analyst at Landesbank Baden-Wuerttemberg who raised his recommendation for the stock to buy from hold.
 Rexam, focusing on its main business after selling plastic-container units, plans to buy more companies after purchasing 51 percent of a can manufacturer in Saudi Arabia in February.
 Rexam in February agreed to buy a stake in United Arab Can Manufacturing Ltd, or UAC, in Saudi Arabia for $122 million, with the deal to close in the third quarter.
 Bright Food is open to buying domestic and overseas companies and it isn’t interested in deals that are “too small” and prefers to work on one acquisition at a time, Chairman Lv Yongjie said in an interview on June 18, without providing further details.
 “Imported foods are also growing in popularity in China and they may also be seeking foreign food brands to address the trend” Bright Food, which controls Shanghai-listed Bright Dairy & Food Co, reached a preliminary agreement last month with private-equity firm Apax Partners LLP to buy its 56 percent in Tnuva for about $960 million, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Kai Yuan Holdings Ltd, an investor in Chinese steelmakers and real estate, said it agreed to buy the Paris Marriott Hotel Champs-Elysees for 3445 million euros ($468 million).
 In December, it agreed to buy a 90-room, 32-story property in Hong Kong’s Sheung Wan district for HK$488 million ($63 million).
 agreed to buy mobile-advertising company TapCommerce, seeking to make more money outside of its main microblogging service by expanding promotions on smartphones and tablets.
 Twitter’s deal to buy MoPub for $350 million was its biggest acquisition to date.
 “That puts Molson Coors in a very strong position to buy that 58 percent at a very low price,” Holland said.
 for about $5335 million last year and was in talks to buy Billabong International Ltd.
 made its biggest acquisition yet in agreeing to buy Kentz Corp.
 In December, the company agreed to buy Valerus Field Solutions for $435 million in cash to expand in US.
 Diamond companies rely on financing, with dealers using credit to buy rough stones from miners and to fund gem-trading and the cutting and polishing of stones for jewelry production.
June 11 (Bloomberg) -- Swiss Re Ltd, the world’s second-biggest reinsurer, agreed to buy the UK.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in his March budget that pushed retirees to buy an annuity with their pension savings.
June 19 (Bloomberg) -- SunEdison Inc, the best-performing solar company this year, agreed to buy solar projects in Massachusetts with 50 megawatts of capacity from BlueWave Capital LLC.
 Asos Plc advanced 74 percent, after plunging 31 percent yesterday, as UBS AG advised investors to buy shares in Britain’s largest online fashion retailer.
 UBS raised its rating on company to buy from neutral, saying that the investments Asos had made to expand the business will help deliver sales growth of above 20 percent per year for the next five years.
 The recent surge in CLO issuance also has allowed investors to be selective and choose not to buy a deal if interest rates are too low, Preston said.
 Eskom Holdings SOC Ltd, the state-backed electricity supplier, agreed to buy the power from the two solar farms, which are near Douglas, South Africa, in the Northern Cape Province, according to the statement.
 agreed last month to buy BCX for about 27 billion rand ($253 million) as Africa’s largest fixed-line operator boosts cloud-based offerings of information and communication technology services.
 The plan allows shareholders to buy large amounts of stock at a discount if anyone obtains 10 percent of the company, making a hostile takeover prohibitively expensive.
 agreed to buy Covidien Plc, a maker of hospital supplies and medical devices, for $429 billion.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the SEC.
 agreed to buy Micros Systems Inc.
 agreed to buy Fusion-io Inc, which provides storage to Facebook Inc.
 He led Oracle Team USA to victory in the America’s Cup last year and agreed in 2012 to buy most of the Hawaiian island of Lanai for an undisclosed sum.
 In December, Oracle agreed to buy marketing-software maker Responsys Inc.
 Hydro-Quebec under a 20-year contract has agreed to buy electricity from the 235-megawatt Temiscouata I wind farm, which is expected to be operational in December.
 Chief Executive Officer Larry Ellison is nearing a deal to buy Micros Systems Inc.
 Oracle made another acquisition in cloud computing today, with an agreement to buy LiveLOOK, a real-time technology for co-browsing and screen-sharing.
 Dekkers, 56, cut the second-largest deal in Bayer’s history in May, agreeing to buy Merck & Co’s consumer-health unit for $142 billion to solidify Bayer’s position near the top of that market.
 It has also given details of proposals that allow some junior creditors to buy shares in the company at a discount so Punch can repay junior notes in the Punch A securitization for less than face value.
 nuclear-power plants, agreed to buy Pepco for $68 billion in cash in April.
 The number of customers he has won since his pledge last year to buy the plane: zero.
 Emirates’ cancellation, announced yesterday, revealed a preference for Boeing Co’s planned 777X, for which the carrier has committed to buy at least 150.
 General funds also are used to buy books or pay teachers.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Dubai’s stocks rose, spurred by funds from money managers tracking the MSCI Emerging Markets Index who had yet to buy into the world’s best-performing gauge.
 It agreed to buy Autoru website for $175 million this week to enter the classifieds business.
 Ventas, based in Chicago, agreed to buy American Realty Capital Healthcare Trust Inc.
 scrapped rules pushing retirees to buy an annuity in Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne’s March budget and capped the fees that pension funds are allowed to charge savers.
 The underwriters will be allowed to buy another 135 million shares if they sell the initial amount.
 Companies are investing in plant and labor after having run up piles of cash and devoted much of what they did spend to buying back stocks or issuing dividends.
 Another option under discussion is for Vnesheconombank, the state development lender, to buy Mechel shares or bonds rather than the creditor banks, the people said.
 Shenzhen’s sale of lottery tickets offering a chance to buy shares in August 1992 drew hundreds of thousands of investors to the southern city and sparked days of violence after application forms ran out.
 Ladder Capital uses its FHLB funding from Indianapolis to buy mostly AAA rated bonds, CEO Brian Harris said last month in a conference call.
 The shareholders properly raised questions about the directors’ willingness to let Kotick and Kelly form an investment group to buy $234 billion of Vivendi’s stake as part of the $82 billion recapitalization, Judge Travis Laster concluded today at a hearing in Wilmington, denying a bid by directors, as well as Kotick’s and Kelly’s group, to have the case thrown out.
 The investors also said Kotick used threats to quit to strong-arm directors into allowing his investment group to buy a sizeable chunk of the French conglomerate’s stake and then blocked Activision from considering alternative deals, according to court filings.
 Until its deal to buy Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc, though, Merck lacked a candidate that hit the same target as Gilead’s Sovaldi, blocking a viral protein critical for replication.
 Merck’s $385 billion deal announced yesterday to buy Idenix gave them that drug, allowing the company the chance to combine it with two others that have been shown to work well in combination.
 The contracts give investors the right but not the obligation to buy or sell a security at a certain price.
 There is no meeting ground” The breakdown in talks and uptick in attacks raises questions about Sharif’s strategy and threatens to disrupt his plans to attract investors to buy stakes in state-run companies as part of an International Monetary Fund road map to revive the economy.
 Daiichi Sankyo rose 17 percent to 1,765 yen after Mizuho Securities raised the company’s rating to buy from neutral, saying new products will drive earnings growth.
 court ruling blocking generic versions of its best-selling product, a decision that may force AbbVie to raise its price to buy the drugmaker, according to Barclays Plc.
 aluminum producer agreed to buy UK.
 London Stock Exchange Group Plc rose 61 percent after agreeing to buy Frank Russell Co.
 aluminum producer, which agreed to buy the UK.
 LSE to Buy Frank Russell for $27 Billion to Boost Indexes Kirkland & Ellis LLP represents the London Stock Exchange Group Plc, which agreed to buy Frank Russell Co, a unit of Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co, for $27 billion to bolster its FTSE International Ltd.
 companies have been looking to buy rivals in the UK.
 agreed to buy Covidien Plc, also a maker of rare disease medicines, for $429 billion.
 “You can be very rich, but if there’s nothing to buy it doesn’t help you,” he said.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 The German automotive and defense-equipment supplier was boosted to buy from hold at Berenberg Bank.
 They like to close quick” While the goal of creating more affordable housing is laudable, risks arise when entire communities belong to buyers with low down payments and fragile finances, said Jack McCabe, a housing consultant based in Deerfield Beach, Florida.
 She married June 14 after deciding to buy the house.
 reaches a deal to buy T-Mobile, Legere is likely to run the combined company, people familiar with the matter said last month.
 is in advanced talks to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP for about $3 billion, according to people with knowledge of the matter, in a move to boost growth for the fourth-largest US.
 Though the company has more than 100 million readers every month across all its publications, it typically sells advertising by individual magazines, making it more difficult for marketers who prefer to buy large swaths of audiences in a single purchase.
 Bayerische Motoren Werke AG rose 28 percent after UBS AG advised investors to buy shares in the world’s largest luxury-car maker.
 UBS upgraded the luxury automaker to buy from neutral, saying its investments in electric-car models confer a competitive advantage over its rivals.
 CGG SA added 29 percent to 1104 euros after Societe Generale SA upgraded the shares to buy from hold.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Element Financial Corp, the Toronto-based equipment finance company, agreed to buy PHH Corp’s North American fleet management business for $14 billion in cash to expand in the US.
 So market makers must constantly adjust their hedging” Spending $10,000 each to buy RadioShack, Clorox and Molson Coors shares in the minute after the options trades would have generated almost $1,000 in profit if the positions were sold at the end of the day, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 I don’t think it surprises anybody” Icahn Calls Investigators are reviewing large option trades in Clorox before Icahn’s attempt to buy the company in July 2011, as well as trading by golfer Phil Mickelson and sports gambler William Walters in Dean Foods Co.
 More than 16,000 calls to buy shares of Clorox changed hands on July 11, 2011, the most since October 2010 and 10 times the number of puts to sell, as the shares rose 28 percent.
 agreed to buy 80 737 jets valued at $74 billion.
 UBS AG boosted its rating on the world’s largest coffee-shop chain to buy from neutral and its stock-price estimate to $87 from $80.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- TreeHouse Foods Inc, a maker of private-label foods for retailers, agreed to buy Flagstone Foods for $860 million in cash to expand in healthy snacks such as dried fruits.
 ‘Significant Interest’ “There’s a growing trend among sovereign wealth funds to buy on margin,” said Bernardo Bortolotti, director of the Sovereign Investment Lab, a research unit at Bocconi University in Milan.
 agreed to buy 60 million Deutsche Bank shares at 2920 euros, the Frankfurt-based bank said May 18.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- William Lyon Homes, a homebuilder focused in the Western US, plans to buy a residential building business from Polygon Northwest Company LLC to expand its reach.
 “If I’m the ordinary consumer I’m rolling my eyes” AT&T’s plan to buy satellite-television provider DirecTV for $485 billion follows Comcast Corp’s proposal to acquire Time Warner Cable Inc.
 EFG-Hermes Holding SAE increased 04 percent after the investment bank said HC Securities & Investment, an independent adviser hired to examine an offer to buy a 20 percent stake by billionaire Naguib Sawiris and Beltone Financial Holding Co, valued the shares at 2293 pounds each.
 About two weeks after Chicago-based Hillshire offered to buy Pinnacle, JBS SA’s Pilgrim’s Pride Corp.
 EPM, based in Medellin, is in advanced negotiations to buy about 30 percent of Taesa from private-equity firm Fundo de Investimento em Participacoes Coliseu, said the person, who asked not to be identified discussing private information.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 last month offered to buy Aquila in a deal that valued the Australian company at A$14 billion ($13 billion) They would get a half stake in the A$74 billion West Pilbara iron ore mine, port and rail project in Australia.
 It didn’t make an offer for any of Aramid’s assets and used information about the Sony investments to buy the outstanding balance of Citigroup’s stake, $2267 million, for 50 cents on the dollar, according to the suit.
 said it agreed to buy the oil-engineering company.
 surged 21 percent after Sycamore Partners said it plans to buy the clothing chain.
 dropped 3 percent after agreeing to buy OpenTable Inc.
 “For a company like Lala to get into Brazil, they’d have to buy local brands,” Miguel Mayorga, a Latin America food analyst at Mexican brokerage Corporativo GBM SAB, said in a telephone interview.
 “Lala needs to buy something, because the amount of cash they have isn’t generating the value that shareholders want” Lala now controls more than half of Mexico’s milk market, according to company reports citing research by AC.
 spurred investors to buy riskier securities.
 aluminum producer, agreed to buy UK.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Bank AG, Europe’s biggest investment bank, offered shareholders a discount of 24 percent to buy new stock as it sought to raise a total of 85 billion euros ($116 billion) to strengthen its finances.
 Deutsche Bank’s sale of the 2998 million shares allows investors to buy five new shares for every 18 they hold, according to today’s statement.
 Hillshire hasn’t made any recommendation to shareholders on Tyson’s $77 billion offer, nor has it terminated its May 12 agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, a condition of both the Tyson and Pilgrim’s proposals.
 phone company, agreed to buy all the electricity from a 225-megawatt Welsh wind farm under a deal valued at about 100 million pounds ($167 million) over 15 years.
 In October, he struck a $297 million deal to buy 285 percent of Rothesay, with Singapore’s sovereign fund taking an equal share.
 “We haven’t seen anything of this scale” The structure is different from private-equity and also hedge funds, which have the latitude to buy exotic or wide-ranging assets.
 Valeant, based in Laval, Quebec, twice raised its bid to buy Allergan as part of its strategy to become one of the world’s five biggest drugmakers.
 Allergan’s anti-takeover provision allows shareholders to buy large amounts of stock at a discount if anyone obtains 10 percent of the company, making a hostile takeover prohibitively expensive.
June 13 (Bloomberg) -- Aspire Mining Ltd, the Australian firm developing coking coal assets in northern Mongolia, said it agreed to buy 50 percent of a venture with Noble Group Ltd.
 raised its recommendation to buy from neutral.
 “We therefore upgrade the shares to buy and add it to our conviction list” Credit Suisse shares were up 16 percent to 2676 francs at 12:20 pm.
 telecommunications deals if he decides to buy T-Mobile US Inc.
 Telephone-service provider AT&T last month announced its $485 billion bid to buy satellite-television company DirecTV.
 closed a deal earlier this year to buy out Vodafone Group Plc’s stake in their wireless venture for $130 billion.
 Demand for the private mortgages, known as non-agency, is growing after the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau’s regulations on qualified mortgages took effect this year, and government-controlled mortgage-finance companies Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac limited themselves to buying loans conforming to those rules.
 Cencosud will have an option to buy back Scotiabank’s 51 percent stake after 15 years.
 The latest deal follows Scotiabank’s May 8 agreement in Canada to buy a 20 percent stake in Canadian Tire Corp’s financial-services business, giving it access to the retailer’s customers.
 Last year, it paid 124 times Ebitda to buy Kabel Deutschland Holding AG.
 Negotiating Position “Fixed-line assets aren’t freely available to buy, this isn’t a liquid market,” Oriel Securities analyst John Karidis said in a phone interview.
 “In situations where Vodafone feel they need to buy, this weakens their negotiating position” Vodafone has forecast that because of higher spending and weaker underlying operating trends its Ebitda will decline by between 5 percent and 9 percent this year on a comparable basis.
 In his letter to the SEC and CFTC, Levin asked if the regulators had found evidence that investors pay a higher price to buy or receive a lower price to sell and any evidence linking high-frequency trading to exchange-related problems or concerns.
 Tepco intends to buy as much as 10 million tons a year of lean, or low-energy LNG from projects such as those fed by North American shale gas.
 The utility agreed to buy a total of 12 million tons a year from Sempra Energy’s Cameron LNG facility in Louisiana on the US.
 Tepco is in talks with Mitsui to buy more gas from the project, he said.
 Supporters of the tick-size test, which will last a year, say it will encourage market makers that facilitate trading to buy and sell more shares and create conditions that would persuade more companies to go public.
 Much of the song and dance performed by computer algorithms is an effort to buy or sell large chunks of stock without throwing off a scent to high-frequency trading computers trying to sniff out big buyers and sellers in the market.
 But here’s the thing: HFT firms won’t go near a huge offer to buy or sell that is thrown into the market all at once.
 Shares of the company, upgraded to buy from neutral at Goldman Sachs last month, declined 09 percent to 1,588 yen as of 2:17 pm.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- London Stock Exchange Group Plc agreed to buy Frank Russell Co, a unit of Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co, for $27 billion to bolster its FTSE International Ltd.
 Wind said it plans to use the proceeds to buy back bonds maturing in 2018 and refinance part of its senior loans.
 McClendon’s American Energy Partners LP agreed to buy shale-drilling rights from West Virginia to Texas in three transactions for a total of $425 billion, the closely held Oklahoma City-based company said in dual statements today.
 Monsanto said in April it spent more than $15 billion to buy back almost 3 percent of its shares over 12 months.
 Last month, Atos offered to buy competitor Bull for about 620 million euros, underscoring demand for cybersecurity and cloud-computing services.
 Blackstone Group LP, the world’s largest alternative-asset firm, is close to an agreement to buy a group of select-service hotels from Clarion Partners LLC for about $800 million, adding to its already sizable portfolio of such properties, a person with knowledge of the deal said yesterday.
 The deal would follow a transaction in September, when a Blackstone affiliate agreed to buy 16 hotels, including Hampton Inn and Holiday Inn Express properties, from Hersha Hospitality Trust for $217 million.
 Investors bet the ECB might have plans to buy bonds under quantitative easing.
 Would-Be Buyers L’Estrange, the son of a cattle dealer, said he’s got almost 30 clients prepared to buy pubs for as much as 4 million euros each.
 Morgan Stanley upgraded the maker of medical devices to overweight, similar to a buy recommendation, from equal weight, citing potential returns from its deal to buy Covidien Plc.
 The fastest traders now have the ability to buy and sell in times measured in nanoseconds, or billionths of a second.
 agreed to buy Fusion-io Inc.
 2 medical device maker, is negotiating to buy Dublin-based Covidien Plc for more than $40 billion, a person familiar with the talks said, in what may become the latest deal driven by potential tax savings from relocating overseas.
 Metropolitan Bank, the third-largest Philippine money manager, has been avoiding PSE shares and has no plans to buy.
 Market Value Foster said April 15 that while the company has had offersto buy the refinery, the board doesn’t recommend selling.
 The growth of trading in stock options - contracts which give their investors the right to buy or sell shares of a company at a specified price within a certain time-frame -- averaged 3 percent in the five years through 2013, data from Options Clearing Corp.
 Fund, designed to buy stocks that benefit most from growth-boosting policies, returned 40 percent in the three months through June 18, the best advance among 64 Indian equity funds tracked by Bloomberg.
 The decision comes amid General Electric Co’s effort to buy Alstom SA, which prompted Economy and Industry Minister Arnaud Montebourg to say he was concerned about the loss of a corporate decision-making center in the country.
 Hebei is obligated under the pact to buy 60 percent of Kami’s annual output to a maximum of 48 million tons of the first 8 million tons of concentrate each year.
 By comparison, Americans are expected to buy 161 million new cars and trucks industrywide this year, according to the average of analysts’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 agreed to buy it.
 surged 29 percent to a record after the touch-screen technology provider agreed to buy display chipmaker Renesas SP Drivers Inc, combining products in high demand from phone and tablet makers.
 Apple, the maker of iPads and iPhones, was in talks to buy Renesas SP Drivers for as much as $1 billion, the Wall Street Journal reported April 2, citing people familiar with the matter.
 “We feel confident that we would be able to submit a competitive bid to buy the company” Rising property taxes and utilities costs are squeezing operating margins at real estate investment trusts that own apartments, putting pressure on them to merge and sell assets.
 A sale of Associated to a financial buyer makes the most sense because publicly traded real estate investment trusts only want to buy assets on the East and West Coasts, Litt said.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- First Quantum Minerals Ltd’s deal to buy Lumina Copper Corp.
 agreed to buy Dublin-based Covidien Plc, a maker of medical equipment.
 Hillshire said it hasn’t made any recommendation on the Tyson offer nor changed its agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 Hillshire agreed May 12 to buy Pinnacle, the producer of brands including Vlasic pickles, for $66 billion including debt.
 ‘Low Debt’ “It makes a lot of financial sense to buy Hillshire now that they have low debt levels, they have very strong cash flow,” Bryan Agbabian, San Francisco-based sector head for agricultural equities for Allianz Global Investors, said by phone earlier.
 Shire said today that its management team had discussions with AbbVie and rejected three offers to buy the company.
 Total Energies Nouvelles Activites USA has agreed to buy $250 million of the convertible debentures, which mature in June 2021, San Jose, California-based SunPower said today in a statement.
 Sony previously agreed to sell its PC division, which produces notebooks under the Vaio brand, to buyout firm Japan Industrial Partners Inc.
 The transcript on Wprost’s website shows Belka allegedly discussing options for the central bank to buy government bonds in an emergency situation by providing liquidity to state-owned lender BGK and state-controlled PKO Bank Polski SA.
 The government’s agenda shows the cabinet will discuss amendments to the central bank law, including allowing the central bank to buy bonds on the secondary market outside of open-market operations, at its June 17 meeting.
June 13 (Bloomberg) -- Residents of Stuyvesant Town-Peter Cooper Village, Manhattan’s largest apartment complex, rallied at City Hall today to keep rents affordable and give tenants a chance to buy the property as it is prepared for a sale.
 opposes reauthorization of the bank and says taxpayers shouldn’t make it easier for foreign competitors to buy jets.
 agreed to buy Doris Inc, North America’s third-largest marketer of branded ladies legwear for C$110 million ($1016 million) to expand into women’s intimates.
 Ventas, based in Chicago, agreed to buy American Realty Capital Healthcare Trust for cash and shares, according to a June 2 statement.
 upgraded the shares to buy from neutral, citing cost savings and revenue-growth potential.
 boosted its 2014 revenue forecast, while predicting adjusted earnings per share will come in at the lower end of an earlier range, as more wireless customers opt to buy new phones on installment plans.
 London Stock Exchange Group Plc in May said it was in exclusive talks to buy Russell.
 To keep settlements difficult to manipulate, the LME records ring sessions with microphones and video cameras to capture traders barking at one another to buy and sell aluminum, copper and zinc, among other metals.
 “If you try to buy Avon, what do you get?” Dibadj said.
 It costs $2 in execution fees for CME Group’s biggest customers to buy or sell 20 Eurodollar futures.
 Proprietary traders who use computers to buy and sell stocks in milliseconds would have to register with the SEC under recommendations made public yesterday by White in New York.
 In a short sale, an investor sells borrowed shares to bet on a decline, hoping to buy them back cheaper and pocket the difference.
 The investor withdrew its offer to buy Family Dollar as part of an agreement that added Trian’s Edward Garden to the board.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the SEC.
 Blackstone Acquisition Bond investors were paid a yield of 120 basis points more than the benchmark swap rate to buy the bonds rated BBB and maturing in four years in the June 3 sale.
 Underwriters for online beauty product seller Jumei International Holding Ltd’s May initial offering exercised their option to buy an additional 16 million shares.
 The sale is part of a broader funding package to cover the 67 billion euros needed to buy full control of Scania and deepen a three-way alliance between the Soedertaelje-based company, VW’s own commercial-vehicle unit and Munich-based MAN SE, which VW also controls.
 The release follows Facebook Chief Executive Officer Mark Zuckerberg’s rebuffed offer to buy Snapchat last year for $3 billion and is part of a broader effort to draw in younger users to the world’s biggest social-networking service.
 Apart from agreeing to buy messaging service WhatsApp, he’s hiring EBay Inc’s PayPal president David Marcus to run the Facebook Messenger application.
 Mitsubishi also offered to buy as much as 10 percent of Alstom, a stake valued at about 900 million euros, while Siemens will explore options to combine its rail assets with Alstom’s.
June 29 (Bloomberg) -- Saab AB agreed to buy the Swedish marine defense unit of ThyssenKrupp AG for 340 million kronor ($50 million), expanding its business to manufacturing submarines and stealth-technology corvettes.
June 10 (Bloomberg) -- Macau’s government plans to further restrict the use of China UnionPay Co’s debit cards at casinos, curbing money flows to the world’s largest gambling hub by making it harder for bettors to buy expensive items that they exchange for cash.
 Crude oil’s longest slump since 2009 and rising equity valuations have led traders to buy up protection against losses in the iShares Standard & Poor’s/TSX 60 Index exchange-traded fund, a measure of Canada’s largest companies.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- TeliaSonera AB agreed to buy Tele2 AB’s Norwegian business for 51 billion kronor ($744 million) to boost its share of the mobile-phone market in Scandinavia’s richest economy and approach the reach of Telenor ASA.
 The purchase will probably reduce the number of networks in Norway to three from four in a move that mirrors Telefonica SA’s deal to buy Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit in Germany.
 With a deal to buy Abbott Laboratories’ generic drugs line, her company will move its legal tax address abroad, as Actavis Plc did last year.
 Hayley Kam, a 24-year-old teacher, is in the line with her father as they make their third attempt to buy a City Point home.
 companies to buy smaller foreign businesses and move their addresses for tax purposes.
 real estate website, is seeking to buy No.
July 2 (Bloomberg) -- Roche Holding AG, the world’s biggest maker of cancer drugs, agreed to buy Seragon Pharmaceuticals Inc.
Telefonica SA (TEF) agreed to buy MediasetSpA (MS)’s stake in Distribuidora de Television Digital as it seeksfull ownership of the Spanish pay-TV operator to strengthenofferings and stem declining revenue.
 Vodafone Group Plc (VOD), the world’s second-largest wireless carrier, agreed in March to buy Spanish cableoperator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in a 72 billion-eurotransaction to bolster capabilities in TV and broadband.
 In June, Telefonica agreed to buy 56 percent of DTS fromPrisa for 750 million euros, and that deal is now awaitingregulatory approval.
 Drillisch will have the option to buy an extra 10 percent of the merged company’s capacity.
 Users aren’t required to buy DirecTV’s satellite dish or TV service to get live streams of games happening outside their local market.
 agreed to buy DirecTV in May for $485 billion, a transaction that will require regulatory approval.
 recommended investors sell Russian equities, citing the latest sanctions as the catalyst, after saying last month it was time to buy.
 ministers will make the initial purchases under a program to buy more than 150 ultra-low emission vehicles, the nation’s Department for Transport said yesterday in London.
 “London streets are cramped, you can’t go that fast and there are all sorts of limitations and fees for gasoline-powered vehicles, so there’s a logic to buying electric cars,” said Karl Brauer, senior industry analyst for Kelley Blue Book in Irvine, California.
 are in talks to buy defaulted bonds from holders including Elliott Management.
 Introbiz offers services to buy contact information of various types of people, including celebrities such as Nicole Kidman and Johnny Depp.
 is negotiating to buy six road projects valued at 20 billion rupees ($333 million), said Parvez Umrigar, co-head of its structured investment group.
 Modi’s pledge to spend $25 billion on roads, airports, ports and smart cities to unclog Asia’s third-largest economy and spur expansion is encouraging investors to buy stalled road and power projects.
 The currency has held near the strong end of its permitted range of HK$775 to HK$785 since July 1, prompting the Hong Kong Monetary Authority to buy dollars to defend the peg.
 Charney then took out a loan from the New York-based fund to buy the shares at about 71 cents apiece.
 Standard General has warrants to buy that stock back and purchase 10 percent of Charney’s original stake at that 71-cent price.
 LLC who upgraded ADM to buy from hold, said by phone today.
 Cantor Fitzgerald LP raised its recommendation on the UK’s biggest supermarket owner to buy from sell, citing a reorganization of its operations, and growth in its online and convenience sales.
 generic-drug maker that tried to buy Meda in April, in a deal valued at about $53 billion.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- First Quantum Minerals Ltd, which agreed to buy an Argentinian copper project last month, is on the lookout for more deals as it sees a supply shortage of the metal by the end of the decade.
 Last month it agreed to buy Lumina Copper Corp.
 Only certain materials can be printed in the MakerBot machine -- metal cannot -- and customers will still have to go to the store to buy the materials for the printer.
 TransForce also agreed to buy Contrans Group Inc.
 “It will take something to ignite it and to get the interest back” Glencore Xstrata Plc’s $135 billion acquisition of Caracal Energy Inc, a driller in Chad, and Qatar’s Al Mirqab Capital SPC’s offer to buy Heritage Oil Plc for $15 billion along with some other deals in April and May encouraged some industry analysts, including Anish Kapadia from Tudor Pickering Holt & Co, to report investor interest in the European oil industry is reviving.
 technology companies may lose as much as $35 billion in the next three years from foreign customers choosing not to buy their products because of concerns they cooperate with spy programs, according to Daniel Castro.
 is moving closer to buying Shire Plc and moving the legal address to Ireland.
 Applied Materials agreed in September to buy Tokyo Electron for $939 billion in stock to add scale as a shrinking base of clients makes earnings of suppliers more volatile.
 India’s CNBC television channel reported last month that Wal-Mart is in talks to buy some of the French retailer’s stores in India.
 The Leap-1A engines from CFM International would power 100 Airbus Group NV (AIR) A320neos that EasyJet agreed to buy in 2013, said the people, who asked not to be identified because details are private.
 “We’ve made it very clear that we are evaluating both the CFM and Pratt & Whitney engines” EasyJet, Europe’s second-largest low-fare carrier, agreed in June 2013 to buy 135 Airbus planes, split between 35 current-generation A320s and 100 Neos.
 have already reduced the amount of their own money they’re willing to use for trading in the face of new regulations, making it more difficult for investors to buy and sell on demand.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Onex Corp, Canada’s largest buyout firm, agreed to buy York Risk Services Group Inc.
 Onex struck a deal in 2012 to buy USI Insurance Services LLC from a fund run by Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Star Member Following the Swissair collapse LOT joined the Star Alliance led by Deutsche Lufthansa AG, which went on to buy the Swiss operator’s successor together with Austrian Airlines and a stake in Belgium’s biggest carrier.
 plans to borrow in the lease-financing market to buy about $110 million of equipment for a waste disposal deal with New York City, according to Chief Financial Officer Brad Helgeson.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 Last November, the company agreed to buy back the Stability Fund’s assets for $38 billion.
 made a fourth offer to buy the drugmaker.
 It may face stronger competition after British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc agreed to buy Sky Italia and Sky Deutschland AG stakes last week from Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc.
 Premium Partner Telefonica agreed this month to buy an 11 percent stake in Premium for 100 million euros.
 Mediaset is also looking for another partner to buy a stake in Premium.
 He reversed himself and sued the NBA in federal court in Los Angeles the day after Ballmer agreed to buy the team for a record $2 billion.
 Azul plans to buy 30 of the E195-E2 model and become the first operator of the plane, the biggest version of Embraer’s updated regional-jet family.
 The number of loans from $1 million to $10 million to buy single-family homes in the 100 largest metropolitan areas surged to more than 15,000 in the second quarter, the highest ever, according to property data firm CoreLogic.
 The rule relaxations come as the stock exchanges of Hong Kong and Shanghai work on a mutual access plan that will allow investors to buy shares listed in Hong Kong via the Shanghai exchange, and vice versa.
 Under the new plan, Chinese investors will be able to buy stocks traded on both the Hang Seng Composite Large Cap Index and the Hang Seng Composite Mid Cap Index, as well as companies traded on the Hong Kong and Shanghai exchanges.
 Companies such as Texas Instruments Inc, which has excess capacity in its plants, may look to buy smaller rivals such as Atmel Corp.
 agreed last month to buy Covidien Plc for $429 billion and take its Irish tax address, and giants including Pfizer Inc.
 owner of storage terminals for oil products and chemicals, agreed to buy the 50 percent of International-Matex Tank Terminals it doesn’t already own for $103 billion in cash and stock.
 In the last three years, the company sold its lighting business, exited complex Chinese joint ventures and agreed to buy Johnson Controls Inc’s electronics business.
 Blackstone last year agreed to buy a group of Madrid apartments for 1255 million euros.
 AbbVie, the North Chicago, Illinois-based maker of the top-selling arthritis drug Humira, made a fourth offer yesterday to buy Shire Plc for 301 billion pounds ($516 billion).
 agreed to buy Dublin-based Covidien Plc, a maker of medical equipment.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 is nearing an agreement to buy Wild Flavors GmbH, a maker of natural food ingredients backed by KKR & Co, for about 25 billion euros ($34 billion), people familiar with the matter said.
 Fund, designed to buy stocks that benefit most from growth-boosting policies, returned 42 percent this year, beating 96 percent of its peers, the data show.
 Standard General already used $10 million of the money to buy a high-interest loan that was deemed in default by the lender.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 More than 15 companies have announced plans to do so since 2010, including AbbVie Inc, the drugmaker that split from Abbott last year and is attempting to buy Dublin-based Shire Plc.
 Yandex said it completed a plan to buy back 15 million shares and authorized a repurchase of 3 million more.
 The fees that jewelers pay importers and bankers to buy gold had dropped to $10 an ounce over the London cash price yesterday from $25 last week in anticipation of a reduction in curbs, Bamalwa said.
 The Santa Clara, California-based company said it intends to buy back about $4 billion of stock in the current quarter, and expects sales growth of about 5 percent for the year, higher than previously projected.
 As the technology firm’s top dealmaker, Perica has upped the pace of acquisitions, culminating in this year’s $3 billion agreement to buy Beats Electronics LLC, the headphone maker and music-streaming service.
 Mitsubishi UFJ agreed to buy Charlotte, North Carolina-based Bank of America’s 49 percent stake in their private bank venture in December 2012.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Klepierre SA offered to buy Dutch competitor Corio NV for about 42 billion euros ($56 billion) to solidify its position as Europe’s second-largest publicly traded-shopping mall operator as euro region economies recover.
July 26 (Bloomberg) -- CIT Group Inc, the lender that struck a deal to buy Steven T.
 “In desperation, I called my local CVS to explain the whole mess and ask how much it would cost to buy mycophenolate out-of-pocket.
 agreed to buy rival messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 Tinkler, who’s trying to buy the Queensland mine through his Singapore-based company Bentley Resources Ltd, missed a June 30 deadline for the payment, the Australian Financial Review reported, citing people it didn’t identify.
 GPIF, BOJ Japan’s Government Pension Investment Fund, which is being urged to buy more stocks and use the JPX-Nikkei 400, said earlier this month it had about $15 billion of its more than $205 billion in local stocks tracking the measure by the end of March.
 Energy Capital will continue to buy waste from Waste Management under long-term contracts, said Tyler Reeder, a partner in the private equity firm.
 A victory by Widodo, known as Jokowi, would lead 74 percent to buy, while 6 percent said they would sell.
 Both candidates say they will maintain Indonesia’s ban on mineral ore exports and Widodo, known locally as Jokowi, has pledged to buy back the state’s stake in telecommunications company PT Indosat.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Bed Bath & Beyond Inc, facing a stock slump after delivering a disappointing forecast last month, plans to buy back $2 billion in shares during the next fiscal year.
 The company is likely to seek a sale of rights to future royalties that could be worth $614 billion, cash that would be used to buy back as many as 10 percent of shares, Arun Jayaram, an analyst at Credit Suisse AG, said July 28 in a note to investors.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-largest oil and gas producer, defended a plan to buyback about $27 billion of stock from Royal Dutch Shell Plc amid concern investors may reject the deal.
 Woodside agreed to buy back shares for A$3649 each, a 15 percent discount.
 founder Steven Udvar-Hazy one candidate, though he said in Doha last month that he’d prefer to buy after the big twin-jet has proven itself with airline operators.
 AirAsia would also seem sure to buy, with Chief Executive Officer Tony Fernandes this month describing the A330neo as a “killer” model that would finally make long-haul discount flights truly viable.
 to buy 888 percent of Hyundai Logistics Co.
 Demand for the city’s currency continued to be strong, prompting the Hong Kong Monetary Authority, the city’s de facto central bank, to buy $410 million during New York and London hours to defend the city’s peg to the US.
 “It is very hard to buy construction companies, so if we do anything, we’re cautious.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Sky Deutschland AG’s second-largest shareholder said that British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc’s offer to buy out investors is too low and it won’t sell without a premium.
 BSkyB agreed to buy Murdoch’s 57 percent holding in the German cable television company for 29 billion pounds ($49 billion) in cash last week.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Gtech SpA agreed to buy International Game Technology for $47 billion in cash and stock, uniting the world’s largest provider of lottery systems with the biggest slot-machine maker.
 While there isn’t an explicit requirement to disclose cyberattacks, public companies are obliged to tell investors about material events that could influence their decision to buy or sell shares.
 “We’re not seeing any reluctance to buy the GTF based on the CSeries incident.
 The New York-based firm uses complex mathematical models to decide when to buy and sell securities, and manages about $20 billion.
 Earlier this month, Tyson agreed to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
July 4 (Bloomberg) -- San Miguel Corp, the biggest Philippine company, is prepared to spend as much as $10 billion to buy assets in Southeast Asia, President Ramon Ang said.
 for $45 billion, while AT&T is seeking to buy DirecTV for $48 billion.
 The real estate investment trust agreed to buy 50 percent of 530 Fifth Ave.
 Imperial is lining up $7 billion to buy some brands that Lorillard and Reynolds would sell off to assuage any concerns raised by the US.
 Chief Executive Officer Robert Kotick faced firing over his demand that he lead a group helping to buy out most of Vivendi SA’s stake in the video-game company he ran, according court filings.
 25% Stake Some Activision stockholders said directors wrongfully allowed Kotick and Kelly’s group, which included Chinese video-game publisher Tencent Holdings Ltd, to buy 25 percent of Vivendi’s Activision stock at the same discounted price Activision paid for $583 billion of the shares.
 Kotick told Activision board members “he would not cooperate with a debt or equity offering or any other process that involves a result other than” the offer by his investment group to buy Vivendi’s shares, according to the filing.
 of China Ltd, China’s biggest aluminum producer known as Chalco, dropped a bid to buy 60 percent of SouthGobi for C$925 million.
 Imperial is lining up as much as $7 billion to buy some brands that the companies would sell off to assuage any antitrust concerns raised by the US.
 properties, agreed to buy Park Avenue Tower in New York for about $750 million, said three people with knowledge of the transaction.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Speculation that Lululemon Athletica Inc’s founder wants to sell the yoga-gear retailer has options traders stretching toward calls to buy the shares.
 Wilson’s time with Lululemon could end if he opts to sell his stake in the company rather than attempt to buy it, a possible alternative reported by the Wall Street Journal.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- China’s stocks rose the most in a month as automakers got a boost from the government’s pledge to buy more alternative-energy cars, while utilities and consumer-staples shares gained on speculation profit will beat estimates.
 “The new policy by the government to buy more alternative-energy cars is boosting hopes that auto sales will increase,” Zhang Yanbing, an analyst at Zheshang Securities Co, said from Shanghai.
 Robeco is using its quota under China’s Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor program to buy mainland consumer and industrial firms with dual listings in Hong Kong, anticipating the price gaps will narrow as an exchange link with Shanghai makes it easier for money to move between the two bourses.
 Company Outlook Aecom was upgraded to buy from hold by Adam Thalhimer, analyst at BB&T Capital Markets.
 agreed to buy Australia’s Talison Lithium Ltd, owner of the world’s largest open-pit lithium mine.
 The partnership between Airbus and Boeing and their suppliers is pivotal, said Jeff Knittel, the CEO of CIT Group Inc’s leasing company, which agreed to buy re-engined A330s aircraft at the show alongside Boeing Dreamliners.
 He was also given a one-time option grant to buy 500,000 shares, according to the filing.
 Gupta Role Gupta will be working on strategic investments as Twitter continues to buy companies to bolster its advertising business.
 Apple agreed to buy Beats for $3 billion in May, its biggest-ever acquisition, with founders Dr.
 ministers will make the initial purchases under a program to buy more than 150 ultra-low emission vehicles, the nation’s Department for Transport said yesterday in London.
 “London streets are cramped, you can’t go that fast and there are all sorts of limitations and fees for gasoline-powered vehicles, so there’s a logic to buying electric cars,” said Karl Brauer, senior industry analyst for Kelley Blue Book in Irvine, California.
July 13 (Bloomberg) --- BOC Aviation Pte, the Asian aircraft leasing company, wants to buy about 35 Airbus A320 aircraft and a larger number of competing Boeing Co.
 agreed to buy June 3, Bristow said.
 *** + ADM agreed to buy Wild Flavors GmbH for about 22 billion euros ($299 billion) in cash.
 Rapid credit growth fueled bank earnings and economic growth until 2008 as clients borrowed to buy homes, cars and consumer goods.
 A put option exercised by Athabasca on April 17 forces PetroChina to buy the 40 percent it doesn’t own in the undeveloped Dover oil-sands project from the Canadian company, based on a 2010 agreement.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Neil Woodford has stuck to buying Britain’s largest drugmakers and cigarette makers for his new equity income fund, industries considered resilient to economic downturns.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Legg Mason Inc, the money manager that’s struggled with more than five years of net redemptions, agreed to buy Martin Currie to expand into active international stock funds.
 In March, it agreed to spend as much as $41 million to buy QS, which split from Deutsche Bank AG in 2010 and had $41 billion in funds under management and $100 billion in advisory assets.
 The offering probably will cut earnings per share by 10 percent next year, assuming underwriters exercise their option to buy an additional $75 million of stock within 30 days, according to David George, a Robert W.
 Revenue from selling power provides funds for the yieldco to buy more plants as they are built and also pay dividends to investors.
 Proceeds of its offerings will be used for expenses and also to buy buy projects from SunEdison and other companies.
 Olayan, one of the most prominent Saudi Arabian family-owned firms, was in talks to buy a majority stake in Gulf Union in a deal potentially worth about 500 million riyals ($133 million), people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 “I didn’t need to go to Taiwan and I didn’t need to buy a microwave oven, but with this extra money, why not?” said retired schoolteacher Yin, 60, as she put receipts into her pink purse at an Industrial & Commercial Bank of China Ltd.
 The company is offering to buy back the $880 million of 7875 percent debentures due July 2020 for as much as 1105 cents on the dollar, the Houston-based company said in its statement.
 Proposed changes to South Africa’s 2002 Mineral and Petroleum Resources Development Act include giving the state the right to a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and to buy an unspecified additional share at an agreed price.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- SSE Plc agreed to buy Energy Solutions Group Topco from Bridgepoint Development Capital Ltd.
 This firm then used this information to buy a rival greeting-card company, according to court papers An appeal followed the February 2013 jury trial and $31 million judgment.
 Chongqing Iron & Steel Group agreed to buy the magnetite iron ore project in Western Australia for as much as A$280 million ($262 million), the official Xinhua News Agency reported in November 2009.
 NRG also received a warrant to buy an additional 2 million shares of FuelCell for $335 each.
 withdrew from an agreement to buy two hydro-power projects from the Indian company.
 “We have had consortiums and JVs bidding together to buy spectrum.
 What we haven’t had is two of the top carriers in the country banding together to buy spectrum,” he said.
 Su and the other individuals were seeking information that they could match to buyers or customers willing to pay a significant price, prosecutors said.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- Realogy Holdings Corp, owner of brokerage brands Coldwell Banker and Century 21, agreed to buy ZipRealty Inc.
 British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc dropped 55 percent after saying it agreed to buy 21st Century Fox Inc’s pay-TV businesses in Germany and Italy.
 Aabar is in talks with former CEO Hasan Ismaik to buy at least half of his 289 percent stake, Bloomberg News reported July 16.
 A victory by Widodo would prompt 74 percent to buy and 6 percent to sell.
 after Carlyle Group LP agreed to buy the company for $475 billion including current debt, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 Sterling filed a $1 billion antitrust lawsuit against the NBA in federal court in Los Angeles the day after Ballmer agreed to buy the team.
 “His dad wants to buy him a new job at the top of his state” The crowd reacts to the trust-funder trashing with delight, though one supporter is absent: Hassebrook’s honorary campaign co-Chairman Susan Buffett, the daughter of Berkshire Hathaway Inc.
 Voters “see those ads as an implication of who you are and that you’re trying to buy the race” Exciting Supporters The Buffett support has helped excite supporters, said Hassebrook, the former director of the Center for Rural Affairs, a Lyons, Nebraska-based non-profit that advocates for small farms, renewable energy and health care.
 Building Base “In ’06 I put a lot of my own money into the race, some people took away that I was trying to buy the race,” Ricketts, 49, said in an interview.
 is aiming to get a deal done to buy rival Lorillard Inc.
 is better off without Rupert Murdoch, who proposes to buy the entertainment giant for more than $75 billion.
 He sold it short last week around $6 -- which means selling stock you don’t own with a plan to buy it cheaper soon, pocketing the difference.
 Market-makers who had sold the shares short got nervous and scrambled to buy them to close their positions, driving the price even higher, Laresca said.
 “If you’re short, you have to buy it within five days,” Laresca said of market-making rules.
 “I have no clue” Cynk, which lists headquarters in Belize, as said on its website that it’s a service to buy contact information for people like celebrities.
 offered to buy the text-messaging service.
 China Qingdao International plans to buy the rest of the company after acquiring about 57 percent stake for HK$4287 million.
 The balance of people saying the next 12 months are a good time to buy a home slumped to 5 percentage points in the second quarter from 34 in the previous three months, the mortgage unit of Lloyds Banking Group Plc said.
 The report adds to evidence that a boom that has driven house prices to record highs may have peaked, with Halifax reporting a “sharp rise” in the proportion of people citing values as a barrier to buying.
 Concerns about interest-rate increases have risen over the past year, although raising a deposit was the most commonly cited obstacle to buying a home, according to the Halifax survey, which questioned 1,959 people July 4-14.
 Standard General also agreed not to buy any more shares of the company until after its 2015 annual meeting.
 Manager Stakes AMG in April agreed to buy a majority stake in Veritas Asset Management LLP, a global equity manager with $17 billion in assets.
 The venture wants to attract customers by offering to buy solar power from their rooftops at an attractive rate and giving energy-saving tips, Yoshiyuki Furukawa, a Panasonic official in charge of the project, said.
 Some non-utility power companies are offering to buy solar power at a higher rate than that set by the government.
 Panasonic’s venture is offering to buy solar power 1 yen higher than the government-set tariff per kilowatt hour.
 HTA agreed yesterday to buy 3,100 African towers from New Delhi-based Bharti Airtel Ltd.
 The nation holds a presidential election next week and candidate Joko Widodo, who is leading in opinion polls, plans to allow foreigners to buy apartments in an effort to raise tax revenues, Setyo Maharso, a member of his campaign team, said on July 3.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- CNP Assurances SA agreed to buy 51 percent of Banco Santander SA’s consumer-finance insurance units, a deal that gives the French insurer access to a host of European countries including Germany.
 “We will be buying additional interests in the deepwater Gulf of Mexico, to complement our portfolio, in the hundreds of millions of dollars” The company in May announced a $31 billion sale of Texas shale properties to Encana Corp, which it followed a day later with a deal to buy positions in Gulf of Mexico projects from Apache Corp.
 To bolster its video offerings, AT&T agreed in May to buy El Segundo, California-based DirecTV for $485 billion.
 has agreed to buy that division for $23 billion, pending a US.
 Litigation between holders of the junior and senior debt may slow progress toward a permanent owner for the complex, whose tenants have been seeking to buy and keep its apartments affordable.
 agreed to buy rival Lorillard Inc.
 “But because you have a desire to work and make better, I continued” Calderon, 68, is one of at least 16 Latinos in the Chicago area who’ve filed consumer complaints with the Illinois attorney general, saying Herbalife duped them into buying tens of thousands of dollars worth of products they couldn’t sell.
 Jefferies Group LLC raised its rating on the copper miner to buy from hold.
 A Sprint acquisition of T-Mobile, though, would probably be challenged by the Justice Department, which sued to block AT&T Inc’s plan to buy T-Mobile in 2011, First said.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Arabtec Holding Co’s second-largest shareholder is in talks to buy at least half of a 289 percent stake held by the construction company’s former chief executive officer, a person with knowledge of the situation said.
 The acquisition follows Whirlpool’s deal last year to buy a majority stake in Hefei Rongshida Sanyo Electric Co.
 Twitter’s implied volatility, or the cost to buy options, was 623 on average in its first week of options trading, according to data on three-month contracts closest to the stock price.
 “I’d be surprised and I don’t suppose the meeting would last very long” PanAust agreed last year to buy Glencore Plc’s stake in Frieda River, estimating the development costs at as much as $18 billion.
 Abbott has been expanding the portion of its generic-drug business that operates in emerging markets, including the deal to buy Chile’s CFR Pharmaceuticals SA in May.
 The announcement comes as AbbVie Inc, the company split off from Abbott last year, today moved a step closer to buying Shire Plc after the Dublin-based company said it’s willing to back a fifth offer of 314 billion pounds ($537 billion), which would be the biggest industry deal this year.
 agreed to buy Banco Comercial Portugues’s Romanian unit to buttress its presence in the neighboring country as the Ukrainian crisis hits the profitability of Hungary’s largest lender.
 The extra yield investors demand to buy Venezuela’s bonds due in 2022 instead of US.
 Arguments over the KFN buyout come two weeks after KKR, led by George Roberts and Henry Kravis, agreed to buy a stake in hedge fund BlackGold Capital Management LP as it continues a push to develop business beyond leveraged acquisitions, a person with knowledge of the deal told Bloomberg News.
 Blackstone in February used client funds to buy a piece of Senator Investment Group LP.
 A preliminary agreement between the carriers was announced today during a visit by German Chancellor Angela Merkel to China that included a range of agreements including signature on a deal for China to buy Airbus Group helicopters.
 The Russian carrier also agreed to buy eight current-version A330s.
 The partnership between Airbus and Boeing and their suppliers is pivotal, said Jeff Knittel, the CEO of CIT Group Inc’s leasing company, which agreed to buy re-engined A330s aircraft at the show alongside Boeing Dreamliners.
 European Shares British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc fell 55 percent after offering to buy 21st Century Fox Inc’s Sky Italia unit and 57 percent stake in Sky Deutschland AG to expand in Europe.
 “From a strategy standpoint, we can get the rights to the content that will make us successful without needing to buy the content,” Fran Shammo, Verizon’s chief financial officer, said this week, without directly addressing whether there were talks.
 The company also said it agreed to buy Swiss watchmaker Ulysse Nardin, without disclosing the price of the purchase, which is expected to be finalized during the second half of 2014.
 Energetica de Minas Gerais agreed to buy a 50 percent stake in a 6762-megawatt wind project in Brazil’s northeastern state of Bahia.
 The authority has been negotiating with banks for time to make payments on credit lines used to buy fuel.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- Standard Chartered Plc’s private equity arm led a group to buy a 28 percent stake in a Longfor Properties Co.
 The company took a step to strengthen the division in May when it agreed to buy Merck & Co’s over-the-counter products, including the allergy medicine Claritin, for $142 billion.
 “He knows what he’s doing’ Telefonica yesterday won European Commission approval for its 855 billion-euro deal to buy E-Plus, combining the third-and fourth-largest German wireless operators.
 WestJet exercised options to buy five more Bombardier Inc.
 Besides delays from Indian manufacturers who are seeking to replicate a weapon Sweden designed three decades ago, plans to buy 1,500 mid-range howitzers have also failed to be executed.
 “The fact India has not been able to buy artillery is symptomatic of the problems of governance within its armed forces,” said Harsh Pant, a defense studies professor at King’s College in London who has written books on India-China ties.
 What’s left is used mostly to buy weapons from abroad because India’s state-run factories aren’t able to meet the army’s needs, leaving tanks without shells and soldiers without bulletproof vests, according to a parliamentary defense committee report published last year.
 Froneman, 54, chief executive officer of Sibanye Gold Ltd, said the inequality, violence, high costs and low productivity that plague South Africa’s mining industry are creating an opportunity to buy platinum assets on the cheap and replicate the turnaround strategy that made his company the world’s lowest-cost major gold producer.
July 4 (Bloomberg) -- The French government has had its ability to buy Alstom SA shares in the open market capped by regulators, raising the potential cost of becoming an anchor investor while General Electric Co.
 An agreement with shareholder Bouygues SA for the state to buy as much as 20 percent of its Alstom stake, alongside an option to acquire freely traded shares, may create an unfair situation, the Autorite des Marches Financiers said in a release yesterday.
 Its option to buy 20 percent of Alstom from Bouygues only starts when GE’s purchase of most of the energy units is completed and Alstom has returned some of the proceeds to shareholders.
 Santander said in April it would offer to buy back about 25 percent of its Brazilian unit in a transaction valued at 47 billion euros.
 Last month he signed GE’s biggest acquisition: $17 billion to buy Alstom SA’s energy assets.
 agreed to buy for $23 billion, pending a US.
 Buyout Economics Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, overhaul and then sell them.
 boosted its recommendation on the Los Gatos, California-based company to buy from neutral, citing the potential for global subscription growth.
 Any slump in the market will be temporary and represents a good time to buy, said Craig Hodges, manager of the $14 billion Hodges Small Cap Fund that’s beaten 99 percent of its peers over three years.
 “We have a list of 15 to 20 names that we’d like to buy at a cheaper price, and so we kind of like days like today, where some of the weak holders get shaken out of stocks,” he said in a phone interview yesterday from Dallas.
 That presented an opportunity for his firm to buy.
 “That and the joint venture on their Duvernay acreage keeps getting deferred” A put option exercised by Athabasca on April 17 forces PetroChina to buy the 40 percent it doesn’t own in the undeveloped Dover oil-sands project from the Canadian company, based on a 2010 agreement.
 They said improving “in-stocks” -- a measure of how much merchandise is available for shoppers to buy -- was a top focus for Wal-Mart.
 TeliaSonera plans to buy Tele2 AB’s Norwegian business to bolster its No.
(Updates with CEO comments from third paragraph) By Sarah Jones July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Friends Life Group Ltd, the insurer created by Clive Cowdery, plans to return cash to shareholders after Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy its European wealth-management unit for as much as 356 million pounds ($610 million).
 agreed to buy it.
 offered to buy the company out at a 42 percent premium.
 Bison Capital, an investment firm in Beijing, proposed yesterday to buy NQ Mobile for $980 per ADR, compared with the closing price of $690 on July 29.
July 30 (Bloomberg) -- CME Group Inc, owner of the world’s biggest futures market, agreed to buy GFI Group Inc.
 and Azure Power India Pvt, for 130 megawatts of capacity, agreeing to buy photovoltaic power at tariffs ranging from 8,001 rupees ($133) a megawatt-hour to 9,330 rupees, according to the agency.
 Mark Mobius, executive chairman of Templeton Emerging Markets Group, says it’s not too late to buy into the rally in Chinese stocks.
 Amedeo, a lessor that signed to buy 20 Airbus A380s in February, has yet to line up a single customer for any of those planes.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd’s plan to buy back shares from Royal Dutch Shell Plc for $27 billion is at risk of being rejected by shareholders as it falls short of the votes needed to proceed.
 Woodside said June 17 it had agreed to buy back the shares for A$3649 each, a 15 percent discount to the previous day’s closing price.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- Elementia SA, the Mexican cement maker backed by billionaires Carlos Slim and Antonio del Valle, is in talks to buy out partner Lafarge SA in their joint venture, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Elementia has the right to buy Lafarge’s 47 percent stake under an option described in the original terms of the Mexico partnership, said two of the people, who asked not to be identified discussing private negotiations.
 Lafarge may be forced to offer its stake at a discount to convince the Mexican company to buy, the person said.
 The bank agreed in August to buy 45 percent of Singapore’s Helios Terminal Corp.
 agreed to buy US.
 The company said on May 9 it agreed to buy oil broker PVM Oil Associates Ltd.
 The NICS records the number of people seeking screening in order to buy a gun.
 When the Hong Kong dollar reaches the so-called strong end of the trading range, the HKMA offers to buy US.
 However, there’s no reason to buy right now either” Futures on the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index slid 01 percent.
 But the longer it keeps benchmark interest rates at about zero, the longer some investors will see a green light to buy.
 Telefonica Brasil SA and Telefonica Deutschland Holding AG, which received European approval this month to buy Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit, yesterday reported earnings that met analysts’ estimates.
 Robeco is using its quota under China’s Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor program to buy mainland consumer and industrial firms with dual listings in Hong Kong, anticipating the price gaps will narrow as an exchange link with Shanghai makes it easier for money to move between the two bourses.
 The Shanghai and Hong Kong exchanges agreed on April 10 to allow as much as 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border trading, opening up the mainland market further to foreigners while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 For one, Aereo would most likely have to buy entire channel bundles to gain access to broadcast channels, he said.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- A California real estate developer who sold billionaire Mark Zuckerberg rights to buy the house behind his Palo Alto home says the Facebook Inc.
 Voskerician was in contract to buy a house in Palo Alto that he planned to replace with a new one when he learned that Zuckerberg lived on the other side of the property’s fence, according to his lawsuit.
 Facebook’s Headquarters In a series of meetings at the property and Facebook’s headquarters, Zuckerberg said he wanted to buy the property from Voskerician, who’d already been offered $43 million by another developer to sell his rights to the house, according to the complaint.
 borrowed $265 billion last month for general purposes and to help integration of JPMorgan’s commodities unit the company agreed to buy.
 The company’s biggest competitor for TV customers, British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc, has announced plans to buy Sky Italia and a stake in Sky Deutschland AG, which would give BSkyB access to 20 million subscribers in five countries.
 Bitcoins, which emerged last year as an alternative to currencies, can be used to buy everything from gummy bears to computers and hotel stays.
 Both Fiat and its biggest investor denied the report that Europe’s largest carmaker made an approach to buy all or part of the Italian competitor.
 He declined to say whether the company plans to buy or lease the jets, and wouldn’t identify the aircraft that WestJet is considering -- other than to say that the planes are used.
 “Due to the much slower movement by other companies I’m becoming very doubtful something will happen this year” Froneman plans to buy platinum assets in South Africa to sustain the company’s dividend as its gold mines reach the end of their lifespans.
 “It was probably the sweetener that convinced them to buy what is essentially a selection of third-tier brands” Market Leader The purchase failed to prevent a 37 percent drop in Imperial Tobacco shares yesterday as the extent of the Davidoff maker’s increased presence in the US.
 “You don’t need to buy a cow when you just want a glass of milk,” Chris Wickham, a London-based analyst at Oriel, said in a phone interview.
 Rating Drop Vodafone’s spending plans, as well as 18 billion euros ($24 billion) in deals to buy Spain’s Grupo Corporativo Ono SA and Kabel Deutschland Holding AG, spurred credit-rating provider Moody’s Investors Service to strip the company of its A3 ranking this week.
 Salix, based in Raleigh, North Carolina, agreed this week to buy patents to three gastrointestinal drugs from Lainate, Italy-based Cosmo for about $27 billion in stock, allowing the US.
 “Some manufacturers waited to buy and used up inventories instead,” he said.
 Penny stocks, trading at low values a share, are particularly vulnerable to manipulation schemes because “it’s very easy for people to buy up large amounts,” Lynch said.
 provided an Ontario town along the proposed Energy East pipeline route with cash to buy a rescue truck on conditions that include the municipality not comment on the company’s operations.
 The money for Mattawa will be used to buy a new rescue vehicle for first-aid services along Highway 17, known as the Trans-Canada, near the community about 300 kilometers (186 miles) northwest of Ottawa, according to the agreement.
 Mallinckrodt on April 7 agreed to buy the company for $56 billion.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- Volkswagen AG said takeovers aren’t on the agenda at the moment after both Fiat SpA and its biggest investor denied a magazine report that Europe’s largest carmaker made an approach to buy all or part of the Italian competitor.
 Non-residents will also be allowed to buy homes in the city, according to a statement on the local housing authority’s website.
 SunEdison is planning to buy Riverstone’s share of Silver Ridge’s stake in the Tenaska Imperial Solar Energy Center West project in 2016, according to the statement.
 The subsidies would also be more than triple the rebate currently offered to buyers of Mitsubishi Motors Corp’s all-electric i-MiEV, which qualifies for a 950,000 yen subsidy in most prefectures.
 agreed to buy Dublin-based Covidien Plc, a maker of medical equipment.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- The man who helped name the world’s biggest pension pool is back as one of its money managers, and says the fund’s new approach to buying stocks will rub off on other retirement investors.
 As GPIF moves to buy more shares, other public pensions with about 50 trillion yen in assets are set to do the same.
 The introduction of REITs will provide a new source of cash to Indian developers that have struggled to reduce debt with interest rates among the highest in Asia, while giving investors the ability to buy into the country’s property market.
 in the 1960s and are publicly traded, pool investor money to buy real estate such as shopping malls, office buildings and rental housing.
 and Tshuva’s Elad Group paid $12 billion to buy the property in 2007 from Phil Ruffin and had the New Frontier hotel demolished that November.
 Packer, who is also developing casinos in Sydney and Sri Lanka, tried earlier this year to buy the Cosmopolitan of Las Vegas hotel and casino, the Australian Financial Review reported in April.
 Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy the property.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Reynolds American Inc, which agreed this month to buy US.
 If the $25 billion deal to buy Lorillard is cleared by antitrust regulators, the transaction will bring Reynolds new brands and help it cope with a shrinking market.
 agreed to buy patents to three gastrointestinal drugs from Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA for about $27 billion in stock, allowing the US.
 In May, the UK’s ITV Plc agreed to buy a controlling stake in Leftfield Entertainment Group, producer of “Pawn Stars,” for $360 million.
 clinched a deal to buy All3Media in a deal valuing the company at 550 million pounds ($932 million).
 Contracts to buy previously owned US.
 The company also agreed to buy Secusmart GmbH, a provider of anti-eavesdropping technology whose clients include German officials such as Chancellor Angela Merkel.
July 30 (Bloomberg) -- If Emily Parsitau wanted to light her home to ward off lions and intruders, she had to walk for an hour to buy kerosene at the nearest store.
 “At the moment it’s very hard for people in Africa to buy online,” MTN’s Chief Marketing Officer Pieter Verkade said in an interview.
 The incentives for people to keep paying include a phone-charging USB port and radio, which remove the need to travel to kiosks to pay for their mobile devices to be charged or to buy batteries for their radios.
 Now she uses the cash to buy treated water from a borehole.
 tumbled 53 percent, leading losses among phone stocks as France’s Iliad SA offered to buy a stake in T-Mobile US Inc.
 “I came here to buy bread because it seems that this war is rolling though in the end, there will be a truce,” he said.
 Apollo needs holders of at least 75 percent each of Verso’s second-lien and subordinated bonds to agree to an exchange that will reduce the company’s debt, allowing it to close a $14 billion deal to buy Miamisburg, Ohio-based NewPage and avert bankruptcy.
 Mercuria agreed in March to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s commodity business for $35 billion.
 PBC, which planned to use the Agence Francaise de Developpement funds to buy cocoa beans and build sheds and depots for the current season, expects to conclude a deal in the next harvest, Joseph Osei Manu, deputy managing director responsible for finance and administration, said in an interview in the capital, Accra, yesterday.
 Accra-based PBC is looking to cut repayment costs on the loans it needs to buy the chocolate ingredient as profit after tax in the six months through March dropped 45 percent to 39 million cedis ($11 million), it said April 29.
 to buy unlisted PetroChina Kunlun Gas Co, the two people said, asking not to be named as the discussions aren’t public.
 China Petroleum & Chemical Corp, known as Sinopec, and ENN Energy, offered HK$153 billion to buy China Gas in 2011, at a multiple of 15 times, a deal which ultimately failed.
 The number of Americans who signed contracts to buy previously owned homes unexpectedly declined in June, falling 11 percent from the month before, figures from the National Association of Realtors showed yesterday in Washington.
 Adding Wagner may signal more deal-making under Cook, who has stepped up the pace of acquisitions since becoming CEO, culminating in a $3 billion deal in May to buy headphone maker and music-subscription service Beats Electronics LLC.
 made a fourth offer to buy Shire Plc, raising the price to about 301 billion pounds ($515 billion) in an effort to force negotiations.
 TeliaSonera AB and Tele2 AB advanced after the Swedish company agreed to buy Tele2’s Norwegian business.
 The brokerage said volume for exchange-traded derivatives will remain weak, and the German exchange operator will struggle to buy back shares or increase dividends in the near term.
 Austal could also stand to gain from the additional $200 million included to buy another High Speed Vessel.
 It will use the money to refinance debt at lower interest rates, retiring notes that are secured by power plants and eliminating restrictive covenants that may limit its ability to buy or sell assets.
 The power producer is seeking to buy back some or all of its $320 million of 8 percent bonds maturing in August 2019, according to a statement yesterday.
 “It gives them additional flexibility in terms of being able to buy and sell assets,” Shea said in a telephone interview.
 OCBC is trying to buy Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 Giving shoppers the opportunity to play with products virtually can make them more likely to buy, he said.
 Cybercrime StubHub Scam Leads to Arrests in US, London, Canada, Spain StubHub, EBay Inc’s online ticket exchange, was targeted by hackers who used stolen passwords and credit card numbers to buy and sell thousands of tickets for pop-music concerts and Yankees games, New York authorities said.
 They met in November that year in Hong Kong, where Tesla offered $50,000 to buy the trademark, Zhan said.
 jobs data, and that’s a reason to buy Japanese stocks,” said Naoki Fujiwara, Tokyo-based chief fund manager at Shinkin Asset Management Co, which oversees about 640 billion yen ($63 billion).
 Verizon added some of that debt to buy Vodafone Group Plc’s 45 percent stake in its wireless unit offering as much as $51 billion in extra interest to get the record $49 billion sale done in September.
 The selloff was exacerbated by margin calls, or offers by banks and brokerages to offload stocks to pay back some of the money that was borrowed to buy them, according to both Yasin and Rantisi.
 Aabar is in talks to buy at least half of former Arabtec Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik’s 2885 percent stake, a person with knowledge of the situation said today.
 During mortgage-backed securities sale negotiations, he lied to buyers and sellers, falsifying prices and keeping the difference for his company, the US.
 “I have no idea who pays my bills and I don’t care” Austin has received several offers to buy his company and says selling it is out of the question.
 Apollo originally offered to buy the US.
 Meda said today it agreed to buy Rottapharm for about 212 billion kronor ($31 billion) to add consumer-health products that aren’t subject to pricing negotiations with governments.
 Tesco, based in Cheshunt, England received warrants to buy as much as 10 percent of the reorganized chain’s equity, and Fresh & Easy got a 225 percent stake.
 Deals Wachtell Lipton Advises in Gtechs $47 Billion IGT Acquisition Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz advised Gtech SpA, which agreed to buy International Game Technology for $47 billion in cash and stock, uniting the world’s largest provider of lottery systems with the biggest slot-machine maker.
 Picking up the pieces are licensing firms whose sole mission is to buy castoff patents and then demand royalties from other companies in a strategy to make a profit.
By Devin Banerjee July 14 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the private-equity firm led by George Roberts and Henry Kravis, agreed to buy a stake in hedge fund BlackGold Capital Management LP as it continues to grow beyond buyouts, said a person with knowledge of the deal.
 Blackstone in February did its first such deal, using client funds to buy a piece of Senator Investment Group LP.
 After Chengdu Tianqi outbid Rockwood to buy Talison, it agreed to sell a 49 percent stake in the mine to Rockwood.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- EBay Inc’s online ticket exchange StubHub was targeted by hackers who used stolen passwords and credit card numbers to buy and sell thousands of tickets for pop-music concerts and Yankees games, New York authorities said.
 Elton John Two of the Russians stole personal data online and used it to buy tickets on StubHub for events including Elton John and Justin Timberlake concerts, the “Book of Mormon” on Broadway and prime seats at Yankees Stadium, Vance said.
 Vadim Polyakov, 30, and Nikolay Matveychuk, 21, are charged with using stolen data to buy the tickets, according to a statement from Vance’s office today.
 One of these firms, Tata Realty and Infrastructure Ltd, is already looking to buy distressed road assets.
 The company said on May 9 it agreed to buy oil broker PVM Oil Associates Ltd.
 As large investors such as American Homes gain access to lower-cost capital and develop greater management efficiencies, they will be positioned to buy smaller operators, said Singelyn, whose Agoura Hills, California-based company owned 25,505 homes at the end of the first quarter.
 “When we look at potential sellers, and those sellers who will accept stock as a form of payment for their homes, they’ll want to partner with the best operators or the stock that trades with the best prospects of going up” Singelyn said his company will continue to buy about 2,000 homes per quarter one by one at foreclosure auctions and in the open market.
 has agreed to buy Severstal Columbus in Mississippi and AK Steel Corp.
 Apple agreed to buy Beats for $3 billion in May, its biggest-ever acquisition, with founders Dr.
 agreed to buy Muscle Milk maker CytoSport Holdings Inc.
 agreed to buy Michael Foods Inc.
 The company’s agreement to buy Benicia, California-based CytoSport is subject to conditions, including the receipt of regulatory approvals, and is expected to close within 30 days, according to the statement.
 plans to buy shares in Mota-Engil Africa, a construction company that will begin trading in London next week, to tap into demand for building spurred by the energy and mining industries.
 “What happens if policy changes and investors head for the exits? Low liquidity means the door is getting smaller” In credit, the RBS model gauges daily trading as a percentage of bonds outstanding, dealer inventories and the gap between what it costs to buy and sell a US.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- Bill Ackman, chief executive officer of hedge fund Pershing Square Capital Management LP, said Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc’s offer to buy Allergan Inc.
 That can change effectively overnight” Pershing Square has teamed with Valeant in its bid to buy Allergan, the maker of the wrinkle treatment Botox, amassing 97 percent of Allergan’s shares.
 During today’s call with investors, he said Allergan’s board may take “value destructive actions to thwart the offer,” including bidding to buy another company for $10 billion or more without investor approval.
 agreed to buy the drugmaker for 5248 pounds ($8980) a share.
 SolarCity installs rooftop solar systems for customers who typically pay little to nothing up front and sign long-term agreements to buy the electricity.
 Canada Pension and other pension plans would probably jump at the chance to buy the stake from SNC, said Durand and analysts such as Canaccord Genuity’s Yuri Lynk.
 BBC America is probably worth about $200 million, according to Amy Yong, an analyst at Macquarie Securities in New York, similar to the value of Fuse TV, which NuvoTV agreed to buy earlier this year.
 In January, Liberty Global agreed to buy Dutch cable provider Ziggo NV for 49 billion euros ($66 billion) after gradually boosting its holding.
 The company, which is 39 percent owned by Fox is in talks to buy Fox’s Italian and German units.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- Grupo BTG Pactual, the only investment bank publicly traded in Brazil, agreed to buy Assicurazioni Generali SpA’s Swiss private-banking unit for 15 billion Swiss francs ($17 billion) to help build a global private-banking platform.
 The obvious one to buy it against is the euro” The pound was little changed at 7919 pence per euro at 5:13 pm.
 producer of nuclear power, agreed to buy fuel-cell power plants with 21 megawatts of capacity that Bloom Energy Corp.
 SoftBank advanced 23 percent, providing the biggest boost to the Topix, after a report the wireless carrier reached an agreement to buy T-Mobile US Inc.
 Industrial Output “There’s no strong reason to buy Japanese shares, but it’s rising to make up for the five-day fall last week,” said Yoshihiro Okumura, a general manager at Chiba-Gin Asset Management Co.
 to buy T-Mobile from Deutsche Telekom AG, the Nikkei newspaper reported.
 The group is investing its fourth real estate fund after starting to buy property fund stakes in 2000, according to the statement today.
 “It’s important to buy local-based producers as China will also shift to declaring these sectors key strategic industries,” which may limit opportunities to purchase them in the future.
 “At first, it was difficult not to buy Russian medicines,” Krivitskaya said.
 Gas War Serhiy Vovk, the 36-year-old head of the Center for Transport Strategies, a Kiev-based research institute, said the only thing from Russia he used to buy was gasoline for his car.
 “It’s very trendy now to buy Ukrainian-made goods,” she said at the showroom on the second floor of a residential building in downtown Kiev.
 But they come here and want to buy our shoes.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- Breitburn Energy Partners LP agreed to buy QR Energy LP for about $167 billion in stock and cash, saying it would become the largest master-limited partnership that produces mostly oil.
 “Otherwise, exiting the market is an option worth thinking about” While Nestle is far bigger than the American market leaders, it’s unlikely to buy either.
 advised investors to buy the stock.
 “I don’t think the market is overpriced, but investors just don’t have catalysts to buy further” The Topix rebounded 11 percent from a May 21 low on signs the economy is weathering an April sales-tax increase and amid optimism Japan’s $12 trillion pension fund will buy more domestic stocks.
 is in talks to buy Griffin-American Healthcare REIT II, an owner of about $3 billion of medical properties in the US.
 health-care REIT by market value, agreed to buy American Realty Capital Healthcare Trust Inc.
 Colgate shares are a good bet because it sells products that people need to buy even when economic growth slows, according to Lauren Lieberman, an analyst at Barclays Plc in New York.
 Comcast told the FCC in April it could offer advanced video services and spread high-speed Internet service without harming competition if it’s allowed to buy Time Warner.
 to buy DirectTV for $485 billion also “presents competitive concerns,” Dish said in the FCC filing.
 Bank of America resubmitted a capital plan in May, saying it scaled back an initial request to raise the dividend to 5 cents a share from 1 cent and to buy back $4 billion of stock.
 Temasek agreed to buy 25 percent of the retail arm of Hutchison in March for HK$44 billion ($57 billion), which pushed back plans for an initial public offering for the unit.
 With the benchmark Shanghai Composite Index down 66 percent from its peak in 2007, the government has been opening up its capital markets by doubling the daily trading band of the yuan and allowing foreign investors to buy the nation’s shares through Hong Kong’s stock exchange.
 Iraq resorted to buying Russian fighter jets only because the Pentagon has been too slow in delivering promised F-16s, Faily said.
 “Our first choice was to buy American-made F-16s,” Faily said.
 Neeleman said in an interview last week that he intends to buy 30 updated Embraer SA jets to expand Azul’s fleet in part to meet new demand he expects under subsidized flying.
 is poised to buy $26 billion of jet engines from a General Electric Co.
 The 200 Leap-1A engines would outfit 100 Airbus Group NV A320neos that American agreed to buy in 2011, said the people, who asked not to be named because the talks are private.
 Reynolds American Inc, 42 percent ownedby BAT, this month agreed to buy Lorillard Inc, leaving theUS.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- Vornado Realty Trust is leading a partnership to buy the retail portion of the St.
 Three analysts have a hold ratings, while one advises clients to buy the shares.
 Homeowners are more likely to buy a solar system than lease one if they’re not worried about maintenance, Billy Parish, founder and president of Oakland, California-based Mosaic, said yesterday.
 Homeowners considering panels may seek loans through Mosaic’s website to buy systems with little or no money down.
 Fed Stimulus At a time when the Federal Reserve holds about a fifth of outstanding Treasuries, and insurance companies to sovereign-wealth funds are hoarding investment-grade notes, it’s getting harder to find top-tier debt to buy.
 Any acquirer of Fleury would have to make an offer to buy out the minority shareholders’ stakes at the same price paid to the controlling stakeholders.
 While credit still shows signs of froth -- with new funds to buy junk-rated loans popping up left and right -- investors are increasingly anxious about when the market will turn.
 The so-called “maker-taker” model pays rebates to traders who stand ready to buy or sell shares as needed, while charging those on the other side of the transaction.
 “We plan to keep the distributors in surplus for the years to come so they have enough money to buy electricity and provide power to Delhi,” he said.
 “It’s all about finding alternative ways to continue to grow” REITs, private-equity firms and hedge funds have spent at least $20 billion to buy as many as 200,000 US.
 He reversed himself and sued the NBA in federal court inLos Angeles the day after Ballmer agreed to buy the team for arecord $2 billion.
 Great-West is seeking to buy firms or their assets that would make it a bigger player in pension management, capitalizing on fee income from the baby boomer generation that’s looking to earn returns for retirement.
 The agency, called Prepa, uses the lines of credit to buy fuel.
 It used $416 million from reserves to pay bondholders $4176 million on July 1 after raiding $100 million from its capital fund in May to buy fuel.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Failing to buy AstraZeneca Plc with the drug industry’s largest-ever deal hasn’t stopped Pfizer Inc’s Ian Read from looking far and wide for acquisitions.
 Kindred offered this week to buy a 149 percent stake in Gentiva after the company rebuffed two takeover bids, a change in strategy to try to force the company to enter talks.
 Bright agreed to buy a 60 percent stake in British cereal maker Weetabix Ltd.
 of China Ltd, China’s biggest producer, dropped a bid to buy 60 percent of SouthGobi for C$925 million.
 to buy coking coal mines overseas.
 Fortress, which bid with Italian asset manager Prelios SpA, offered to buy the company including its bad loan assets, said one of the people.
 The gauge has risen 16 percent this year as the BOJ continues to buy about 7 trillion yen of government notes a month.
 “As long as banks lend, they can get double the amount of funds to buy whatever they want,” said Bank of America’s Fujita.
 “Lenders have become much more uptight, and this is a big problem for the person who wants to buy a starter home,” Willen said in an interview.
 The Arlington, Virginia-based company, which sells more than 140,000 products in transactions using bitcoins and other virtual currencies, is refusing to buy bitcoinshopcom, whose owner is asking for $100,000, he said.
 In May, JPMorgan agreed to buy about $5 billion of government bonds that Argentina gave to Spanish oil producer Repsol SA as compensation for the takeover of its local unit in April 2012.
 Citigroup lifted its rating on the Glasgow-based company to buy from neutral, citing its exposure to positive trends in the oil and gas market, and possible merger and acquisition activity.
 said today it agreed to buy rival Lorillard Inc.
 CCTV, the national broadcaster, said a provincial government was told not to buy computers with Microsoft’s Windows 8 operating system.
 CNH Industrial NV, the maker of Iveco trucks, is “viewed as a potential suitor” for DAF, which may cost about $25 billion to buy.
 In May, the company agreed to sell $31 billion of Texas oil and gas assets to Encana Corp, and announced a day later it would use part of the proceeds to buy stakes in deep-water Gulf of Mexico projects from Apache Corp.
 and Oman Oil were seeking to buy the stake, people with knowledge of the matter had said.
 Business Secretary Vince Cable brushed aside calls for a tighter public-interest test on takeovers following Pfizer Inc’s abandoned attempt to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 supermarket chain, agreed to buy online retailer Vitacostcom Inc.
 Saab, based in Sweden, announced this week that it plans to buy ThyssenKrupp AG’s submarine-making unit.
 ‘Very Disappointed’ “I would be very disappointed if the administration believes the answer to dealing with companies going offshore is to make it harder to be an American company,” Portman said, adding that the proposal would encourage companies in other countries to buy US.
 Each share came with a warrant to buy one half of a share for 85 cents that expires in August 2019.
 Verso, owned by Leon Black’s Apollo Global Management LLC, needs bondholders to agree to a debt-reducing exchange in order to close a $14 billion deal to buy NewPage Holdings Inc.
 This could pave the way to these companies becoming more profitable more quickly” Stock Surge Zillow is seeking to buy Trulia for as much as $2 billion in cash and stock, according to people with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 It’s possible that a technology giant such as Google could someday look to buy Zillow, said Macquarie’s White.
 The Tel Aviv-based company is in talks to buy three malls in Sao Paulo and is looking to double the number of shopping centers it owns in Brazil, part of a global strategy to snap up prime commercial property in densely populated cities and sell off suburban assets.
 Multiplus has been losing business to Smiles, which has a 36 percent profit margin, as corporate clients such as banks push to buy points more cheaply, said Felipe Silveira, an analyst at brokerage Coinvalores.
 Cheaper Tickets Smiles spent 12409 reais ($5577) per 10,000 redeemed points to buy tickets from Gol in the three-month period ending March 31, Daltozo said.
 Inter RAO said it may need government aid or to sell its stake in OAO Irkutskenergo to buy back 314 billion rubles ($918 million) of its shares from Vnesheconombank.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- Alexander Philips joined the rush to buy foreclosed US.
 Cinven agreed to buy Gas Natural SDG SA’s telecommunications unit for 510 million euros last month, and Bahrain-based Investcorp Bank BSC is working with JPMorgan to sell Spanish ceramics-products maker Esmalglass SA.
 agreed to buy for about $2 billion earlier this year, acquired software startup RakNet to make it easier to add features like chatting to video games.
 Last month, the Irvine, California-based company also agreed to buy Carbon Design Group, which has worked on products such as Microsoft Corp’s Xbox 360 controller.
 reached an agreement to buy its rival for $274 billion including debt.
 Creating Interest “Investors always like to buy what’s worked,” said Greg Lesko, a New York-based fund manager at Deltec Asset Management LLC, which oversees $800 million including emerging-market stocks.
 Some smaller investors aren’t in a position to buy junk-rated loans and may want to go long through such a synthetic wager, according to the Morgan Stanley analysts.
July 2 (Bloomberg) -- Bidvest Group Ltd, South Africa’s second-biggest company by revenue, agreed to buy the banking unit of Grindrod Ltd.
 technology companies may lose as much as $35 billion in the next three years from foreign customers choosing not to buy their products over concern they cooperate with spy programs, according to an earlier study by the Washington-based Information Technology and Innovation Foundation.
 Each has its own character, and the decision to buy depends on both the driver’s personality and the price point.
July 30 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA, the biggest European telecommunications investor in Latin America, said it’s in talks over a deal in Mexico, following a report that it is seeking to buy Grupo Iusacell SA.
 rose to the highest price since before a sale of the struggling smartphone maker fell apart last year, in a sign that investors are starting to buy into Chief Executive Officer John Chen’s turnaround plan.
 BG Raised BG increased 2 percent to 1,2725 pence as Canaccord Genuity upgraded the natural gas explorer to buy from hold.
 Wisconsin Energy announced plans to buy Integrys Energy Group Inc, owner of utilities in Wisconsin and three other states, for $57 billion in June.
 The exchanges agreed to allow as much as 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border trading, opening up the mainland market further to foreigners while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 PetSmart could take on debt to buy back shares, according to Wedbush Inc.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in a bet the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares more cheaply and pocket the difference.
 “Normally, geopolitical risks give you an opportunity to buy back because shares tend to rebound.
 said it agreed to buy rival messaging service WhatsApp for as much as $19 billion.
 Sky Deutschland AG added 14 percent after British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc offered to buy the German broadcaster.
 Kronen tausend985 GmbH, a subsidiary of BSkyB, offered to pay 675 euros per share for the rest of Sky Deutschland after agreeing to buy 21st Century Fox Inc’s 574 percent stake in the German broadcaster.
 In the US, he plans to buy a regional food chain to boost its reach, he said.
 “If I had half a million euros to buy a house all my problems would be over,” Diallo said in fluent Portuguese during an interview in downtown Lisbon.
 A reputation for discretion made Greenberg valuable to corporate raiders including Donald Trump, Henry Kravis and Irwin Jacobs when they tried to buy shares of target companies quietly.
 Policy makers kept their pledge to buy about 7 trillion yen ($69 billion) of government debt a month.
 “Investors tend to stand by to buy JGBs rather than to sell, capping yields,” said Shuichi Ohsaki, a rates strategist in Tokyo at Bank of America Merrill Lynch, another primary dealer.
 In 2010, Alibaba agreed to buy online marketplace companies Vendio Services Inc.
 moved a step closer to buying Shire Plc after the Dublin-based company said it is willing to back a fifth offer of 314 billion pounds ($537 billion) just four days before the deadline to strike a deal.
 Even as the industry events at the show wind down today, the manufacturers will be working to ensure that the pledges to buy planes eventually are booked as firm orders.
 MG Aviation, a leasing company, agreed to buy two 787-9, the mid-sized version of the Dreamliner model.
 Almirall SA jumped 79 percent to 1160 euros after AstraZeneca Plc agreed to buy the rights to the Spanish drugmaker’s respiratory medicines for $875 million.
 Rio Tinto gained 3 percent to 3,2025 pence after Bank of America raised its recommendation on the shares to buy from neutral, citing its valuation.
 President Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, who in July 2012 banned most dollar purchases outright after tightening controls in October 2011, this year authorized Argentines to buy foreign currency worth 20 percent of their average monthly salaries, with a limit of $2,000 per month.
 Widening Gap At current mortgage rates, borrowers would have to pay about 7,000 pesos per month on a loan to buy a $100,000 apartment, said Roberto Arevalo, director at Argentina’s Real Estate Chamber.
 The fund used the proceeds to buy 14 million shares of Dorian LPG Ltd, according to filings.
 Some of the schools could be attractive to buyers, said Trace Urdan, an analyst with Wells Fargo Securities in San Francisco.
 China’s banking regulator is allowing some local governments including Shanghai’s to set up asset-management companies to buy bad loans from financial institutions, said three people with knowledge of the matter who asked not to be identified.
 Bank of Baroda jumped to a two-week high, sending the S&P BSE India Bankex higher, after the central bank allowed global investors to buy more shares of the lender.
 jumped 25 percent to an all-time high after agreeing to buy natural gas assets for C$100 million in cash.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Reynolds American Inc’s deal to buy Lorillard Inc.
 Chinese and Hong Kong-listed firms last year spent the most in a decade to buy or invest in food, drink or farming assets, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 CCTV, the national broadcaster, said a provincial government was told not to buy computers with Microsoft’s Windows 8, and it quoted a professor calling the software a potential threat to China’s information security.
 said it’s in talks to buy the cigarette maker.
 backer Standard General LP is close to buying Lion Capital LLP’s $10 million loan to the retailer, avoiding a potential default, according to three people familiar with the situation.
 Charney Loan After failing to hold a special shareholders’ meeting, he turned to Standard General and borrowed $20 million to buy 274 million shares and increase his stake to 43 percent.
 Standard General also has the right to buy the shares back from Charney.
 Archer-Daniels-Midland Co’s agreed deal to buy Wild Flavors for 23 billion euros ($31 billion) earlier this week is spurring speculation of further consolidation in the ingredients industry against a backdrop of a limited number of larger available targets.
 + Aecom agreed to buy URS Corp.
 + Lindt agreed to buy Russell Stover Candies.
 + Whiting Petroleum agreed to buy Kodiak Oil also for $6 billion including debt.
 is nearing a 25 billion-euro ($34 billion) agreement to buy Wild Flavors GmbH, a maker of natural food ingredients backed by KKR & Co, people familiar with the matter said.
 In 2011, they shot down AT&T Inc’s attempt to buy T-Mobile from Deutsche Telekom.
 TerraForm Power Inc, a solar power plant owner developed by SunEdison that sold shares last week in an initial offering, has an option to buy the plant when complete.
 Some buyout firms concluded that Nobel Biocare is too expensive to buy, the people said.
 In April, Zimmer said it agreed to buy Biomet Inc.
 “If you are on the Atlantic Coast, you have a chance to buy imported coal,” Stevenson said.
 Gtech SpA gained 41 percent after agreeing to buy International Game Technology for $47 billion.
 Hindalco surged 67 percent after CLSA raised its rating on the stock to buy, saying the stock will surge on a “multi-year deleveraging cycle” Tata Steel Ltd.
 Standard General already used $10 million of the money to buy a high-interest loan that was deemed in default by the lender.
 agreed to buy Total SA’s South African coal unit, the fifth-largest producer in the country, to gain expanded reserves and rights at the main export harbor for the fuel.
 Some hedge funds have turned to Europe to buy non-performing loans and lend to cash-starved companies in the region, said Sudhir.
 “A lot of the distressed guys have moved away from high-yield that has more volatility and into these areas” Global Challenge Firms that deploy distressed strategies are navigating the same challenges as the rest of the hedge-fund industry as central banks globally push down benchmark interest rates, reduce volatility and encourage investors to buy riskier assets.
 in 2010 agreed to pay a $78 million civil fine to settle claims that some stores in California and Nevada allowed criminals to buy cold medications that were used to make methamphetamine.
 The developments have “stiffened” lawmakers’ resistance to buying the US.
 advanced 16 percent as Deutsche Bank AG advised investors to buy the stock.
 lender to buy from hold.
 “We’re very much focused on what’s going on in the market in terms of transitioning from traditional brick-and-mortar to e-commerce” Bain Capital LLC and Advent International Corp, both private-equity firms, agreed in March to buy Ballerup, Denmark-based payments processor Nets Holding A/S for about $31 billion to expand in Scandinavia.
 Imperial is lining up $7 billion to buy some brands that Lorillard and Reynolds would sell off to assuage any concerns raised by the US.
 The Zurich-based insurer plans to buy Itau Unibanco Holding SA’s high-risk insurance business in a Brazil deal announced July 4 for about $685 million, and also expanded in nations such as Mexico and Thailand.
 “As we get closer to the Fed tightening, the front end remains under pressure” Lederer said investors should sell shorter-term Treasuries and look to buy longer-dated debt when prices decline.
 “When you go into a situation like that you have to accept that the state is going to participate” The changes to the 2002 Mineral and Petroleum Resources Development Act include giving the state the right to a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and to buy an unspecified additional share at an agreed price.
 Santander said in April it would offer to buy back about 25 percent of its Brazilian unit in a share transaction valued at 47 billion euros.
 A put option exercised by Athabasca on April 17 forces a PetroChina subsidiary to buy the 40 percent it doesn’t own in the undeveloped Dover oil-sands project in northeastern Alberta, based on a 2010 agreement.
 Citic Pacific is raising funds through share sales in order to buy $36 billion of assets from its state-owned Chinese parent.
 is in talks to buy what could be the South African oil and gas company’s first production asset, Chairman Tito Mboweni said.
 Ping An Insurance plans to buy 45 percent to 50 percent of shares in the banking unit’s latest sale, while its asset-management unit agreed to acquire 50 percent to 60 percent of the preferred shares, according to yesterday’s statements.
 CCTV, the national broadcaster, said a provincial government was told not to buy computers with Microsoft’s Windows 8 operating system.
July 2 (Bloomberg) -- Public Service Enterprise Group Inc’s solar unit agreed to buy a 13 megawatt project from Juwi Solar Inc.
 agreed to buy Itau Unibanco Holding SA’s high-risk insurance business for 152 billion reais ($684 million) to become the biggest property and casualty insurer in Brazil.
 The company is considering selling bonds to buy back more expensive debt and extend maturities, Chief Executive Officer Walter Schalka said in a May 12 telephone interview from Sao Paulo.
 will pursue its offer to buy Australand Property Group for about A$26 billion ($24 billion) in the Singapore real estate company’s biggest proposed acquisition after trumping a bid by Stockland.
 will give the combined company 30 million TV subscribers, while AT&T Inc’s bid to buy DirecTV will give it a total of about 25 million subscribers.
 agreed to buy its three existing hydro-power plants valued at $17 billion.
 withdrew an agreement to buy two of Jaiprakash’s plants, the Indian company said in a July 24 statement, citing a change in the strategy of the Abu Dhabi company, known as TAQA.
 Reliance has agreed to buy Jaiprakash’s Baspa and Karcham Wangtoo plants in the northern state of Himachal Pradesh and the Vishnuprayag plant in neighboring Uttarakhand, according to the statement.
 IBM and USAA, based in San Antonio, worked for about nine months to develop the tool to answer questions specific to customers leaving the military, like whether to seek out veteran’s benefits or how to buy a home, said Eric Engquist, assistant vice president of military transitions at USAA.
 ‘Conscripted Consumption’ Last week, Richard and Ackman said distributors at Herbalife clubs use false promises of riches and a fraudulent training program to force poor Latinos to buy weight-loss shakes one at a time.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Spain’s 30 billion-euro ($41 billion) plan to buy heavy armament, including Krauss-Maffei Wegmann GmbH’s Leopard battle tanks, will put the country’s defense budget under pressure, according to a report from opposition party UPyD.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- Public Service Enterprise Group Inc’s solar unit agreed to buy a 36-megawatt photovoltaic plant in Vermont from closely held Juwi Solar Inc.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 Graham Brown, an analyst at Canaccord Genuity, raised his recommendation on the shares to buy from sell, “reflecting the improving prospects the business has demonstrated” with better than expected organic growth and more work ahead.
 GSO Capital Partners LP, the credit unit of Blackstone Group LP, raised 2605 million euros ($350 million) this month for a fund to buy European loans and invest in CLOs after Marathon Asset Management created a CLO equity fund, according to a regulatory filing.
 Now he faces another crisis as a plan to buy Airbus Group NV A380 jets turns sour.
 “Concerns about the airline’s finances are coming to the fore with the news of Airbus’s cancellation” Nishikubo, who took flying lessons and became a pilot after purchasing his stake in Skymark, said yesterday he still wanted to buy A380s.
 International Flights He announced a decision to buy double-decker A380s and start an international business-class service in 2010, breaking from the company’s model of low-fare travel using single-aisle Boeing Co.
 Arabtec’s second-largest shareholder, Aabar Investments PJSC, is in talks to buy at least half of a 289 percent stake held by the construction company’s former Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik, a person with knowledge of the situation said July 15.
 “If Aabar decides to buy anything more than 50 percent of Ismaik’s ownership, it will be positive for the stock” The Abu Dhabi state-owned investment company is negotiating a price of 5 dirhams to 6 dirhams a share, the person said.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- Spanish and Italian government bonds climbed amid speculation the European Central Bank won’t be able to prevent banks from using its cash to buy higher-yielding sovereign debt.
 ‘Cheap Money’ “The convenience to use the ECB cheap money to buy government bonds is much less” than in a previous funding round, which started in December 2011, Draghi said in testimony to the European Parliament in Strasbourg, France, yesterday.
 Qatar Airways said it wants to buy an additional 50 of the largest twin-engine model, after firming up a deal for the same number announced at the Dubai expo in November.
 MG Aviation, a leasing company, agreed to buy two 787-9, the mid-sized version of the Dreamliner model.
 Espirito Santo Financial Group borrowed more than 100 million euros from Nomura to buy the shares in Banco Espirito Santo, Portuguese newspaper Expresso reported, without saying how it got the information.
 property owners with just one rental house can now get cash from Wall Street to buy more.
 investor-owned or vacation houses were without a mortgage as of last month, based on data from property-research firm RealtyTrac, implying investors in about 7 million homes could get cash-out mortgage financing to buy more real estate or make other investments.
 Stagnating wages and an increase in student debt are keeping younger people from qualifying or even wanting to buy, said Laurie Goodman, director of the Housing Finance Policy Center at the Urban Institute in Washington.
 Home sales will fall this year as higher prices and interest rates limit people’s ability to buy, according to Fannie Mae economist Douglas Duncan.
 It agreed to buy a 30 percent stake in an exploration block in Aruba, subject to approval by the national oil company.
 “Nobody forces agents to buy advertising with us.
 in February agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Keurig Green Mountain Inc, which is developing a product similar to SodaStream’s, for about $125 billion.
 “It’s hard to paint a persuasive case to buy anything locally in fixed income,” Stuart Culverhouse, the global head of research at Exotix Partners LLP in London, said by phone June 20.
 The price is more than 50 percent above Shire’s closing level on May 2, before AbbVie made its first proposal to buy the company.
 agreed to buy rival Lorillard Inc.
 “It was probably the sweetener that convinced them to buy what is essentially a selection of third-tier brands” Including the Blu brand in the deal was needed to get Imperial to the table and reduced antitrust concerns from having the products in the same company as Reynolds’s Vuse e-cigarettes, said a person familiar with the matter.
 Vodafone gained 1 percent after winning approval from the European Union to buy Grupo Corporativo Ono SA.
 The European Commission said late yesterday that the British wireless carrier got anti-trust approval to buy Spanish cable operator Ono as the deal did not raise competition concerns.
 Verso, controlled by Apollo Global Management LLC, has been trying to convince second-lien and subordinated bondholders to go along with an exchange that will clear the way for its $14 billion deal to buy NewPage.
 The underwriters have a 30-day option to buy an additional 15 percent of the common stock.
 Brazil, Ethiopia Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 KKR in April agreed to buy Aceco TI, a Brazilian data-center business, and last month agreed to buy a stake in Afriflora, an Ethiopian flower farm.
 BNP Downgrade BNP lost 21 percent to 5020 euros after Macquarie Group downgraded the stock to neutral from outperform, which is similar to buy.
 Deutsche Bank AG upgraded the property company to buy from hold, citing the possibility of better-than-expected growth in the second half of the year and a pickup in deal momentum.
 “The ECB continues to have an easing bias and therefore investors are happy” to buy Europe’s higher-yielding bonds, he said.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Helvetia Holding AG agreed to buy a majority stake in Nationale Suisse in a transaction valuing the company at about 18 billion Swiss francs ($2 billion) to create Switzerland’s third-largest insurer.
 agreed to buy for $23 billion, pending a US.
 “We continue to believe strongly in London” Investors have been competing to buy London office buildings to gain from rising values and rents.
 $741 Million Gain Results also benefited from a $741 million gain after AstraZeneca Plc exercised its option to buy Merck’s interest in the drugs Nexium and Prilosec.
 Mobius Outlook Mark Mobius says it’s not too late to buy into the rally in Chinese stocks.
 It now competes with Facebook Inc, which tried to buy Snapchat for $3 billion last year and started its own product to send ephemeral photos and videos after being rebuffed.
 “Polls favorable to opposition candidates spurred investors to buy stocks.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- RFR Holding LLC, the investment firm that owns New York’s Seagram Building and Lever House, is in talks to buy a Berlin skyscraper that’s due to be completed in 2017, a person with knowledge of the matter said.
 The online travel-booking service agreed yesterday to buy Australia’s Wotifcom Holdings Ltd.
 raised its rating on the stock to buy from hold after ADM said it will acquire Wild Flavors GmbH for $3 billion.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Bich Ngoc, who earns less than $60 a week and has a newborn son, cobbled together four months of savings to buy the latest iPhone so she could impress her colleagues who have older versions of the device.
 Dollarama receives a handling fee and has an option to buy control of the company beginning in February 2019.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- China awarded Germany a quota of 80 billion yuan ($129 billion) that will allow domestic investors to buy securities in China under the Renminbi Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor program.
 last month agreed to buy BR Towers for about $1 billion, and Tim Participacoes SA, the mobile-phone provider owned by Telecom Italia SpA, has hired Morgan Stanley for its own sale of towers for about $1 billion, people familiar with the matter have said.
 agreed to buy BP Plc’s headquarters in the city for 64 million pounds, Property Week reported in March.
 VimpelCom Stake In January 2013, Orascom entered into an agreement to buy out Lacavera and take control of the company.
 and Morgan Stanley, the second half has proven a much better time to buy during the past decade.
 AbbVie has yet to secure a deal agreement with Shire Plc, which it’s trying to buy for about $50 billion.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- LinkedIn Corp, owner of the largest professional-networking website, agreed to buy business-marketing startup Bizo Inc.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- China’s banking regulator is allowing governments in five places including Shanghai to set up asset-management companies to buy bad loans from financial institutions, three people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Cost estimates for the $3986 billion F-35 program have climbed 71 percent in inflation-adjusted dollars since the Pentagon signed its initial contract with Lockheed in 2001, even as plans were adjusted to buy 409 fewer aircraft.
 and Italy have both committed to buy the variant, which is designed for short takeoffs and vertical landings on ground fields and aircraft carriers.
 Rising energy demand is spurring companies such as Reach Energy to buy and develop smaller oil and gas fields ignored by their larger international counterparts.
 Malaysia’s Sona Petroleum Bhd, also a special-purpose acquisition company, finalized an agreement this week to buy a stake in two Thai oil and gas blocks of UK-based Salamander Energy Ltd.
 “With the confidence of these institutions, this paves the way for us to grow the business” Blank Check Special-purpose acquisition companies, or SPACs, are known as blank-check entities as they sell shares to raise money to buy existing business that they haven’t yet identified.
 The Irvine, California-based company could also take on debt to buy back shares and push up the price of its stock, he said.
 Sebastian Palla, head of investment banking at Banco Macro SA in Buenos Aires, will present a proposal from members of the Adeba local banking association to buy defaulted bonds from investors who won a lawsuit for full repayment, said a bank official who asked not to be identified because she isn’t authorized to speak publicly about the plans.
 “Instead, prime African Americans are being served by FHA and more credit-constrained minorities aren’t being allowed to buy at all” Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac have more resources than the FHA, an arm of the US.
 Advocacy groups are also urging FHFA, which oversees the companies, to change their pricing policies and set new affordable housing goals requiring them to buy loans in disadvantaged communities.
 They’re also more likely to buy a house in the first place, said Marcia Griffin, founder of HomeFree-USA, a Maryland-based homebuyer assistance organization.
 “If I’m coming in and trying to buy a home with a 660 credit score, as an example, I’m going to get the runaround half the time,” she said.
 He said he was encouraged to learn that it’s possible to buy a house with far less than the $20,000 he was originally told he’d need.
 “Authorities are saying, we’re going to buy dollars and basically lean into the wind to prevent further appreciation,” Benoit Anne, the head of emerging-market strategy at Societe Generale SA in London, said by phone on July 14.
 “The new Indian government is very, very determined to stop large blackouts and that’s the reason we will see electricity demand continuing to rise” Clogged Network Coal India Ltd, the world’s biggest miner of the commodity, has failed to keep pace with increasing demand, forcing power stations, aluminum producers and cement factories to buy coal from overseas.
 Legg Mason agreed in March to spend as much as $41 million to buy QS Investors, a global quantitative equity firm that split from Deutsche Bank AG in 2010.
 Legg Mason agreed on July 24 to buy Edinburgh-based Martin Currie to expand into active international stock funds.
 The consistent gains have encouraged individual investors to buy stocks.
 Revealing Strength “Willingness to buy on a dip implies confidence,” Stacey Nutt, chief investment officer at ClariVest Asset Management LLC in San Diego, California, said in an interview July 22.
 The New York-based hedge fund, which uses complex mathematical models to decide when to buy and sell securities, was started in 2001 by David Siegel, a former chief technology officer at Tudor Investment Corp, and John Overdeck, a former managing director at DE.
 The senior Murdoch “knows he’s going to be unable to buy BSkyB in the foreseeable future after the difficulties last time around,” said Roddy Davidson, an analyst at Westhouse Securities in London.
 Rules stipulate it must offer to purchase shares from all stakeholders under the same conditions, although it may not need to buy all shares for sale.
 Contracts to buy previously owned US.
 Still, he said, “there are so many more things we should be dedicating taxpayer resources to than handing it out to some select companies” Speaker John Boehner of Ohio hasn’t said how he’ll vote on the bank, which provides financing for foreign companies to buy US.
 “There are lots of diamonds out there but that doesn’t mean Tiffany has lost its value, people still want to buy the authentic one,” Swinand said.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- BCE Inc, Canada’s biggest telecommunications company, agreed to buy the shares of Bell Aliant Inc.
 The RBI defined affordable housing to include loans to individuals for as much as 5 million rupees ($83,000) to buy property in the nation’s six biggest cities, and 4 million rupees in other locations.
 announced plans to buy DirecTV for $485 billion three months later in response.
 13 after Comcast agreed to buy the media provider.
 Yields on two-year notes were about two basis points from falling to negative after European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said yesterday that risks to the region’s economic outlook are to the “downside” Spanish securities advanced even as Draghi said in testimony to the European Parliament yesterday that banks shouldn’t count on a fresh round of ECB cash to buy sovereign debt.
 The decline may have been amplified by so-called margin calls, attempts by banks and brokerages to offload stocks to pay back some borrowed money that was used to buy them, brokers and analysts said at the time.
 Staff Dismissal Aabar, which has investments in the real estate, aviation and energy industries, is in talks to buy at least half of former Arabtec Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik’s 2885 percent stake, the person said, asking not to be identified as the plan is private.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 on its failed hostile bid to buy Potash Corp.
 Switzerland’s Xstrata Plc made a successful bid in 2006 for nickel producer Falconbridge Ltd, the year Brazil’s Vale SA agreed to buy Toronto-based miner Inco Ltd.
 to make a $75 billion bid to buy Time Warner Inc.
 “I’m a supporter of reproductive rights, but the ruling doesn’t really impact me much in terms of where I’m going to shop,” Suzie Frazier, 43, said yesterday outside a Hobby Lobby in Canton, Michigan, west of Detroit, as she prepared to buy sidewalk chalk for her son.
 It took a step closer to becoming a national wireless operator in February after spending C$233 million ($217 million) to buy airwaves across the country.
 Carrefour last month agreed to buy back the French stores of discounter Distribuidora Internacional de Alimentacion SA as it seeks to cement a revival at home and strengthen sales in Europe, Latin America and China.
July 28 (Bloomberg) -- Fewer Americans than forecast signed contracts to buy previously owned homes in June, a sign residential real estate is struggling to strengthen.
 “It’s going to surprise us because I still don’t think we’ve got to a point where water is boiling yet” Birinyi, one of the first analysts to advise clients to buy when stocks were bottoming after the 2008 financial crisis, predicts the S&P 500 will rise to 2,100 by December.
 Service Specialists To beef up its energy business, Siemens in May agreed to buy most of Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s energy assets for $13 billion.
 After agreeing in May to let his wife sell the team, Sterling reversed himself and sued the NBA in federal court in Los Angeles the day after Ballmer agreed to buy it.
 Buying Properties Lodha agreed to buy a Canadian diplomatic property in central London’s Mayfair district in November for C$530 million ($495 million).
 Aabar Investments PJSC, is in talks to buy at least half ofa 289 percent stake held by the builder’s former chiefexecutive officer, Bloomberg News reported yesterday, citing aperson with knowledge of the matter.
 Quebecor, which runs the country’s third-largest cable operator and has a mobile-phone business in the French-speaking Quebec province, took a step closer to becoming a national wireless operator in February after spending C$233 million ($218 million) to buy airwaves across the country.
 In November 2013, private equity firm Advent International agreed to buy Dutch cloud-software maker Unit4 for about 115 billion euros.
 are among four bidders shortlisted to buy real estate loans with a face value of more than 400 million euros ($547 million) from Ireland’s bad bank, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Nationale Suisse shares soared to the highest in almost 25 years after Helvetia Holding AG won a bidding contest to buy the company, valuing it at about 18 billion Swiss francs ($2 billion) and creating Switzerland’s third-biggest insurer.
 agreed to buy mobile-advertising company TapCommerce, seeking to make more money outside of its main microblogging service by expanding promotions on smartphones and tablets.
 Twitter’s deal to buy MoPub for $350 million was its biggest acquisition to date.
 retreated 28 percent after agreeing to buy cloud services provider ViaWest Inc.
 ‘Terrific Way’ “If you chose to buy a bucket without attributes and show up with a bag, you probably should pay for it,” Powers said.
 HBOS Plc, which Lloyds agreed to buy in 2008, also tried lowering its submissions to make itself look more attractive financially.
 *** - Dollar Tree just agreed to buy Family Dollar.
 Or do they? “Willingness to buy on a dip implies confidence,” ClariVest Asset Management’s Stacey Nutt tells Wang.
 Alternative investment managers are attracting investors seeking returns regardless of the market’s direction at the same time that banks cut the amount of money they use to buy and sell riskier debt in the face of new regulations.
 Azul has already announced that it will buy 30 E195-E2 jets with an option to buy another 20.
 The company spent about $600 million to buy a stake in Iraq’s Atrush oil field in 2012 and is investing an additional $300 million to start pumping crude next year at a rate of 30,000 barrels a day.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Rupert Murdoch wants HBO so badly, he’s willing to buy all of Time Warner Inc.
 Rascoff said in an interview that the deal to buy Trulia signals that Zillow is creating a portfolio of online real estate brands, which lets the company appeal to the broadest audiences and attract the biggest set of real estate advertisers.
 “Portals like Zillow and Trulia have created a whole new additional category of real estate lifestyle surfing for consumers who are interested in home prices and community information, even though they may not be in the market to buy or sell a home in the immediate future,” said Stefan Swanepoel, a consultant and author on real estate trends.
 agreed to buy Family Dollar Stores Inc.
 Exelon plans to buy gas from the Eagle Ford shale formation in south Texas as well as from the interstate pipeline system to supply the Annova facility.
 Picking up the pieces are licensing firms whose sole mission is to buy castoff patents and then demand royalties from other companies in a strategy to make a profit.
 Wynn Resorts had to buy the rights from certain mainlanders, though the Land Public Works and Transport Bureau said it wasn’t aware about their involvement, according to the Macau Business report.
 to buy.
 Product Expansion LinkedIn’s professional networking service has been expanding into new product categories and last week said it agreed to buy Bizo Inc, a business-marketing startup, for $175 million.
 With Relational pushing the world’s largest home-improvement chain to improve its use of capital, the retailer ousted CEO Robert Nardelli and sold its contract supplies unit months later for $85 billion, using the proceeds to buy back stock.
 Financiere Richemont SA, which last year sought to quash speculation that it was in talks to sell its online fashion retailer Net-a-Porter to Yoox, may instead decide to buy Yoox, said Pedraza of the Luxury Institute.
 Gross said he prefers to buy funds that sell at a discount or “at the right price” The large gains racked up by closed-end funds in 2014 have not diminished Gross’s enthusiasm for the investments.
 Comcast is awaiting approval to buy Time Warner Cable, while AT&T needs clearance for its takeover of DirecTV.
 He struck the deal with Standard General in which he borrowed about $20 million to buy shares.
 Charney’s Stake The fund also has warrants to buy back the shares Charney purchased as well as 10 percent of his original stake.
 Lion also holds warrants to buy 245 million shares with an exercise price of 66 cents each, according to public filings.
 terminated its offer to buy Aspen Insurance Holdings Ltd.
July 9 (Bloomberg) -- EBay Inc’s Braintree unit, an electronic-payment system for businesses acquired last year, is seeking to make it simpler for e-commerce companies to get customers to buy on mobile devices.
 Rome-based Gtech SpA agreed to buy the world’s biggest slot-machine maker for $47 billion.
 agreed to buy it for about $85 billion.
 Stocks slumped earlier in the day as fewer Americans than forecast signed contracts to buy previously owned homes in June, a sign residential real estate is struggling to strengthen.
 raised its rating on the maker of Gauloises cigarettes to buy from neutral.
 European Delivery And if I were to buy the Cayenne, I would surely opt for the European delivery, a little-known program that lets purchasers drive around Europe in their very own new car.
 forecast in a July 9 report, saying that it’s now cheaper for steel mills in China to buy seaborne supply rather than domestic material.
 Still, he said, “there are so many more things we should be dedicating taxpayer resources to than handing it out to some select companies” Speaker John Boehner of Ohio hasn’t said how he’ll vote on the bank, which provides financing for foreign companies to buy US.
 The ECB is also undertaking preparatory work to buy “simple and transparent” ABS.
 “His main goal is to buy more operating businesses,” said Sims, whose firm counts Omaha, Nebraska-based Berkshire among its largest holdings.
 Niel then tried to buy Bouygues Telecom, a deal that was stymied by a $4 billion price gap.
 He has thrown in his lot with Standard General, forging a deal that involved borrowing about $20 million to buy more shares and using his current stake as collateral.
 Despite what happens with its loan, Lion has the right to name two people to the board because it has warrants to buy 245 million shares that would equal a 12 percent stake in the company, according to public filings.
 agreed to buy for $23 billion.
 The company this month agreed to buy the 24 percent stake in Barcelona water company Sociedad General de Aguas de Barcelona it doesn’t own for stock and 299 million euros in cash.
 Applied Materials agreed in September to buy Tokyo Electron for $939 billion in stock to add scale as a shrinking base of clients makes earnings of suppliers more volatile.
 Duerr also gained voting rights over 758 percent of its target and is seeking to buy the rest of the company, it said.
 “We have very high market share already in our core business and wouldn’t be able to buy further auto businesses,” said Dieter.
 rose to a record after agreeing to buy Apple & Eve LLC.
 “There are issues in Portugal that are getting worked through -- it’s translated into buying bunds, gilts and Treasuries,” said Dan Mulholland, head of Treasury trading at BNY Mellon Capital Markets in New York.
 The Bapo will use those funds to buy about 13 million Lonmin shares and the company will transfer 09 percent in the two mining units to a development trust, it said.
 Marshall of CI Investments was offered a coupon of 15 percent to buy Sunshine’s unrated five-year notes.
 Rosneft is also set to buy a stake in the Seadrill unit, which it could increase to as much as 50 percent over time, people familiar with the deal said in May.
 “Any change to current regulations could allow international or domestic players to buy Ten and add other businesses to it, like a regional network or other radio licenses,” said Lewis.
 Before that, it passed legislation extending its ability to block foreign attempts to buy French companies in energy, transport and health care.
 Domestic stockpiles that in May 2013 were the highest in 20 years have slumped with a surge in shipments to buyers including Saudi Arabia, Morocco, Egypt and Iran, government data show.
 The price change means importers who signed three-month and six-month contracts to buy US.
 BCE, Canada’s biggest telecommunications company, announced today that it plans to buy the shares of Bell Aliant Inc.
 Under the new plan, the team overseeing the $184 billion private-equity fund the firm completed raising in January will use some of their incentive income to buy restricted shares of Apollo that vest over three years.
 Buffett Model As Fosun’s founders plotted their overseas expansion, they considered different business models -- from the property-to-ports conglomerate built by Li Ka-shing, Asia’s richest man, to buyout titans like Carlyle Group LP and Bain Capital Partners LLC that use leverage to bolster returns.
 Fosun paid $725 million to buy 1 Chase Manhattan Plaza, the largest purchase of a New York building by a Chinese buyer.
 World Cup Carrefour, which agreed in June to buy back discount stores in France, is focusing on price and convenience as it seeks to cement a domestic revival.
 sought firm purchases for its embattled CSeries after getting commitments to buy the planes.
 agreed to buy 50 of the E175-E2 model, Embraer said today at the Farnborough Air Show near London.
 He raised his rating on the stock from hold to buy.
 Last year, it beat Malone’s Liberty Global to buy Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for more than $10 billion.
 About two weeks after Chicago-based Hillshire offered to buy Pinnacle, JBS SA’s Pilgrim’s Pride Corp.
 Nishikubo, who took flying lessons and became a pilot after purchasing his stake in Skymark, said earlier this week he still wanted to buy A380s.
 The airline announced a decision to buy double-decker A380s and start an international business-class service in 2010, breaking from the company’s current model of low-fare travel using single-aisle Boeing Co.
 Investors have been competing to buy London offices to gain from rising values and rents.
 Wynn Resorts had to buy the rights from certain mainlanders, though the Land Public Works and Transport Bureau said it wasn’t aware of their involvement, according to the Macau Business report.
 That usually signals to investors an opportunity to buy because the fund’s price is lower than the value of its assets.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 The company expects to buy back as much as $8 billion in shares in 2014 and 2015, of which it has already purchased $16 billion in the first half of the year.
 rose 13 percent after Barclays Plc advised investors to buy shares in the world’s biggest company by market value.
 offered to buy a 149 percent stake in Gentiva for $16 a share as the company seeks to become the largest shareholder in the provider of home health-care services.
 “But most of these same market participants also say they plan to buy on pullbacks” Investors are using the easiest ways to reduce their junk holdings, hanging on to the illiquid securities that would be more difficult to buy again if their sentiment changed.
 Change Capital agreed to buy the stake from JH Partners LLC for an undisclosed sum, the company said an e-mailed statement today.
 Vitol teamed with sovereign wealth fund Abu Dhabi Investment Council to offer $26 billion to buy Royal Dutch Shell Plc’s refining and fuel station assets in Australia in February.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- Swiss Re Ltd, the world’s second-biggest reinsurer, agreed to buy a Chinese unit of the UK’s RSA Insurance Group Plc as it shifts capital to regions with higher premium growth prospects.
 China unveiled a plan in April that will connect the Hong Kong and Shanghai bourses, allowing investors to buy shares listed in Hong Kong via the Shanghai exchange, and vice versa.
 Under the dual access plan, Chinese investors will be able to buy stocks traded on both the Hang Seng Composite Large Cap Index, and the Hang Seng Composite Mid Cap Index, as well as companies traded on the Hong Kong and Shanghai exchanges.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- Kingdream Plc, an oil and drilling equipment maker controlled by Asia’s biggest refiner, said it plans to sell shares in a private placement to raise funds to buy assets from parent China Petrochemical Corp.
 The Johannesburg-based company agreed to buy Alucan, a Nigerian packaging company, for 33 billion rand ($307 million) in its biggest ever deal last year and is studying an option to buy a plastics manufacturer in the continent’s largest economy.
 “Now more than ever there are economic reasons not to buy government bonds,” Weidmann told Sueddeutsche Zeitung newspaper in May.
 Both pieces of debt will be used to buy the stock of Perpetual Corp.
 Sinclair said in March it would restructure the Allbritton deal to meet objections from the Federal Communications Commission, selling a station in three markets where it proposes to buy an affiliate of Walt Disney Co’s ABC network from Allbritton.
 are raised, it may mean higher costs for investors to buy Chinese shares,” JG Capital’s Guo said.
 Last week, Dominion said it agreed to buy out one of Ekati’s minority partners, Chuck Fipke, for about $67 million.
 “Frasers had planned on achieving several key strategic objectives over the medium term, including increasing the proportion of overseas earnings and recurring income as well as enhancing our platform in Australia” Frasers agreed to buy the five-star Sofitel Sydney Wentworth hotel in the city’s center from LaSalle Investment Management for A$201 million, according to an e-mailed statement from broker Jones Lang LaSalle Inc’s hotel division in May.
 The extra yield, or spread, investors demand to buy Venezuela’s benchmark bonds due in 2027 instead of US.
 Deals Covington, Skadden on $13 Billion Aristocrat Leisure Deal Covington & Burling LLP advised Aristocrat Leisure Ltd, which agreed to buy Video Gaming Technologies Inc.
 Calls to buy shares in the pet-care retailer trade close to the most expensive level in almost a decade relative to bearish puts, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in bets that the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 The plan relies on more aggressive marketing, an upgraded HBO Go app and expanded access to the network for broadband-only customers of companies like Comcast who don’t want to buy a full cable-TV package.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Breitburn Energy Partners LP agreed to buy QR Energy LP for about $167 billion in stock and cash, saying it would become the largest master-limited partnership that produces mostly oil.
 Deals Jones Day Advises Reynolds on $25 Billion Lorillard Acquisition Jones Day is advising Reynolds American Inc, which agreed to buy Lorillard Inc.
 and Mexico is an option as there are few opportunities to buy prize assets in emerging markets, Rorsted said in an interview in New York.
 Last month, Dusseldorf-based Henkel agreed to buy three US.
 reached an agreement to buy its rival for about $25 billion.
 The so-called “maker-taker” model pays rebates to traders who stand ready to buy or sell shares as needed, while charging those on the other side of the transaction.
 Deals Baker Botts Advises Linn Energy on Devon Well Purchase Baker Botts LLP advised Linn Energy LLC, which agreed to buy oil and natural gas-producing acreage across six US.
 “Investors who bought at the auction did well, and everyone else, who expected to buy at higher yields after hearing the Fed minutes, is being forced to chase the rally” Ten-year notes sold at the auction yielded 2597 percent.
 “To me it seems as if it’s somebody trying to buy on the cheap.
 (753) with loans and guarantees to buy US.
 “But, this is a company that is generating cash, generating profits, using the money to buy back stock, pay dividends, doing everything that airlines have never done before” Bastian and Chief Executive Officer Richard Anderson fielded questions from analysts today about a glut of seats in markets including Europe and Asia.
 It’s December agreement to buy a 49 percent stake in Talison Lithium Ltd.
 After Chengdu Tianqi outbid Rockwood to buy Talison, it agreed to sell a stake in the mine to Rockwood.
 He reversed himself and sued the NBA in federal court in Los Angeles the day after Ballmer agreed to buy the team.
 The former Economy Ministry official and current head of investment banking at Banco Macro had a plan to buy the defaulted bonds from their holders.
 Hebei is obligated under the pact to buy 60 percent of Kami’s annual output to a maximum of 48 million tons of the first 8 million tons of concentrate each year.
 He struck the investment deal with Standard General in which he borrowed about $20 million to buy the shares and used his current stake as collateral.
 General de Combustibles SA, in which he owns a majority stake, the person said, adding that CGC has the first right of refusal to buy two of the fields.
 Buenos Aires-based CGC may partner with another Argentine company to buy the other fields in southern Argentina, the person said.
 As much as 80 percent of aluminum inventories may be tied up as collateral in so-called financing deal that make the metal unavailable to buyers, according to Societe Generale SA.
 Part of Fortress’s statehouse push is to require that insurers respond to inquiries from prospective life-settlement investors about the validity of policies they want to buy.
 Experimental Treatments The company said earlier this month it agreed to buy Seragon Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Roche agreed in June to buy Genia Technologies Inc.
 “We believe that gradually the European macro-economic backdrop will improve” ING’s Stake ING’s ownership may shrink to 681 percent if underwriters fully exercise an option to buy as many as 116 million additional NN shares, the firm said yesterday.
 Nomura increased its investment rating on the stock to buy from neutral, and boosted its share-price target to 2,080 yen from 1,650 yen.
 “We believe that gradually the European macro-economic backdrop will improve” ING’s ownership may shrink to 681 percent if underwriters fully exercise an option to buy as many as 116 million additional NN shares, the company said yesterday.
 is betting Americans are ready to buy $3,000 televisions.
 While Americans continue to buy TVs to watch communal events like the Super Bowl in their living rooms, secondary sets for bedrooms and kitchens are losing out to tablets and computers, said Veronica Thayer, an analyst for IHS Technology based in Austin, Texas.
 TVs are upgraded about every seven years on average, so theoretically the millions of people who snapped up flat-panel sets last decade are prime candidates to buy again.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 Applied Materials agreed in September to buy Tokyo Electron for $939 billion in stock to add scale as a shrinking base of clients makes earnings of suppliers more volatile.
 Not Enough The Manufacturers Association of Israel, which says its members account for 95 percent of industrial output, has urged the central bank to buy enough foreign currency to push the shekel to a floor of 38 per dollar and keep it there.
 His stake in Puma includes more than 4 million common shares and a warrant to buy 21 million shares for $16 each.
 to buy some assets and brands.
 Imperial Tobacco confirmed it is in talks to buy some of those assets and brands.
 Platow Brief reported that Ajinomoto hired an investment bank to prepare a deal to buy Symrise.
 agreed earlier this week to buy Wild Flavors GmbH for 23 billion euros, spurring speculation of consolidation in the industry.
 Whirlpool, the American manufacturer of Maytag and KitchenAid appliances, agreed to buy a 60 percent stake that represents about 67 percent of the Italian company’s voting rights.
 Today’s dealmaking included AirAsia Bhd’s $138 billion accord to buy the new A330neo, earning Chief Executive Officer Tony Fernandes a kiss from Fabrice Bregier, who runs Airbus’s jetliner unit.
 Reynolds American Inc, 42 percent owned by BAT, this month agreed to buy Lorillard Inc, leaving the US.
 That makes a big difference” The fired Demoulas has offered to buy the company, as have an unspecified number of others, according to the board.
 Louisville, Kentucky-based Kindred had offered on July 14 to buy a 149 percent stake in Gentiva for $16 a share after the company rejected two takeover bids.
 Telefonica, the second-largest mobile-phone company in Mexico, “wishes to buy Grupo Salinas’s stake in Iusacell.
 founder Jeff Bezos to buy the Washington Post.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy the European wealth-management business of Friends Life Group Ltd.
 The unit’s largest single investment prior to Lombard was a $297 million deal to buy a stake in insurer Rothesay Life Ltd.
 Amy Stellitano, a 37-year-old nurse from New York, is one mom who doesn’t plan to buy an entertainment-based smartwatch.
 With help from private equity funds and bond investors willing to buy debt that’s seven levels below investment grade, McClendon is building an empire following the same playbook he used to turn Chesapeake into a drilling powerhouse.
 Verso has been trying to persuade the creditors to accept an exchange that will reduce its debt, satisfying a prerequisite for its $14 billion deal to buy NewPage.
 “The coalition has fallen apart, laws haven’t been voted on, soldiers can’t be paid, there’s no money to buy rifles, there’s no possibility to store up gas,” Yatsenyuk told lawmakers.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA, the Brazilian steelmaker led by Benjamin Steinbruch, is seeking to buy steel assets in the US.
 The interest follows a failed attempt earlier this year to buy OAO Severstal’s assets in the US, he said.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Japan’s Topix index rebounded from its biggest drop since May after a report the nation’s pension fund freed itself to buy more domestic equities and investors weighed geopolitical risks in the Middle East and Ukraine.
 Also, the Piper analysts believe people who used to kill time by wandering around the malls are now killing time by wandering around the web and retailers need to make it easier to buy stuff on their phones.
 The miner is looking to buy gold projects with more than 100 metric tons of metal reserves and copper projects with more than 1 million tons of reserves, Chairman Chen Jinghe said in March.
 The unit was formed after JBS agreed to buy the Seara food-processing assets from Marfrig Global Foods SA for 585 billion reais in June 2013.
 Expedia announced its plans to buy Wotifcom for about $658 million last month.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Li Ka-Shing’s Cheung Kong Group won a contest to buy Envestra Ltd, after a rival bidder for the Australian gas distributor said it would sell its shares in support of the A$24 billion ($22 billion) bid.
 Envestra’s independent directors in May recommended Cheung Kong’s cash bid for the company over APA’s proposal to buy the company either via stock or a combination of cash and stock.
 Infineon’s Offer Infineon, Germany’s largest chipmaker, agreed yesterday to buy International Rectifier Corp.
 The currency zone’s persistent low inflation may also prompt investors to buy UK.
 Mandelbaum has a budget of as much as $75 million to buy other startups.
 agreed to buy Siemens AG’s health information technology unit for $13 billion as the US.
 “CEO Kaeser is addressing businesses previously deemed ‘sacred’ within the company” Danaher Corp’s Beckman Coulter last month agreed to buy Siemens’s clinical microbiology business in a deal expected to close in the first quarter of 2015.
 surged the most in more than 17 months after it agreed to buy $625 billion of power plants in a bet that electricity prices in the US.
 NRG spent $42 billion in 2012 to buy rival GenOn Energy and about $3 billion to buy Edison Mission Energy’s assets while the company was in bankruptcy.
 The company may use the cash to buy back stock, he said.
 Interviews/Commentary Banks Said to Form Argentine Disputed Debt Buyer Group International banks are looking to put together a group of investors to buy disputed Argentine debt and resolve a US.
 The company plans a tender offer to buy back 8875 percent senior notes due in 2019, 7875 percent debentures due in 2023, 7875 percent senior debentures due 2030, and 7125 percent senior notes due 2023 of CBS Broadcasting Inc, a wholly owned unit of CBS Corp, the company said in a statement today.
 The company also said its agreement last month to buy Trunk Club, a men’s online clothing service, will reduce full-year earnings by as much as 5 percent.
 agreed to buy Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 It also agreed to buy Predator Midstream Ltd, according to a statement from the company yesterday.
 When Orb’s backers decided to liquidate the company and cut their losses, Costello put together a group to buy it instead.
 Investors who want to buy existing storage properties are stymied by high prices.
 Kirk has budgeted $500 million this year to buy storage properties; last year, it spent $586 million.
 has ended talks to buy T-Mobile US Inc, the No.
 In May, Ergen said he would be interested in T-Mobile if Sprint failed to buy it.
 16, people began approaching, wanting to buy one.
 Cautious Approach Relative yields on asset-backed securities linked to all kinds of consumer borrowing, including credit-card debt and auto loans, rose as investors took a more cautious approach to buying bonds, according to Wells Fargo & Co.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- SMA Solar Technology AG wants to buy more power-plant operations and maintenance contracts as the biggest maker of inverters used by solar farms seeks to expand its service business to counter falling sales.
 to buy the unit’s stake in a Finnish online game developer.
 Already North America’s fifth-largest lumber producer, Resolute has been assessing potential opportunities to buy or construct US.
 1 it agreed to buy two sawmills in Georgia, increasing its US.
 OAO TMK jumped 22 percent as OAO Rusnano said it plans to buy new shares issued by the steel pipe producer.
 That buyer would have the option of trying to buyout Artie T.
 and Italy have committed to buying the version, the F-35B, which is designed for short takeoffs and vertical landings on fields and aircraft carriers.
 While Pfizer shelved plans in May to buy the UK.
 announced a deal in May to buy the company for more than $48 billion to gain video subscribers in the US.
 “Personally, I haven’t signed any contract with Itau and Citi regarding a decision to buy shares.
 Emaar doesn’t provide analysts or investors with guidance on the number of properties it expects to hand over to buyers each quarter to help predict revenue.
 The company’s board has also approved a plan to buy back as much as $500 million in stock, according to a filing.
 fell 21 percent to 3,745 yen after jumping 15 percent yesterday as parent Roche Holding AG was said to be in talks to buy out the Japanese drugmaker.
 15 that Roche is in talks to buy remaining the 40 percent of Chugai.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- UOL Group Ltd, a luxury-hotel operator based in Singapore, agreed to buy a land plot in the City of London financial district from Heron International Ltd.
 Cutrale, a closely held juice maker controlled by Brazil’s Jose Luis Cutrale, is partnering with banks owned by Joseph Safra, the country’s second-richest man, to buy Chiquita and cancel its purchase of Fyffes.
 Deerfield, Illinois-based Walgreen would have had to change the terms of its 2012 agreement to buy Boots to give the combined company a non-US.
 no longer wants to buy CNN now that it’s unlikely to be put up for sale, Chief Executive Officer Les Moonves said.
 agreed to buy a stake, pushing its valuation to 361 times estimated earnings.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Axa SA’s property unit agreed to buy a 50 percent stake in a shopping mall and other assets in the English city of Bristol from Land Securities Group Plc for 2678 million pounds ($450 million).
 Banks and brokerages exacerbated the selloff as they offloaded stocks to pay back some of the money that was borrowed to buy them.
 The borrowing adds to signs Canadians are continuing to buy big-ticket items and tuning out warnings about unsustainable debt growth.
 “If you can’t put down 20 percent including taxes you aren’t ready to buy a car,” he said.
 Higher interest rates could slow the market or lead some customers to buy a smaller or cheaper car.
 Alibaba also has the right to buy a stake of about one-third of Small & Micro Financial with the approval of Chinese regulators, according to the filing.
 “It doesn’t appear that the cost of fuel will make a leap down, so the motivation to buy aircraft with lower operating costs is high,” Lawson said on a conference call with analysts.
 - Gannett agreed to buy the rest of Carscom for $18 billion.
 A separate procurement list includes some Apple computers that departments can continue to buy on a smaller scale, defined as purchases totaling less than 12 million yuan ($195,000), according to a state purchasing website.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Dollar Tree Inc, the discount chain that’s in a bidding war to buy Family Dollar Stores Inc, cut the top end of its full-year earnings forecast amid acquisition-related costs.
 Last month, Dollar Tree agreed to buy Family Dollar for $85 billion, creating a sprawling discount chain with $18 billion in sales and more locations than any US.
 companies to buy smaller foreign businesses and take their addresses for tax purposes.
 ECB President Mario Draghi said this month policy makers have intensified preparation to buy asset-backed securities.
 Svenska Handelsbanken AB upgraded the shares to buy from reduce, citing improved market conditions for the Swedish maker of sterilization systems.
 Claure, 43, will be appointed less than a year after SoftBank agreed to buy a majority stake in his mobile-phone distributor for $126 billion as part of the Japanese carrier’s push for international expansion.
 Meatpacker JBS SA advanced the most on the gauge after Deutsche Bank AG raised its recommendation to buy.
 Tim Participacoes SA climbed the most since May as parent Telecom Italia SpA was said to be preparing an offer of as much as 7 billion euros ($94 billion) to outbid Telefonica SA in the race to buy Vivendi SA’s GVT.
 The phone company slumped earlier this month after Telefonica SA offered to buy GVT, spurring speculation Tim’s alternatives for expansion were shrinking.
 Alibaba Group agreed to buy 60 percent of the company, formerly known as ChinaVision Media Group Ltd, in March for HK$624 billion ($804 million) to gain rights to television dramas and English Premier League soccer.
 Priceline’s investment in Ctrip, through a convertible bond and an agreement to buy Ctrip shares on the open market over the next year, means the company may own as much as 10 percent of Ctripcom, which is listed on the Nasdaq Stock Market.
 The company agreed to buy more than 2,000 towers from Etisalat Nigeria earlier this month and said it would invest further $100 million in the towers acquired.
 Allergan rose, probably because the prospect of a defensive acquisition bolsters its defense as well as adds the wrinkle of a possible inversion play: Salix itself is in the middle of trying to buy an Ireland-based unit of Cosmo Pharmaceuticals, the Journal reports.
 We tend to jump for anything Tara Lachapelle writes because the smartest stories make our job easier, and she finds that in the days following 21st Century Fox’s aborted attempt to buy Time Warner Inc, Scripps has risen to match Time Warner’s multiple based on expectations it’s going to be a target.
 A month later, YPF agreed to buy assets from Apache Corp.
 agreed to buy a stake in the company.
 Sentiment about whether or not it’s a good time to buy waned last week, with the buying-climate index falling to 323 from 326.
 Khazanah’s offer to buy the 306 percent stake it doesn’t already own in the Subang, Malaysia-based company at 27 sen per share is 125 percent higher than the stock’s Aug.
 The 58-year-old billionaire said opportunities to buy real estate in the region won’t last much longer and that he’s looking to purchase sites that can be developed to serve people he expects to move there because of the legislation.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Carlos Slim’s decision to buy out AT&T Inc’s stake in America Movil SAB has reaped him almost $1 billion in profits in just over a month.
 Shenyin Wanguo HK Ltd, which soared last week on its parent’s plan to buy Hong Yuan Securities Co, advanced 68 percent to HK$517.
 Carry traders who sold the dollar and euro to buy a basket of five currencies including Argentina’s peso and Indonesia’s rupiah would have made almost nothing since the start of July, after receiving 92 percent from February to June, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Days earlier, it ended a recommendation to buy Hungary’s forint with a loss of about 1 percent.
 Sven Richter, head of frontier markets at the RenAsset Management, which has offices in Johannesburg, Guernsey and London, is “still finding attractive stocks” to buy.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Rupert Murdoch was deterred in his effort to buy Time Warner Inc.
 “Also, after what happened with Time Warner and Sprint, you put those two elements together and there’s likely to be more demand to add protection in deals” Reassessing Deal Gary Ellis, Medtronic’s chief financial officer, said in June that while the company plans to buy Covidien with or without the inversion, it would reassess the decision if the laws changed.
 companies to buy smaller foreign businesses and take their addresses for tax purposes.
 Maureen McDonnell asked for a Rolex watch, which Williams said he produced, and a Range Rover sport utility vehicle, which he declined to buy.
 “I shouldn’t have had to buy things like that to get the things I needed,” Williams said.
 “It was a bad business decision” Williams said he declined Maureen McDonnell’s request to buy a Range Rover for one of her children because it would be “too visible” and because he didn’t want a car dealer to have a bank check that might link him to the McDonnell family.
 The incentive for sending cargoes from the region to buyers in Asia is at its strongest in four years, data from PVM Oil Associates Ltd.
 in a debt restructuring in 2012, agreed to buy 144 UK.
 Once customers have the option to buy deals on a website, instead of during a limited time typically associated with e-mailed deals, that reduces “the sense of urgency in purchasing,” Arvind Bhatia, an analyst at Sterne, Agee & Leach Inc, wrote in a research note.
 “There’s so much press at the moment about the sales market overheating that people are just not prepared to pay the prices” While it’s generally cheaper to buy a home in the UK.
 Christian Scheuring, a 32-year-old project manager at Internet marketing company Bazaarvoice Inc, said he wants to buy a home even though he gets a good deal on his rent in Wapping, between the City of London and Canary Wharf financial districts.
 “The idea was to try to clamp down on these kinds of practices, where certain investment advisers were trying to buy access or influence,” said Scott Kimpel, a partner at the Hunton & Williams law firm who worked at the SEC when the rule was passed by a 5-0 vote.
 So when his computer screen showed hourly earnings were unchanged in July, he knew exactly what to do: direct his traders to buy more Treasuries.
 The program, expected to start in October, will offer unprecedented access to China’s $37 trillion equity market while opening a route for wealthy mainland investors to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 “We believe that down the road someone’s going to try to buy the resource, no doubt,” Tonken said.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Sunrun Inc, a closely held provider of rooftop power systems, agreed to buy as much as 100 megawatts of panels from REC Solar ASA, ensuring its supply amid concerns of a looming shortage.
 predicted a dramatic recovery in prices in second half, saying that it’s now cheaper for steel mills in China to buy seaborne supply rather than domestic material.
 SMA today signed a contract to buy Phoenix Solar’s European operations and maintenance activities including customer contracts in Germany, France, Spain and Italy, the Niestetal, Germany-based company said in a statement.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- The Nasdaq 100 Index’s highest level since the 2000 technology bubble has sent options traders rushing to buy protection.
 Contracts hedging against a 5 percent decline in QQQ, the biggest exchange-traded fund tracking technology companies, cost 42 points more than calls to buy, according to three-month implied-volatility data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Kapoor also entered new categories, outbidding Bayer AG to buy vitamin and supplement maker Schiff Nutrition for $14 billion in 2012, and last year added health care remedies in China and Latin America.
 “We’re hoping to sell this dark blend to those people that are still going to buy our original blend but are maybe looking for a different experience,” Chief Executive Officer Marc Caira said in an interview at a promotional event in Toronto yesterday, which featured a performance by Canadian singer Jann Arden.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Electrolux AB, the Swedish maker of AEG stoves and Frigidaire refrigerators, said it’s in talks to buy General Electric Co’s home-appliances business.
 agreed to buy a $50 million stake in Tesla and sold a shuttered California factory to its new partner for a mere $42 million.
 is in talks to buy a stake in Ivanhoe’s Kamoa project in the Congo, people with knowledge of the matter said in March.
 “The large businesses in China tend to buy where the government leads,” Frank Gillett, an analyst at Forrester Research Inc, said in an interview.
 Short-sellers borrow shares and sell them, expecting to buy them back later at a lower price for a profit.
 Middleware Market For Inspur, the deal could help convince potential customers to buy its hardware with the option to use IBM’s software.
 Amlak and Tamweel were the two biggest mortgage providers in Dubai during a real-estate boom that began in 2002 when the government allowed foreigners to buy properties in some parts of the emirate.
 In March, Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy annuities with their pension savings.
 It will take about 538 semi-truck loads, each capable of hauling 80,000 pounds of corn and soybeans, to get his anticipated harvest to buyers.
 and Workday Inc, who deliver software as a service via the Web, freeing users of the need to buy and maintain hardware.
 Thai billionaire Charoen Sirivadhanabhakdi is in talks to buy the holding, Bloomberg News reported yesterday.
 7 to buy Metro AG’s wholesale stores in Vietnam for $874 million including debt.
 plans to split into two publicly traded companies by spinning off its publishing business, including USA Today, and said it has agreed to buy full ownership of Carscom.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Enquest Plc Chief Executive Officer Amjad Bseisu said he plans to buy more oil and gas assets in the UK.
 The Hungarian company, scheduled to report second-quarter earnings tomorrow, has risen 15 percent this year on bets its parent may offer to buy outstanding shares after a similar step in the Czech Republic and other purchases in eastern Europe.
 The company also said today it agreed to buy the 73 percent interest it doesn’t already own in Classified Ventures LLC, which owns Carscom, for $18 billion in cash.
 TeliaSonera plans to buy Tele2’s Norwegian business to bolster its No.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Tim Participacoes SA fell the most on Brazil’s benchmark stock index on speculation the mobile-phone carrier’s alternatives for expansion are shrinking after Telefonica SA offered to buy rival GVT.
 Its position in the Brazilian market has weakened” Telefonica offered to buy GVT for 67 billion euros ($9 billion) to expand in a fast-growing broadband market and address antitrust concerns in the country.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Yara International ASA, a maker of ammonia, nitrates and specialty fertilizers, agreed to buy 60 percent of phosphate producer Brazil’s Galvani Industria Comercio e Servicos SA to expand further in South America.
 Applied Materials, seeking to add scale and capture more market share, last year agreed to buy Tokyo Electron Ltd.
 Jefferies LLC’s David Zervos wrote in a note to investors this morning, “Maybe I have been looking at different data releases than the rest of the market, but I don’t see what all the fuss is about” On the other hand, Morgan Stanley strategists said in a report today that “investors shouldn’t feel pressured to buy aggressively” Regardless of who’s right, the world’s biggest economy is showing signs of accelerating, which ostensibly would help the most-indebted companies.
 It has also given details of proposals that allow some junior creditors to buy shares in the company at a discount so it can repay notes in the Punch A securitization for less than face value.
 The talks were already under way before Spain’s Telefonica -- which competes with Telecom Italia in Brazil’s phone market -- offered to buy GVT for 67 billion euros ($896 billion) this month.
 In its proposal to Vivendi, Telefonica would give the French company the right to buy almost all of its stake in Telecom Italia.
 The company will use $50 million of the proceeds from the private sale to buy back shares from the note acquirers as part of a previously announced $150 million repurchase program, according to a statement yesterday.
 The CFO this year repaid a 6 million-rand ($562,000) loan from the company that was used to buy shares after the transaction was found to have breached corporate rules.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Infineon Technologies AG, Germany’s largest chipmaker, agreed to buy International Rectifier Corp.
 agreed to buy LSI Corp for $66 billion, and semiconductor-equipment supplier Applied Materials Inc.
 agreed to buy TriQuint Semiconductor Inc.
 In June, JPMorgan paid $147 million to buy a Jersey City building it had been leasing, according to the Record newspaper in nearby Hackensack.
 Infineon Technologies AG, Germany’s largest chipmaker, agreed to buy the company for about $3 billion in cash, adding to its power-management technology business.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- A subsidiary of Cantor Fitzgerald LP agreed to buy a Ranieri Real Estate Partners LP commercial-mortgage business that’s led by onetime Deutsche Bank AG executives Jon Vaccaro and Eric Schwartz.
 The most expensive option is to buy back as much as 15 trillion rubles of bonds to replace foreign debt, for instance, using money from the National Wellbeing Fund, the report said.
 offered to buy out minority shareholders in a restructuring plan for the national carrier that suffered two disasters this year.
 Khazanah will pay 27 sen a share for a total of 138 billion ringgit ($429 million) to buy the remaining 306 percent it doesn’t own, it said in a statement today.
 said yesterday that it agreed to buy his International Strategy & Investment Group LLC and the remaining 40 percent of its own equity business for as many as 81 million shares, or as much as $406 million at Evercore’s Aug.
 Schlosstein said today on a conference call with analysts that Evercore plans to buy back about half of the shares it will issue to fund the deal over the next five years, reducing the potential dilution for investors.
 Swiss Re’s corporate solutions unit, which sells insurance to corporate customers, last month agreed to buy a Chinese unit of the UK’s RSA Insurance Group Plc for 71 million pounds ($120 million) following a deal in February to buy 51 percent of Columbia’s Confianza.
 The group also agreed to buy the UK.
 12 to buy contracts in California and already trades in PJM.
 “The ebb and flow of news related to Ukraine continue to set most of the current agenda in the European gas market” Ukraine passed a bill last week that enables the country to impose sanctions on Russia that may include banning Gazprom from transiting fuel through Ukraine and forcing European companies to buy gas at the Ukrainian border.
 The Spanish treasury last week sold 10-year bonds at record low yield of 27 percent as the European Central Bank pledged to hold down borrowing costs for an “extended period” Investors prefer Spanish debt to Italian paper, demanding an extra 24 basis points to buy 10-year debt issued by Italy, which unexpectedly slipped into economic recession in the second quarter as Rajoy said he plans to raise his forecast for Spanish growth.
 Phaidon, a publisher of art and design books, agreed to buy Artspace, the companies said today in a statement without disclosing the price.
 “How do you make people decide to buy art? After all, it’s a discretionary purchase,” said Almgren, whose new online venture, Artfinder, allows customers to buy art directly from little-known artists.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Ingersoll-Rand Plc agreed to buy Cameron International Corp’s centrifugal compression unit for $850 million.
 jumped by the most in more than 14 years after parent Roche Holding AG was said to be in talks to buy out the Japanese drugmaker to secure full control of its cancer and arthritis drugs.
 Last month, Roche, the world’s largest maker of cancer drugs, agreed to buy Seragon Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Roche agreed in June to buy Genia Technologies Inc.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity.
 and this may positively affect Tencent’s stock price, triggering people to buy call options” Shares of Tencent climbed 12 percent to HK$12980 today in Hong Kong, the biggest boost to the benchmark Hang Seng Index.
 This year, Tencent has also agreed to buy 199 percent of Craigslist-like 58com Inc.
 The Wall Street Journal reported earlier that Sprint dropped its plans to buy T-Mobile.
 when the government abandoned rules that had pushed consumers to buy the retirement products.
 Earlier this year, Ageas agreed to buy the remaining half of a Portuguese joint venture with Banco Comercial Portugues SA.
 Bosch oversees a family-run empire started in 1911 by his grandfather, which invested $500 million last year to buy a stake in the Central America operations of Telefonica SA.
 In a two-year put and call option agreement that Millicom and Lopez struck in January, Millicom has the option to buy his stake for $18 billion.
 “The low interest rates are leading investors to buy riskier portfolios, which pushes along the sale of non-core assets,” Christian Hamann, an analyst at Hamburger Sparkasse AG, said yesterday.
 The Spanish telecommunications company said it has offered to buy Vivendi’s Brazilian Internet-provider unit GVT.
 He retired in 2002, at age 44, with plans to buy a California mansion larger than anything he could find in Asia.
 At the same time as announcing the split, Gannett said it agreed to buy the rest of Classified Ventures LLC, the parent company of Carscom, for $18 billion in cash.
 “It’s up to the board to make sure that they literally shake the tree as much as possible to get the best offer” Accepting the takeover proposal would force Charlotte, North Carolina-based Chiquita to scrap its plan to buy Irish competitor Fyffes Plc in a tax-advantageous inversion deal.
 In Play The bid for Chiquita comes five months after the banana producer agreed to buy Fyffes in an all-stock transaction that would create the world’s biggest banana producer.
 “How many times do you have a chance to buy a premium brand in a sector that doesn’t have too many?” Shah said.
 rose 14 percent after a report the convenience store operator made the short list to buy a $16 billion stake in China’s Sinopec Sales.
 agreed to buy closely held International Strategy & Investment Group LLC in an all-stock transaction as it seeks to expand its research and trading business.
 Evercore will issue as many as 81 million share equivalents to buy both ISI and the 40 percent of its own equities business that it doesn’t already own, according to a presentation from the company today.
 Pfizer abandoned a 695-billion-pound ($116 billion) effort to buy London-based AstraZeneca on May 26, and under UK.
 than Pfizer’s AstraZeneca bid, and Valeant is tangled in a hostile attempt to buy Allergan Inc.
 Locomotives, Generators Angola’s government announced plans in June to buy $1 billion of trains and power generators from GE.
 The introduction of REITs will provide a new source of cash to Indian developers that have struggled to reduce debt with interest rates among the highest in Asia, while giving investors the ability to buy into the country’s property market.
 in the 1960s and are publicly traded, pool investor money to buy real estate such as shopping malls, office buildings and rental housing.
 buyout firm TPG Capital are nearing a deal to buy a majority stake in Saudi Arabian fast-food chain Kudu, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 The talks were already under way before Telefonica offered to buy GVT for 67 billion euros ($896 billion) this month.
 The planned tie-up, scheduled to start around October, will give foreign investors unprecedented access to the mainland market while opening a route for wealthy Chinese investors to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 Private-equity funds use borrowed money to buy companies, improve profitability and resell them.
 Meda twice rejected advances from Mylan this year and instead chose to buy Rottapharm for about $31 billion, picking the family-owned company from a list of about 10 targets.
 ’Entry Point’ Johan Unnerus, an analyst at Swedbank AB, said the decline in the share price as a result of the manufacturing issues and pressure on two or three products could provide an opportunity to buy Meda stock, “given the steady progress for emerging markets and over-the-counter sales” He predicts the stock will rise to 135 kronor, implying an increase of about 45 percent.
 Frustrated in their attempt to find a company to buy, the partners took a tip from an investment banker and purchased debt-laden soda maker Hansen Natural Corp.
 Name Change On advice of a banker, they decided to buy family-owned soda maker Hansen Natural.
 Interest for Dutch software providers is increasing, with private-equity firm Advent International agreeing to buy Dutch cloud-software maker Unit4 for about 115 billion euros in November.
 It agreed last year to buy Glencore Plc’s stake in Frieda River, estimating the development costs at as much as $18 billion.
 Time Warner also reported earnings that beat estimates and said it plans to buy back $5 billion of its shares.
 lender raised its quarterly dividend to 5 cents a share and dropped plans to buy back stock after the Fed approved its resubmitted capital plan for 2014.
 Friends Provident, with almost 7 billion pounds in assets under management, reported a 44 percent slump in the value of new business, a measure of future sales, in the first half of the year, citing “challenging market conditions” Friends Life said in May that it would miss its earnings target this year after Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne in his budget scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy annuities with their pension savings.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Shares in Kuwait Food Co, the Middle East operator of KFC and Pizza Hut restaurants, were suspended from trading on the Kuwait Stock Exchange today after Saudi Arabia’s Savola Group said it had held talks to buy a stake in the company.
 Premier Oil climbed 32 percent to 3368 pence after UBS raised its recommendation on the shares to buy from neutral.
 health-care landlord by market value, agreed to buy HealthLease Properties Real Estate Investment Trust and formed a partnership for additional properties to expand in senior care.
 agreed to buy Griffin-American Healthcare REIT II for about $34 billion.
 By simplifying his empire’s corporate structure, Kinder will lower borrowing costs and unify the company under a single stock that he can use as currency to buy competitors, Bloomberg News reported.
 “We won’t have as much business,” he said, saying the bank is a “catalyst and gives people the ability to buy now and pay later.
 Investors are keen to buy China stocks because of a planned Hong Kong-Shanghai bourse link, Bank of East Asia’s Lai said.
 “The government was quite wise” to buy some of the apartments, Daniele Marzocco said.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- The end of Sprint Corp’s campaign to buy T-Mobile US Inc.
 and AT&T’s proposal to buy DirecTV, he said.
 “Sprint now has an opportunity to focus their efforts on robust competition” 27th Day Today is the 27th day of a projected 180-day review at the FCC of Comcast’s $452 billion proposal to buy Time Warner Cable, which would combine the two largest US.
 president to a Republican administration following the 2016 elections would improve regulatory prospects for a renewed effort by Sprint to buy T-Mobile, Gallant said.
 Activist investor Carl Icahn, who had pushed Apple to buy back more of its own stock earlier this year, said the rise in the company’s share price validated his earlier claim that the iPhone maker was undervalued.
 He’s also been more active in acquisitions, including spending $3 billion to buy Beats Electronics LLC, the company’s biggest-ever purchase.
 The goal is to get women to buy new wardrobes and jolt anemic apparel sales.
 New fashion trends, when they catch on, have a multiplier effect because women are forced to buy new shoes, blouses, jackets and so on.
 agreed to buy a stake in the company.
 Tractebel Energia SA and other utilities have been forced to buy energy at record spot prices when output at their dams fell short of supply commitments.
 “We have got more into the bulk annuity area so you will see more in the second half than in the first” About $6 billion was wiped off the UK insurance industry’s market value in March after Chancellor of Exchequer George Osborne’s budget scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity product.
 UBS boosted the stock to buy from neutral.
 Vice President Al Gore sued Al Jazeera, claiming the satellite news provider owned by the Qatari royal family owes him and a partner $65 million from a deal to buy his network, Current TV.
 He also said a smaller program to buy asset-backed securities won’t be ready any time soon.
 The banking regulator is allowing local governments in Shanghai, Guangdong, Zhejiang, Jiangsu and Anhui to set up asset-management companies to buy bad loans from financial institutions, people familiar with the matter said last month.
 Japan’s Government Pension Investment Fund, which is being urged to buy more stocks, said in July it had about $15 billion of its more than $205 billion in local stocks tracking the measure by the end of March.
 Applied Materials, seeking to add scale and capture more market share, last year agreed to buy Tokyo Electron Ltd.
 Two weeks ago, Gtech SpA agreed to buy International Game Technology for $47 billion in cash and stock, uniting the world’s largest provider of lottery systems with the biggest slot-machine maker.
 agreed to buy the company in a push to expand in the wireless market.
 agreed to buy a stake in the company.
 Dominion Resources Inc’s North Carolina unit has agreed to buy electricity from the solar farm under a 15-year contract.
 The stock market hasn’t helped an investor who has said he likes to wait for the “fat pitch,” an opportunity to buy a company at a price promising favorable returns.
 Chairman Charlie Ergen, who has said he could go after T-Mobile if Sprint fails to buy it.
 Led by Chief Executive Officer Patrick Frost since July 1, the insurer agreed to buy German real estate asset-manager Corpus Sireo to accelerate an expansion in money management.
 Swiss Life agreed to buy the Cologne-based Corpus Sireo from German savings banks Sparkasse KoelnBonn, Stadtsparkasse Duesseldorf and Frankfurter Sparkasse for 210 million euros ($281 million).
 Claure, 43, was appointed less than a year after SoftBank agreed to buy a majority stake in his mobile-phone distributor for $126 billion as part of the Japanese carrier’s push for international expansion.
 8 after a report the nation’s pension fund freed itself to buy more domestic equities.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA (CSNA3), the Brazilian steelmaker led by Benjamin Steinbruch, is seeking to buy steel assets in the US.
 The interest follows a failed attempt earlier this year to buy OAO Severstal’s assets in the US, he said.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd’s $27 billion plan to buy back stock from Royal Dutch Shell Plc was blocked by shareholders, leaving Europe’s largest oil company with a larger, unwanted stake in the Australian gas producer.
 Look to Buy The company will also look to buy a project should it fail to discover a new mine, he said.
 Morgan, Hancock joined with Roberto Mendoza, a former colleague at the bank, in a deal to buy a stake in Berkshire’s General Re Securities Holdings.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc has agreed to buy 727 percent of Greek broadband company Hellas Online SA for 727 million euros ($965 million) and plans to make an offer for the rest of the company.
 Vodafone agreed to buy Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in March for 75 billion euros, including debt, and Kabel Deutschland Holding AG last year for 105 billion euros.
 last year to buy a controlling stake in Supercell Oy, developer of games Clash of Clans and Hay Day.
 Buying Spree Pershing Square has teamed with Laval, Quebec-based Valeant in its bid to buy Allergan as Valeant’s Chief Executive Officer Mike Pearson aims for his company to become one of the world’s biggest drugmakers.
 Using options allowed Pershing Square to skirt rules requiring government approval to buy more than $75 million of a company “with an intent to influence control of the business,” Ackman told Bloomberg TV’s Stephanie Ruhle and Erik Schatzker.
 ‘Incredible Opportunity’ Valeant found a partner in Ackman, who saw an “incredible opportunity to buy Allergan stock with advance inside knowledge,” guaranteeing high returns, Allergan alleged.
 Swedbank today raised its recommendation on Oslo-based DNO ASA to buy from neutral, and the shares rose 83 percent in Oslo trading.
 Short-sellers borrow shares and sell them, expecting to buy them back later at a lower price for a profit.
 The talks were already under way before Telefonica SA -- which competes with Telecom Italia in the Brazilian wireless market -- offered to buy Vivendi’s GVT unit for 67 billion euros ($9 billion) earlier this week.
 As part of the existing bid for GVT, Vivendi would be given the right to buy a stake of about 8 percent in Telecom Italia from Telefonica, which is a shareholder in the company through an investment vehicle known as Telco SpA.
 Evercore said yesterday it would issue as many as 81 million shares to buy ISI and the 40 percent of its equities research and trading unit it doesn’t already own.
 Evercore plans to buy back about half the shares it will issue to fund the deal over the next five years, reducing the potential dilution for investors, Chief Executive Officer Ralph Schlosstein said today on a conference call with analysts.
 Rhone, which tried to buy a stake in English Premier League soccer club Liverpool in 2010, has investments in German chemicals companies, US.
 said businesses would be able to buy middleware and database products from Oracle on the Azure cloud.
 A negative yield means investors who hold a security until it matures will receive less than they paid to buy it.
 The first pool is more than halfway toward its target of $5 million, which will be used to buy properties in Brooklyn’s Bedford-Stuyvesant.
 Building Upgrades In Bedford-Stuyvesant, Weissman plans to buy as much as $15 million of properties -- mostly apartment buildings with ground-floor retail space -- with $5 million coming from investors and the rest borrowed.
 Policy Rethink Fraser, whose company agreed earlier this year to buy two state-owned coal-fired power plants in New South Wales for A$151 billion, said the government needs to “rethink” the policy to spur significant investment in the industry.
 “They’re offering to buy us out.
 The company is “not in talks to buy them,” he said.
 San Miguel has announced almost $8 billion in acquisitions since 2000 and is prepared to spend as much as $10 billion more to buy assets in Southeast Asia as it moves further from the food-and-beverage industry and into energy and infrastructure.
 The Philippine Daily Inquirer reported July 28 that Tan was trying to raise funds to buy back San Miguel’s stake, adding that San Miguel may buy out Tan if he can’t come up with the money.
 Tan would need about $1 billion to buy back shares and cover advances for aircraft purchases, the newspaper said, citing unnamed people familiar with the business.
 A separate procurement list includes some Apple computers that departments can continue to buy on a smaller scale, defined as purchases totaling less than 12 million yuan ($195,000), according to a state purchasing website.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Dobrolet, the low-cost unit of Russia’s OAO Aeroflot grounded by European Union sanctions, plans to buy $15 billion of single-aisle jets from Boeing Co.
 Zhang, 37, tried to buy shares in each and every one, confident that she knew what was coming next: an immediate surge in price that has rewarded investors in Chinese IPOs with an average first-day gain of 43 percent this year.
 Zhang, the investor who has tried to buy shares in all of this year’s IPOs, agrees.
 agreed to buy 15 percent stake in MCX from Financial Technologies last month, and shareholders in the bourse now include billionaire investor Rakesh Jhunjhunwala and HDFC Bank Ltd.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 Chugai soared 15 percent after people familiar with the situation said Roche Holding AG is in talks to buy the rest of the Japanese drugmaker.
 Roche, the world’s biggest maker of cancer drugs, plans to pay about $10 billion to buy about 40 percent of Chugai to take full control, the people said, asking not to be identified because the plans are private.
 on whether or not it’s illegal to buy and sell private third-party data digitally, she said.
 JPMorgan Chase and some other major banks are offering to buy the defaulted bonds from the holdouts -- NML, Aurelius.
 Earlier this month, Yigit Bulut, chief economic adviser to Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan, contradicted Ali Babacan, deputy prime minister with responsibility for banking and the Treasury, who said that it would be “desirable” for Ziraat to buy Bank Asya.
 Investors are snapping up the bonds as the Federal Reserve suppresses interest rates, pushing investors to buy riskier assets to get higher yields.
 Some people won’t want to buy the game a second time, he said.
 “You want to buy companies that have that currency leverage,” said Irwin Michael, fund manager at ABC Funds in Toronto.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Stock investors who missed this year’s 20 percent rally in the S&P BSE Sensex Index will get a chance to buy at cheaper levels in the next two months, according to BlackRock Inc’s India joint venture.
 That correction ought to be used to buy” Risk Aversion The DSP BlackRock India TIGER.
 Angola’s government announced plans in June to buy $1 billion of trains and power generators from GE.
 After spending $32 million to buy Billerica, Massachusetts-based VideoIQ in January, Avigilon raised C$100 million in a share sale in April.
 Pfizer abandoned a 695-billion-pound ($116 billion) effort to buy London-based AstraZeneca on May 26.
 In Spain, the carrier is fighting to hold on to market share in mobile and Internet services after Vodafone Group Plc agreed in March to buy Grupo Corporativo ONO SA for 72 billion euros, a deal that makes Vodafone the second-largest carrier in the country, behind Telefonica SA.
 Abertis Infraestructuras SA agreed in August 2013 to buy at least 4,227 mobile-phone towers from Telefonica SA and TeliaSonera AB’s Spanish unit Yoigo for 385 million euros.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Masayoshi Son, Japan’s most acquisitive executive, is raising a war chest that could be used to buy companies from Yahoo! Inc.
 agreed to buy Roc Oil for A$474 million ($442 million), ending the Sydney-based company’s plan to combine with domestic peer Horizon Oil Ltd.
 last month agreed to buy Franklin, Tennessee-based Video Gaming Technologies Inc.
 Its Brazil unit Tim Participacoes SA competes with Telefonica SA’s Vivo, the country’s biggest mobile carrier, which has offered to buy Vivendi SA unit GVT to add broadband users.
 Vivendi would also get a right to buy a stake of about 8 percent in Telecom Italia from Telefonica, a transaction that would reduce Telefonica’s clout in Brazil’s wireless market.
 “Given that money managers are gauged on how they perform versus fixed-income indices, the artificially higher allocation of MBS in the index forces money managers to buy the sector even if spreads are rich,” the New York-based analysts wrote in the Aug.
 Bond investors demanded some of the highest yields since the market started less than a year ago to buy securities backed by the landlord’s houses in a $684 million deal today.
 ArcelorMittal said that it had agreed to buy stakes held by BHP Billiton Ltd.
 added 23 percent to $6495 as it agreed to buy HealthLease Properties Real Estate Investment Trust and formed a partnership for additional properties to expand in senior care.
 The provider of fuel cards agreed to buy Comdata Inc.
 agreed to buy three UK.
 Temasek in March agreed to buy a 25 percent stake in Hong Kong-based Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s retail arm AS.
 Medtronic Inc, based in Minneapolis, was also said to consider bidding for the company before deciding to buy Covidien Plc.
 defense contractor, wants India to buy more of its C-130J transport aircraft, Madhavan said.
 Numericable in April agreed to buy SFR, France’s second-largest carrier, from Vivendi SA, and in June unveiled a deal to buy Virgin Mobile’s unit in the country.
 Merrill Lynch raised its rating to buy from neutral for both real estate investment trusts, citing a positive real estate environment.
 for C$32 billion in May, Montreal-based SNC struck a deal to buy Kentz, an oil-services company, for $197 billion.
 Calls to buy shares of Europe’s largest lender trade close to the highest level in almost three years relative to bearish puts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg on the Hong Kong-listed equities.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Mexichem SAB rose the most among major Mexican stocks after agreeing to buy a US.
 Mexichem agreed to buy Knoxville, Tennessee-based Dura-Line Corp.
 Mexichem has acquired 17 companies since 2007 and agreed to buy German chemical maker Vestolit GmbH from Strategic Value Partners LLC for 219 million euros ($293 million) on Aug.
 While placing his car on the Concours’s concept lawn yesterday afternoon, he said, people began approaching him wanting to buy one.
 agreed last month to buy a group annuity contract from Prudential to cover about $350 million of the manufacturer’s pension liabilities.
 The company is stepping up its search for global acquisitions after its $27 billion plan to buy back stock from Royal Dutch Shell Plc was blocked by shareholders, leaving Europe’s largest oil company with a larger, unwanted stake in the Australian energy company.
 dealership next year -- to buy a home power network that allows them to charge their new cars using only solar power.
 With battery systems to store power generated from rooftop panels to release on demand, SunPower customers can make their hybrid car truly solar-powered, reducing the amount of electricity they need to buy from the grid, he said.
 to buy Permira Advisers LLP’s television producer All3Media, in a deal valuing the company at 550 million pounds.
 Liberty Global has been waiting for European Union regulators to clear its 49 billion-euro ($66 billion) purchase of Dutch broadband provider Ziggo after agreeing to buy the company in January.
 Suchman LLC, which financed the bankruptcy, paid $12 million of debt in lieu of cash to buy MEE.
 The defendants then used $150 million of Tetragon’s cash to buy back nonvoting Tetragon shares, according to the lawsuit.
 Last month, Direct Energy agreed to buy installer Astrum Solar Inc.
 and Israel” The world’s richest country per capita has used wealth from the world’s third-largest natural gas reserves to buy stakes in Barclays Plc, Volkswagen AG and purchase London’s Harrods department store.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Gemalto NV, a developer of software and chips that make transactions more secure, agreed to buy data-protection company SafeNet Inc.
 The company also announced a plan to buy back as much as $3 billion in stock and a quarterly dividend of 3375 cents a share.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 In addition to buyout holdings, Apollo manages $1057 billion in credit assets and $91 billion in real estate.
 Sabanci’s Cimsa Cimento agreed to buy Sancim Bilecik Cimento, a cement producer in western Turkey, from Sonmez Group for $2207 million, it said in a public filing last month.
 The company, which boosted its monthly property purchases by $40 million to $100 million last quarter, expects to buy more mortgages than homes this quarter, according to Beasley.
 Amec, which agreed to buy US-traded Foster Wheeler AG earlier this year to expand its geographic footprint, won contracts including in the North Sea, and was the preferred bidder for Poland’s first nuclear power plant.
 A put option exercised by Athabasca on April 17 forces a PetroChina subsidiary to buy the 40 percent it doesn’t own in the undeveloped Dover oil-sands project in northeastern Alberta, based on a 2010 agreement.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- CIT Group Inc, the business lender that last month agreed to buy OneWest Bank, has no plans to become a “serial acquirer,” of financial firms, Chief Executive Officer John Thain said.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- UniSuper Management Pty, the third-best performing Australian pension fund over 10 years, plans to buy more emerging Asian equities as the region’s economic outlook improves.
 shelved plans in May to buy AstraZeneca Plc for about $117 billion, which would be a record-setting transaction for the drug industry.
 Aabar is in talks with former Arabtec CEO Hasan Ismaik to buy at least half of his 289 percent stake, a person familiar with the matter said July 16.
 Expedia announced its plans to buy Wotifcom for about $658 million last month.
 After its offer was spurned, Dollar General said in a separate statement that it remains committed to buying Family Dollar and is confident it can resolve any antitrust obstacles.
 “The hunters have feasted for the last six months,” said Raleigh Finlayson, managing director of Saracen Mineral Holdings Ltd, which in May completed a deal to buy OAO GMK Norilsk Nickel’s mothballed Thunderbox operations in Australia.
 Tim Participacoes SA was the worst performer on the gauge, dropping 85 percent on speculation the mobile-phone carrier’s alternatives for expansion are shrinking after Telefonica SA offered to buy rival GVT.
 “When you go into a situation like that you have to accept that the state is going to participate” The changes to the 2002 Mineral and Petroleum Resources Development Act include giving the state the right to a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and to buy an unspecified additional share at an agreed price.
 WH Group will use the money raised to repay part of the $4 billion in loans taken out to buy Smithfield Foods Inc.
 The company’s IPO was “moderately over-subscribed” for the stock portion alloted to international funds, while local retail investors asked to buy more than 50 times the shares offered, WH Group said in a statement yesterday.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Telecom Italia SpA is preparing an offer valued at as much as 7 billion euros ($94 billion) to outbid Telefonica SA in the race to buy Vivendi SA’s Brazilian broadband unit GVT, people with knowledge of the plan said.
 In its proposal to Vivendi, Telefonica would give the French company the right to buy almost all of its stake in Telecom Italia.
 It’s difficult to buy the market if nothing changes” In the UK, the Bank of England said two of its policy makers wanted an interest-rate increase this month, marking the first split on borrowing costs in more than three years, according to minutes of the Aug.
 Germany’s largest chipmaker is nearing agreement to buy a US- based semiconductor company for about $2 billion, people familiar with the situation said.
 “The consumer needs to be inspired to buy,” Jaffe said.
 Fosun, which agreed to buy Roc for A$474 million ($441 million) in cash, added 07 percent to HK$963 in Hong Kong.
 Edwards, Imperial’s largest shareholder, agreed to buy C$40 million of the 6 percent, six-year senior unsecured convertible debentures via Edco Capital Corp, a company he controls.
 RQFII Demand Funds under the Renminbi Qualified Institutional Investor program, which allows yuan raised offshore to buy securities in China, are seeking new quotas.
 Worse Meat “We will now be forced to buy a worse quality of meat at higher prices,” said Zalina Abdusalamova, chief executive officer of Moscow-based Kings Meat Co, which provides meat to Marriott, Radisson and Novotel hotels.
 “We don’t have to buy it to be there,” Dauman said.
 Added Complexity ZF confirmed in July that it’s in negotiations to buy TRW, which would create the world’s second-largest auto-parts supplier by sales -- combining a maker of transmissions with a leading producer of car-safety technology.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies over a five- to six-year span, sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Adani Power Ltd, the power generator controlled by Indian billionaire Gautam Adani, agreed to buy one of Lanco Infratech Ltd’s thermal power plants in a deal valued at more than 60 billion rupees ($983 million).
 “When we saw these big outflows we were looking to buy stuff,” said Mark Okada, chief investment officer of Dallas-based Highland Capital Management LP, which manages $195 billion.
 Fixing wholesale gas and electricity prices or using insider information to buy or sell energy products would become a crime under the proposed laws, the Department of Energy and Climate Change said in an e-mailed statement.
 The company’s $600 million in annual cost savings from the merger is twice what Dollar Tree estimated in its deal to buy Family Dollar.
 “More investors are realizing that one day, the crisis will be over and good opportunities to buy will be over too” Petroleo Brasileiro SA tumbled 5 percent, leading the Ibovespa’s 15 percent decline.
 hired Austin Beutner to lead the Los Angeles Times Media Group, bringing in a former deputy mayor of the city who once tried to buy the namesake newspaper with billionaire Eli Broad.
 After scrapping a plan to buy smaller rival T-Mobile US Inc, Son ousted Chief Executive Officer Dan Hesse and hired Claure, the founder of wholesale mobile-phone seller Brightstar Corp, to put the company on a new course.
 Lexington, based in New York, raised $7 billion in 2011 for a fund to buy stakes in buyout funds, a practice known as secondary private-equity investing.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Gannett Co, the owner of USA Today, has agreed to buy out the other companies that own Carscom for $18 billion, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 The Miramar, Florida-based company said Rhone Capital LLC has agreed to buy $50 million in preferred stock and warrants to acquire 25 million shares of common stock.
 Product Expansion LinkedIn’s professional networking service has been expanding into new product categories and last week said it agreed to buy Bizo Inc, a business-marketing startup, for $175 million.
 and EU investors to buy up to 49 percent of NAK Naftogaz Ukrainy, which operates pipelines that are used to transport gas for domestic use and half of the Russian gas that Europe imports.
 Exchanges in Hong Kong and Shanghai agreed in April to allow cross-border trading, opening up the mainland market further to foreigners while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 Limits on buying parts have also compelled companies to buy used planes for component salvage, hampering safety.
 to agreed to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 A negative yield means investors who hold a security until it matures will receive less than they paid to buy it.
 and Warburg Pincus LLC are among the private-equity firms weighing a plan to buy hundreds of older-brand drugs from Glaxo and Sanofi, the Financial Times reported, citing people familiar with the matter.
 and two private equity groups to buy the Parsons division, which according to the paper is valued at about $1 billion.
 Banks are proposing to buy at least a portion of the defaulted bonds, he said.
 A large number of overlapping store locations means that were Ahold to buy Market Basket, some outlets might have to be closed, making a takeover less likely, Vos said.
 “It’s just sad comedy to watch this company continue to deny that it’s a fraud” Bison Capital Holding Co, a China-based investment firm, proposed to buy NQ Mobile for $980 per ADR in a non-binding offer on July 30.
 For such national-plan providers, “the path of least resistance may be to buy your way in,” Rigg said.
 Marketers will be able to see the number of users that clicked on an ad, whether they used a smartphone, tablet or desktop computer, and which device was used to buy a product, Menlo Park, California-based Facebook said in a blog post today.
 Fosun is seeking to buy Aurora National Life Assurance Co.
 agreed to buy Shire Plc for $55 billion and said the combined company’s tax domicile will be in the UK.
Telecom Italia SpA (TIT) is preparing anoffer valued at as much as 7 billion euros ($94 billion) tooutbid Telefonica (TEF) SA in the race to buy Vivendi SA (VIV)’s Brazilianbroadband unit GVT, people with knowledge of the plan said.
 In its proposal to Vivendi,Telefonica would give the French company the right to buy almostall of its stake in Telecom Italia.
 The Beijing-based company asked to buy about 20 percent of Axiata, a stake that would be valued at more than $37 billion based on yesterday’s closing price, said one of the people, asking not to be named as the information is private.
 It agreed in June to buy 18 percent of True Corp, Thailand’s third-largest phone company, for $881 million.
 China Mobile last year scrapped an agreement to buy a stake in Taiwan’s Far EasTone Telecommunications Co.
 The exchanges agreed to allow as much as 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border trading, opening up the mainland market further to foreigners while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 And a bitcoin ETF would make it much easier for people to buy them.
 In May, JPMorgan agreed to buy about $5 billion of government bonds that Argentina gave to Spanish oil producer Repsol SA as compensation for the takeover of its local unit in April 2012.
 Woodside’s $27 billion plan to buy back stock from Royal Dutch Shell Plc was blocked by shareholders earlier this month, leaving Europe’s largest oil company with a larger, unwanted stake in the Australian gas producer.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Medtronic Inc, the medical technology company poised to buy Covidien Plc and move its address abroad for tax purposes, said its quarterly sales grew 5 percent as demand rose for its pacemakers and aortic valves.
 In June, Medtronic agreed to buy Dublin-based Covidien for $429 billion in cash and stock to expand its portfolio of products sold to hospitals.
 We all want to do our best to make sure those benefits become reality” The agreement to buy Covidien was among several health-care industry deals that have set off controversy in the US, with congressional leaders and President Barack Obama’s administration looking for ways to keep companies from moving.
 The airline also agreed to buy 375 million gallons of fuel, or 2 percent of its current fuel consumption, from the US.
 agreed to buy last month for $55 billion, slid 4 percent to 4,680 pence.
 Customers sign decades-long contracts to buy the output, and SolarCity is pouring the revenue into new installations.
 agreed to buy Hong Kong and Singapore operations from RSA Insurance Group Plc for $215 million to expand in Asia.
 Investors from outside the six-nation Gulf Cooperation Council, looking for access to Saudi Arabia’s $745 billion economy, aren’t currently allowed to buy Saudi-listed shares directly, and instead access the market through equity swaps and exchange-traded funds.
 Of the 17 analysts who cover the stock and share their rating with Bloomberg, nine advise clients to sell, while six have hold recommendations and two recommend clients to buy.
 The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index has almost tripled from its 2009 low, limiting options to buy stocks at attractive prices.
 restricted last month, have all extended programs to buy their own stock this year.
 “Billionaires are now likely to spend more to buy their companies’ stocks as valuations are low and the sanctions are in place,” Rabinovich wrote in an e-mail.
 Mailru, the Internet company controlled by Alisher Usmanov, Russia’s richest man, plans to buy $45 million of its stock in 2014, compared with $30 million in 2013 and $35 million in 2012, according to the company’s regulatory filings.
 Vagit Alekperov, the chief executive officer of Lukoil and Russia’s 12th-wealthiest man, spent at least $147 million in the first quarter to buy company stock, while Vice President Valery Subbotin spent more than $34 million for stock in June and July, the data show.
 Paris-based Iliad has offered $15 billion to buy 57 percent of T-Mobile in a move that may initiate a bidding war with Sprint Corp.
 regulatory approval to buy T-Mobile than Sprint can, according to Craig Moffett, an analyst for MoffettNathanson LLC in New York.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Tractebel Energia SA, Brazil’s second-largest utility by market value, got approval from its board to buy the Santo Agostinho wind project in the country’s northeast for as much as 54 million reais ($24 million).
 agreed last month to buy Kodiak Oil & Gas Corp.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Mexichem SAB, the petrochemical producer controlled by billionaire Antonio del Valle, agreed to buy German chemical maker Vestolit GmbH from Strategic Value Partners LLC for 219 million euros ($293 million) in cash and assumed liabilities.
 A recent rule change allows the health ministry to buy drugs from labs without a public bidding process, as long as firms partner with a state-owned lab.
 “Social media is typically effective when there’s some sort of advocacy cause behind it, but not when it comes to buying or selling at all,” Helms said.
 Cubist “would be pretty accretive to any company who would be looking to buy them,” Brian Skorney, a New York-based analyst at Baird, said in a phone interview.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 The $787 billion American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, better known as the economic stimulus package, included tax credits and loans to spur development of green companies and to encourage people to buy their products.
 The central bank also cut the maximum period for new loans to buy public housing by five years to 25 years.
 “This process of renewal will involve painful steps and sacrifices from all parties” Khazanah offered shareholders 27 sen a share to buy the 306 percent stake it doesn’t already own in the company, offering a 125 percent premium to the stock’s Aug.
 7 to buy Metro AG’s wholesale stores in Vietnam for $874 million including debt, the data show.
 NetJets provides financial incentives for customers to buy shares in Bombardier Inc’s Global 5000 and 6000, which can fly 6,000 nautical miles (11,112 kilometers), or from Sao Paulo to Stockholm.
 Another option is leasing time on planes through NetJets Marquis Jet Card program, which allows customers to buy 25 or 50 hours of flight time on the aircraft of their choice.
 Banks are proposing to buy at least a portion of the defaulted bonds, he said.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- International banks are looking to put together a group of investors to buy disputed Argentine debt and resolve a US.
 estimates a 3 percent impact to its profit margin in the worst case where it can’t pass on any of the tax to buyers, the company said by e-mail.
 Tencent, Asia’s largest Internet company, in March agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in JDcom and then folded its e-commerce businesses into the venture.
 “We might be able to buy without a limit and many other foreigners will go in that way,” Dennis Lim, a money manager at Templeton Emerging Markets Group, said in an interview earlier this month.
 “There is no reason to buy an unsubsidized Samsung at the high end because they are so much more expensive but not that much better anymore than domestic Chinese models,” said Shaun Rein, managing director for China Market Research Group in Shanghai.
 Comcast is awaiting approval to buy Time Warner Cable, while AT&T needs clearance for its takeover of DirecTV.
 “The clients are evaluating the new reality of their pockets, and it’s much cheaper to buy used appliances at a market, if it’s good quality, than pay it by installments in Elektra or Famsa,” he said.
 In the past, Mexico had kept the sales tax along the border lower than the rest of the nation for decades to give consumers incentive to buy products at home rather than cross into states like Texas, which charges as little as 625 percent in sales tax, and Arizona, at as little as 56 percent.
 Tencent Rivalry Alibaba agreed to buy 60 percent of the company in March for HK$624 billion ($805 million) to gain rights to television dramas and English Premier League soccer.
 “A way of assembling a high-quality property portfolio promptly is to buy a REIT and there’s a lot of hidden value in these companies,” Prew said by phone.
 Still, Klepierre plans to sell non-essential assets if the deal to buy Corio is approved by shareholders, Laurent Morel, chief executive officer of Klepierre said July 29 without being more specific.
 to buy a panelmaker in June.
 bank, raised its quarterly dividend to 5 cents a share and dropped plans to buy back stock after the Federal Reserve approved its resubmitted capital plan for 2014.
 Ophir, focusing on West and East Africa, plans to buy as much as $100 million of shares, the London-based company said today in a statement.
 Shareholders in Genel, with projects in Iraqi Kurdistan, on April 22 gave it approval to buy as much as 10 percent of its voting shares.
 is seeking to buy coking coal mines, preferably in Australia, according to a tender document on its website.
 “Sellers looking to sell, lots of buyers looking to buy and pretty good fundamentals, which are making pricing dramatically higher than in 2012” Sales Jump About $30 billion of bad loans were sold in the first half of this year, more than the roughly $25 billion traded in all of 2013, according to Michael Nierenberg, chief executive officer of New Residential Investment Corp, a real estate trust that invests in mortgage-related assets, managed by an affiliate of Fortress Investment Group LLC.
 New Residential purchased $500 million of nonperforming loans, or NPLs, from a bank in the second quarter and isn’t eager to buy more, Nierenberg said last week.
 Niel then tried to buy Bouygues Telecom, a deal that was stymied by a $4 billion price gap.
 By simplifying his empire’s corporate structure, Kinder will lower borrowing costs, free up cash for bigger dividend payouts and unify the company under a single stock that he can use as currency to buy competitors.
 People can’t buy directly through the site yet, but Twitter has been building a strategy for the possibility and recently agreed to buy CardSpring Inc, a service that lets users redeem deals and discounts through merchants’ tweets.
 “As long as there is a preponderant player in the telecom sector, Televisa can continue to buy cable-TV players without the regulator’s authorization” Cablecom, one of the few large, independent pay-TV providers left in Mexico, will help Televisa compete against America Movil SAB, which holds about 22 million of Mexico’s phone and Internet connections, compared with Televisa’s 3 million.
 A takeover approach “would certainly feel like it would be opportunistic at today’s prices, but we are a publicly traded stock so what can you do if someone wants to buy you? The door is always open when you are publicly listed” Port Access With projects such as Corunna Downs, Atlas’s resources in the Pilbara total 17 billion tons, the company said in a June presentation.
 By simplifying his empire’s corporate structure, Kinder will lower borrowing costs and unify the company under a single stock that he can use as currency to buy competitors.
 Kinder Morgan Partners, the main operating unit, has been forced to buy into riskier, lower-profit businesses, such as oil tankers, because of its higher cost of capital, analysts with investment bank Tudor Pickering Holt & Co.
 Energy Transfer, the owner of 35,000 miles (56,000 kilometers) of natural gas pipelines, announced a deal in April to buy gasoline-station owner Susser Holdings Corp.
 Warren also was reportedly negotiating to buy Targa Resources Corp.
 “Investors are encouraged to buy riskier investments in large part due to near zero interest-rate environments in Europe and the UK,” said Spencer Lake, global head of capital financing at HSBC Holdings PLC.
 Riley’s Sinha, who raised his rating on the stock last month to buy from neutral.
 Inbound shipments surged 65 percent in value to $312 billion in June from a year earlier after the central bank allowed more banks and traders to buy gold overseas.
 Premiums or the fees that jewelers pay to buy gold from importing banks and agencies have plunged to $8 an ounce over the cash price in London from as high as $160 in December, according to Bamalwa.
 “We can utilize our risk tolerance to buy when risk premia are really high in the market” The DNB High Yield Total Return Index rose 99 percent over the past 12 months.
 Board Refused Fox dropped its proposal to buy Time Warner, citing that the company’s board had refused to engage in talks and Fox’s stock price had declined since the offer became public, according to a statement from the company.
 The Turetskys, who married in December, decided to buy a three-bedroom, 1,500-square-foot (140-square-meter) unit at the Adeline, right across from their current rental.
 Few Options “If you’re a buyer looking to buy something in our bottom price tier, you really don’t have that many options south” of Central Park, Lightfeldt said.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Sensata Technologies Holding NV plans to buy Schrader International Inc.
 The MERS database largely replaces filings that were historically done by hand, making it easier for Wall Street banks to buy and sell home loans.
 Customers in Chinese cities including Beijing and Guangzhou will be able to buy all the items on the menu later this week, Oak Brook, Illinois-based McDonald’s said in a statement today, without specifying the date or number of cities.
 ‘Rational’ Investment Polskie Gornictwo Naftowe i Gazownictwo SA, the state-controlled company that imports almost all gas to Poland, has signed a 20-year contract with Qatargas to buy about 15 billion cubic meters annually through the terminal, with the first deliveries scheduled for the end of this year.
 withdrew from talks to buy T-Mobile over conditions of the deal and concern that regulators wouldn’t approve a combination of the third- and fourth-largest wireless operators in the nation.
 Mercuria, based in Geneva, agreed in March to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s commodity business for $35 billion.
 Nishikubo, who took flying lessons and became a pilot after purchasing his stake in Skymark, said earlier this week he still wanted to buy A380s.
 The airline announced a decision to buy double-decker A380s and start an international business-class service in 2010, breaking from the company’s current model of low-fare travel using single-aisle Boeing Co.
 ETFs, which allow investors to trade shares representing a broader index of stocks, are gaining popularity as a way to invest in industries such as apparel, restaurants and entertainment without having to buy multiple equities.
 Not only that, Oaktree gets warrants to buy 10 percent of the miner of rare-earth minerals, which are used in electronic devices from Apple Inc’s iPads to Raytheon Co’s Tomahawk missiles.
 Priceline’s investment in Ctrip, through a convertible bond and an agreement to buy Ctrip shares on the open market over the next year, means the company may own as much as 10 percent of Ctripcom, which is listed on the Nasdaq Stock Market.
 The pact helped secure a $22 billion Russian credit line allowing Venezuela to buy tanks, missiles and an anti-aircraft defense system.
 In December, Rosneft agreed to buy Morgan Stanley’s oil trading, storage and transportation businesses.
 surged 79 percent after agreeing to buy Kyrgyzstan oil assets.
 The shipbuilder agreed to buy a 60 percent stake in an oilfield project in Kyrgyzstan for HK$218 billion ($2813 million) in an all stock deal.
 The company agreed in June to buy Frank Russell, a unit of Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co, for $27 billion to bolster its FTSE International Ltd.
 Murdoch’s $85-a-share bid to buy Time Warner Inc.
 Persistent gains and shorter losing streaks are encouraging investors to buy dips.
 “There is a great hesitation to buy at new highs and then feel stupid when the inevitable correction hits,” Jason Goepfert, president of Sundial in Blaine, Minnesota, wrote in an e-mail.
 A separate procurement list includes some Apple computers that departments can continue to buy on a smaller scale, defined as purchases totaling less than 12 million yuan ($195,000), according to a state purchasing website.
 Berli Jucker agreed to buy 19 wholesale stores in Vietnam from Dusseldorf, Germany-based Metro AG for an enterprise value of 655 million euros ($876 million) to expand its distribution and retail network in the Southeast Asian country, according to a statement to the Thai stock exchange yesterday.
 Al Jazeera is using the “underhanded tactic” of turning the escrow fund into “a reservoir from which to pull money to buy favor with its distributors,” the partnership that owned Current TV said in the complaint.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA offered to buy Vivendi SA’s Brazilian Internet-provider unit GVT for 67 billion euros ($9 billion) to expand in a fast-growing broadband market and address antitrust concerns in the country.
 Vivendi would also get a right to buy a stake of about 8 percent in Telecom Italia SpA from Telefonica, a transaction that would reduce Telefonica’s clout in Brazil’s wireless market.
 Telefonica lost out to Vivendi in an initial attempt to buy GVT in 2009.
 plans to buy International Strategy & Investment Group LLC, the closely held research firm co-founded by Ed Hyman, in what would be the investment bank’s biggest acquisition, according to two people with knowledge of the negotiations.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- BNP Paribas SA offered to buy out shareholders in DAB Bank AG just days after reaching agreement with UniCredit SpA to acquire all but 19 percent of the German online broker.
 In April, the company agreed to buy 66 percent of ConSors Discount Broker AG, a competitor of DAB Bank, for 287 million euros, adding it to the French bank’s Cortal brokerage unit to form Europe’s biggest online broker.
 Devan Kaloo, head of global emerging markets at Aberdeen, said the stock drop, which started in mid-July, opens a chance to buy Russia’s largest retailer at an attractive valuation.
 unit he said failed to fulfill parts of a 2012 agreement to buy a division of his Carter Brothers security business.
 In October 2012 Tyco Integrated Security LLC agreed to buy the equity interest in Atlanta-based Carter Brothers LLC, which consisted of a fire and life safety division and a security division, for $358 million, according to the lawsuit.
 is in talks to buy Dublin-based aircraft-leasing firm Avolon Holdings Ltd, the company said in a stock exchange filing.
 11 that the two companies were in talks to buy it for $4 billion to $5 billion, including debt.
 in the 1960s, are traded publicly and pool investor money to buy real estate such as shopping malls, office buildings and rental housing.
 electricity producer, agreed to buy Goal Zero to add portable and emergency solar-power systems to its retail energy offerings.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Roche Holding AG is in talks to buy the almost 40 percent of Chugai Pharmaceutical Co.
 Roche, the world’s biggest maker of cancer drugs, plans to pay about $10 billion to buy the remaining stake in Tokyo-based Chugai, the people said, asking not to be identified because the plans are private.
 Last month, Roche agreed to buy Seragon Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 “We’d be happy to buy current ordinary shares over the counter at 5 cents -- they’re not worth zero,” Jean Pierre Verster of Johannesburg-based 36ONE, which had an open short position on African Bank when the shares ended trading on Aug.
 led gains on the Hang Seng Index after the developer agreed to buy assets from its parent.
 “Investors are also getting excited about asset injections from Chinese SOEs” China Resources Land surged 76 percent to HK$1818 after saying it agreed to buy a Shenzhen property project from a unit of its state-owned parent.
 The judgment is a setback for Blackstone, manager of the largest fund dedicated to buying real estate in Europe, as it tries to buy up distressed real estate assets in Ireland with the economy starting to rebound from its property crash of 2008.
 In May, it agreed to buy the O’Flynn loans through Carbon Finance.
 Last month, it agreed to buy the shares in Bell Aliant Inc.
Imperial Tobacco Group Plc’s (IMT) Alison Cooper was lauded as the surprise winner in theReynolds/Lorillard tobacco megadeal when she agreed to buy Blu,the world’s best-selling electronic cigarette.
 The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index has almost tripled from its 2009 low, limiting options to buy stocks at attractive prices.
 Yigit Bulut, chief adviser to Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan, yesterday denied comments by Deputy Prime Minister Ali Babacan that the government wants state-owned TC Ziraat BankasiAS to buy Bank Asya, as the lender is known.
 IBM, Motorola In January, the company announced plans to buy Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility unit for $291 billion in cash and stock.
 The same month Lenovo agreed to buy International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit for $23 billion.
 agreed to buy the company that owns the brand in Ireland and southwest England as the South African food and liquor retailer seeks to boost growth outside its home market.
 The deal will be financed by a rand-denominated loan and includes the right to buy the remainder of Dublin-based BWG in three to five years.
 Amec, which agreed to buy US-traded Foster Wheeler AG earlier this year to expand its geographic footprint, won contracts including in the North Sea, and was the preferred bidder for Poland’s first nuclear power plant.
 agreed to buy less than 10 percent of game developer Gumi Inc.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Dairy Farm International Holdings Ltd, an operator of supermarkets and retail stores, is paying 569 billion yuan ($925 million) to buy 20 percent of Yonghui Superstores Co.
 and Dutch natural gas futures while keeping the energy trading platform it agreed to buy from GFI Group Inc.
 system it agreed to buy last week.
 “There’s client interest in having other clearing venues for those hubs and that’s why we prioritized them” CME agreed to buy Trayport’s owner GFI Group Inc.
 Best Prices “You have in the value chain brokers that today are providing the quotes and giving liquidity to this platform,” Diego Perfumo, an exchanges analyst at Equity Research Desk in Greenwich, Connecticut, said on July 30 by phone, the day CME announced it had agreed to buy Trayport.
 “If you weren’t able to buy fakes, the way China works someone else will come and fill that gap” It usually takes Alibaba as long as 5 working days to remove a product, according to the company.
 on July 9 predicted a dramatic recovery in prices in the second half, saying that it’s now cheaper for steel mills in China to buy seaborne rather than domestic supply.
 Activist investor Carl Icahn, who had pushed Apple to buy back more of its own stock earlier this year, said the rise in the company’s share price validated his earlier claim that the iPhone maker was undervalued.
 He’s also been more active in acquisitions, including spending $3 billion to buy Beats Electronics LLC, the company’s biggest-ever purchase.
 Kinder plans to buy up two companies he controls, known as master limited partnerships, for a combined $44 billion, consolidating his oil and natural gas pipeline empire under a single, taxable corporation known as Kinder Morgan Inc.
 plans to split into two publicly traded companies by spinning off its publishing business, including USA Today, and also said it has agreed to buy full ownership of Carscom.
 Gannett also agreed to buy the 73 percent interest it doesn’t already own in Classified Ventures LLC, the parent company of Carscom, for $18 billion in cash.
 Shares Gain Bloomberg News reported earlier that Gannett agreed to buy the remaining stake in Carscom for $18 billion, citing a person familiar with the matter.
 agreed to buy Griffin-American Healthcare REIT II for about $34 billion, gaining medical-office buildings and senior housing in the biggest health-care real estate deal in three years.
 In June, Ventas Inc, the country’s third-biggest health-care REIT by market value, agreed to buy American Realty Capital Healthcare Trust Inc.
 Vice President Al Gore sued Al Jazeera, claiming the satellite news provider owned by the Qatari royal family owes him and a partner $65 million from a deal to buy his network, Current TV.
 Senvion will use the sale proceeds to buy the group’s contracts to monitor and repair 25,000 megawatts of machines worldwide -- a business which generates about 500 million euros a year and is growing at about 20 percent, according to Tanti.
 Apple agreed to buy Beats for $3 billion in May, its biggest-ever acquisition, with founders musician Dr.
 Novo Banco’s managers, led by Chief Executive Officer Vitor Bento, will seek to find private investors to buy “significant” stakes in the bank in “an adequate time horizon,” according to the central bank.
 The company agreed last year to buy Elkhorn Holdings, a Wyoming-based provider of construction services for midstream oil and gas facilities in the US.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Russian companies are set to seize on sliding asset prices to buy back their bonds, helping stem the third-biggest rout in emerging markets, according to Morgan Stanley and Erste Sparinvest.
 Steelmaker OAO Severstal and Far East Shipping Co, whose cash piles both amount to 11 times short-term debt obligations, are among companies with an “incentive to buy back bonds,” Morgan Stanley said in a report two days ago.
 “It’s basically a good option to buy back bonds trading at a discount” Bond Selloff Severstal’s $750 million of securities due in October 2022 slid as much as 437 cents from July 16 to a three-month low of 9450 cents on Aug.
 “There will be some cash-rich, non-sanctioned corporates using this opportunity to buy back debt,” thus providing some support for Russian corporate credit, Morgan Stanley said in its research note.
 OAO Phosagro, another company cited in the report, doesn’t plan to buy back Eurobonds, the company’s press service said yesterday.
 “It’s basically a good option to buy back bonds” for companies with surplus funds, or those having low indebtedness with good cash flow and with good access to financing, Varga of Erste Sparinvest said.
 Chief Executive Officer Niall Booker is refocusing the bank on retail customers and selling non-core assets after the 150-year-old company had to raise about 400 million pounds in May to plug a capital deficit that was uncovered after its failed attempt to buy branches from Lloyds Banking Group Plc.
 Mok upgraded the shares to buy from hold.
 The London-based unit will use some of the proceeds from the IPO to buy the 49 percent stake of a Canadian business that it doesn’t already own, according to the filing.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Siemens AG agreed to buy Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 “I would still hold Richemont and look to buy the dip” Swatch Forecast Swatch Group AG’s sales growth may decelerate to 2 percent to 6 percent this year, Nick Hayek, chief executive officer of the maker of Omega and Longines Swiss watches, said in an interview published by Finanz & Wirtschaft yesterday.
 to encompass Asia and Europe, and we now see broad demand from a diverse range of investors” Suntory Holdings will use the $1 billion raised in this month’s sale to complete the refinancing of an 800 billion yen bridge loan from Mitsubishi UFJ it arranged to buy Beam, according to Hasumi Ozawa, a spokeswoman for Suntory.
 is moving forward with its deal to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Blue Earth Inc, a solar-power developer and provider of energy-efficiency services, has agreed to buy a $10 million equity stake in battery maker PowerGenix Systems Inc.
 “We’ve been trying to buy some Scottish bonds opportunistically, but there don’t seem to be many around, at least not in size,” said Pattullo, who helps oversee about $121 billion.
 The risk of losses should the vote swing the other way may be dissuading bond dealers from holding the securities, according to Pattullo, who said he managed to buy some bonds of Edinburgh-based Standard Life Plc.
 “I’m sure that Ulster Bank executives saw improvements in the Irish property market and broader economy coming through last year, even before RBS flagged that they were reviewing the operations here, but it probably took a bit longer for RBS to buy into that story,” Hughes said.
 (C) With customers already lining up to buy the phones, Apple’s decision to team up, rather than develop a payment system from scratch, could funnel more spending to the networks and card-issuing banks as transactions shift from cash and plastic cards to mobile phones and other digital devices.
 “If the ECB wants a strong sentimentchange by making large purchases it’s hard to do that in thesecondary or new-issue ABS markets as there quite simply aren’tenough bonds” The debt-buying plans have been greeted with skepticism byinvestors who suggest the central bank will struggle to buyenough securities after the market contracted more than 40percent since 2010.
 The company agreed to buy Neotel from India’s Tata Communications Ltd.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Ardian, the former private-equity arm of insurance company Axa SA, agreed to buy private-equity fund stakes valued at 1 billion euros ($13 billion) from UniCredit SpA, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 When it came to buying the team, Pegula and his wife, Kim, who reportedly paid a record $14 billion for it, turned to Pittsburgh’s Sherrard, German & Kelly PC.
 Televisa took a loss on its investment just three years after it agreed to buy the stake for $16 billion, as the carrier struggled to compete in Mexico.
 EBay marketplaces could draw bids, too, because its robust cash flow would appeal to buyout firms, he said.
 It could cost Google $50 billion to $62 billion to buy PayPal alone, according to an estimate in a Sept.
 It boosted the amount late yesterday after receiving commitments to buy 5825 million euros of shares.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Mitsubishi Corp, Japan’s biggest trading house, proposed to buy the Norwegian fishery Cermaq ASA for 888 billion kroner ($14 billion) to expand its foods business and become the world’s second-largest salmon farmer.
 A majority of Cermaq’s shareholders last year rejected a final bid from Marine Harvest ASA to buy Cermaq, including its fish-feed unit Ewos, for 107 kroner a share.
 Hidili earlier this week offered bondholders 68 cents on the dollar to buy back its $380 million of 8625 percent notes due November 2015, as well as a two cent fee for consenting to amend the notes’ terms.
 (2850) has spent NT$428 billion on locally issuedforeign debt and plans to buy more to boost returns, accordingto an Aug.
 Under Japan’s incentives to develop sources of clean energy, utility operators are required to buy clean energy at terms and prices set by the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry.
 agreed to buy Conversant Inc.
 In two deals last week, SAP AG agreed to buy Concur Technologies Inc.
 ‘Highly Flawed’ Eni teamed with Royal Dutch Shell Plc in 2011 to buy Oil Prospecting License 245 for $11 billion.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- PT Pertamina, Indonesia’s state-owned energy company, agreed to buy a 30 percent stake in Murphy Oil Corp’s oil and natural gas assets in Malaysia for $2 billion in cash.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- L’Oreal SA, the world’s largest cosmetics company, agreed to buy Brazilian hair-color maker Niely Cosmeticos Group, continuing an acquisition spree that has seen it spend more than $5 billion on deals this year.
 “It takes a lot of guts on the executive management to say that we’re going to buy what is otherwise a bank’s garbage,” Brunelle said.
 Amid a recession and slowing growth in Brazilian air travel, Sao Paulo-based Gol is also taking advantage of low borrowing rates to buy back debt with proceeds from a bond sale that Standard & Poor’s estimates may be as much as $500 million.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Burger King Worldwide Inc’s deal to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 Pfizer, which this year attempted to buy AstraZeneca Plc and move abroad, fell as much as 23 percent.
 “When people go to buy a car, they should not have to worry whether they’ll pay more for their auto loan because of their race, gender, or ethnic background” Talks between the agency and auto lenders to settle claims of discrimination have stalled at times because the bureau wanted a public commitment that banks will eliminate the discretion of dealers to change loan costs, according to four people briefed on the discussions.
 Tech Record The company is on the second week of its global tour to meet with investors as it seeks to convince funds to buy into its offering.
 London-based Gemfields, the world’s top emerald producer, has been visiting Colombia over the past four years, seeking to buy a share in an emerald mine, said Chief Executive Officer Ian Harebottle.
 “Gemfields tends to buy 75 percent, and leave 25 percent with local stakeholders” Gemfields, which mines emeralds in Zambia, has climbed 108 percent over the past 12 months to 52 pence in London trading.
 The company would like to buy an asset in a proven emerald-producing region of Colombia, and considers security in Boyaca to be adequate, even following recent violence, Harebottle said.
 Exports, catering to buyers seeking to “own a piece of history” in countries such as the US, UK.
 A survey of 386 iPhone customers waiting in line in New York and Minneapolis yesterday found that 57 percent planned to buy the iPhone 6 Plus and 43 percent the iPhone 6, Gene Munster, an analyst for Piper Jaffray Cos.
 More customers also intended to buy higher storage capacity than purchasers of the iPhone 5S last year, with 22 percent yesterday choosing the 16-gigabyte version of the iPhone 6 or 6 Plus, 52 percent paying for 64 GB and 26 percent opting for 128 GB, the survey showed.
 FCC action might grant the new services the right to buy programming owned by cable companies, and possibly to feature television broadcasts, said the person briefed on the agency’s plan.
 “If you get one-third of the transfer, yourreturn is booming” Third-party ownership allows investors to buy the tradingrights to players from clubs.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- CEZ AS, the largest Czech power producer, says it would like to buy a majority stake in Polish utility Energa SA as part of its plan to grow through acquisitions in central Europe.
 CEZ’s interest in Energa and its stated desire to buy Enel SpA’s stake in Slovak power producer Slovenske Elektrarne AS marks a reversal of its earlier policy to steer clear of foreign acquisitions.
 The Czech company will seek opportunities to buy assets in nearby foreign countries, particularly in Slovakia and Poland, the CEO said.
 The Milan-based carrier has spoken to advisers about using its Brazilian unit Tim Participacoes SA to buy Oi, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the discussions are private.
 The company will need to buy faster-growing businesses -- such as Tableau Software Inc.
 in 2010 for $19 billion, has maintained its focus on the region, agreeing to buy a Guatemalan lender and Banco Bilbao Vizcaya Argentaria SA’s Panama unit.
 “I originally wanted to rent, but interest rates are so low, housing prices are down and rents are creeping up, so I thought it was a good time to buy,” said Varga, who in March bought a new two-bedroom apartment on the outskirts of Budapest with a 13 million forint ($54,000) 20-year mortgage.
 EE agreed to buy 58 Phones 4u shops and take on 359 employees, the largest UK.
 Dixons Carphone, the London-based electronics retailer that agreed last week to take on 800 Phones 4u employees, is in negotiations to buy some Phones 4u stores and may announce the purchase as soon as today, people familiar with the matter said.
 19 that it plans to buy 140 shops and take on about 900 employees, pending a court hearing today to review the sale.
 Vodafone’s agreement to buy stores and inventory will raise 124 million pounds ($203 million) while EE’s deal for shops will raise 25 million pounds, PwC said today in a statement.
 20 that Dixons Carphone was in talks to buy some of the stores.
 utility owner by market value, is spending $500 million to build three solar farms in North Carolina and to buy power from five more in the state.
 Siemens,Europe’s largest engineering company, is looking to buy Dresser-Rand in a deal that would scupper a competing plan by Sulzer AG,according to people familiar with the plan.
 jumped 18 percent to $12720 asSAP SE agreed to buy the company for $74 billion to boost itscloud-computing business.
 In 2010, the companies couldn’t come to an agreement that would enable Alibaba to buy back shares held by Yahoo.
 told clients to buy the shares.
 The stock was raised to buy from neutral at Citigroup.
 The wealth fund agreed to buy 45 percent stakes in 601 Lexington Ave.
 In May, a partnership led by the property unit of the Ontario Municipal Employees Retirement System agreed to buy five Boston-area office buildings from Blackstone Group LP for $21 billion.
 Microsoft, maker of the Xbox video-game console, is in talks to buy Persson’s company, Mojang AB, for more than $2 billion, people with knowledge of the talks said.
 This year, he slammed Facebook, tweeting that the “things they can do to your phone is creepy, so I’m switching to web” In March, he said he canceled a deal to bring Minecraft to the Oculus virtual-reality headset after Facebook agreed to buy its manufacturer, because Facebook “creeps me out” Last month, he said he’s “officially over being upset about Facebook buying Oculus” Warming Up E-mails to Persson and Mojang weren’t returned.
 in 2005 and this year’s deal to buy Micros Systems Inc.
 Three stock promoters -- Anthony Thompson, 38, of Bethesda, Maryland; Eric Van Nguyen, 30, of Quebec; and Jay Fung, 40, of Delray Beach, Florida -- are accused of working with five others from April 2009 to May 2012 to drive up prices of penny stocks to induce investors to buy shares, Vance said today in a statement.
 Kingfisher earlier thisyear agreed to buy Mr Bricolage, France’s third-largest home-improvement chain.
 I am opposed to both sanctions and counter-sanctions’’ Rosneft, in the meantime, is pushing ahead with plans to expand into the oil services business and to buy the global oil merchant business of Morgan Stanley.
 “This will make it hard for peopleto buy in a market that’s lacking positive news to begin with” To contact the reporters on this story:Kana Nishizawa in Hong Kong at knishizawa5@bloombergnet;Weiyi Lim in Singapore at wlim26@bloombergnet;Fion Li in Hong Kong at fli59@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story:Michael Patterson at mpatterson10@bloombergnet;Sarah McDonald at smcdonald23@bloombergnetPhani Varahabhotla Press spacebar to pause and continue.
 The company agreed in July to buy Dublin-based Shire Plc in a 32 billion pound ($524 billion) deal where it planned to move its legal address abroad to lower its taxes.
 company is trying to buy, lost 25 percent to $8811.
 said in July it agreed to buy Abbott’s generic drug business in developed markets and would form a new company incorporated in the Netherlands to cut taxes.
 The company, which agreed at the end of August to buy Canada-based Tim Hortons Inc, will proceed with the deal even amid the crackdown on inversions.
 The company has a net cash position and decent cash flow, qualities that appeal to buyout firms.
 Organized Ducks While MYR could appeal to buyers looking to fill a specific geographic niche, large electrical transmission companies “have their ducks in a row” and may not be interested in making major acquisitions, Jonathan Braatz, an analyst at Kansas City Capital Associates, said in a phone interview.
 Reuters reported earlier today that Pepper was in advanced talks to buy PrimeCredit and is awaiting approval from Hong Kong’s banking regulator, citing unidentified people.
 The laws add 15,000 permits for clean-air vehicles to use car-pool lanes, give rebates to low-income residents to buy cleaner automobiles, require cities and counties to speed up permits for residential solar-panel installations and require the state to devise a plan to fight short-lived pollutants such as methane.
 Incentives the state gives residents to encourage them to buy zero-emission vehicles “are cranked into the whole panoply of incentives that we give for climate-change policies” Hybrid Cars The number of hybrid cars in California has grown 110 percent to 709,766 in 2013 from 337,881 in 2009, according to the state’s Department of Motor Vehicles.
 increased for a second day after three people said the tractor maker is in advanced talks to buy PSA Peugeot Citroen’s scooter business.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Electrolux AB agreed to buy General Electric Co’s century-old appliances unit for $33 billion in cash, putting the Swedish company on a par with industry leader Whirlpool Corp.
 He acknowledged there’s competition to buy the debt, saying, “We aren’t the only ones interested” Buyers from pensions to life insurers poured $146 billion into US.
 had to receive an approval from Putin three years ago to buy a 49 percent in a countrywide television channel to show cartoons and kids’ shows.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- ZF Friedrichshafen AG, which agreed to buy TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 Past Reforms Under Guo’s leadership from 2011 to 2013, the China Securities Regulatory Commission expanded foreign investor quotas to buy stocks, cut trading fees and pushed companies to increase dividends.
 had the steepest gain in two weeks after agreeing to buy from Merck & Co.
 “The valuation, by our math, impliedthat Merck would never invent another drug in our lifetimeThat’s a good time to buy a stock” Merck remained ISI’s top pick as of mid-August.
 Berkshire will earn 9 percent annual interest on its $3 billion investment tied to the Burger King deal and has the option to buy a 175 percent stake in the combined restaurant company.
 analyst Heath Jansen today raised his rating to buy from neutral, saying a London listing for the spinoff would be welcomed by UK.
 The firm, with offices in London and New York, may sell about $200 million of private-equity holdings, half the level it showed to buyers earlier this year, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 rose 31 percent afteragreeing to buy Athlon Energy Inc.
 The European Central Bank last month hired the company to advise on developing a program to buy asset-backed securities as the monetary policy-maker strives to revive the faltering euro-area economy.
 Yara International ASA added 12 percent to 32260 kroner after Liberum Capital raised its rating on the fertilizer supplier to buy from neutral.
 Associated British Foods Plc rose 45 percent to 2,679 pence as Credit Suisse Group AG advised clients to buy the stock.
 Cohen’s traders are melting away- The Organization of American States holds its annual generalassembly in Guatemala City, Guatemala- Home Depot hack affected 56 million payment cards- China sentences Glaxo’s Mark Reilly to three years in prisonfor bribing doctors and hospitals and fines Glaxo 297 millionpounds ($489 million)- Libya is a mess- Nigeria is combatting Boko Haram by torturing men, women andchildren, according to a seven-year study by AmnestyInternational- Florida man kills his daughter, six grandchildren and himself- Baltimore cop’s lawyer says client within his right toneutralize a dog that bit a woman by slitting its throat- Memphis police find another 200 unprocessed rape kits, somedating to 1976, to go with the current backlog of 12,000- Dunkin’ Donuts, Krispy Kreme agree to buy palm oil only fromsources that don’t clear cut rain forests- Japan will resume killing whales for scientific research,dinner- Women will be admitted as members to the Royal and AncientGolf Club of St.
 “They will serve as confidence boosters to investors looking to buy into the sector” German online fashion retailer Zalando SE plans to raise as much as 633 million euros in an IPO on Oct.
 “Investorshave found more reasons to sell than to buy right now” Growth Prospect President Xi’s probes are targeting Communist Party cadresfrom the top to bottom ranks nationwide as he warned that the 87million-member strong party is facing “severe dangers” fromcorruption.
 That had made it harder for gamblers to buyexpensive goods in exchange for cash.
 More Countries “People who want an iPhone are going to buy one, regardless of what the news says,” said Carl Howe, an analyst at 451 Research.
 Draghi, Kuroda ECB President Mario Draghi this month announced a final round of interest-rate cuts and a plan to buy privately owned securities as he seeks to revive inflation in the 18-nation euro area.
 As part of that agreement, BlackRock and MarketAxess developed a pricing system, an alert that notifies any investor on the system if an incoming order matches a bond they want to buy or sell, a person familiar with how it works said in November.
 Once compliant with Volcker, the bank intends to continue to commit capital to buyout funds, one of the people said.
 Jose Galindo, 36, sitting on the floor of a United terminal at O’Hare, said “there’s thousands of people trying to purchase a ticket” Galindo has been trying to buy a ticket online after his Delta flight to Atlanta got canceled.
 For years, patients have been able to buy less expensive copies of existing chemical drugs -- ranging from Lipitor for cholesterol to the antidepressant Prozac -- once their patents ended.
 “People who want an iPhone are going to buy one, regardless of what the news says,” said Carl Howe, an analyst at 451 Research.
 Social trends, though, suggest it will be difficult to convert these gawkers into buyers, said Tim Urquhart, an analyst at IHS Automotive in London.
 The previous government in January scrapped a $753 million deal to buy helicopters from AgustaWestland, a unit of Rome-based Finmeccanica, after a 15-month corruption probe.
 The 77-year-old, who made an unsolicited $2 billion cash offer to buy the Empire State Building last year and owns a stake in Manhattan’s Woolworth Building, has never appeared on an international wealth ranking.
 He made his unsolicited $2 billion cash offer to buy the Empire State Building in June 2013.
 That will also entice networks to buy advertisements promoting a specific show and its airtime -- what’s called a tune-in advertisement.
 Call warrants are financial instruments that give the holder the right to buy the underlying share at a specific price within a certain period.
 Since June, ECB President Mario Draghi has cut interest rates to record lows, offered cheap long-term cash to banks, and pledged to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds in a bid to revive the euro-area economy.
 Matt Rose, executive chairman, visited the region in August and spoke to local media and Seattle Mayor Ed Murray about the company’s safety practices and commitment to buy 5,000 stronger tank cars.
 Since then, mortgage standards have tightened, and he can’t afford to buy in his neighborhood because investors have bid up prices to almost pre-bust levels.
 The Hispanic share of the market for mortgages to buy homes fell to 22 percent in 2013 from 24 percent the prior year and barely half of the 2006 peak, according to an analysis of federal lending data by the Urban Institute, a Washington-based non-partisan research group.
 “The majority of our clients are Hispanic and they want to buy a house but it’s so difficult,” Manuel, 21, said during an interview in the apartment living room.
 Such a concentrated deal encouraged more fund managers to buy on the first day of trading, as they sought exposure to Alibaba’s dominance over a booming e-commerce industry in the country of 136 billion people.
 Pfizer, which had run aground (for now) in its attempt to buy AstraZeneca, came out with yet a new and different target for its inversionary tactics, Actavis.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Perella Weinberg Partners LP agreed to buy the site of Berlin’s Tacheles building, a former department store that was occupied by squatters for two decades.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Palm oil’s slump to a five-year low offers investors an opportunity to buy plantation stocks, according to Dorab Mistry, director at Godrej International Ltd, who says producers are still making money.
 “We have long argued that the way to make money in the palm sector is to buy growth operators when prices are low and sentiment is weak,” Standard Chartered analysts Adrian Foulger and Denis Chai said in a report dated Sept.
 The company is negotiating the interest rate with initial buyers, who will have the option to buy an additional $75 million in notes.
 Valeant, based in Laval, Quebec, wants to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 Verisk announced in January that it agreed to buy EagleViewto add an image library that encompasses about 90 percent ofUS.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- BB&T Corp, the lender that agreed last week to acquire 41 Texas branches from Citigroup Inc, plans to buy Bank of Kentucky Financial Corp.
 Investment in the grain industry will continue until there aren’t any assets left to buy, according to John Murray, managing director at Emerald Grain Pty, a Melbourne-based grain handler.
 Who doesn’t want “high-quality stocks,” right? And for most of a decade, if you wanted to buy the “quality” stocks in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index you could just load up on the PowerShares S&P 500 High Quality Portfolio ETF issued by Invesco Ltd.
 offered to buy it.
 Cermaq surged 14 percent to 9575 kroner after Mitsubishi offered to buy the Norwegian fishing company for 888 billion kroner ($14 billion).
 15 (Bloomberg) -- ZF Friedrichshafen AG agreed to buy TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 The company agreed to buy a stake in Liongate Capital Management LLP last year to add hedge funds.
 Publicly traded funds allow investors to buy and sell stakes without affecting the fund’s holdings.
 and aren’t wealthy enough to buy into the hedge funds directly,” said Admire Capital’s Karamanian.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Fosun International Ltd, the investment arm of China’s biggest closely held conglomerate, is offering to buy Espirito Santo Saude SGPS SA for as much as 451 million euros ($580 million), joining a bidding war for the Portuguese hospital operator.
 It faces rival bidders in its push to buy Espirito Santo Saude, which runs hospitals, clinics and nursing homes in Portugal.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Euro-area government bonds declined on concern the European Central Bank may lack the tools to deliver fully on a measure it announced last week to buy privately-owned assets.
 Mounting Tensions Dollar General, spurned twice in its attempts to buy Family Dollar, announced yesterday that it was taking its latest, $80-a-share offer directly to shareholders.
 The hostile approach ratcheted up a bidding war that began after Dollar Tree announced its agreement to buy Matthews, North Carolina-based Family Dollar for $7450 a share in July.
 Adobe has been trying to persuade customers to buy online subscriptions for its design software, seeking to make sales more predictable by replacing periodic one-time purchases.
 They cut borrowing costs again this month and announced plans to buy asset-backed bonds.
 A unit of billionaire Anil Ambani’s Reliance Power Ltd, which had signed a memorandum of understanding to buy Jaiprakash Power Ventures Ltd’s three hydro-power plants on July 27, scrapped the deal citing “regulatory uncertainties and tariff issues,” according to a statement yesterday.
 Rating Cut Abu Dhabi National Energy Co, known as Taqa, withdrew from an agreement to buy two hydro-power projects in July 24 after signing an agreement in March to take over the assets at an enterprise value of $16 billion along with a Canadian institutional investor and Indian infrastructure finance fund, IDFC Ltd.
 Butanother bank run could bring it down if it’s massive enough” Local competitor TC Ziraat Bankasi AS decided againstmaking a bid to buy the lender last month in favor of startingits own Sharia-compliant unit.
 Mercuria, nearing completion of a $35 billion deal to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodity operation, joins Glencore Plc and Trafigura Beheer BV in having part of its business regulated by the FCA.
 jumped 33 percent after Germany’s Merck KGaA agreed to buy the specialty-chemicals company for $17 billion.
 agreed to buy VimpelCom Ltd’s stake in upstart carrier Wind Mobile.
 VimpelCom, based in Amsterdam, had struggled to offload its stake since it backed off an attempt to buy control from Lacavera in June 2013.
 Ripplewood is in talks to buy the government’s stake andplans to develop the bank into a national champion, ChiefExecutive Officer Tim Collins said Sept.
 seeks to buy mines already in production to boost cash flow, said the South African producer of the metal with operations from Australia to Peru.
 Gold Fields seeks to buy cheap assets as larger producers offload some mines to pay back debt and adjust to a bullion price down 27 percent since the start of 2013.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- South Korea will go ahead with plans to buy 40 Lockheed Martin Corp.
 The military scaled back the number to 40 last year, when it opted to buy the F-35 over cheaper options from Boeing Co.
 Cost estimates for the $3986 billion program have climbed 71 percent in inflation-adjusted dollars since the Pentagon signed its initial contract with Lockheed in 2001, even as plans were adjusted to buy 409 fewer aircraft.
 “Why would anyone want to buy Russian equities, no matter how cheap they are, amid the geopolitical risk?” ‘Sanctions War’ A Sept.
 (4755) rose the most in fivemonths after it agreed to buy US.
 “They were essentially saying: ‘I’m never going to holdonto this and I’m sure I’ll find someone else to buy it before Ihave to make that completion payment,’” the CEO said.
 He finished oneand delivered it to buyers, while the other two are set forcompletion in November, he said.
 Ford declined 2 percent to $1680 after Morgan Stanley downgraded the shares to underweight, similar to sell, from overweight, similar to buy.
 rose 26 percent to $12798 after Ryanair Holdings Plc agreed to buy as many as 200 high-density Boeing 737 jets in a deal worth a potential $22 billion at list prices.
 The ECB is preparing to buy covered bonds and asset-backed debt as it seeks to spur economic growth by stimulating lending.
 “New issues are over-subscribed, spreads are grinding ever tighter and now there is a big buyer looking for 100 billion euros or more” Third Time This will be the third time the ECB has created a program to buy covered bonds, with previous purchases starting in July 2009 and November 2011.
 RewardStyle’s LikeToKnow:It has made theBCBGMAXAZRIA and Herve Leger catwalks shoppable via Instagramphotos, and edgy media outlet Refinery29 shows consumers whereto buy the clothes worn by the stars attending Fashion WeekIt’s all based on what shoppers at home “like” “We started realizing that the consumer really dictatestrends, even though us fashion people always think we do,”Lubov Azria, chief creative officer of BCBG Max Azria Group LLC,said in an interview at her showroom in New York’s GarmentDistrict.
 Coke gave the drink a Twitter account, too, so loyalists can “follow the brand’s journey” “Surge is back,” the Facebook page’s organizers said, urging readers to buy and spread the word.
 If they don’t get that, anything else is suboptimal” Richard Farnsworth, a spokesman for SABMiller, declined to comment on whether it will make another attempt to buy Heineken or any other companies.
 Another idea is to buy Groupe Castel’s African beer operations, in which SABMiller already has a 20 percent stake, though that may not provide enough scale, he said.
 “They’re very complementary businesses” If SABMiller is still opposed to being taken over, then it’s going to need to buy an international brand like Heineken, said Chris Wickham, a London-based analyst at Oriel Securities Ltd.
 In July, BTG agreed to buy Assicurazioni Generali SpA’s Swiss private-banking unit for 15 billion Swiss francs ($16 billion), almost doubling assets under management to about $200 billion.
 “Japanese shares have risen quite far, so investors that want to buy are in wait-and-see mode and those that want to sell are taking profits” Officials at the US.
 “We are interested in bolt-on transactions and we like to buy for a reasonable price,” Strobel said, adding Baloise “profited during the financial crisis with our acquisitions in Belgium and Luxembourg, where the sellers were forced to sell” The shares rose as much as 03, extending this year’s gains to 73 percent.
Iliad SA (ILD) faces hurdles in its planto buy T-Mobile US Inc.
 Couche-Tard was among a short list of suitors to buy a $16 billion minority stake in China’s Sinopec Sales Co, Reuters reported Aug.
 International investors have been flocking to Treasuries since speculation the ECB was moving closer to buying bonds drove yields in the region to historic lows this month and turmoil in Ukraine enhanced the refuge appeal.
 Sherman, who helps manage DoubleLine’s $1344 million Shiller Enhanced CAPE fund, said traders at the firm started selling higher-rated bonds to buy lower-rated ones about a month ago.
 While Yellen’s been warning that this market looks frothy, she just gave investors the green light to buy more junk.
 “There is more confidence in the consumer and because there’s more confidence there’s possibly a greater ability to buy the more expensive pieces,” he said.
 Merrill Lynch upgraded the stock to buy from neutral.
 The allocations allow yuan raised offshore to be used to buy securities in China’s domestic market.
 wireless carrier after seven years of customer losses and a failed plan to buy smaller rival T-Mobile US.
 Repsol SA dropped an offer for Talisman in August that added to costs to buy default protection, leading to the worst performance for credit-default swaps in Canada during the past month, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 All three major shareholders have committed to buying stockin the new issue, which gives investors the right to buy sevenshares for every 25 shares they already own, SGL said in an e-mailed statement.
 SAP SE may move after the biggest maker of business-management software agreed to buy Concur Technologies IncVivendi SA may move after agreeing to sell its Brazilianbroadband unit GVT to Telefonica SA.
 The agreement reached in August allows it to buy the remaining 55 percent by Feb.
 Chief Executive Officer Preben Prebensen said in an interview that lending growth was driven by the residential construction market and auto buyers as the UK.
 The middle class swelled to more thanhalf the population, and people got credit to buy their firsthomes and cars.
 9, the same day the Tokyo-based company said it plans to buy US.
 agreed to buy earlier this year, slipped 25 percent after the US.
 raised it to buy, citing cheap valuation relative to regional peers.
 An average of more than 90 percent of workers across all units backed the concessions, a day after Greybull was announced as the preferred bidder to buy Monarch from the Mantegazza family, the Luton, England-based company said in a statement.
 The survey of 386 Apple customers waiting in line in Minneapolis and New York yesterday found that 57 percent intended to buy the iPhone 6 Plus, he said.
 Last year, 35 percent planned to buy 16 GB, 39 percent intended to get 32 GB and 25 percent wanted 64 GB, Munster said.
 to try to buy PT Bank Danamon Indonesia last year in a deal that was scuttled by regulators.
 I can take my time” London home sellers, who have dominated the market for five years amid a dearth of inventory and robust demand, are losing clout to buyers.
 “Tanga will be the first one” Investors are looking to buy Tanzanian assets as policymakers in East Africa’s second-biggest economy get ready to scrap limits on foreign-share ownership.
 Jose Galindo, 36, sitting on the floor of a United terminal at O’Hare, said, “there’s thousands of people trying to purchase a ticket” Galindo has been trying to buy a ticket online after his Delta Air Lines Inc.
 Yara’s desire to lock in cheaper gas was clear when it tried unsuccessfully to buy Terra Industries Inc, said Colin Isaac, an analyst at Atlantic Equities LLP in London.
 expansion in 2004 when the Toronto-based company agreed to buy a 51 percent stake in Portland, Maine-based Banknorth Group Inc.
 Broadmedia’s G-cluster service, which began in June of 2013, allows users to play games without having to buy discs or download the software to a local machine.
 agreed to buy the owner of real-estate websites.
 The mall developer also agreed to buy the 40 percent stake it doesn’t already own in the Highcross Shopping Center in Leicester, England, for 180 million pounds.
 VIA, the new fund with Value Retail, has completed outlet-mall acquisitions in Amsterdam and Prague and is in exclusive talks to buy four more, Atkins said on a call with analysts today.
 More than 1,100 miles south in suburban Miami, Maggie Cruz-Ledon and her husband have set a 2015 deadline to buy a house, upping their budget in the process.
 Microsoft is in talks to buy Mojang AB for more than $2 billion, according to people familiar with the negotiations.
 “The companies with stronger balance sheets will use this as an opportunity to buy assets at a good level,” he said.
 Moody’s expects to buy back as much as $125 billion worth of shares this year, an increase from $1 billion.
 Moody’s plans to buy the remaining shares it doesn’t already own in Copal Amba, which provides research and analytics services to companies and financial institutions, according to a statement.
 Gamba also expects rising demand for the natural gas it produces in Colombia, with three large buyers expressing interest in its supplies, in addition to a utility that signed a new contract to buy from Canacol this month.
 It would make sense for Alibaba to buy Yahoo, though Alibaba may be reluctant to do such a “big, splashy deal,” said Jackson of Ironfire Capital.
 It’s a “more elegant way” for Alibaba to buy back its shares from Yahoo and lower the price, said Ryan Jacob, manager of the Jacob Internet Fund, which owns Yahoo stock.
 By 2012, the bailout included a $60 billion credit line from the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, a Treasury investment of as much as $698 billion and as much as $525 billion from the Fed to buy mortgage-linked assets once owned or backed by the insurer.
 Easier Mortgages In July, the Reserve Bank of India announced a rule change that applies to banks selling long-term bonds to raise funds that can be lent to buyers of cheap homes.
 Republicans say they worry that the Democrats’ changes would encourage more foreign corporations to buy US.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Burger King Worldwide Inc’s deal to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 The cloud-computing company decided to remain independent after ending a review on strategic options, and rebuffed investor calls to buy back shares, saying it will preserve cash for future acquisitions.
 agreed to buy US.
 “The stock’s price jump in trading is definitely a goodreward to investors who had the chance to buy,” said Tan Chiheng, a Boston-based analyst at Granite Point Capital Inc,which purchased some of the shares.
 shopping-center landlord spun off this year from Simon Property Group Inc, agreed to buy Glimcher Realty Trust for about $2 billion to create a diversified retail property owner.
 The combined company may seek to buy more properties where tenant sales are lower on a per-square-foot basis than at malls owned by Simon and other top-tier landlords, said Jeffrey Langbaum, a Bloomberg Intelligence analyst.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaires including Li Ka-shing and Robert Ng have cut debt at their Hong Kong developers to near-record lows as they prepare to buy land as prices fall, a signal the city’s real estate gains may be coming to an end.
 “You can’t force developers to buy land,” Nicole Wong, CLSA’s regional property research head, said this week.
 “You can only entice them to buy land, and that would be through a seemingly profitable land price” Land Sales Hong Kong’s government is accelerating land sales to boost housing supply by 470,000 units over the next decade.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Rakuten Inc, controlled by billionaire Hiroshi Mikitani, fell the most in three months in Tokyo after the owner of Japan’s largest online mall said it’s in talks to buy US.
 ECB Meeting In addition to cutting interest rates to record lows and offering long-term loans to banks, the ECB has committed to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds to steer price gains back toward its goal of just under 2 percent.
 3 to buy putsexpiring in November and conveying the right to sell the bondETF at $113, 24 percent below yesterday’s close.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Alere Inc’s former chief executive officer is working with shareholders to buy the health-services company and take it private for $46 a share.
 “My daughter’s is easier to read; the quality of her pictures are really good too,” she said, adding that she hopes to buy a new iPhone soon.
 Slightly more than half of consumers planning to buy a smartphone will opt for a larger device, according to a survey conducted earlier this year by Accenture Plc.
 More than a quarter of those who responded said they’re willing to spend $299 to buy a 55-inch iPhone, according to the poll.
 It isn’t just retirees who are poised to buy bigger iPhones.
 “Most likely you’ll have a victory for the No with a very thin margin, so it’s probably a good idea to buy assets now while they’ve come down a lot,” St-Arnaud said in a telephone interview.
 last week, it could be a chance to resume his quest to buy a National Basketball Association club.
 Ellison, 70, has failed in bids to buy the Golden State Warriors, Los Angeles Clippers, New Orleans Hornets (now the Pelicans) and the Memphis Grizzlies.
 He failed in efforts to buy the Hornets, and then the Grizzlies, with the intention of moving them to San Jose, California.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander SA, Spain’s biggest bank, agreed to buy Canadian car-financing company Carfinco Financial Group Inc.
 Consumers in New York and San Francisco had already formed queues to be first to buy the gadgets.
 The 59-year-old Air Force veteran, who has stood in line to buy iPhones three times before on the first day of sales, said he had his heart set on an iPhone 6 Plus, which has a 55-inch screen.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- OTP Bank Nyrt, Hungary’s largest lender, offered 300 million euros ($379 million) to buy Nova Kreditna Banka Maribor dd.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- SABMiller Plc was rebuffed in an attempt to buy smaller brewer Heineken NV, a deal that would have strengthened it against a potential bid by Anheuser-Busch InBev NV, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 “For SAB, a way of preserving their independence is to buy Heineken,” said Matthew Beesley, portfolio manager and head of global equities for London-based Henderson Global Investors Ltd.
 Time Warner’s standalone strategy includes an upgraded HBO Go mobile app and easier access to the channel for broadband Internet users who don’t want to buy a full cable-TV package.
 (FDO) says Dollar General Corp’sproposal to buy the company will have a tough time getting pastregulators.
 Softbank Corp, the Japanese telecommunications companyheaded by Masayoshi Son, is in talks to buy Glendale,California-based DreamWorks Animation, people with knowledge ofthe discussions said on Sept.
 Content Consolidation 21st Century Fox Inc’s attempt to buy Time Warner Inc.
 The company ended talks to buy thefourth-largest mobile carrier, T-Mobile US Inc.
 Last year he attempted to buy Universal Music Groupfrom France’s Vivendi.
 Bombardier expects the Turkish government to announce an auction by the end of this year to buy as many as 90 high-speed trains, Dieter John, head of the Canadian company’s central and eastern Europe division, said at a news conference in Istanbul today.
 Blackstone and GIC in October also agreed to buy a majority stake in Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s European insurance business.
 is in talks to buy Singapore-based semiconductor test and assembly company Stats Chippac Ltd.
 The Hua Capital group is in active discussions to buy OmniVision, Zhang said.
 Walgreen owns 45 percent of Alliance Boots and said last month it plans to buy all of the company and base the new business in Chicago.
 A deal would enable Alibaba to buy back its shares from Yahoo without a large tax leak.
 “They can basically now look to a target to buy with the proceeds,” he said in a telephone interview.
 Today’s announcement may prompt renewed takeover interest from chemical companies seeking to buy the plastics unit, Wenner said.
 The company agreed in May to buy Merck & Co’s over-the-counter drug business for $142 billion, and Dekkers also has expressed interest in acquisitions in veterinary medicines.
 “Tenders into the Dollar General offer will be meaningless since there is no way that Dollar General can purchase shares that are tendered” Dollar General, spurned twice in its attempts to buy Family Dollar, took its offer directly to shareholders in a hostile bid last week.
 Jazztel, Orange Jazztel Plc climbed 61 percent to 1278 euros and Orange SA declined 14 percent to 1129 euros as the French company offered to buy the Spanish broadband provider for about 34 billion euros ($44 billion).
 “On the private banking side we would almost exclusively like to buy in Switzerland,” Staub said.
 UBM is in advanced talks to buy the privately-held US.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Ethiopian Airlines Enterprise, Africa’s largest carrier by revenue, agreed to buy 20 redesigned 737 models valued at $21 billion in the largest single order for Boeing Co.
 Investcorp agreed to buy a majority stake in Esmalglass from 3i Group Plc in August 2012 in a deal valued at about 200 million euros, the person said.
 The iPhone 6 Plus, which has a larger display, will take three to four weeks for shoppers who pre-ordered online yesterday, according to Apple’s website, as people rushed to buy the handset hours after the company began taking pre-orders.
 agreed to buy closely held Windsor Quality Holdings LP for about $800 million in its biggest purchase as the Japanese maker of seasonings and processed foods pursues growth in the US.
 in its attempt to buy Swiss natural food ingredients maker Wild Flavors GmbH.
 He said he had intended to buy THMI for its computer equipment.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 Former Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik said last month he rejected an offer to buy part of his 28 percent holding.
 sold debt, driving down the value of existing bonds, to buy back C$900 million ($821 million) of its own shares after coming under pressure from two US.
 Deals Sidley, Davis Polk Advised on Electrolux Purchase of GE Unit Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP represented Electrolux AB (ELUXB) in itsdeal to buy General Electric Co.
 Spain’s Banco Santander SA agreed in June to buy GE’s consumer finance unit in Sweden, Denmark and Norway for 700 million euros ($894 million).
 After stocks plunged during the financial crisis, he used Daily Journal cash to buy shares of Wells Fargo & Co.
 Pessimism today means there are more people to buy into the rally tomorrow, he said.
 The company charges a 025 percent advisory fee on managed assets exceeding $10,000, and additional fees to buy exchange-traded funds, according to its website.
 Regulator Worries The first big challenge Armstrong addressed was how to buy bitcoins easily.
 People still used a whole one to buy a pizza, if they could find a shop that accepted it.
 The Ontario Power Authority has agreed to buy output from Belle River, enough to power about 35,000 homes, according to the statement.
 Cevian, which seeks to buy undervalued stocks, has alsoincreased its stake in ThyssenKrupp AG this year, and now owns15 percent of the German steelmaker, according to data compiledby Bloomberg.
 Hossie declined to comment on the size of the missed payment by Glencore, which has a contract to buy 2 million tons a year at spot prices until the first quarter of 2017.
 “In any sort of cyclical industry, you want to buy when there’s blood in the street,” said George Dethlefsen, chief executive officer of Corsa Coal Corp, the Canadian mining company that’s backed by private equity investors, which bought PBS.
 private-equity firm Quintana Capital Group LP, plans to buy and develop mines close to Pittsburgh and the Great Lakes, the US.
 last year to buy an eastern Kentucky coal mining complex for $473 million.
 He created Blackhawk Mining LLC in 2010 to buy idled mines and his family is majority owner of the company through JMP Holdings LLC.
 Strobel acknowledged that finding debt to buy may be a challenge.
 ECB President Mario Draghi stepped up the effort last week, cutting benchmark rates and announcing plans to buy bonds backed by loans to corporations.
 The trust agreed to buy a one-third stake in Marina Bay Financial Centre Tower 3 from its sponsor Keppel Land, it said today in a statement.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Lawmakers have rejected the Pentagon’s request to shift as much as $15 billion in war spending to buy eight new Lockheed Martin Corp.
 The Pentagon sought permission to spend $880 million to buy six Lockheed F-35B fighter jets and spares for the Marine Corps to replace six older Marine AV-8B Harriers destroyed during a September 2012 Taliban attack on Forward Operating Base Camp Bastion in Afghanistan.
 Air Force The Pentagon also sought to shift $256 million to buy two Air Force versions of the F-35 and spare parts meant to replace to two Boeing F-15 fighter jets lost in combat operations.
 An additional $404 million would have been transferred to buy 21 Apache helicopters from Chicago-based Boeing to replace 21 Kiowa Warrior aircraft lost in battle.
 rose the most among stocks in the Dow Jones Industrial Average after Ryanair Holdings Plc agreed to buy as many as 200 of the high-density jets being added to the planemaker’s 737 Max family.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Aeon Co, Japan’s largest retailer, agreed to buy the rest of money-losing rival Daiei Inc.
 “I’ve been waiting for a break, but it hasn’t come” Driving the growth is demand for high-risk mortgages such as interest-only loans and financing to buy rental properties.
 Interest-only mortgages jumped to 43 percent of all new home lending in the three months through June 30, and credit to buy rental properties climbed to 38 percent, both record highs, according to APRA data starting in the first quarter of 2008.
 The company took on debt to buy fellow casino operatorMandalay Bay Resort & Casino in 2005 and build the $9 billionCityCenter project in Las Vegas.
Terry and Kim Pegula agreed to buythe Buffalo Bills for around $1 billion, the Buffalo Newsreported, citing two people familiar with negotiations.
 Samsung last month agreed to buy SmartThings, a startup that makes similar applications.
Telefonica SA (TEF) agreed to buy Vivendi (VIV)SA’s Brazilian broadband unit GVT, three weeks after thecompanies entered exclusive talks for the business.
 in 2010 for $19 billion, has maintained its focus on the region, agreeing to buy Guatemalan lender Grupo Financiero Reformador and Banco Bilbao Vizcaya Argentaria SA’s Panama unit more recently.
 SABA received 85 percent of available loan funds for the project to buy and export goods to Darussafaka and received the money in a series of disbursements submitted by SABA to Deutsche Bank and Ex-Im, the US.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Cofco Land Holdings Ltd, a Hong Kong-based developer backed by China’s government, agreed to buy the builders of the mainland Joy City properties for HK$125 billion ($161 billion).
 That means decisions by money managers to buy or sell have increased impact on these economies, where assets are smaller and less liquid.
Blackstone Group LP (BX) and TPG CapitalManagement LP agreed to buy mortgage lender Kensington Group Plcfrom Investec Plc for 180 million pounds ($290 million) toexpand in the UK.
 Bayer Material Science, as the plastics unit is known, maybe valued at more than 12 billion euros ($155 billion) and thedrugmaker could use the proceeds from a divestiture to buyZoetis Inc.
 The German company already boosted its life sciencesbusiness with one deal this year, agreeing in May to buy Merck’sover-the-counter products, including allergy medicine Claritin,for $142 billion.
 Last year it agreed to buy its partner on oneof its new cancer drugs, Norway’s Algeta ASA.
 A need for critical mass was behindBayer’s decision to buy the Merck consumer health business, hesaid.
 That’s in part because it’s become more difficult to buy and sell bonds as banks pull back from making markets in the face of higher capital requirements.
 “I used to buy bonds, now you just buy the ETFs” Fixed-income funds such as ETFs may be a potential threat to the financial system when the Federal Reserve withdraws its unprecedented stimulus, Michael Feroli, chief US.
 Kvisle is trying to sell assets as he seeks to rein in debtand refocus a company with operations spanning six continentsRepsol dropped a plan to buy all of Talisman to instead weighthe purchase of some of the company’s shale assets, people withknowledge of the matter said in August.
 It’s never been cheaper for euro-area governments or individuals to borrow money and the ECB is seeking to put cash into the economy through cheap loans to banks and a pledge to buy asset-backed securities.
 Banks and smaller firms are offering more loan products to buyers based overseas, most of whom have paid cash for homes in the last few years.
 Belgium’s AB InBev is in talks with banks about financing a 75 billion-pound ($122 billion) deal to buy SABMiller, Dow Jones reported, citing an unidentified source.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- News Corp, the newspaper publisher controlled by Rupert Murdoch, agreed to buy the owner of Realtorcom for $950 million, expanding its digital real-estate listings to compete with sites such as Zillowcom.
 agreed to buy Harlequin Enterprises for $415 million, bolstering its book publishing business with the romance imprint.
 Salesforce agreed to buy data-management startup RelateIQ Inc.
 (FOXA) said it isn’tcoming back for the stake in British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc (BSY)it doesn’t already own after withdrawing an offer to buy TimeWarner Inc.
 BSkyB, which is 39 percent owned by Fox, agreed to buy SkyItalia and a 574 percent stake in Sky Deutschland from Fox inJuly for more than $9 billion.
 We want to getbigger, stronger and better” As Fox was working on a deal to sell its European units toBSkyB, it was also attempting to buy New York-basedentertainment company Time Warner Inc.
 Murdoch previously tried to buy BSkyB in 2011.
 The company in June agreed to buy a $736 million stake in China-based 58com to bolster its online content as it seeks to compete with Alibaba.
 ECB Stimulus Since June, ECB President Mario Draghi has cut interest rates to record lows, offered cheap long-term cash to banks, and pledged to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds in a bid to revive the euro-area economy.
 In two deals last week, SAP AG agreed to buy Concur Technologies Inc.
 agreed in November to buy six Recurrent solar projects in California and Arizona in a $400 million transaction.
 Roche, based in Basel, Switzerland, agreed in August to buy Brisbane, California-based InterMune for $83 billion in cash.
 24 to buy three of Jaiprakash’s hydropower plants, citing regulatory uncertainties and tariff issues.
 In July, Abu Dhabi National Energy Co, known as Taqa, withdrew from an agreement to buy two hydropower projects after having signed a deal in March to take over the assets at an enterprise value of $16 billion along with a Canadian institutional investor and Indian infrastructure finance fund, IDFC Ltd.
 Vodafone went on to buy Spanish broadband company Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in March for 72 billion euros.
 Liberty agreed to buy Dutch cable operator Ziggo NV for 49 billion euros in January and a stake in ITV Plc, the UK’s biggest commercial broadcaster, in July.
 has also given the underwriters on its sale a 30-day option to buy as much as 6 million additional shares in Israel Chemicals.
 Short-sellers borrow stock and sell it, hoping to buy it back at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 Pfizer Inc, which this year attempted to buy AstraZeneca Plc and move abroad, fell less than 1 percent to $3005 at the close in New York.
 companies need to buy a foreign operation, and the shareholders of the non-US.
 AbbVie Inc, based in North Chicago, Illinois, has agreed to buy Shire Plc and move to the UK.
 Medtronic Inc, which plans to buy Covidien Plc and move its legal address to Ireland from Minneapolis, fell 29 percent to $6408.
 Pfizer Chief Executive Officer Ian Read had cited the tax benefits as a reason to buy AstraZeneca and move Pfizer’s tax base to the UK.
 Expedia’s Offer Expedia, whose brands include Hotelscom and Hotwirecom, agreed July 7 to buy Wotif, offering shareholders A$306 and a special dividend of 24 cents a share, which would be paid by Wotif.
 “This approach appears to be intended to not only preempt shareholder approval, but also eliminate interest from the various bidders for the company” Allergan is in talks to buy Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 “Allergan’s Board remains confident in the Company’s ability to deliver significantly more value than Valeant’s grossly inadequate offer” Jackson Square said Allergan had refused to engage in talks with Valeant and declined to buy back its own stock when it was trading at lower levels last year, ignoring urging from the San Francisco-based investor.
 postponed a shareholder vote on its plan to buy Fyffes Plc while it seeks talks with Cutrale Group and Safra Group on their unsolicited $614 million proposal to acquire the banana producer.
 He reversed himself and sued the NBA in federal court in Los Angeles the day after Ballmer agreed to buy the team.
 “For anyone to buy them is risky” BHP Spinoff Iron ore slumped 38 percent this year as producers increased output, while copper for delivery in three months on the London Metal Exchange declined 7 percent.
 Short sellers borrow assets to bet on a decline in prices, hoping to buy them back later and pocket the difference.
 Rusal to buy.
 BNP Paribas agreed to buy Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc’s equity derivatives unit in February after reaching a similar deal with Credit Agricole SA in October.
 Poland is able to buy 2 billion cubic meters of gas per year via a link with the Czech Republic and via the Lasow link with Germany.
 With Facebook, a Nasdaq software error caused a late start to trading and caused some investors to buy more shares than they intended.
 The $70 billion computer maker’s near-record cash pile gives it the means to do a deal, and the worst sales forecast among computer hardware peers provides the motivation for HP to buy its way to more competitive products.
 The company agreed to buy Mainland Sand & Gravel Ulc of Canada on Sept.
 More recently, Oracle in June agreed to buy hospitality software maker Micros for $53 billion.
 Ismaik, who owns about 28 percent of the company, said last month he rejected an offer from Aabar to buy part of his stake.
 She uses the digital currency to buy gift cards and office supplies.
 If anything, using the currency to buy goods and services is even more popular in Europe, said Tony Gallippi, CEO of BitPay, which is based in Atlanta.
 “Adding a new currency for them is a very easy task” Plane Tickets Peter Surda, an economist who lives in Vienna, uses bitcoin two or three times a week to buy everything from food to electronics to plane tickets.
 Nevada’s legislature began considering a package of bills related to Tesla yesterday, including the tax incentives and a measure to allow the automaker to sell directly to buyers, rather than through dealerships.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Veresen Inc, the Canadian company planning a terminal to ship liquefied natural gas to Asia from Oregon, agreed to buy Global Infrastructure Partners’ 50 percent stake in the Ruby pipeline for $143 billion.
 steelmaker by sales, agreed to buy a Kentucky mill from ArcelorMittal and Gerdau SA for about $770 million to boost its output of flat-rolled products.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA said last month it was looking to acquire Gallatin after failing to buy ThyssenKrupp AG plants in Alabama and Rio de Janeiro last year.
 Cisco also recently agreed to buyMetacloud, a Pasadena-based company that runs cloudinfrastructure for companies, using gear the companies alreadyhave in their data centers.
 Investor and Fiskars were said to have rebuffed a bid byRolls-Royce Holdings Plc (RR/) to buy Waertsilae’s ship-engine unit inJanuary.
 “A lot of the timeJapanese would have to buy land and build themselves.
 lawmakers’ attention this year, prompting Treasury’s response, including Burger King’s deal to buy Tim Hortons and move its address to Canada.
 are among companies that have opted to buy annuity contracts from Newark, New Jersey-based Prudential.
 The firm also has made higher-than-market bids to buy blocks of stock from clients to win market share.
SAP SE (SAP), the biggest maker ofbusiness-management software, agreed to buy Concur TechnologiesInc.
 The complaint comes after New York-based BGC disclosed earlier this week a hostile takeover offer to buy the company for $525 per share in cash, 15 percent higher than CME’s all-stock transaction.
 “It’s a good strategy to buy shares of companies that are affiliated to Alibaba, since domestic investors can’t directly invest in its IPO,” Dai Ming, a money manager at Hengsheng Hongding Asset Management Co.
 will introduce a program that enables clients to buy Alibaba shares through the firm’s special program for qualified investors, the China Daily reported July 4.
 Keyur Parekh, an analyst with Goldman Sachs, raised his rating on Glaxo this week to buy from hold, in part on the prospect of additional changes to be introduced by a new chairman.
 (6758) may reward investors ifthey wait to buy its bonds after an expected ratings downgrade,BNP Paribas SA said.
 Then,“we need to buy,” she said in an interview in Tokyo yesterday.
 The company said earlierthis month that it agreed to buy a 90 percent stake in power-plant developer Yunnan Metallurgical New Energy Co.
 The so-called hold-to-maturity norms protect banks from losses and encourage them to buy government debt.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date, and non-deliverable contracts are settled in dollars.
 agreed to buy Thomas H.
 London-based CVC agreed last year to buy online payment firm Skrill Group Plc from Investcorp Bank BSC.
 “The big push is likely to be for regional-language transactions” For Snapdeal, that means you can click on ‘khariden’ to buy in Hindi, or ‘vaangu’ to do the same in Tamil.
 Investors aren’t ready to buy Russia yet because of Ukraine risks, and now Evtushenkov’s arrest has soured the mood further” The case against Evtushenkov stems from a probe into Bashneft, an oil producer that his holding company Sistema acquired in 2009, the Investigative Committee said on Sept.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Starbucks Corp, the world’s largest coffee-shop chain, agreed to buy the remaining 61 percent of its Japanese operations for about $9135 million.
 Ebro Foods SA added 23 percent to 1539 euros as UBS AG raised its rating on the Spanish maker of rice and pasta products to buy from neutral.
 Shop Sales EE agreed to buy 58 Phones 4u shops and take on 359 employees, the largest UK.
 Dixons Carphone, the London-based electronics retailer that agreed last week to take on 800 Phones 4u employees, is in negotiations to buy some Phones 4u stores, people familiar with the matter said.
 19 that it plans to buy 140 shops and take on about 900 employees.
 Vodafone’s agreement to buy stores and inventory will raise 124 million pounds ($203 million) while EE’s deal for shops will raise 25 million pounds, PwC said.
 4, when the ECB unexpectedly cut interest rates and announced a plan to buy securitized debt.
 utility owner by market value, said last week it would spend $500 million to build three solar farms in North Carolina and to buy power from five more in the state.
 decided to develop a payments system so people could use iPhones to buy items at a store instead of swiping debit or credit cards, the company bypassed EBay Inc’s PayPal.
 (STR), an Indiandrugmaker, agreed to buy Shasun Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 gained the most in nearly five years after agreeing to buy Civitas Therapeutics Inc, the developer of an experimental Parkinson’s disease therapy.
 If you decide to buy, you can do that, too, then arrange to have the car insured and shipped.
 In May, Apple agreed topay $3 billion to buy headphones and streaming-music serviceBeats Electronics LLC, the company’s biggest-ever purchase.
 These include Burger King Worldwide Inc’s deal to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Lone Star Funds, the private-equity firm founded by billionaire John Grayken, agreed to buy 38 US.
 That could come from selling and using the cash to buy assets deemed safer, or just by holding onto the debt, based on its own favorable regulatory treatment.
 He sold about half his TDC bonds last week due to “rating concerns” after the company said it agreed to buy Norwegian cable provider Get AS for 138 billion kroner ($22 billion).
 Siemens AG Chief Executive Officer Joe Kaeser did just that in a deal to buy Dresser-Rand Group Inc, a US.
 Following the July 2013agreement to buy E-Plus, the company said it would raise about37 billion euros in a rights issue.
 In addition to Qatar Islamic’s failed takeover, local competitor TC Ziraat Bankasi AS decided against making a bid to buy the lender last month in favor of starting its own Shariah-compliant unit.
 (4568) agreed to buyUS-based Ambit Biosciences Corp.
 Blockbuster Deals Global pharmaceutical companies have announced a string ofdeals this year, pruning underperforming businesses and makingacquisitions in areas where demand for medicines is growingNovartis AG (NOVN) in April agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc (GSK)’s cancerdrug business for as much as $16 billion, form a consumer-healthventure with Glaxo and sell its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly& Co.
 (ABBV) agreed to buy Shire Plc (SHP) forabout 32 billion pounds ($52 billion) in July.
 Oi has hired Banco BTG Pactual SA to look at strategic options to buy Telecom Italia’s Tim stake.
 Policy makers reduced borrowing costs further earlier this month and committed to buying asset-backed securities and covered bonds to boost the ECB’s balance sheet by as much as 1 trillion euros ($13 trillion).
 The decision to buy covered bonds, assets the ECB already bought between 2009 and 2012, was also driven by concern over volumes, Visco said.
 Yizheng said it then plans to buy Sinopec Oilfield Service Corp.
 “The company might want to not be too aggressive on pricing so it can still have some upside after the listing” The company is embarking on the second week of its global tour to meet with investors in Asia and Europe as it seeks to convince funds to buy into its offering.
 A group of investors led by the New York-based fund yesterday agreed to buy the Latvian government’s 75 percent stake in Citadele Banka AS, the Baltic nation’s fifth-biggest lender by deposits, for an undisclosed price.
 JPMorgan raised its rating on the producer of security scanners to overweight, similar to buy, from neutral.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Robert Bosch GmbH plans to buy full control of its home-appliance venture from partner Siemens AG for 3 billion euros ($386 billion) as the German manufacturer pushes to make more consumer products with Internet links.
 The business will continue using the Siemens brand for “the long term” The agreement is Bosch’s second in a week to buy out a joint venture partner, following a deal to gain full control of a car steering-systems producer from ZF Friedrichshafen AG.
 ZF is selling its half of the steering-systems manufacturer to reduce antitrust issues as the Friedrichshafen, Germany-based company bids $117 billion to buy TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 Internet/Trademark Twitter Testing ‘Buy’ Button as E-Commerce Plans Take Shape For Twitter Inc, a tweet will soon be more than a form ofcommunication or an ad -- it will be an invitation to buy.
 Zimmer agreed to buy Biomet in April.
 The purchase brings the value of announced acquisitions of health-products companies this year to $81 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, led by Medtronic Inc’s agreement to buy Covidien Plc for $429 billion.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 The DVR “has been slowing growth for 10 years’ The majority of VOD viewing takes place after those three days, when advertisers are less likely to buy commercials.
 26 that it agreed to buy Tim Hortons for more than $11 billion.
 Omaha, Nebraska-based Berkshire will earn 9 percent annual interest on its investment and gets the option to buy a 175 percent stake in the combined company.
 Pfizer abandoned abid to buy the UK’s AstraZeneca Plc in May, while peoplefamiliar with the matter said it has approached Actavis Plc toexpress an interest in an acquisition.
 Before that, it bought most of its cars from automakers that agreed to buy them back at a set age and price.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- BASF SE’s oil and gas arm agreed to buy assets from Norway’s Statoil ASA for $125 billion, diversifying energy supplies for Germany’s biggest chemical maker as relations between Europe and Russia worsen.
 Jose Galindo, 36, sitting on the floor of a United terminal at O’Hare, said, “there’s thousands of people trying to purchase a ticket” Galindo has been trying to buy a ticket online after his Delta Air Lines Inc.
 Three rate the stock hold, while one advises clients to buy the stock.
 urged investors to buy.
 The groups had traveled from New York, about two hours away by car, to buy the iPhone 6 and iPhone 6 Plus in order to resell them in China for large markups, said David Hartman, a police spokesman.
 The lines also attracted a swell of tourists looking to buy handsets that aren’t available yet back home.
 Kumho Petrochemical said in an e-mailed statement that the group ordered affiliates including the petrochemical company in 2009 to buy commercial papers issued by Kumho Industrial and Kumho Tire just before the two companies entered debt rescheduling programs.
 2, the ECB is scheduled to announce further details of its ABS plan, including more specifics on the kinds of assets it intends to buy.
 Vodafone then went on to buy Spanish broadband company Grupo Corporativo Ono SA this year.
 For its part, Liberty agreed to buy Dutch cable operator Ziggo NV in January and a stake in ITV Plc, the UK’s biggest commercial broadcaster, in July.
 utility owner, agreed to buy solar power projects under construction in California from a US.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Norway’s sovereign-wealth fund, the world’s largest, agreed to buy stakes in three prime US.
 The fund earlier this month agreed to buy a 499 percent stake in San Francisco’s Orrick Building, also known as Foundry Square II, through a venture with asset manager TIAA-CREF.
 agreed to buy a 49 percent stake as part of a revenue-sharing alliance.
 In the Mong Kok district, a popular shopping destinationfor tourists, an electronics store offered to buy an iPhone 6for at least HK$10,000 and an iPhone 6 Plus for HK$12,000.
 Whether people return to buy Corrales’s peanuts or Corella’s milk remains uncertain.
 The days of ads bought over the phone are fading asadvertising agencies and publishers automate the process and usedetailed consumer data to target individuals ready to buy, Magnasaid in a forecast released today.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Iron Mountain Inc, the Boston-based data storage and information management company, is considering an offer to buy Recall Holdings Ltd.
 is taking on at least 50,000 more to ensure people get their iPhones and foot massagers on time even as consumers tempt fate by waiting later and later to buy online.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Huntsman Corp, the chemical maker that agreed to buy Rockwood Holdings Inc’s titanium dioxide assets for $105 billion, won European Commission antitrust approval to complete the deal once a printing-ink unit is sold.
 Biggest Lender UBA Plc, Nigeria’s fourth-biggest lender by market value, granted $700 million in loans to several investors, including Transnational, which got $215 million to buy Ughelli Power, the country’s second-biggest gas-fueled plant with capacity for 900 megawatts.
 of Nigeria, or Amcon, to buy bad debts from lenders and save the financial system from collapse.
 4, when the region’s central bank unexpectedly cut interest rates and announced a plan to buy securitized debt.
 In June 2013, it agreed a $1 billion deal to buy pharmaceutical assets from US.
 CEO Sol Trujillo get financing to buy a stake in Telecom Italia, Fossati said he doesn’t have details about Trujillo’s plan.
 The European Central Bank is taking the opposite path, announcing a plan to buy securitized debt and keeping rates low until inflation increases toward its target.
 Benmosche announced a deal last month to buy a unitfrom Ageas Group for about $305 million to expand in UK.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Houston Foods Inc, a fast-food franchisee in Texas, plans to buy about 260 Burger King locations owned by Blackstone Group LP’s Heartland Food Corp.
 The company agreed last month to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 Gol parked its wide-body 767s earlier this decade and, after agreeing to buy discounter Webjet in 2011, handed back that carrier’s older 737s to lessors.
 “The weakness in the property market forced SouFun to offer this type of promotion to encourage people to buy homes, which will pressure its margins,” Henry Guo, an analyst at JG Capital, said by phone from San Francisco.
 Both companies service casino floors, so you’ll have a network of service” Casino Mergers GCA’s offer follows a wave of mergers in the casino industry, including Gtech SpA’s agreement to buy International Game Technology for $47 billion in July.
 More recently, Oracle in June agreed to buyhospitality software maker Micros Systems Inc.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- For Twitter Inc, a tweet will soon be more than a form of communication or an ad -- it will be an invitation to buy.
 Hubbard, the former president of Live Nation Entertainment Inc’s Ticketmaster, who was hired last year before Twitter’s November initial public offering, said the company will use the test to determine what kinds of posts are most successful in getting people to buy.
 In July, Twitter agreed to buy San Francisco-based Cardspring Inc, which lets users redeem deals and discounts through merchants’ tweets.
 The most-leveraged trader used a cash deposit of 20 million yen to buy and sell 4 billion yen worth of equities in a single day, according to Warita.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 buyout firm Apollo Management International LLP to buy 80 percent of insurer Fidelidade-Companhia de Seguros SA from the Portuguese government.
 ‘Treasure Island’ Bloomberg News, citing a person with knowledge of the matter, was the first to report last year that the CFTC found evidence traders at Wall Street banks instructed ICAP brokers to buy or sell as many interest-rate swaps as necessary to rig ISDAfix by moving it to a predetermined level.
 People applying for a loan to buy a second home may get lower down payments and mortgage rates that were previously only available to first-time home buyers so long as they have paid off their initial mortgage, the People’s Bank of China said in a statement on its website yesterday.
 “If you are InBev looking to truly build a global brewer, which they have been doing in recent years, the next asset that ABI would want to buy is SAB” Shea estimates such a deal would be valued at about $90 billion after a 25 percent premium.
 ‘Big Void’ “At that point, you could only use bitcoins to buy T-shirts, coffee mugs and alpaca socks,” Alan says.
 Those who think bitcoins are fool’s gold should know that they can be used to buy the real thing.
 BNP Paribas agreed to buy RBS’s equity derivatives unit in February after reaching a similar deal with Credit Agricole in October.
 Scotland has about 43 percent of the UK’s wind powercapacity and exports a quarter of its electricity, relying on anationwide system obligating utilities to buy clean energy tosupport the industry.
 and Canada to have that kind of oil ultimately come from Canada than from just about all the other places the oil is presently coming from” Harper touted the country’s low business tax rates and waded into the controversial decision by Burger King to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 Requirements to buy from the Anglo American Plc unit will include maximum debt-to-equity ratios and an audit of their books.
 The settlement, which immediately added Jana founder Barry Rosenstein to the board, comes after Walgreen last month agreed to buy the rest of European health and beauty chain Alliance Boots GmbH for $153 billion.
 Hidili earlier this month said it would pay noteholders 68 cents on the dollar to buy back the securities, as well as a two cent fee for consenting to amend the notes’ terms.
 added 49 percent after the e-commerce business agreed to buy US shopping-site operator Ebates Inc.
 “Withthe exchange connect coming closer, the market is expectingforeign investors” to buy Chinese shares, he said.
 Stolen information on credit and debit cards has been used to buy prepaid cards, electronics and groceries, the newspaper reported yesterday, citing unidentified people familiar with the attack’s fallout.
 And rather than typical fixed or adjustable-rate loans, the government-backed agencies should encourage lenders to offer shared appreciation mortgages, where lenders benefit from price appreciation of homes, or lease purchases, which enable renters to buy their homes, he said.
 rose the most in five months after it agreed to buy US.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Micro Focus International Plc agreed to buy US-based business-software provider The Attachmate Group Inc.
 KKR agreed in July to buy a 249 percent stake in Houston-based BlackGold Capital Management LP.
 KKR also agreed early last year to buy a same-sizedstake in Nephila Capital Ltd, a Bermuda-based company that makesreinsurance-related investments which traces its roots to 1998.
 Chinese institutions and investors with at least 500,000 yuan in their securities accounts will be able to buy Hong Kong shares using yuan through mainland brokerages.
 The excitement about mainland shares contrasts with a 2007 plan to allow Chinese citizens to buy Hong Kong stocks, later abandoned, which helped drive the Hang Seng Index to a record.
 UBS AG raised its rating on the micro-blogging service to buy from neutral.
 agreed to buy Producers Ag Insurance Group from CUNA Mutual Group for $110 million to diversify into the business of guarding farmers against losses.
 (CVX), the world’s third-largest oil producer by market value, is searching for someoneto buy one of its smallest refineries, the Kapolei facility onthe Hawaiian island of Oahu.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Merck KGaA agreed to buy Sigma-Aldrich Corp.
 While there is a potential buyer for Phones 4u’s insurance business, mobile phone carriers and the unnamed competitor haven’t shown any willingness to buy the company as a whole, according to Hunt.
 The firm uses mathematical models to decide when to buy and sell securities, derivatives and other investments.
 Former Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik, who owns about 28 percent of the company, said last month he rejected an offer from Aabar Investments PJSC to buy part of his holding.
 The exchange said the suspension was due to “uncertainties over the bank’s ownership” after a takeover bid by Qatar Islamic Bank SAQ failed and state-owned TC Ziraat Bankasi AS decided against making a bid to buy the bank.
 agreed to buy TriZetto Corp.
 Activist investors are subject to extensive disclosure requirements, including details on the identity of the investors, the price and date of their recent transactions in company stock, the source and amount of money spent to buy the stake, any recent steps or future plans to influence management or seek control, contractual arrangements, and the use of derivatives.
 Spinning off real estate into a separate property companyor converting into a REIT holding company would enable ClubCorpto boost dividends and lower its interest costs, and could putit in a better position to buy other clubs and courses, said thepeople.
 ClubCorp last month announced itagreed to buy Sequoia Golf Holdings LLC, a deal that will add 50clubs.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Dollar General Corp, spurned twice in attempts to buy Family Dollar Stores Inc, took its $91 billion offer directly to shareholders in a hostile bid.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Prudential Plc, the UK’s biggest insurer by market value, agreed to buy Kenyan life insurer Shield Assurance Co, its second acquisition in Africa.
 Twitter also recently agreed to buy CardSpring Inc, a service that lets users redeem deals and discounts through merchants’ tweets, for undisclosed terms.
 He said yesterday that if he comes close to something that starts to gain traction, he’ll “probably abandon it immediately” Microsoft’s deal to buy Stockholm-based Mojang is projected to close late this year.
 A decision to buy state assets will be made after “an objective, hard-nosed assessment,” Roy said.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Ryanair Holdings Plc agreed to buy as many as 200 high-density Boeing Co.
 Already the region’s biggest discount airline, Ryanair agreed to buy 100 737 Max 8 aircraft with eight more seats than the standard version, together with the same number of options in a deal worth a potential $22 billion at list prices.
 Their clients’ wishes in hand, traders would head out to buy and sell shares at the dozens of posts where specialists oversaw individual stocks.
 Eyes Opened An infusion of cash would give Verizon more flexibility after its debt ballooned to finance the $130 billion deal to buy full control of its wireless unit earlier this year.
 The stock was upgraded to buy from neutral by Compass Point analysts led by Jason Stewart.
 The Philadelphia-based company struck a deal in May to buy Clayton Holdings to expand outsourcing services for the home-lending industry, and is considering a sale of its bond guarantor.
 Jose Antonio Martinez Sampedro and Luis Javier Martinez Sampedro will later have to buy 196 percent of shares from bondholders as a condition of the agreement, which includes delisting Codere.
 “There’s no doubt the world is getting to be a more and more dangerous place, and there are countries around the world” that could look to buy aircraft and artillery, Jeff Babione, deputy manager of Lockheed’s F-35 Lightning II program, said in an interview in Oslo.
 had agreed to buy Fingerprint Cards for $650 million.
 Williams said in July the Houston-based company was looking for ways to repatriate approximately $35 billion in cash overseas, which would give it “more flexibility” to buy back shares or boost its dividend.
 shoppers and a slowdown in emerging marketsThe company yesterday agreed to buy Brazilian hair-color makerNiely Cosmeticos Group, continuing an acquisition spree that hasseen it spend more than $5 billion on deals this year.
 Diamond District In a separate transaction, SL Green agreed to buy the top 13 floors at Extell Development Co’s International Gem Tower at 55 W.
 The company announced last month an offer to buy 75 percent of Alyasra Food Co’s retail frozen foods distribution business in Kuwait.
 18 referendum and reckoning markets will price in a 35 percent chance, its strategists reckon the time to buy Scottish stocks is two days before the vote.
 to buy Permira Advisers LLP’s televisionproducer All3Media, in a deal valuing the company at 550 millionpounds.
 Bond Purchase India’s government is looking to buy back 200 billion rupees ($33 billion) of bonds from the central bank and the transaction will probably be completed in September at market prices, two officials familiar with the matter said this week, asking not to be named because the plans are private.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 SAP, the largest maker of business-management software,agreed to buy Washington-based Concur for $74 billion to boostits cloud-computing business.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Private-equity manager Philip Manduca is so convinced of the inflation-beating value of diamonds that he shrugged off reports of an alleged army uprising to buy part of a mine in Lesotho.
 “From the investor’s perspective, this fee structure alsocreates a potential misalignment of interest between theintermediary and the investor,” Conning said in the report“Another approach, though one we have seen little evidence ofdeveloping as of yet, is altering the traditional compensationmodel so the intermediaries have a vested interest in theeventual profitability of the life settlement” Investor Discretion Darwin Bayston, chief executive officer of the LifeInsurance Settlement Association, whose membership includesbrokers and investment firms, said all parties already have aninterest in the long-term success of the market, and that it’sup to buyers to evaluate risks before taking on contracts.
 “Investors always have the discretion to buy what theywant,” he said in a phone interview.
 Mars, the maker of M&M’s candies, later acquired an additional 10 percent of the operation, though it declined to buy most of P&G’s slower-growing European business.
 The rules are expected to allow foreign investors to buy local currency bonds for the first time and could be published early next year, they said.
 Cliffs has also announced a plan to buy back as much as $200 million of shares.
 teenagers are thinking of Adidas when they want to buy basketball shoes” Based in the Bavarian town of Herzogenaurach since its creation in 1949, the world’s No.
 (ECA) agreed to buy AthlonEnergy Inc.
 Encana will pay $593 billion in cash and assume $115billion in long-term debt to buy Athlon, the Calgary based-company said today in a statement.
 Not-for-profit groups that want to buy the pools of mortgages say the current system favors financial buyers over those whose primary mission is aiding borrowers and communities.
 Rackspace, which maintained its forecasts for the current quarter, also said it’s rebuffing investor calls to buy back shares and will preserve cash for future acquisitions.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Many of the people rushing to buy an iPhone 6 tomorrow will fund the purchase with a currency that’s growing in value: old iPhones.
 Installment Plans Getting customers to buy new phones is especially important under increasingly popular installment plans, in which consumers pay the whole value of new phones over several months in return for lower service rates.
 Grilled Chicken TPG Capital, based in Fort Worth, Texas, and Abraaj Group Ltd, a Dubai buyout firm, are nearing a deal to buy a majority stake in Saudi Arabian fast-food chain Kudu, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 The MSCI World Index, which tracks developed equity markets around the globe, is up 116 percent since its March 2009 low -- higher prices make it harder for private-equity firms to find bargain companies to buy.
 Royal Philips Electronics NV, the world’s largest lighting company, agreed to buy a 51 percent stake in Saudi Arabia’s General Lighting Co.
 Since then, Sprint named a new chief executive officer, Marcelo Claure, after abandoning talks to buy T-Mobile.
 Banks can now either accept zero returns on that money or use it for auto and motorcycle loans, or to buy credit portfolios and bonds from smaller lenders.
 Car Loans “The problem is that the demand to buy vehicles isn’t hot nowadays,” said Paulo Duailibi, head of retail products at Banco Santander Brasil SA.
 The central bank’s attempt to goad lenders into buying portfolios from mid-size competitors, freeing up their capacity for new loans, is also unlikely to find success, said Antonio Hermann de Azevedo, Banco BMG SA’s chief executive officer.
 Loan Purchases “No bank will be buying loan books after these measures because there aren’t many loan books to buy,” he said in a telephone interview, explaining that mid-size banks retreated from lending because of the slowing economy and to keep delinquencies under control.
 Always Interested Bristow said that while he probably wouldn’t look to buy the rest of Kibali, his company would study other assets AngloGold might look to sell.
 Emirates NBD, the second-biggest bank, greets customers with a message encouraging them to buy shares in the IPO through its automated teller machines or when they log in to their accounts online.
 For the banks, lending to customers to buy stock is a way to put their ample supplies of cash to work.
 Allergan, the maker of the anti-wrinkle treatment Botox, was said to be in talks to buy Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 Amcon was set up in 2010 to buy bad loans and took over three of the eight lenders it rescued as part of a 620 billion-naira ($38 billion) bailout.
 willseek a $675 billion term loan to buy Tim Hortons Inc, thelargest financing of its kind since the collapse of LehmanBrothers Holdings Inc.
 Tencent, which in June agreed to buy a stake in 58com to bolster its online content to compete with Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, fell 33 percent to HK$122.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 It’s likely to make loans scarcer in an industry that relies on debt to buy the dull, rough diamonds that are finished into jewelry.
 “If I’m going to get a million shares of Alibaba, I need to have money to buy that.
 lost 1 percent to $4624 after agreeing to buy Mojang AB, the software company behind the popular game Minecraft, for $25 billion, in a bid to boost its Xbox and mobile business.
 Yesterday’s settlement was disclosed minutes after Judge Robert Hildyard issued a verdict saying Barclays misused the information to buy Tricorona AB in 2010.
 agreed to buy 22 office properties in the US.
 The bonds also have the appeal of being relatively easy to buy and sell, in contrast with most speculative-grade securities issued for stand-alone projects such as retirement communities, fertilizer plants and charter schools.
 The company agreed in August to buy less than 10 percent of Gumi Inc, the Japanese maker of role-playing games including Genjuhime Monster Princess, and plans to set up a 10 billion yen fund to invest in other local game developers.
 “If I’m going to get a million shares of Alibaba, I need to have money to buy that.
 The central bank also plans next month to release details of a program to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 The ultimate value of the TLTROs and programs to buy covered bonds and asset-backed securities will be 985 billion euros, according to the Bloomberg survey.
 regulators, were part of its defense of the deal to buy No.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Mahindra & Mahindra Ltd, India’s largest maker of tractors and sport-utility vehicles, is in advanced talks to buy PSA Peugeot Citroen’s scooter business, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 “That means they have to buy everything from local suppliers” Norinco declined to comment on the company’s business strategy or make executives available for comment after five e-mails and several phone calls to the company’s public relations representatives.
 With a wider choice of other beverages to buy, beer has lost some of its status.
 agreed to buy for $21 billion.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s central bank increased interest rates sooner than investors and analysts forecast to buy policy makers credibility two days after President Dilma Rousseff’s re-election sparked a sell-off in assets.
 cable company Comcast, seeking to buy No.
 Today, it announced a deal to buy interests in deepwater Indonesia to expand in Southeast Asia.
 Aiming to build its video business, AT&T agreed in May to buy El Segundo, California-based DirecTV.
 agreed this week to buy the Waldorf Astoria hotel for $195 billion.
 Norway’s Norges Bank Investment Management last month agreed to buy stakes in three Boston Properties Inc.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Wereldhave NV agreed to buy six French shopping centers for 850 million euros ($11 billion) and plans to finance part of the deal by selling shares.
 New Hotels With Brazil’s economic growth weakened, Iguatemi’s future expansion will come by taking advantage of low prices to buy stakes in new and existing malls, as well as adding mixed-use commercial towers and hotels to shopping centers.
 “There’s a lot of space to buy into,” Betts said.
 Australian police alleged in 2011 that Securency International Pty paid kickbacks to government officials in Indonesia, Malaysia, Nepal and Vietnam to persuade them to buy the company’s weather-resistant plastic bank notes.
 Numericable shareholders will get preferential rights to buy new shares at 1782 euros apiece, the Champs Sur Marne, France-based cable provider said today.
 Altice agreed to buy SFR, France’s second-largest phone company, for $23 billion from Vivendi SA in April.
 and ConocoPhillips -- are in a position to buy their way to more acreage.
 The company is looking to buy gold mines in Africa that would raise its annual production to about 1 million ounces, Gordon said.
 He doesn’t expect the company to buy up competitors or low-priced mining assets until coal prices start to rebound, he said.
 Norilsk and a group of banks and private investors are raising funds to buy palladium stockpiles from Russia’s central bank, the company said Sept.
 plunged the most in six years after the Chinese natural gas supplier agreed to buy gas refueling stations in North America from company Chairman Wang Yusuo and his wife.
 In 2005 he played a game of chicken with General Motors Co, threatening to enforce a contract that would have required the struggling American company to buy even-dodgier Fiat; he walked away with a $2 billion cash settlement.
 That’s one reason the company cites for investing in Bugatti: the ultra-high-end car shows people who might want to buy its other luxury brands what VW is capable of doing.
 10 amid concern the European Central Bank will face obstacles in its plan to buy securitized debt as a means of boosting inflation and growth.
 Regulatory Pressure Bank of America, Deutsche Bank and Credit Suisse backed away from financing Vista Equity Partners’ more than $4 billion deal to buy Palo Alto, California-based Tibco Software Inc, which JPMorgan and Jefferies LLC are underwriting, according to two people with knowledge of the buyout announced last month.
 While investors appreciate regulators’ concerns, ultimately they will decide whether loans are too risky or not to buy, said Jonathan Insull, a New York-based money manager at Crescent Capital Group LP, which oversees about $15 billion of speculative-grade debt.
 In July, Seattle-based Zillow agreed to buy San Francisco-based Trulia Inc.
 South Korea has been reviewing its missile-defense options, including whether to buy Lockheed Martin Corp’s Terminal High-Altitude Area Defense system, known as THAAD.
 government offered to buy electricity at a price that’s almost double today’s market rate under a 35-year contract.
 Rules meant to safeguard markets after the 2008 financial crisis prompted the traditional middlemen in the bond market -- the world’s largest banks -- to pare back their operations, making it harder for investors to buy and sell debt.
 If investors turn that down, then they may support Dollar General’s tender offer to buy Family Dollar, which would remove the need to revamp the board.
 will give the Malaysian group greater access to the European market, while asset-rich Wilmar is probably the best company to buy over the long term, Mistry told reporters.
 Mistry, who’s traded edible oils for more than three decades, said in September that it was a good time to buy palm oil companies, without identifying individual stocks, and reiterated that call yesterday at the conference.
 “If you’re looking at something over the long term, it’s probably the best palm oil company to buy.
 9 offered 107 billion pounds ($171 billion) for London-listed New Britain Palm Oil to buy plantations in Papua New Guinea.
 “I am happy to repeat that the present is a good time to buy plantation and processing company equities,” Mistry told the conference yesterday.
 They’re also eager to ensure Rio executives would remain in key roles in a merger that would probably be billed as a combination of equals, especially after Glasenberg largely ejected Xstrata Plc managers after Glencore agreed to buy that company in 2012, one of the people said.
 is accelerating a real estate deal spree, spending $585 million to buy more than half of a Silicon Valley office park and agreeing to lease an entire campus in development to make space for its growing workforce.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s Cutrale Group and Safra Group boosted their offer to buy Chiquita Brands International Inc.
 “If a nuclear disaster happens, nobody’s going to buy another single bottle of shochu or another single piece of kushiage from us,” said Kazuya Tanaka, an Ichikikushikino real estate agent who became a city councilman after the Fukushima accident to fight for the permanent idling of the Sendai plant.
 won European Union antitrust approval to buy messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 agreed to buy the company for $122 billion.
 JSR soared 65 percent to 1,875 yen after saying it plans to buy back up to 21 percent of its shares for as much as 10 billion yen from Oct.
 It decided to buy 49 percent of Kalon and plans to acquire the remaining stake in the future, Fujifilm spokesman Takahiro Taguchi said, confirming an earlier report by the Nikkei.
 Operation Failure The BOJ bought 262 trillion yen of Japan’s treasury-discount bills from financial companies today after offering to buy the securities with yields at 0005 percentage point below market rates.
 “The BOJ has to continue to buy bills at a rapid pace until at least November to achieve its monetary-base target” Japan’s three-month treasury bill yield was minus 009 percent, while the six-month rate was minus 005 percent.
 Vodafone, the world’s second-largest wireless carrier by customers, agreed to buy Ono in March as part of a plan to add Internet and TV services across Europe.
 Trading Slump It’s become increasingly difficult to buy and sell debt as new regulations prompt Wall Street banks to curtail their holdings.
 At the end of the auction, SNCF retains a legal right to buy the stake at a 15 percent premium to the best bid.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Qatar Airways’s deal to buy as many as 20 Gulfstream business jets will more than double the size of the corporate charter fleet at the second-biggest Gulf carrier.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Private-equity investors are expected to buy European insurance assets in 2015 as more companies sell non-essential businesses, according to a Towers Watson report.
 “For sustainable, long-term investors it makes a very decent story to buy into” So far shareholders have been reluctant to ratify the story.
 Last month, SAP agreed to buy Concur Technologies Inc.
 Under the terms of the 2013 agreement, Merrimack, New Hampshire-based GT Advanced was required to supply millions of units of sapphire that Apple wasn’t obligated to buy, and had to maintain certain key employees, Squiller said.
 “A couple of the builders said to me, ‘What will it take for you to buy this home?’ That’s kind of drastic when they say something like that.
 “If people qualify to buy, there are some great deals to be had,” Stacia Ehlen said.
 Marubeni and Winsway Enterprises Holdings agreed to buy stakes in Calgary-based Grande Cache in 2011, the year that the price of coal peaked, paying a 70 percent premium over its market value on the Toronto Stock Exchange.
 Up Energy Development Group has agreed to buy Marubeni’s 40 percent and Winsway’s 427 percent stakes in the Canadian miner, and will assume its obligations including a bank loan, the Hong Kong-listed company said in a statement yesterday.
 Buyback Right Marubeni retains the right to buy back 1578 percent of Grand Cache, and Winsway 1686 percent, over the next five years, according to Up Energy’s statement.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Norway’s sovereign wealth fund, the world’s largest, agreed to buy the Bank of America Merrill Lynch Financial Centre in London for 5825 million pounds ($944 million) as it expands its bet on the UK.
 “GIC’s decision must have been driven by broader portfolio considerations” Norway’s state fund in 2010 agreed to buy a $772 million stake in London’s Regent Street from the Crown Estate and in August snapped up a stake in London’s Mayfair district for 343 million pounds.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- AEW Europe plans to buy as much as 4 billion euros ($5 billion) of European real estate in the next three years as demand from Asian investors spreads across the region.
 The company is putting together a group of investors to buy out LSK’s stake, he said.
 “I don’t think it would be prudent for CEZ to buy Enel’s entire stake in Slovenske Elektrarne,” Benes said.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- The euro climbed the most since March as the European Central Bank failed to provide details on the size of a plan to buy private debt, curbing bets it would expand the ECB’s balance sheet enough to weaken the currency.
 The euro gained from almost a two-year low as ECB President Mario Draghi unveiled plans to buy covered bonds and asset-backed securities for at least two years.
 “Even when prices go down, it’s hard to buy paper,” said Gershon Distenfeld, the New York-based director of high-yield debt at AllianceBernstein Holdings LP.
 Comcast, which is seeking regulatory approval to buy rival Time Warner Cable Inc.
 In a short sale, an investor sells a security it doesn’t own, betting the price will decline before it has to buy the shares to close the trade.
 People applying for a loan to buy a second home may get lower down payments and mortgage rates that were previously only available to first-time home buyers so long as they have paid off their initial mortgage, the People’s Bank of China said in a statement on Sept.
 The airline announced a decision to buy double-decker A380s and start an international business-class service in 2010, breaking from the company’s model of low-fare travel using single-aisle Boeing Co.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Endo International Plc agreed to buy Auxilium Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 16 value, when Endo announced that it wanted to buy the Chesterbrook, Pennsylvania-based drugmaker for $2810 a share.
 In addition, investors have forced lenders to buy back more than $81 billion of soured home loans because of faulty underwriting.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- The Iraqi government has asked to buy 800 more Hellfire missiles from the US, according to a Pentagon spokeswoman.
 “Buyers are not in the slightest hurry to buy,” Celeres’ Galvao said.
 “You could risk losing some of the talent you’re trying to buy in the process” GFI Chairman Gooch and Lutnick still own large portions of the competing companies they founded.
 BGC had wanted to buy its rival for years and was surprised when the CME deal was announced, according to a September statement by BGC.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Germany’s 10-year bonds halted a six-day advance as European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said a plan to buy asset-backed securities to boost the economy would begin this quarter.
 The volatility caught traders off guard, spurring them to buy back futures to cover short sales and contributing to a spike in the VIX during that time, according to Ramon Verastegui, the head of engineering and strategy at Societe Generale SA.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- As bets pile up against Japanese stocks, investors with $293 billion in client assets see the pessimism as a signal to buy.
 “These measures will result in savings that can be put to more productive use such as spending on education and health care, a better and wider public transportation system, and on the country’s security” Before the latest adjustment, Malaysia was among the 10 cheapest places to buy gasoline in a Bloomberg ranking of 61 countries using data as of April.
 Gordon, who represented Oracle Corp’s Larry Ellison, music mogul David Geffen and Oprah Winfrey in their unsuccessful bid to buy the Los Angeles Clippers.
 said it intends to use about $16 billion in external financing to buy Covidien, reaffirming its commitment to complete the acquisition of the drugmaker.
 The Moscow-based company’s billionaire Chief Executive Officer Vagit Alekperov said in May that he would use the $600 million of dividends he expected to receive this year to buy more shares, according to the letter.
 The ECB has already implemented a negative deposit rate, offered cheap loans to banks and unveiled a plan to buy asset-backed securities.
 “You would think that people would be lining up now to get mortgages to buy a home,” Buffett said today at a conference hosted by Fortune magazine in Laguna Niguel, California.
 Buffett agreed last week to buy Van Tuyl Group, a collection of 78 car dealerships, in a bet that the industry will consolidate.
 “If you are able to buy them at the right entry point, particularly when the sentiment is very negative, like now, you can really make a lot of money,” Jimenez Crespo said.
 Google, betting that connected homes will help spread its technology and services, paid $32 billion in February to buy Nest, which in turn bought in-home camera company Dropcam Inc.
 In a statement yesterday, Techint’s Ternium SA subsidiary agreed to buy an additional 10 percent stake, bringing its holding to 38 percent.
 DirecTV has been testing wireless Internet access, when it may make more sense to buy large landline networks that already have broadband subscribers, he said.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to engage management and the board when they disclose their holdings in a filing with the US.
 It will start purchasing covered bonds this month and plans to buy asset-backed securities from this quarter.
 Beale, who took over as CEO of the world’s oldest insurance market in January, said many businesses are not yet alert to the risks of an attack on their computer systems or the need to buy coverage.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Apax Partners LLP agreed to buy Exact Holding NV for 730 million euros ($930 million) to back the Dutch business-software provider’s push into cloud computing.
 Private-equity firm Advent International agreed in November to buy cloud-software maker Unit4 for about 115 billion euros.
 You have this heavy penalty environment and you want people to lend more: Those are two conflicting things” Buyback Offenses Watt, a former Democratic congressman who oversees Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, outlined the types of offenses, including misrepresentations and data inaccuracies, that will require banks to buy back defaulted loans over their lifespan.
 Reassess Overlays To broaden lending, Watt added, Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac may start to buy mortgages with down payments as low as 3 percent.
 “When you align a number of technical indicators together, it’s telling you to buy,” said Hiroichi Nishi, an equities manager at SMBC Nikko Securities Inc.
 The company agreed to buy DramaFever, which offers Korean TV programs online for English-language viewers, adding to the Japanese carrier’s spate of online content acquisitions.
 It also had $46 billion in debt, thanks in part to buybacks it financed with borrowings.
 Altice this year agreed to buy French mobile-phone carrier SFR in a $23 billion deal as part of a plan to combine the asset with Drahi’s Numericable Group.
 Iliad SA yesterday scrapped its offer to buy a majority stake in T-Mobile, joining Sprint Corp.
 Legere, speaking two weeks ago at a conference in Seattle, said his employees still have post-traumatic stress disorder from AT&T’s failed attempt to buy the wireless carrier in 2011.
 The retailer plans to raise capital by offering shareholders $625 million of notes plus warrants to buy additional stock, an attempt to give the company time to return to profitability.
 rallied 84 percent, the biggest gain in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index, to $6543 after a partnership it controls agreed to buy QEP Resources Inc’s natural-gas pipeline and processing unit for $25 billion.
 “Banks have more capital and their ability to support losses is greater now than it was” Reassured by the capital banks have raised, investors’ new-found readiness to buy securities that can incur losses even before equity suffers has helped boost the CoCo market to about $62 billion within 18 months of the first notes being sold.
 The Paris-based telecommunications provider abandoned a plan to buy a majority stake in T-Mobile US Inc.
 The company lined up $578 million in prepayment loans from Apple to buy equipment to make the material, which wasn’t included in the latest version of the iPhone.
 Support for anti-euro groups such as Alternative for Germany has risen and the ECB’s latest plan to buy assets sparked an outcry within all major parties.
 Germany’s Federal Constitutional Court has already expressed doubts about the legality of the two-year-old pledge to buy bonds of stressed countries after a challenge by a German lawmaker and a group of academics.
 agreed to buy UK.
 Dealmaking in the semiconductor industry has picked up this year, with Infineon Technologies AG agreeing in August to buy International Rectifier Corp.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Intesa Sanpaolo SpA and UniCredit SpA, Italy’s biggest lenders, led European banking stocks lower after the European Central Bank failed to provide details on a plan to buy securities that were designed to unlock lending.
 say it’s time to buy after yields on high-yield, high-risk securities rose to the highest in a year on Sept.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Russian billionaire Viktor Kharitonin agreed to buy a majority stake in the Nuerburgring, the German race track known as Green Hell for its challenging Formula One course.
 Kharitonin, chairman of Moscow-based Pharmstandard OJSC, agreed to buy two-thirds of the company that controls the Nuerburgring, according to a statement from the property’s administrators today.
 Kharitonin stepped in after Capricorn Automotive GmbH, an auto-parts maker that agreed to buy the Nuerburgring in March, failed to complete the acquisition, said Pietro Nuvoloni, a spokesman for the administrators.
 At least 16 Latinos have filed consumer complaints with the Illinois attorney general, saying Herbalife duped them into buying tens of thousands of dollars worth of products they couldn’t sell.
 “It is certainly possible fair value could fall significantly” For Olivia Engel, State Street Corp’s Sydney-based head of Asia-Pacific active quantitative equity, the valuations are a reason not to buy.
 last month agreed to buy Producers Ag Insurance Group from CUNA Mutual Group for $110 million to diversify into the business of guarding farmers against losses.
 cable-television company says it will shed 25 million customers in Detroit and other Midwestern and Southern communities as part of a plan to buy No.
 Charter, which had sought to buy Time Warner Cable, would own a 33 percent interest in GreatLand and become the second-largest US.
 “Just the appointment of the new central bank governor is an indication that there are still things we get right as a country” While FirstRand pulled out of the bidding to buy Mainstreet Bank Ltd, it’s still looking for “bolt-on acquisitions” in Nigeria, said Nxasana.
 agreed to buy three of its operating units for $44 billion, in the year’s largest energy deal.
 to buy 24 million rand ($219 million)worth of shares in television equipment company Ellies HoldingsLtd.
 to buy Greece’s government bonds in April, last week said it has sold all its holdings of the nation’s debt on expectations that the European Central Bank won’t “launch a full-blown quantitative easing” program of securities purchases that will support the market.
 The company entered into talks with Americana in 2012 to buy its food business, one of the people said.
 “At half of YHOO, 10B<Twitter and small pct of major media companies, someone will try to buy them” Cuban, 56, is buying a stock that is trading near its lowest level in five months after slumping more than 20 percent in two days.
 “The buy-the-dip philosophy came back stronger than ever as everybody said the correction is behind us and the opportunity to buy stocks on sale is now,” Brian Peery, co-portfolio manager at Novato, California-based Hennessy Advisors Inc, said by phone.
 The biotechnology drug company will raise its dividend 30 percent in the first quarter 2015 and plans to buy back as much as $2 billion of stock through the end of next year.
 Earlier this year, Iliad tried to get its hands on Bouygues’s mobile network as Bouygues sought to buy Vivendi SA’s SFR -- only to have the plan scuttled when Vivendi sold SFR to Numericable Group.
 Today’s report from AB InBev comes amid speculation that the brewer could seek to buy its main competitor SABMiller, the maker of Grolsch and Peroni.
 So in some sense you could say that sanctions have helped us with a number of decisions that will cut costs’’ On plan to buy Morgan Stanley’s oil trading unit: ‘‘I want to talk about our intentions.
 I think he has weighed all of these risks when deciding to buy.
 Greek and Portuguese bonds extended their gains from yesterday even as ECB Governing Council member Luc Coene said there was “no concrete proposal” to buy corporate bonds.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s Cutrale Group and Safra Group again increased their unsolicited joint bid to buy banana producer Chiquita Brands International Inc.
 Investors will demand a concession to buy longer-dated debt as the Fed withdraws from a market where it bought 41 percent of this year’s gross issuance of Treasuries due in more than 20 years, Pimco said in a report.
 ECB President Mario Draghi has said he’ll start a programthis month to buy asset-backed securities and covered bondsPolicy makers gathering today in Italy are under pressure to actafter his pledge to add as much as 1 trillion euros ($126trillion) to the bank’s balance sheet failed to rein in bets ona worsening price outlook in the euro area.
 The European Central Bank is expected to announce today details of its plan to buy asset-backed securities after it unveiled a series of stimulus measures to boost credit lending and combat the threat of deflation.
 power company by market value, agreed to buy a 150-megawatt solar project in California from First Solar Inc.
 Sempra Energy’s San Diego Gas & Electric has agreed to buy power from the solar farm under a 25-year contract.
 Fidelity Worldwide Investment’s Dominic Rossi, who oversees global equities from London at the fund manager, said today that he plans to buy US.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, overhaul and then sell them.
 District Judge David Carter that Ackman’s Pershing Square Capital Management LP used inside information about Valeant’s plans to buy the shares starting in February.
 “Pershing Square got the opportunity to buy $4 billion of Allergan stock knowing that a hostile bid at a higher price was imminent,” Wald said.
 Valeant, based in Laval, Quebec, is seeking to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 Pershing Square isn’t offering to buy Allergan’s shares as part of the Valeant bid; it doesn’t control the terms of the offer; and it won’t have control over the resulting company, Allergan said.
 The move came after French government officials said they were concerned that corporate decision-making was leaving the country, illustrated most recently by General Electric Co’s effort to buy Alstom SA.
 “But there are a number of lingering questions around readiness and other market structure issues that we hope to learn more about” Non-deliverable forwards are contracts to buy or sell a currency in the future that are settled with cash rather than delivery of the currency.
 Last month, ZF Friedrichshafen AG agreed to buy TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 Los Angeles-based Toms Shoes said in August that Bain agreed to buy a stake in the business and that Jefferies had committed to finance the deal.
 They had to cart over all the clients’ accounts and the systems” DBS, Southeast Asia’s biggest bank, said in March it agreed to buy the French bank’s private-banking operations in Singapore and Hong Kong as well as “selected parts” of its trust business for $220 million.
 “This is a good way for SolarCity to broaden the range of investors who are able to buy solar bonds, a new asset class,” Pavel Molchanov, an analyst at Raymond James in Houston, said today in an e-mail.
 “There will be a lower share price to buy into this company” CIMB cut its rating on Osim to hold from add and reduced its share-price forecast by 41 percent to S$237.
 The Federal Reserve is poised to end a program this month of asset-buying that drove investors to buy stocks, bonds and currencies in developing nations.
 Chiquita Brands is scheduled to hold a shareholder meeting for a vote on its plan to buy Fyffes.
 agreed to buy a controlling stake in the Candelaria copper mining complex in Chile from Freeport-McMoRan Inc.
 Another option considered was for UBS to buy a small bank, transfer the undeclared “black accounts” to it and then sell the acquisition.
 The New York firm that’s been investing money for the German automotive family was in talks earlier this year to buy a family-owned business based in California, said the person familiar.
 Amcon was set up in 2010 to buy bad loans and stabilize Nigeria’s banking industry after a debt crisis threatened the industry with collapse.
 “The big mistake in the past was where borrowers were using their family home, taking some positive equity out,” to buy properties for lease, said Fergal McGrath, chief executive officer of Dublin-based Dilosk Ltd, which plans to start lending at the end of the year.
 “We have certainly seen more interest in buy-to-let in recent months” Quirke said AIB borrowers could be couples who have paid more than half of their own mortgage and are trying to buy a property for their adult children before prices rise too much.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi’s plan to buy asset-backed securities may give Irish banks access to cheaper money and buttress a lending revival.
 Draghi’s willingness to buy asset-backed securities and RMBS starting this month should make them easier to sell, resulting in lower coupon payments for Dilosk on the proposed securities.
 As a condition for European approval, Drillisch, a smaller carrier that doesn’t own a network, agreed to buy as much as 20 percent of the merged company’s network capacity over five years.
 Publishing targeted weightings in advance would move markets, forcing the fund to buy at highs and sell at lows, he said in an interview on Oct.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 CFO’s View Chief Financial Officer Ramon Leal said Alfa hasn’t decidedwhether to buy, maintain or reduce its stake in Bogota-basedPacific, Colombia’s second-largest oil company.
 It could be something else, orsome other company, so we want to keep flexibility” David Neuhauser, a money manager at Livermore PartnersInc, an energy-focused hedge fund located in Northbrook,Illinois, said the size of Alfa’s stake in Pacific signals thatthe Mexican company is committed to buying the rest.
 Companies with lower ratings are unlikely to sell bonds in India, regardless of the coupon, because local investors tend to buy only high-grade credits, S&P said.
 The 47-year-old began using the iPad largely because it added an element of cool to his stores, and he is now looking for more reasons to buy.
 as well as Chinese investors had approached him through bankers to buy all or part of Meriton.
 to buy Greece’s government bonds in April, has sold all its holdings of the nation’s debt.
 Tata Motors’ Jain says he thinks gradually increasing the fuel price will eventually make Indonesians more likely to buy smaller cars.
 agreed to buy Louisiana utility Cleco Corp.
 Last month, Macquarie, a specialist in investing in regulated infrastructure assets, appeared to be faltering in its attempts to buy the utility because co-investors were skeptical of the returns, people familiar with the matter said at the time.
 “I don’t think the oversight on trading is going to relax anytime soon” Nasdaq Messages Athena’s strategy was allegedly to take advantage of messages that Nasdaq sent out ahead of its close, which tell traders if there are imbalances between orders to buy and sell certain stocks.
 If an imbalance message showed a buy imbalance of 10,000 in a company’s shares, Athena would place an order to sell 10,000 shares at the close and then try to buy those 10,000 shares in the final few minutes of the day, the SEC said.
 Companies can have an advantage to buyout firms in competitive bidding processes because they often have access to cheaper financing, and can reap more cost savings by integrating acquisitions with existing businesses.
 The divestments come as Siemens spends $76 billion to buy Dresser-Rand Inc.
 fracking market” Kaeser is concentrating on that industry as he seeks to catch up with the profitability of General Electric Co, which has agreed to buy France’s Alstom SA to expand its own energy offering.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in bets that the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 Cameras capture the kids’ reactions, and parents later have a chance to buy the photos.
 The plan gives foreign investors unprecedented access to mainland shares while providing Chinese investors a channel to buy Hong Kong-listed equities.
 and ConocoPhillips -- are in a position to buy their way to more acreage” It makes us think that the $5 we saved at the gas pump isn’t really that much at all.
 and 11 states alleging the companies paid kickbacks to Medco Health Solutions Inc, based in Franklin Lakes, New Jersey, then the largest manager of employee prescription-drug benefits, to buy and recommend brand-name drugs including London-based AstraZeneca’s heartburn pill Nexium.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Enterprise Products Partners LP bought a stake in Oiltanking Partners LP and offered to buy the rest of the company in a proposal worth as much as $6 billion, the latest bet on the growing market for US.
 Oi’s debt load led Bava to cut the highest dividend yield in the global telecommunications industry last year, initiate the Portuguese merger and hire Banco BTG Pactual SA to act as a vehicle to buy Tim Participacoes SA.
 It was able to buy oil at lower prices than analysts expected because of its ability to move it on pipelines and a fleet of more than 3,200 rail cars.
 small businesses are dropping health insurance for their workers, as Obamacare lets them send employees to new marketplaces where they can often get subsidies from the government to buy coverage.
 The elimination of fuel subsidies that have cost Petrobras at least 60 billion reais during Rousseff’s first term would boost the company’s profit and its ability to buy goods and services from suppliers such as Halliburton, according to the Instituto Brasileiro de Petroleo, or IBP, a group that lobbies for the industry.
 Wealthy urbanites, we learned, were laying out noteworthy sums -- $25,000 in Brooklyn! $95,000 in Boston! -- to buy indoor parking spaces for their favorite rides via condominium-like real-estate deals.
 Dubai shares are stringing together two days of gains for the first time this month as global markets rebound on the European Central Bank’s decision to buy government debt to stimulate the region’s economy.
 announced plans to buy a company that owns a West Texas prospect for $71 billion, or about $50,000 an acre.
 Encana will pay $5850 a share to buy Athlon Energy Inc, a four-year-old Fort Worth, Texas-based driller backed by buyout firm Apollo Global Management LLC.
 Cliffs also has announced a plan to buy back as much as $200 million of shares and agreed with lenders to amend a credit facility, allowing the company to proceed with the stock repurchases.
 He is advising investors to buy the so-called defensive shares, which typically refers to stocks of software, consumer and drug companies.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- German bonds fell, pushing 10-year yields up the most in two weeks, as investors reassessed prospects for additional European Central Bank easing measures after it gave only outlines of a plan to buy private securities.
 “The ECB looks set to adopt a wait-and-see stance but eventually will introduce QE,” he said, referring to buying sovereign bonds, or quantitative easing.
 Focusing on plans to buy private debt as soon as this month to buoy euro-area inflation that’s the weakest in five years, Draghi yesterday left the option of purchasing government bonds in his toolbox.
 Portuguese and Greek bonds climbed after Draghi said the ECB was prepared to buy ABS from nations rated below investment grade.
 France’s Christian Noyer joined policy makers from Germany and Austria in opposing a program to buy asset-backed securities, according to two euro-area officials.
 Banco Santander SA, Spain’s biggest bank, agreed to buy GE Money Bank AB, which operates in Sweden, Denmark and Norway, for about 700 million euros ($953 million).
 GE agreed in 2007 to buy BPH from UniCredit SpA to take advantage of economic growth in eastern Europe.
 Established lenders are reluctant to ease their rules out of concern that Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac and FHA will force them to buy back bad loans with underwriting errors.
 Eager to avoid further increases or moving to a smaller place, they began looking to buy another home.
 Wall Street has been willing to buy and bundle into securities only high quality mortgages on expensive homes, known as jumbos.
 Hoping to buy another home before prices rose too much, Dave, whose credit score had fallen to about 660, got a mortgage from Atlanta-based Angel Oak Home Loans to buy a four-bedroom house for $260,000 in Woodstock, Georgia, with 20 percent down.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, overhaul and then sell them.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Nedbank Group Ltd, the South African lender controlled by Old Mutual Plc, has agreed to buy 20 percent of Ecobank Transnational Inc, even after the Lome, Togo-based company sold a stake to a Qatari bank.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander Brasil SA tumbled as much as 12 percent, the biggest intraday drop since January, as its Spanish parent prepares to conclude an offer to buy 25 percent of the bank it doesn’t already own.
 Purchasing Protection A month ago, investors were rushing to buy stock hedges during a stretch in which the MSCI Emerging Markets Index lost 12 percent.
 The outflows have prompted derivatives traders to buy options to protect against declines in equities.
 Companies have to buy more water from distant suppliers and are spending more to purify the little water they can get from current reserves, according to Ademar Ribeiro Romeiro, a professor at State University of Campinas.
 QIA today agreed to buy 199 percent of Lifestyle, the owner of the Sogo department store in Hong Kong, for about HK$478 billion ($616 million).
 Dealers, which historically used their own money to buy bonds off clients as markets soured, have been sellers, too.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy Philadelphia Financial Group Inc.
 telephone company by revenue, followed in May with its $485 billion agreement to buy satellite TV provider DirecTV.
 lost 21 percent after agreeing to buy a controlling stake in the Candelaria copper mining complex in Chile from Freeport-McMoRan Inc.
 Sinovel’s bondholders last month rejected a plan to allow its Jiangsu unit to use as much as 700 million yuan to buy some of 26 billion yuan of debt the company sold in 2011.
 agreed to buy Aviv REIT Inc.
 agreed to buy Griffin-American Healthcare REIT II for about $34 billion.
 Getting another layer of protection would make them “feel confident when offering these loans -- giving more of our nation’s heroes a chance to buy a home in the country they risked everything to protect” Smaller Lenders When smaller lenders do offer VA loans, they often sell the servicing contracts to larger lenders to get rid of the default risk, said Tozer of Ginnie Mae, which guarantees $15 trillion of bonds mostly backed by FHA and VA loans.
 The underwriters have been given an option to buy another 24 million shares of the unit within 30 days, the lender said.
 Where they don’t agree is on what industries to buy before the reports start rolling in, though there is some common ground: Subramanian is bullish on health-care and financial stocks and advises avoiding consumer-staples and energy companies.
 “Our job will be to ensure that the players receive their fair share of the results of their efforts and that we do everything possible to maintain the growth and popularity of the game” Bloomberg reported in July that Fox, the Rupert Murdoch-controlled company that tried to buy Time Warner this year, was interested in pursuing the NBA rights.
 has rallied three times as fast as the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index since agreeing to buy WhatsApp Inc.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Spanish government bonds dropped for the first time in three days as European Central Bank President Mario Draghi failed to provide details on the size of a plan to buy private securities to boost the economy.
 Greek bonds rose as Draghi said the ECB was prepared to buy ABS from nations rated below investment grade.
 One way of gauging market sentiment is to compare how much it costs to buy options that protect against losses in shares this month versus those timed to expire in 90 days.
 Though she knew about Nissan’s no-frills brand, she paid almost 50 percent more than the top-end version of the Go to buy a Grand i10 from Hyundai Motor Co.
 Sales last quarter got a boost as VMware signed more customers to multiyear agreements and persuaded them to buy tools for managing their systems, according to a note from Mizuho’s Lamba, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 that have the necessary income and appetite to buy the machine, according to Louis Kim, Hewlett-Packard’s vice president of product management.
 plans to buy the 30 percent of Brookfield Residential Properties Inc.
 The country also provides subsidies to consumers in the form of loans to buy and install batteries alongside solar panels.
 It plans to buy back as much as $2 billion through the end of 2015 and has the authorization to buy back $4 billion in total.
 Stockholm-based Cevian, which seeks to buy undervalued stocks, has also increased its stake in ThyssenKrupp AG this year, and now owns 15 percent of the German steelmaker, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Telefonica, owner of the Vivo brand in Brazil, agreed to buy Vivendi SA’s local broadband provider GVT last month.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- KPMG LLP and the UK’s markets regulator failed to spot a 15 billion-pound ($24 billion) shortfall at Co-Operative Bank Plc that derailed its plan to buy Lloyds Banking Group Plc branches, British lawmakers said.
 Puts give the right to sell a stock at a certain price, while calls allow the owner to buy it at a set level.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Actavis Plc, the drugmaker that made three acquisitions this year, agreed to buy Durata Therapeutics Inc.
 Customers including farmers, rural homeowners and schools pay little to nothing up front and sign long-term contracts to buy electricity produced by United Wind systems.
 In that case, Fintech will pay Telecom Italia $175 million in compensation and Telecom Italia gets an option to buy back Sofora shares bought by Fintech.
 A verdict that allows the transfer of shares to buyers is “a precondition” for the sale process to resume, he said.
 10 allowed the government to proceed with the sale on condition it won’t transfer shares to buyers until a ruling.
 He said his decision to buy more will “depend on the terms” of the sale.
 Sven Richter, head of frontier markets at Johannesburg-based Renaissance Asset Management, which owns shares in Oil and Gas and Pakistani banks, said he hasn’t decided yet whether to buy OGDC.
 “We are happy to buy Pakistan,” Richter said in a phone interview on Oct.
 to block Apple Inc’s mobile-payment technology presages a long fight over the fees and customer data collected when people use smartphones to buy stuff.
 “It’s about getting customers to buy stuff, and you don’t want to stop customers from buying stuff just because you don’t offer a payment alternative they chose to use,” he said.
 Target Corp, another MCX member, doesn’t allow Apple Pay for in-store transactions, though customers can use it to buy things on their phones through the chain’s mobile app.
 FHFA Plans Homebuilders extended gains after reports yesterday that the Federal Housing Finance Agency, which regulates Freddie Mac and Fannie Mae, plans new steps to encourage lending to buyers with less-than-perfect credit scores.
 plans to buy an additional 40 percent stake in Istanbul’s second-biggest airport to gain full control, people familiar with matter said.
 Malaysia Airports, which owns 60 percent of Istanbul Sabiha Gokcen Airport, plans to exercise its pre-emptive rights to buy the remainder from units of Turkish builder Limak Holding AS, said the people.
 A bid from Malaysia Airports would put an end to plans by TAV Havalimanlari, owner of Istanbul’s larger Ataturk airport, to buy the stake in a deal reached last month.
 Malaysia Airports, operator of airfields in the Southeast Asian country, had agreed in December to raise its stake in Sabiha Gokcen to 60 percent, paying 225 million euros to buy out Indian partner GMR Infrastructure Ltd.
 It currently has about 1,000 clients registered to buy and sell, and plans to increase that number in coming months.
 If overseas investors were to buy the developer’s bonds despite its high debt load, that would mean “its risks don’t look that high to some,” he said.
 “The reason is probably that they know that they need to open up the domestic market if they want to promote panda bonds” Growth Potential China’s central bank didn’t permit qualified foreign institutional investors to buy notes in the interbank market until March 2013.
 Employment gains are are lifting consumer confidence and giving more shoppers the money to buy gifts this year.
 About 52 percent of shoppers are planning to buy electronics, making them the most popular gift this year, the New York-based industry trade group said.
 TMK said in June that it plans to sell 56 million shares, or about a 6 percent stake, of existing shares, while state-held Rusnano said in August that it agreed to buy them.
 retreated the most since July 17 after it offered to buy a 51 percent stake in French carmaker PSA Peugeot Citroen’s scooter business, giving India’s biggest tractor maker access to European technology.
 In May, Cupertino, California’s Apple agreed to pay $3 billion to buy the headphones and streaming-music service Beats in the company’s biggest-ever purchase.
 Icahn sees “nothing wrong” with a tender offer as large as $100 billion for Apple to repurchase its stock, he said in an interview with Bloomberg Television’s Trish Regan, where he reiterated his praise for Cook while urging him to buy Apple’s “undervalued shares” faster.
 In February, he dropped his campaign to spur Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after the company stepped up repurchases.
 agreed to buy Van Tuyl Group, the largest privately owned US.
 A Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor license, known as a QFII, or Renminbi Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor license, known as an RQFII, is needed for foreign asset managers to buy A-shares.
 Once the license is obtained, the investor also needs to submit an application to China’s State Administration of Foreign Exchange for a specific dollar amount of investment quota that they can use to buy mainland stocks.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- A company controlled by Sweden’s Lundin family agreed to buy Kinross Gold Corp’s idled Fruta del Norte gold project in Ecuador for $240 million and will change its name to Lundin Gold Inc.
 The company, which has operations in the Americas, Russia and West Africa, acquired the project when it agreed to buy Aurelian Resources Inc.
 AbbVie, based in North Chicago, Illinois, had planned to buy Shire for an estimated $52 billion, then move the combined company’s legal address to the UK.
 The drugmaker walked away from a $114 billion attempt to buy London-based AstraZeneca, a purchase that would have boosted the company’s roster of medicines and moved its legal address overseas.
 agreed to buy 175 publications from Quebecor Inc.
 Watt’s plan to ease rules that can force them to buy back soured debt.
 Last month, the bank moved to buying jumbos with loan-to-value ratios as high as 85 percent, up from 80 percent, for mortgages as large as $15 million, he said.
 Borrowers who don’t have 20 percent equity have to buy mortgage insurance -- a monthly fee that can make refinancing too costly.
 Banks imposed strict rules after regulators forced them to buy back more than $80 billion of soured mortgages from Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac due to underwriting errors.
 “There are a number of Americans who want to buy a home, can afford to buy a home, who simply can’t get credit,” he said.
 Doubling Target Last week, Rocket almost doubled its target for proceeds and then advanced the date of its listing after winning commitments to buy shares from JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Mercuria Energy Group Ltd’s six-month-old agreement to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodities business for $35 billion was revised to cover only $800 million of assets, according to people familiar with the change.
 rooftop developer agreed in June to buy Silevo Inc, a maker of high-efficiency solar panels for about $200 million.
 “The best time to buy is before the shops get crowded,” said Anand, 27, as she eyed trinkets on velvet shelves at a store in Mumbai’s Zaveri Bazaar, India’s biggest jewelry market.
 A rush to buy will not materialize unless prices fall closer to $1,100, they said.
 Yield levels are low but that’s what you have to buy” Germany allotted the 1 percent securities due in August 2024 at an average yield of 093 percent.
 Randgold jumped 61 percent, following a gauge of mining companies higher, after HSBC advised investors to buy the stock.
 Severstal’s Cash “We prefer high cash-return stocks like Severstal,” JPMorgan’s Gorokhov wrote in his note, raising it to buy from neutral.
 AbbVie, which announced in July a plan to buy Dublin-based Shire and move its legal address abroad, said its board of directors will meet Oct.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- General Electric Co’s aircraft leasing division, the world’s largest, agreed to buy Milestone Aviation Group for $178 billion to add helicopters to its portfolio of rental assets.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Cyient Ltd, an Indian software services provider to the aerospace and automotive industries, plans to buy at least one more company this fiscal year, Chief Executive Officer Krishna Bodanapu said.
 agreed to buy TriZetto Corp.
 EBay said it has taken pains to reach out to buyers and sellers to reassure them that little will change with a split.
 Buy Puts “Investors have been using this move up in volatility to buy puts, with the expectation that the VIX will mean revert,” said Mandy Xu, a New York-based derivatives strategist at Credit Suisse Group AG.
 is offering an 85 percent premium to buy palm oil plantations in Papua New Guinea, betting land will become scarce to produce the edible oil used in food, cosmetics and biofuels.
 “We’re using this weakness to buy into names that got beaten up over the last week or so” Data Watch The S&P 500 fell yesterday to its lowest level since Aug.
 said it will remain an independent company after Silver Lake Management LLC shelved an attempt to buy it.
 Enterprise Hybrid Cloud Solution takes 28 days to set up and will cost in the hundreds of thousands of dollars, compared with nine to 12 months of setup and the millions of dollars it would cost for businesses to buy the products separately and stitch them all together, Burton said.
 mortgage-bond analysts in August also said it might be time for benchmark bond indexes to exclude the Fed’s holdings, because the current set-up “forces money managers to buy the sector even if spreads are rich” The share of the debt in Citigroup’s own BIG index would fall to 20 percent from 29 percent with such a switch, its analysts wrote.
 “We have to be a bit more cautious especially for companies that have high debt levels” before we make a recommendation to buy, said Lexter Azurin, the head of equity research at Unicapital Securities Inc.
 “Real money issaying this is an attractive level to buy stocks” To contact the reporters on this story:Callie Bost in New York at cbost2@bloombergnet;Eric Lam in Toronto at elam87@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story:Chris Nagi at chrisnagi@bloombergnetLynn Thomasson, Emma O’Brien Press spacebar to pause and continue.
 will proceed with its 352 million-euro ($449 million) bid to buy rival banana producer Fyffes Plc after rejecting a higher takeover offer from Brazil’s Cutrale Group and Safra Group.
 Cutrale, a closely held fruit juice company controlled by Jose Luis Cutrale, and banks controlled by Joseph Safra, Brazil’s second-richest man, are trying to derail Chiquita’s plan to buy Fyffes, a deal that was announced in March.
 The fund, which controls 694 percent of Malaysia Airlines, has offered to buy the shares it doesn’t already own for 138 billion ringgit ($422 million) and delist the company by the end of the year.
 Draghi pledged to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds for at least two years, and said that Greece and Cyprus must be subject to bailout programs to ensure their inclusion because their credit ratings are below investment grade.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Liberty Global Plc agreed to sell a Dutch pay-TV channel and to drop some clauses in contracts with broadcasters in return for European Union antitrust approval to buy Dutch cable operator Ziggo NV, regulators said.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- C&C Group Plc plunged after the Magners cider maker’s first-half earnings fell short of market expectations and as analysts questioned the logic of its approach to buy England-based Spirit Pub Co.
 In the late 1970s, the Hunts were accumulating so much silver they needed surrogates to buy it for them, said George Gero, who traded the metal at the Commodity Exchange Inc’s open outcry pit in New York for the investment bank Drexel Burnham Lambert.
 While Whitworth didn’t threaten a proxy contest aimed at gaining a board seat, he told the company he’d bring credibility and focus Hewlett-Packard on using its cash to buy back shares, increase its dividend or put more money into research and development.
 agreed last month to buy Taminco Corp, a producer of alkylamines whose sales are projected to grow at a faster pace than its own.
 The city agreed to renew a lease for a Syncora affiliate to operate a tunnel into Canada, and to give the bond insurer the option to buy land around the tunnel and a parking garage downtown.
 Anyone using above-average GDP gains as a signal to buy would have missed the 190 percent advance in the S&P 500 since March 2009 that rivals almost any rally in the past nine decades.
 Maybe going forward, we’ll see the economy catch up and the stock market may not have strong gains” Throughout the rally, corporate profits have been a better guide than GDP growth for when to buy stocks.
 The French company this year agreed to buy mobile-phone carrier SFR in a $23 billion deal as part of a plan to combine the asset with Drahi’s Numericable Group.
 There’s no specific plan to buy corporate bonds, ECB Governing Council member Luc Coene said this week in an interview with L’Echo newspaper.
 IBM has struggled to keep up with the industrywide shift, prompting Chief Executive Officer Ginni Rometty to buy SoftLayer Technologies Inc.
 Vodafone agreed to buy Kabel Deutschland in a $10 billion transaction that was completed in October last year.
 Teva is trying to buy more time to shift patients to a longer-acting version that won’t face generic competition until 2030.
 Iliad SA rallied 96 percent as it abandoned a plan to buy a majority stake in T-Mobile US Inc.
 The investor will use the so-called revolving credit facility to buy projects that include solar and wind power plants as well as waste and water processing facilities, it said today in an e-mailed statement.
 RHB will issue new shares to buy CIMB and units of both firms will form a “mega-Islamic bank” with Malaysia Building Society, the companies said Oct.
 Buyers of the book frequently also purchase Tyvek suits and respirators, according to Amazon, which encourages customers to buy all three together.
 He suggested price-sensitive buyers won’t miss the features that are disappearing, including the right to buy or be awarded complimentary upgrades to better seats and the right to get same-day stand-by or confirmed tickets.
 Siemens Chief Executive Officer Joe Kaeser is trying to build the Munich-based company around products for “electrification, automation and digitalization” Last month, he agreed to buy Dresser-Rand Inc.
 TD Securities analyst Jamie Somerville raised the stock to buy from hold.
 Those two are free-to-play games that encourage users to keep spending small sums to speed up their game progress, as opposed to a one-time payment to buy most iterations of Angry Birds.
Fortress Investment Group LLC (FIG), the first publicly traded hedge-fund and private-equity manager in the US, is seeking about $43 billion to buy distressed credit around the world as investment firms prepare for markets to sour, according to people familiar with the matter.
 He has announced a plan to buy as much as $200 million of shares and has sold a minority holding in a graphite mining company as part of a review of Cliffs’ assets.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Reynolds American Inc, the tobacco company that agreed in July to buy US.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Geberit AG, the Swiss maker of bathroom piping, offered about $14 billion to buy Finnish ceramic toilet maker Sanitec in what would be Chief Executive Officer Albert Baehny’s biggest acquisition.
 plans to buy back more shares, spending as much as C$17 billion ($15 billion), after posting third-quarter profit that missed analysts’ estimates.
 “CN seems ready to increase its payout ratio,” Benoit Poirier, an analyst at Desjardins Capital Markets who advises investors to buy Canadian National shares, said today in a note to clients.
 Distressed Debt Fortress is seeking about $43 billion for its third credit opportunities fund to buy distressed debt, two people with knowledge of the plans said this month, joining investment firms Oaktree Capital Group LLC and Apollo Global Management LLC in anticipating deterioration in debt markets.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 “It’s really up to Mellanox here to stay ahead of them and come out with a faster speed and stay ahead of the curve” Intel Threat In a July 16 note entitled “Giddy about Grantley,” Jefferies analyst James Kisner upgraded Mellanox to buy from hold, arguing that while the company faces a “significant threat” from Intel in the long term, that’s unlikely to materialize until at least 2016.
 While Actavis may not be able to buy everything on its wish list, it could acquire Allergan and do some smaller deals, Kedra said.
 “Consumers have long complained about how their cable service forces them to buy channels they never watch,” Wheeler said.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Morgan Stanley advised clients to buy Russian stocks seven weeks after cutting the country to sell, the latest sign of how volatile the market has become as the conflict in neighboring Ukraine approaches its eighth month.
 The bank cut its recommendation to sell in late July, just a month after raising it to buy.
 Investors are trying to buy up copper mines in anticipation of rising prices.
 Aiming to build its video business, AT&T agreed in May to buy El Segundo, California-based DirecTV.
 Litmus Test The bid-ask spread for major currencies, the difference between the price at which traders are willing to buy and sell, was 008 percent this month, little changed from September and compared with a six-year average of 011, according to JPMorgan.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- SABMiller Plc hinted at the prospect of more deals in the brewing industry after being rebuffed in an attempt to buy smaller rival Heineken NV.
 Yet the problem of persuading people to buy things theydon’t know they need has been solved before, perhaps mostspectacularly by Sony with its Walkman.
 You have to buy the pods, which cost $699 for a box of 12.
 Earlier this month, Iliad SA scrapped its offer to buy a majority stake in T-Mobile, joining Sprint and AT&T in failing to win control of the company.
 Evonik spokeswoman Barbara Mueller denied any plans or considerations to buy DSM, saying “that is definitely not the case and there are no talks” Representatives for DSM, Clariant and Croda declined to comment on whether Evonik is evaluating them as a takeover target.
 In a letter earlier this month, Corvex urged Crown Castle to increase its dividend payout ratio or raise cash to buy back more stock, before bidding for Verizon’s towers.
 agreed to be bought by Brazil’s Cutrale Group and Safra Group for about $681 million, three days after shareholders rejected its plan to buy another banana producer in a tax inversion.
 Chiquita had rejected Cutrale-Safra’s overtures three times, including last week when it said the $1450-a-share price wasn’t superior to its plans to buy Dublin-based banana producer Fyffes Plc.
 ‘Brand Loyalty’ Cutrale, a closely held fruit juice company, and banks controlled by Brazil’s second-richest man, Joseph Safra, initially made an unsolicited offer of $13 a share to buy Chiquita in August.
 dollars created an impetus for Venezuelan distributors to buy more product and take it outside the country.
 Carrefour, which agreed in June to buy back discount stores in France, is focusing on price and convenience as it seeks to cement a domestic revival.
 If Crist wins, he may push for a program similar to that adopted in Arkansas and more palatable to Republicans, which has enabled the poor to buy private insurance using Medicaid, McGorman said.
 In the other sale, KKR & Co-backed Fleur de Lis Energy LLC agreed to buy 7,200 acres in the Permian Basin of Texas for $350 million.
 Chinese collector Liu Yiqian used his AmEx Centurion Card to buy an ancient ceramic cup for a record $36 million in April, racking up almost 422 million points.
 Non-deliverable forwards are contracts to buy or sell a currency in the future that are settled with cash rather than delivery of the currency.
 Fairway filings show Sterling invested about $90 million to buy about 80 percent of the company in 2007.
 The number of calls to buy shares of the Chinese mobile-security service provider has climbed to 356,000 on Oct.
 Bison Capital Holding Co, an investment firm in Beijing, proposed on July 30 to buy NQ Mobile for $980 per ADR, a 42 percent premium over the previous day’s closing price.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Tesoro Logistics LP agreed to buy QEP Resources Inc’s natural-gas pipeline and processing business for $25 billion in cash to expand its business in the Rocky Mountains and North Dakota.
 agreed to buy Atlas Pipeline Partners LP and Atlas Energy LP for $587 billion last week.
 They are offering to buy the company and a portfolio of about 34 billion euros ($43 billion) in bad loans, the people said.
 Twitter got a favorable rate for the more than $18 billion in convertible debt that it sold last month, even though the company didn’t have anything in mind to buy with the money at the time, the CEO said.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Steris Corp, an Ohio-based maker of hospital sterilization products, agreed to buy Synergy Health Plc for about 12 billion pounds ($19 billion) and move to the UK.
 Principal trading is the business of using a firm’s capital to buy and sell securities, while profiting on the spread and movement in prices.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in bets that the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Spain’s Ferrovial SA agreed to buy three UK.
 The money manager in recent months moved to an underweight position in longer-dated periphery debt, and it ended a key overweight position in Portuguese securities as investors priced in expectations the ECB would have to buy sovereign bonds to revive the region’s economy, Thiel said.
 After the ECB’s Governing Council meeting yesterday, Draghi played down the importance of the balance sheet target as he provided more details on the plans to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 “Now that they don’t have to buy at such a high price, they should drop,” Pando said while waiting at Dallas-Fort Worth International Airport for a trip to visit friends in Orlando.
 At the same time, Garuda is concerned there’d be little year-round call for the model and would be reluctant to buy without government help, he said.
 analyst, upgraded the stock to buy from neutral.
 If banks commit compliance errors in issuing a loan that goes bad, they have to buy it back at a loss from Fannie Mae or Freddie Mac.
 In a profanity-laced tirade, Legere said his employees still have post-traumatic stress disorder from AT&T’s failed attempt to buy the wireless carrier.
 IndiGo, the biggest domestic carrier in India by market share, has a right to buy another 100 jets as part of the deal, President Aditya Ghosh said in a phone interview today.
 While IndiGo talked to Boeing Co, Airbus’s main competitor, the New Delhi-based carrier’s preference was to buy Airbus planes, people familiar with the airline’s discussions said in July.
 government offered to buy electricity at a price that’s almost double today’s market rate under a 35-year contract.
 In addition to putting an end to buying clients shots of booze, one sent around a memo imposing a curfew on entertaining, according to GQ Employment Law.
 Osaka Bay Ferrovial, the Spanish builder, and Macquarie agreed this month to buy three UK.
 Synergy Health Plc jumped 31 percent after Steris Corp, an Ohio-based maker of hospital sterilization products, agreed to buy it for about 12 billion pounds ($19 billion).
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 This “is a good time to buy plantation and processing company equities,” Mistry said today and listed Wilmar International Ltd.
 A so-called short squeeze occurs when prices rise as investors who made bearish bets are forced to buy the security to pay back borrowed shares.
 The US-backed companies will spell out when they will force lenders to buy back loans that were issued based on false or inaccurate information, Federal Housing Finance Agency Director Melvin L.
 Monte Paschi’s missteps began with its November 2007 agreement to buy Padua-based Banca Antonveneta SpA.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP represented Brazil’s Cutrale Group and Safra Group in its protracted and ultimately successful bid to buy Chiquita Brands International Inc.
 Chiquita rejected Cutrale-Safra’s overtures three times, including last week when it said the $1450-a-share price wasn’t superior to its plans to buy Dublin-based banana producer Fyffes Plc.
 The bad bank was set up in 2010 to buy non-performing loans and stabilize Nigeria’s banking industry after a debt crisis threatened it with collapse.
 3Legs Resources Plc, the Isle of Man-based company that was the first foreign explorer to buy a license in the East European nation, said last month it’s leaving after poor results at Poland’s biggest fracking operation in the northeastern Baltic Basin.
 3Legs handed three permits in the Baltic Basin to partner ConocoPhillips last month, seven years after becoming the first foreign company to buy a license in Poland, citing poor results from their Lublewo well.
 told clients to buy the shares.
 The North Chicago, Illinois-based pharmaceuticals company planned to buy Shire for an estimated $52 billion, then move the combined company’s legal address to the UK.
 Argentina’s sovereign risk excludes the nation from access to long-term LNG contracts and forces it to buy in the more expensive spot market, Montamat’s Scheimberg said.
 India’s subsidy bill rose fivefold under Prime Minister Manmohan Singh as he implemented policies to buy farm produce at guaranteed prices, boost rural wages and distribute cheap food.
 The Coatesville Area School District has agreed to a 25-year contract to buy electricity from it.
 Price Discrepancies Orders to buy or sell stock are submitted and withdrawn all the time in electronic markets, where computerized strategies are used by arbitragers to profit from price discrepancies and by market makers to anticipate demand.
 The company agreed to buy Catalunya Banc from the government in July in a bet that Spain’s economy is on the road to a lasting recovery.
 The lender is taking advantage of a rally in ABS prices spurred by the European Central Bank’s plan to buy the securities as part of its asset purchase program.
 The yield premium investors seek to buy European asset-backed bonds over benchmark rates is 078 percentage point, approaching the lowest in seven years, according to Barclays Plc index data.
 Secretary of State John Kerry told Vietnam Deputy Prime Minister Pham Binh Minh that Vietnam will be able to buy non-lethal weapons from the US.
 Malaysia Airports yesterday exercised its pre-emptive rights to buy the stake in Istanbul Sabiha Gokcen Airport from units of Turkish builder Limak Holding AS, it said in a filing to the exchange.
 The bid from Malaysia Airports put an end to plans by TAV Havalimanlari Holding AS, owner of Istanbul’s larger Ataturk airport, to buy the stake in a deal reached last month.
 Malaysia Airports, operator of airfields in the Southeast Asian country, had agreed in December to raise its stake in Sabiha Gokcen to 60 percent, paying 225 million euros to buy out Indian partner GMR Infrastructure Ltd.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Gingko Tree Investment Ltd, a unit of the agency that manages China’s foreign currency reserves, is in talks to buy a Munich office park that’s valued at as much as 500 million euros ($630 million), according to two people with knowledge of the plan.
 Crown Estate to buy a shopping center in the English city of Leicester for 3455 million pounds.
 It stems from decreases in the value of the company’s debt, under the theory it would be less expensive to buy it back.
 of Nigeria, a state company created to buy bad debt from lenders after the country’s 2009 financial crisis, also last year raised its annual levy on banks from to 05 percent of their assets from 03 percent.
 Acibadem Saglik Hizmetleri ve Ticaret AS, Turkey’s biggest hospital chain owned by IHH Healthcare Bhd and Khazanah Nasional Bhd, is in exclusive due diligence to buy rival Medicana Saglik Grubu, Istanbul-based Medicana said Sept.
 College Operator For-profit college operator Gaec Anima Educacao SA rose 13 percent to 2998 reais after Valor Economico newspaper reported the company is in talks to buy two universities in Brazil.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Rentrak Corp, a data provider for the entertainment industry, soared after agreeing to buy Kantar Media’s US.
 “In any sort of cyclical industry, you want to buy when there’s blood in the street,” said George Dethlefsen, chief executive officer of Corsa Coal Corp, the Canadian mining company that’s backed by private equity investors, which bought PBS.
 private-equity firm Quintana Capital Group LP, plans to buy and develop mines close to Pittsburgh and the Great Lakes, the US.
 last year to buy an eastern Kentucky coal mining complex for $473 million.
 He created Blackhawk Mining LLC in 2010 to buy idled mines and his family is majority owner of the company through JMP Holdings LLC.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Frank Timis, founder of Sierra Leone’s biggest iron-ore producer African Minerals Ltd, is close to buying the Marampa mine from London Mining Plc, which appointed administrators last week.
 Lenders raised standards after the 2008 housing collapse compelled the government to rescue Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac and the companies forced banks to buy back bad loans from them with underwriting errors.
 A stock gauge designed by Societe Generale SA comprisingbusinesses that plan to buy back shares, a strategy to boostshareholder returns while reducing cash balances, is beating itsbetter-known peer.
 said in April it wouldspend as much as 500 billion yen ($46 billion) to buy backstock.
 This month, Archer-Daniels-Midland Co, the world’s largest corn processor, closed its deal to buy Wild Flavors GmbH for about $3 billion and announced an agreement to purchase Specialty Commodities Inc.
 announced an agreement to buy Penford Corp.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Fibra Uno Administracion SA, Mexico’s biggest real-estate investment trust, plans to buy 20 billion pesos ($149 billion) of properties, according to the company’s adjunct Chief Executive Officer Gonzalo Robina.
 The property trusts pool investor money to buy real estate such as shopping malls, office buildings and rental housing.
 Flexjet LLC, a provider of fractional aircraft ownership services, agreed to buy as many as 50 Gulfstream jets, including the new G500.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Old Mutual Plc, Africa’s largest insurer, agreed to buy UK-based Quilter Cheviot Ltd.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Namibia has formally made an offer to buy Areva SA’s water desalination plant in the country to secure supplies for uranium-mining operations as well as towns in the semi-arid Erongo region and western coastal area.
 Yahoo separately also agreed to buy mobile-chat platform MessageMe.
 It competes with Facebook Inc, which tried to buy Snapchat for $3 billion last year and started its own product to send ephemeral photos and videos after being rebuffed.
 “The fuel economy used to be a reason not to buy them.
 agreed in July to buy US.
 “We’re starting to bear fruit on the cost-competitiveness of the company” Immelt has been disposing of some GE Capital assets while bulking up those that support industrial operations, a strategy that includes steps such as this week’s accord to buy helicopter lessor Milestone Aviation Group LLC.
 “With the ruble getting cheaper, that becomes very, very good for investors because you’re able to buy more rubles with less dollars” Mobius favors Sberbank, “major” oil companies, supermarket chains and mining companies, including OAO GMK Norilsk Nickel.
 Bertelsmann, owner of 53 percent of the New York-based business, plans to buy part or all of the 47 percent held by Pearson Plc, the people said, asking not to be named discussing private deliberations.
 “Print is inherently a more challenging business as they try to make the digital transition” Bertelsmann agreed yesterday to buy the 25 percent stake in German magazine publisher Gruner & Jahr it doesn’t own, ending a 45-year-old partnership with the Jahr family.
 Should Bertelsmann choose not to buy Pearson’s shares, Pearson has the right to initiate a recapitalization of the venture.
 “Not only is it a good time to sell, it’s a great time to buy” Demand for properties on the market should be good, Walters of CBRE said.
 We want to help small businesses expand globally just like large corporations can, and we want to make it less difficult for Chinese consumers to buy international brands” Alipay Expansion Small & Micro Financial, controlled by Ma, is competing against Tencent Holdings Ltd.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander SA, Spain’s biggest bank, said investors holding 1365 percent of its Brazilian unit’s minority shareholders accepted the company’s offer to buy their stock in exchange for newly issued shares.
 Santander announced its proposal to offer as much as 47 million euros ($59 billion) to buy back as much as 25 percent of the outstanding shares earlier this year, offering to pay 20 percent more than their market price at the time.
 The acceptance rate was lower than the level required for Banco Santander to have to buy the remaining outstanding units and shares from any investor who wants to sell at the same price in an additional offering through the exchange in the next three months, the lender said.
 Mikhail Prokhorov, whose investment empire stretches from the world’s largest aluminum maker to the Brooklyn Nets basketball team, recently explored whether fellow oligarchs, including Vladimir Potanin, were willing to buy a portion of his $27 billion stake in potash miner OAO Uralkali, two people familiar with the matter said.
 Uralkali’s market value declined about 56 percent since November last year, when Prokhorov’s companies agreed to buy about 28 percent in the potash maker, using debt.
 Assets Decline Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 The European Central Bank is forecast to announce tomorrow details of its plan to buy asset-backed securities, after unveiled a series of stimulus measures to boost credit lending and combat the threat of deflation.
 The brokerages downgraded their recommendations to the equivalent of neutral from ratings similar to buy.
 will invest $562 million to buy its parent’s stake in an oil-processing plant in Saudi Arabia to consolidate its position as Asia’s biggest refiner.
 Bangkok Airways, led by Chief Executive Officer Puttipong Prasarttong-osoth, plans to use the proceeds to buy 18 new planes from Boeing Co.
 Bangkok Bank Pcl planned to buy another 105 million shares from existing investors at the same time as the IPO, the terms show.
 plans to buy Norway’s Cermaq ASA in a deal that will allow Japan’s biggest trading house to leapfrog Oslo-based Marine Harvest ASA as the largest salmon farmer in Chile.
 He said stores need to boost in-stock levels -- a measure of the merchandise available on shelves for customers to buy.
 Tim shares surged today after Folha de Sao Paulo reported that Oi, Telefonica SA and America Movil SAB agreed on an offer to buy the carrier, controlled by Telecom Italia SpA, that values the company at as much as 315 billion reais ($129 billion).
 ‘Big Impact’ Institutional investors “will have no choice but to buy Japan Post given the big impact the share sale would have on the market,” DZH’s Tanaka said.
 (PRE) surgedthe most in seven months after Mexico’s Alfa SAB (ALFAA) said it’sconsidering an offer to buy shares it doesn’t already own inLatin America’s biggest non-state-owned oil producer.
 Akimov did this by giving Novatek loans to buy assets from Gazprombank that the lender had acquired from businesses tied to former Gazprom managers.
 When they began to buy more and more, it became a bit more difficult to understand” The value of Alfa’s disclosed stake in Pacific Rubiales, which reached as high as $11 billion in late August, had fallen to about $860 million as of yesterday.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Sulzer AG sees further opportunities to buy or merge with companies producing equipment for the oil and gas industry after a proposed merger with Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 Bonds declined following a meeting last week where Draghi failed to provide details on the size of its purchases of asset-backed securities and covered bonds, and the option of expanding the program to buy government bonds through a quantitative easing plan in the toolbox for now.
 Salus Capital Partners LLC is seeking to buy as much as$465 million of the $585 million of loans purchased byRadioShack’s largest shareholder, Standard General LP, said thepeople, who asked not to be identified because the discussionsare private.
 Gamers will be able to buy a separate controller made for the phone that can stream titles like Activision Blizzard Inc’s newest Destiny game or Take-Two Interactive Software Inc’s Grand Theft Auto.
 The company, which is run from Parsippany, New Jersey, and obtained an Irish tax domicile by acquiring Warner Chilcott Plc last year, agreed to buy Durata Therapeutics Inc.
 “The traditional buyer -- the person who takes out a mortgage loan to buy a home -- seems to be growing in strength over the past year and we expect that to continue,” said Robert Stein, deputy chief economist at First Trust Portfolios LP in Wheaton, Illinois, who is among the best forecasters of existing home sales over the past two years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Now, the 44-year-old investment adviser says he’s gotten so many phone calls from clients asking about Argentina in the past year he decided to start a hedge fund dedicated to buying the nation’s securities.
 For Melhem, who moved to Argentina from Mexico when he was seven years old and lived in Buenos Aires until the second year of college before getting his bachelor’s degree in economics and international business at Babson College, the deterioration of the economy ahead of the next administration is an opportunity to buy the nation’s securities before a rebound.
 Other bidders still in the running to buy the British safety-equipment maker include buyout firms Wendel SA, Onex Corp, AEA Investors and Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 agreed to buy Hovensa LLC, the company said in a statement.
 dropped plans to buy the company last week.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Apollo Global Management LLC co-founder Josh Harris is close to an agreement to buy Crystal Palace, two people with direct knowledge of the talks said, a deal that would make him the fifth owner of both a major US.
 The company agreed to buy Mainland Sand & Gravel Ulc of Canada on Sept.
 JPMorgan last week advised Geberit AG, the Swiss maker of bathroom piping, on its offer of about $14 billion to buy Finnish ceramic toilet maker Sanitec Corp.
 Sears Holdings investors will receive subscription rights to buy Sears Canada stock at C$1060 ($952) per share, the Sept.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Amazoncom Inc’s Chief Executive Officer Jeff Bezos has a knack for harnessing product reviews to get customers to buy online.
 Holiday Forecast “Word-of-mouth marketing -- people like you bought this -- creates a strong urge to buy,” said Rebecca Lieb, a social-media marketing analyst at Altimeter Group in San Mateo, California.
 Deliveries jumped 13 percent in the quarter, helped by the new Fit and back orders from the rush to buy before an increase in the sales tax rise in April.
 and Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce to buy a niobium mine in Quebec.
 “For us it’s nice to have investors like this who have a particularly good insight in what’s going on in the Asian market” Regent, 48, is among prominent figures in the mining industry who have established companies to buy assets as the world’s largest producers put unwanted operations up for sale.
 Strong Fundamentals Magris and its partners agreed to buy the Niobec mine and a nearby rare-earth deposit from Iamgold Corp.
 Bolanos changed his rating to buy from hold on Aug.
 Last week, the company almost doubled its target for proceeds and then advanced the date of its listing after winning commitments to buy shares from JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 Chief Executive Officer Niall Booker has sold assets after the 150-year-old company raised about 400 million pounds ($644 million) in May to plug a capital deficit that was uncovered after its failed attempt to buy branches from Lloyds.
 KPMG LLP and the UK’s markets regulator failed to spot a 15 billion-pound shortfall at Co-Operative Bank Plc that derailed its plan to buy branches from Lloyds, British lawmakers said Oct.
 30 people applyingfor a loan to buy a second home may get lower down payments andinterest rates that were previously only available to first-timehome buyers, as they have paid off their initial mortgage.
 Sahar Kandah plans to buy eight 50-piece bags of Halloween candy to hand out to trick-or-treaters in her Bronxville, New York, neighborhood, compared with seven last year, even though Mars Chocolate North America raised prices, including for her beloved Snickers bars, by an average of 7 percent in July, the same month that Hershey imposed an 8 percent increase.
 Woodside is stepping up its search for global acquisitions after its $27 billion plan to buy back stock from Royal Dutch Shell Plc was blocked by shareholders, leaving Europe’s largest oil company with a larger, unwanted stake in the Australian energy company.
 Drahi’s investment company Altice, which controls Numericable, agreed in April to buy France’s second-largest phone company from Vivendi SA.
 In June, Luxembourg-based Altice agreed to buy smaller carrier Virgin Mobile in France.
 It’s holding talks with Oi SA shareholders to buy the Brazilian phone company’s Portuguese assets, a person familiar with the matter said this month.
 “It’s strategic for Alibaba to buy out Youku Tudou and find a home for all of its video content,” Castor Pang, head of Research at Core-Pacific Yamaichi in Hong Kong, said by phone.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Up Energy Development Group said it’s picked the bottom of the coking coal market after the Hong Kong company agreed to buy control of a Canadian mine from its two owners by paying them $1 each.
 Winsway will hold onto 173 percent and retains the right with Marubeni to buy back some of Grande Cache shares within five years.
 Her predicament stems from her 1998 decision to take the biggest loan ever given at the time to an individual in Spain to buy her sister Alicia’s stake in Fomento de Construcciones & Contratas SA.
 Sentiment gets pushed to a negative extreme, markets become undervalued again and smart investors find opportunities to buy back in” Regional Gauges Japan’s Topix index rose 26 percent.
 Reuters earlier reported the ECB is looking to buy corporate bonds on the secondary market amid growing concern the euro area’s economic growth is slowing.
 It gives US-focused investors more opportunity to buy into the automaker Lee Iacocca once saved and that was salvaged out of bankruptcy in 2009 by Marchionne and Fiat.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage management and the board by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 Earlier this year, Iliad tried to get its hands on Bouygues’s mobile network as Bouygues sought to buy Vivendi SA’s SFR -- only to have the plan scuttled when Vivendi sold SFR to Numericable Group SA.
 Braun raised his recommendation on the shares to buy from hold, raising his six-month price estimate to 15 euros from 12 euros.
 (GOOG) is accelerating a realestate deal spree, spending $585 million to buy more than halfof a Silicon Valley office park and agreeing to lease an entirecampus in development to make space for its growing workforce.
 Members of the country’s major political parties have criticized the ECB’s latest plan, to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds, on the grounds that it imposes risk on taxpayers.
 health insurers have been adapting to the 2010 law that this year required all Americans to buy insurance, giving those with low incomes subsidies to help them do so.
 Acquisition Steris Corp, an Ohio-based maker of hospital sterilization products, agreed to buy Synergy Health Plc, provider of sterilization services, for about 12 billion pounds ($19 billion) and move to the UK.
 Coca-Cola’s recent agreement to buy 17 percent of Monster will shift distribution away from AB InBev in the US.
 The company agreed to buy 58 shops from the defunct Phones 4u retail chain and take on 359 employees last month.
 Prime Minister Matteo Renzi, who’s struggling to cut Europe’s second-biggest debt of more than 2 trillion euros ($253 trillion), urged Chinese investors in June during a Beijing visit to buy stakes in Italian companies, following his counterparts in Greece and Portugal who tapped Chinese money to raise revenue and exit bailout programs.
 The country, which is getting gas from EU countries including Slovakia and Poland, needs to buy an additional 5 billion cubic meters of gas to last the winter without Russian supplies, Andriy Kobolyev, NAK Naftogaz Ukrainy’s chief executive officer, said Oct.
 unit agreed in 2011 to buy an undisclosed stake in the $390 million Fulton, Mississippi, project, which will be built by China Three Gorges Corp.
 Tenaska Biofuels LLC agreed in 2010 to buy output from the Fulton plant.
 It agreed in June to buy UK.
 “It’s much more punitive from a liquidity standpoint to buy cash bonds” Derivative Divergence JPMorgan’s data matches up the cost of credit swaps on individual companies and spreads on debt that matures within a similar time frame.
 One measure of that known as the bid-ask spread -- the difference between prices dealers quote to buy and sell the debt -- widened to 10 basis points, she said.
 Last month, Germany’s ZF Friedrichshafen AG agreed to buy TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 decided to develop a payments system so people could use iPhones to buy items at a store instead of swiping debit or credit cards, the company bypassed EBay Inc’s PayPal.
 Enel, which also produces in Algeria, signed a contract to buy supplies of liquefied fuel from the US.
 The Mumbai-based company agreed last year to buy Jaiprakash Associates Ltd’s cement factory in Gujarat state for an enterprise value of 38 billion rupees ($621 million).
 “We also believe the best way to help West African cocoa farmers and their communities is to continue to buy the cocoa that they grow,” Bill Guyton, president of the World Cocoa Foundation, said in the statement.
 The weaker ruble is “very, very good” for foreign investors, because it allows to buy more with fewer dollars, he said.
 Bison Capital Holding Co, an investment firm in Beijing, proposed on July 30 to buy NQ Mobile for $980 per ADR, a 42 percent premium over the previous day’s closing price.
 European Woes Europe’s biggest engineering company Siemens this year unsuccessfully tried to combine its ailing train operations with Alstom’s transport business as part of an asset swap to buy the French company’s energy assets.
 “A lot of our currency investors are looking to buy dollars, especially when there’s any dip.
 Not Prestigious “I am planning to buy a Renault Duster,” said Yuri Parsamov, 29, a marketing specialist from Moscow, referring to Renault’s best-selling low-cost sport-utility vehicle.
 Postmedia Network Canada Corp, with the backing of a New York-based investment firm, agreed to buy 175 publications from Quebecor Inc.
 The European Central Bank may detail its plan to buy asset-backed securities tomorrow amid slowdowns in Germany in France.
 MSG also announced plans to buy back shares and put activist Nelson Peltz and private-equity investor Scott Sperling on its board.
 AbbVie, based in North Chicago, Illinois, planned to buy Shire for an estimated $52 billion, then move the combined company’s legal address to the UK.
 Steady employment gains are giving more consumers the wherewithal to buy presents this year and helping others feel secure enough in their jobs to spend more.
 Government Shutdown Last year, the first partial government shutdown in 17 years spooked some customers out of spending while extreme weather and a shorter shopping season kept them out of malls when they did want to buy.
 The New York City Taxi and Limousine Commission in September 2012 designated the Nissan NV200 as the official “Taxi of Tomorrow” and required owners of medallions, which confer the right to operate yellow cabs in New York, to buy the $29,700 vehicles.
 Taxi fleet operators sued the city in December 2012 seeking to block the requirement, and a judge halted the program five months later, saying it violated the administrative code because it didn’t allow medallion owners to buy hybrid vehicles.
 More Opportunities Smaller firms such as RCM are starting to see more opportunities this year, with offers of partnership from Wall Street firms, increased credit from specialty lenders and bids from rival companies seeking to buy homes in bulk.
 The firm sees opportunities to buy with its Premium Point partnership in cities including Jacksonville, Florida, Columbia, South Carolina and Birmingham, Alabama, where there is less competition from big institutional players, according to Popp.
 KPN completed the sale of its German unit to Telefonica SA’s local business this month and said today it will use some of the proceeds to buy back as much as 2 billion euros in notes.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Adidas AG took steps to placate investors who have sent its shares down 35 percent this year, saying it plans to buy back as much as 15 billion euros ($19 billion) of its stock over the next three years.
 ‘Intrinsic Issues’ Some bidders might use a real estate investment trust structure to buy Oncor, which would eliminate taxes, he said.
 last month, said he sees the 21 percent decline in the benchmark Philippine Stock Exchange Index this month through yesterday as an opportunity to buy shares of banks, real estate, gaming and power companies.
 Morgan Stanley advised clients to buy Russian equities seven weeks after cutting the country to sell on Oct.
 Minera Los Pelambres, a unit of Antofagasta Minerals SA, has agreed to buy electricity from the solar farm under a 20-year contract.
 In February, he dropped his campaign to spur Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after the company stepped up repurchases.
 While Barclays Plc had the largest short position in Shire, at about 21 percent, it also had a long position of 27 percent, including derivatives and options to buy stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg and company filings.
 Inversion Crackdown In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in bets that the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- The Canadian government is still reviewing Burger King Worldwide Inc’s proposal to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 “It’s a lot easier for a large company to buy a smaller one that has a disruptive technology and only 50 engineers” EMC, for example, has more than 60,000 employees.
 agreed to buy the Beares brand and some stores from Ellerine Holdings Ltd, the furniture retailer of failed South African lender African Bank Investments Ltd.
 When the opportunity came to buy control of Globalstar in 2003, Monroe figured he could turn it around by simplifying and lowering prices to lure more consumers.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank kept interest rates unchanged at record lows as investors wait for President Mario Draghi to reveal details of a plan to buy assets.
 The focus now shifts to Draghi’s press conference at 2:30 pm, when he is due to unveil the specifics of a plan to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 “We want to know what, how much, from whom, and when the ECB plans to buy,” said Robert Kuenzel, an economist at Daiwa Capital Markets Europe Ltd.
 has entered exclusive talks to buy Omega Pharma NV after beating suitors including Sanofi, Actavis Plc and Boehringer Ingelheim GmbH, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Perrigo may reach an agreement to buy Omega Pharma, a Belgian over-the-counter health-care company, soon, two of the people said, asking not to be identified because the deliberations are private.
 In July 2013, Perrigo agreed to buy Irish drug company Elan Corp.
 Shire, which AbbVie agreed to buy in July, slid 73 percent to 3,718 pence, extending losses since yesterday to 28 percent.
 “Customers can push out a project, andit’s not a big deal for the customer, but it can be a huge dealfor a supplier like EZchip” Lower Expectations Schreiner downgraded his recommendation on Yokneam, Israel-based EZchip to buy from strong buy on Oct.
 Jim Rogers, who set up Quantum Fund with George Soros in the 1970s, said the negative sentiment and low prices in Russia are a signal for contrarian investors to buy.
 jumped 52 percent in Hong Kong after its board approved a plan to buy stakes in thermal and hydro power stations from its parent.
 Demoulas, who then brokered a deal to buy the company at the end of August.
 Postmedia Network Canada Corp, operator of the National Post, jumped 11 percent to C$250 after agreeing to buy 175 newspapers and trade publications for C$316 million ($282 million) from Quebecor Inc.
 Safra agreed to buy the bank for more than 1 billion Swiss francs ($113 billion) in November 2011.
 Chinese nationals will be able to buy equities and real estate via a Qualified Domestic Retail Investor scheme, Wang Dan, a deputy director general at the central bank, said today at a conference in Beijing.
 They won’t just have Hong Kong and be dependent on Hong Kong only” Through Train QDRI was the name used for a program known as the through train, announced in August 2007 and then later abandoned, that would have allowed Chinese nationals to buy Hong Kong stocks directly.
 - Becton Dickinson to buy CareFusion Corp.
 Tokyo Gas Co, Japan’s biggest city-gas distributor, agreed in July to buy about 520,000 metric tons a year from the Cameron project for 20 years starting 2020.
 “We are advising clients to buy on dips” The Nifty has risen 27 percent this year, the best performer among the world’s 10 biggest markets.
 cable company awaiting regulatory approval to buy Time Warner Cable Inc, reported profit that beat estimates as new high-speed Internet customers more than made up for declining video subscribers.
 Calls to buy the iShares MSCI Brazil Capped ETF for between $4350 and $4950 over the next month fell the most among all contracts traded on US.
 Bullish contracts giving the right to buy the exchange-traded fund accounted for nine of the 10 biggest retreats among US.
 Calls give the right to buy 100 shares of a security for a certain amount, the strike price, by a set date.
 Lesin said today that he’s not planning to buy Vedomosti.
 The private-equity firm is raising $1 billion for a fund to buy the riskiest portions of bonds backed by loans given mostly to borrowers with troubled credit histories and first-time homebuyers with high student debt, according to marketing materials obtained by Bloomberg News.
 and continental Europe, was already the largest pool ever raised dedicated to buying assets in the region, according to the New York-based company’s website.
 Last month, Manulife agreed to buy competitor Standard Life Plc’s Canadian business.
 And in July, Corporativo GBM SAB agreed to buy a 26 percent stake in the company.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Namibia’s mining-investment company said it reached an agreement to buy a 75 percent stake in the Navachab gold mine that former JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 Demand is underpinned by the European Central Bank’s plan to buy ABS, as well as Finland’s top credit rating, he said.
 Egypt’s Global Authority for Supply Commodities agreed to buy 600,000 tons of wheat from Romania since July 1, more than the 525,000 tons it’s buying from Russia and 480,000 tons from France, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The carrier will use the IPO proceeds to buy 18 new planes from Boeing Co.
 “We see very encouraging signs and expect better performance in the second half” The carrier will spend as much as 95 billion baht of the proceeds to buy new airplanes through 2017, according to a regulatory filing with the country’s Securities & Exchange Commission dated today.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Activist investor Bill Ackman said he’s preparing to buy a stake in a US.
 IHS Automotive raised its light-vehicle sales forecast to 164 million this year, the most since 2006, as credit to buy cars becomes easier to obtain.
 Issuers also make promises to buy back any debt that has been misrepresented and retain the pieces of the bond deals that are in line to take losses first.
 6 its offer to buy Riverbed, a bid that the company rejected in February as too low.
 Prudential agreed to buy about 34 percent to 40 percent of Chilean retirement-fund manager Administradora de Fondos de Pensiones Habitat SA, the Newark, New Jersey-based insurer said yesterday in a statement.
 He described at a June hearing plans to borrow about $4 billion, using $3 billion to buy forestry assets in China, and $1 billion to buy “a portfolio of marketable securities” He said the cash flow from the investments, after making repayments on the debt, would go to the charity.
 agreed to buy CareFusion Corp.
 agreed to buy Covidien Plc in June in an agreement deal that was also intended to broaden offerings to hospitals.
 The gauge retreated 73 percent in the past three weeks amid concern the ECB will face obstacles in its plan to buy securitized debt as a means of boosting inflation and growth.
 Carlyle Group LP, the Washington-based money manager that has been expanding its fund offerings, agreed to buy 60 percent of TCW in 2012.
 A shift of customers choosing to rent textbooks as opposed to buying them also cut into sales growth, he said.
 In August, Amazon said it plans to buy video-game service Twitch Interactive Inc.
 11, 2014: Hewlett-Packard agrees to buy cloud-computing software developer Eucalyptus Systems Inc.
 cut official selling prices of its crude to buyers in Asia for November, two people with knowledge of the pricing decision said yesterday.
 Spoofing Profit It’s against the law to spoof, or post requests to buy or sell futures, stocks and other products in financial markets without intending to actually follow through on those orders.
 One app will be used for oil exploration and the other to help determine the most attractive oil and gas assets to buy.
 buyout firm Apollo Management International LLP to buy 80 percent of insurer Fidelidade from the Portuguese government.
 According to Rosenblatt Securities Inc, about 17 percent of trading takes place on the private venues, where offers to buy and sell stocks are cloaked until trades are completed.
 offered to buy a 51 percent stake in French carmaker PSA Peugeot Citroen’s scooter business, giving the Indian tractor manufacturer access to European technology to expand in the models.
 are nearing a deal to buy a majority stake in Saudi Arabian fast-food chain Kudu, two people with knowledge of the matter said in August.
 Alcoa has expanded capacity at downstream plants in Indiana and Virginia this year, and in June agreed to buy UK.
 ECB President Mario Draghi detailed plans to buy assets for at least two years to boost inflation and economic growth in the euro area.
 told clients to buy the shares.
 The company yesterday boosted its quarterly dividend and announced plans to buy back as many as 35 million shares.
 With so few deadbeats, and low-cost capital from depositors, banks have little incentive to buy into Merrill’s complex algorithms.
 and is seeking to buy out other unitholders.
 CEO Sol Trujillo get financing to buy a stake in Telecom Italia, Fossati said he doesn’t have details about Trujillo’s plan.
 If other assets cannot be identified, the company may renew efforts to buy Belt Railway Co.
 Short interest on Burger King, which agreed in August to buy the Canadian coffee-and-doughnut chain for $11 billion, has jumped fivefold since the deal was announced.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in bets that the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 They alleged DLF had given as much as 650 million rupees in unsecured, interest-free loans to Robert Vadra, who they said used the funds to buy property from DLF at below-market prices.
 “The Yelp founder came here to this office and told me, ‘Can you spin out Tabelog from Kakakucom? I want to buy it,’” Tanaka said in an interview.
 “Really for the past four to five years we have seen very little activity in that segment” More “fence sitters” will be convinced that it’s time to buy if the economy continues to show stable growth, Von Weise said, and that will attract more jet-financing competitors.
 14, advising investors to buy PanAust shares.
 A gauge of construction, property and real-estate stocks has jumped 28 percent on expectations the new president will build more roads, seaports and allow foreigners to buy apartments valued at more than 25 billion rupiah ($204,666).
 Assets Decline Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 “I would like nothing more than to buy as much Globalstar as I possibly could at these prices,” Monroe said on the call.
 and the partnership it controls agreed to buy Atlas Pipeline Partners LP and Atlas Energy LP for about $587 billion, adding to its ability to process, ship and export booming US.
 Dimon and other bankers have blamed tight credit on losses they have endured from having to buy back soured loans with underwriting errors.
 CtW also asked for an investigation into the role that hedge funds played in the decision to buy the rest of Alliance Boots.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Janus Capital Group Inc, which hired Pacific Investment Management Co’s Bill Gross last month, said it agreed to buy VelocityShares LLC for at least $30 million to expand in exchange-traded products.
 Raytheon has agreed to buy a closely held company that it didn’t identify for about $400 million, executives said today on a conference call with analysts.
 Washington Prime Group Inc, a Bethesda, Maryland-based owner of strip shopping centers and regional malls, agreed last month to buy rival Glimcher Realty Trust in a $43 billion deal.
 Even Before the Washington Prime deal, Barry Sternlicht’s closely held Starwood Capital Group had been buying up lower-tier mall properties sold off by big real estate owners, including its agreement in June to buy seven malls from Taubman Centers Inc.
 None of the large mall operators are going to buy operators with lower-quality properties and B-mall REIT share prices are low and they don’t have the currency to make deals for each other, said Rich Moore, an analyst at RBC Capital Markets in Solon, Ohio.
 Watt, 69, a former Democratic congressman from North Carolina, has talked about expanding access to credit and has been reviewing Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac’s legal requirement to buy loans in “underserved” markets.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Eric Cinnamond had 75 percent of the money in his mutual fund in cash at the end of July because he couldn’t find enough cheap small-company stocks to buy.
 Buffett has said he is waiting for a “fat pitch,” his phrase for an opportunity to buy a stock at a favorable price.
 Weitz, whose $11 billion Weitz Partners III Opportunity Fund beat 97 percent of peers over the past five years, said he has found a few new companies to buy in the past few days.
 “It brings us back into the game” At the Goodhaven Fund, Trauner said the best time to buy stocks is when markets are depressed.
 While the orders were canceled before being executed, averting losses for whoever placed them, they highlight the potential for catastrophe anytime someone gets details wrong with instructions to buy or sell securities.
 “Also, the amount was huge, so someone would’ve noticed before the market closed” Orders to buy or sell stock are submitted and withdrawn all the time in electronic markets, where software strategies are used by arbitragers to profit from price discrepancies and by market makers to anticipate demand.
 After missing out on innovations that allowed smaller, domestic wildcatters to break open gas-and-oil-soaked shale rock formations, most of the big global oil companies used their financial muscle to buy their way in.
 Trafficking has encouraged middlemen to buy crude and smuggle it into Turkey, Jordan or Iraq, where it’s blended with other oil and sold to unsuspecting buyers, according to the report.
 in Vancouver who advises investors to buy Canadian Pacific shares, said today in a note to clients.
 “Results have been impressive” Oglenski advises investors to buy Canadian Pacific stock and predicts the shares could rise as high as C$280.
 Approvals for shoppers wanting to buy on credit at Edcon stores have fallen by about 50 percent since Barclays Plc’s South African unit took over the retailer’s book in 2012, while efforts to find a potential second provider of credit have been unsuccessful.
 Those fliers are prized because of the frequency of their trips and their tendency to buy costlier tickets for last-minute flexibility.
 26 to buy 40 of the aircraft.
 The company has reshuffled management, naming Emmanuel Faber as chief executive officer, and is said to be considering the sale of the medical nutrition unit amid speculation it may be seeking to buy bigger assets.
 The companies also plan to start a joint venture to buy Fonterra’s Darnum plant in Australia and craft a distribution deal to sell the Fonterra baby milk brand, Anmum, in China.
 Publishing targeted weightings in advance would move markets, forcing the fund to buy at highs and sell at lows, he said in an interview on Oct.
 “We don’t even know what we’re going to have to pay for that spectrum, and we don’t even know if we’ll be able to buy it,” Pieters said.
 “It will be step by step” Dassault Aviation has about 3 billion euros in cash, according to Trappier, and the company may seek clearance to buy more shares beyond the 10 percent stake now planned.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Nigerian crude producer Oando Plc plans to build a 400-megawatt power plant in Africa’s biggest economy after it failed in three bids to buy state electricity utilities for sale last year.
 “Appetite to buy is already curbed” and rents could fall further, S&P’s Chan said.
 Capital Markets Chinese nationals will be able to buy equities and real estate via a Qualified Domestic Retail Investor scheme, Wang Dan, a deputy director general at the central bank, said today at a conference in Beijing.
 Bills fans previously organized a boycott of rocker Jon Bon Jovi over his involvement with a group of investors trying to buy the team, allegedly with the intention of moving it to Toronto.
 It is likely to be sold to another private-equity firm, with the company’s steady cash flow appealing to buyout shops, they said.
 “If you look at HP, going down the split, H3C in China is probably too much to manage at the moment” Hewlett-Packard acquired H3C in 2010 as part of a deal to buy networking company 3Com Corp.
 “If you have $2 billion to invest, isn’t it easier to buy one asset at arguably the greatest address in the world rather than 10 different ones?” he said.
 Now somebody would love to buy them, I would believe, and this is what they should be exploring,” Icahn said yesterday in a Bloomberg Television interview with Stephanie Ruhle after speaking at the Robin Hood Investors Conference in New York.
 The Mentor, Ohio-based maker of hospital sterilization products agreed to buy Synergy Health Plc for about 12 billion pounds ($192 billion) earlier this week in a tax inversion.
 Pertamina earlier this year expanded an agreement to buy liquefied natural gas from Cheniere Energy Inc’s US.
 In August, Switzerland’s Roche Holding AG agreed to buy InterMune Inc.
 said it agreed to buy British restaurant chain PizzaExpress Ltd.
 agreed to buy rival Lorillard Inc.
 raised its rating to buy from neutral.
 In that hearing the court had allowed the government to proceed with the sale on the condition it won’t transfer shares to buyers till a ruling.
 The Ontario Power Authority has agreed to buy the electricity under a 20-year contract.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date, and non-deliverable contracts are settled in dollars.
 business, we don’t have to buy any more” Masrani, who becomes CEO tomorrow, is setting a different path than predecessor Ed Clark, who in 12 years transformed Toronto-Dominion into Canada’s largest bank with more branches in the US.
 Legere, in a profanity-laced tirade, said his employees still have post-traumatic stress disorder from AT&T Inc’s failed attempt to buy the wireless carrier in 2011.
 The German company last month took steps to placate investors with plans to buy back as much as 15 billion euros of its stock over three years.
 Finally he returned to Overstockcom to buy “underpants, water glasses and slippers” The only place to find plentiful bitcoin-buying opportunities, Sella concluded, was on what remained of Silk Road, the underground Internet marketplace targeted by US.
 I’m not worried” Societe Nationale des Chemins de Fer Francais will remain majority investor with a 55 percent stake and that should also mitigate against upheaval, though the French state rail company is unlikely to exercise a right to buy the UK.
 The owner of the Sofitel and Ibis brands agreed to buy French app-maker Wipolo and plans to improve customer access via mobile devices and revamp its online booking websites and employee platforms, the Paris-based company said in a statement today.
 “There are certain countries where we’d benefit from a partner” Groupon agreed to buy e-commerce marketplace Ticket Monster in South Korea less than a year ago for $260 million.
 “The more gas from other sources, the lower the reliance on current supply source will be” Independence Capacity The Independence, with a capacity of 170,000 cubic meters, is leased by Klaipedos Nafta AB, the state-owned energy terminal operator, from Norway’s Hoegh LNG Holdings for 10 years with an option to buy the regasification unit.
 Under the terms of the 2013 agreement, Merrimack, New Hampshire-based GT Advanced was required to supply millions of units of sapphire that Apple wasn’t obligated to buy, and had to maintain certain key employees, Squiller said.
 to buy 24 million rand ($219 million) worth of shares in television equipment company Ellies Holdings Ltd.
 Car owners allege they were duped into buying models that weren’t as safe as they were made to believe because of the potentially dangerous air bags.
 Teva is trying to buy more time to shift patients to a longer-acting version that won’t face generic competition until 2030.
 Comcast, which is seeking regulatory approval to buy rival Time Warner Cable Inc.
 The fast-food restaurant seeking to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 The New York company that has been building a health-care property business agreed to buy Griffin-American Healthcare REIT II in August.
 There are no plans to buy out the operator’s state shareholders, he said.
 IFM doesn’t plan to buy more than 30 percent of the stock, Kerschl said.
 After four years of government restrictions to cool housing prices that had tripled since 2000, the central bank is reversing course, making it easier for homeowners to buy second properties.
 Swiss energy trader Vitol Group’s plan to raise $2 billion to buy oil from state-owned producer OAO Rosneft was thwarted after the world’s largest publicly traded oil producer by volume was slapped with US.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Adidas AG placated investors who have sent its shares down 35 percent this year, saying it plans to buy back as much as 15 billion euros ($19 billion) of its stock over the next three years.
 “In virtually all other areas of commerce, consumers know the price and much about the quality of what they intend to buy ahead of the purchase,” said Uwe Reinhardt, a health economist at Princeton University, in an editorial accompanying the study.
 I hope they can continue to be self-restrained and reasonable” Leung’s offer is “a practical move to buy more time” while he waits for public opinion to turn against the movement, said Hung Ho-fung, an associate sociology professor at Johns Hopkins University in Baltimore who studies Hong Kong and China.
 “But as long as the prices are right and there’s a guarantee that companies are getting the products they need, they will want to diversify supplies to reduce risks” GS Caltex Corp, which unloaded 800,000 barrels of Alaskan North Slope crude this month is considering whether to buy more of the grade, according to a company official.
 Allergan has been seeking its own deals, which might make it too big for Valeant to buy.
 ECB President Mario Draghi will push his organization to buy bundles of Greek and Cypriot bank loans with “junk” ratings, the Financial Times reported late yesterday.
 Draghi will unveil this week details of a plan to buy private-sector assets for hundreds of billions of euros, the paper said.
 “A lot of these guys are going to have to buy their way in, they really have no choice,” Pinheiro said.
 “It is expensive to buy the smaller companies because they are in demand,” said Jack Russo, a St.
 Boies challenged him with documents, including a press release issued on the night the bailout began, saying the government would receive a warrant, or option to buy shares of common stock.
 CFO’s View Chief Financial Officer Ramon Leal said Alfa hasn’t decidedwhether to buy, maintain or reduce its stake in Bogota-basedPacific, Colombia’s second-largest oil company.
 It could be something else, orsome other company, so we want to keep flexibility” David Neuhauser, a money manager at Livermore PartnersInc, an energy-focused hedge fund located in Northbrook,Illinois, said the size of Alfa’s stake in Pacific signals thatthe Mexican company is committed to buying the rest.
 BSkyB, about 39 percent owned by Rupert Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc, agreed in July to buy Fox’s Sky Italia unit and a majority stake in Sky Deutschland.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 Proposed changes to the act include giving the state the right to a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and to buy an unspecified additional share at an “agreed price” Exxon, Anadarko Petroleum Corp.
 Low upgraded the stock to buy from hold earlier this month.
 The Internet search giant has teamed up with Novartis AG to develop sensor-enhanced contact lenses that aim to help people with diabetes more easily track their glucose levels, and last month agreed to buy health-technology startup Lift Labs as it pursues new methods to address neurodegenerative diseases such as Parkinson’s.
 Exits Slow Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 “At current levels, it may be a good time to buy on dips or accumulate,” said Linus Yip, a strategist at First Shanghai Securities Ltd.
 Electrolux last month agreed to buy General Electric Co’s appliances business for $33 billion, putting the maker of AEG stoves and Frigidaire refrigerators on a par with main rival Whirlpool Corp, with both companies chalking up revenue exceeding $20 billion.
 In May, Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy the Cosmopolitan of Las Vegas hotel and casino for $173 billion from Deutsche Bank AG, which sought to end its money-losing foray into casino development.
 In 2013, the company raised $44 billion to buy commercial real estate around the world.
 The chain is planning to offer its shareholders $625 million of 8 percent unsecured notes due 2019 plus warrants to buy additional shares, according to a statement today.
 The warrants allow shareholders to buy additional stock for five years at $2841, the closing price last week.
 Overseas holdings in several of Vietnam’s biggest companies have reached the legal limit of 49 percent, making it difficult for international investors to buy all the shares they want.
 They raised their recommendation to buy from neutral and increased their target price to 19 pesos from 17 pesos.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- The question of what counts as high-speed Internet service is emerging as a sticking point in Comcast Corp’s bid to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 McMillon said stores need to boost in-stock levels -- a measure of the merchandise available on shelves for customers to buy.
 National Commercial Bank said that at the end of yesterday investors had agreed to buy just over 10 percent of its $6 billion share sale.
 “Gross’s new fund needs to build a good track record” Weil has raised the firm’s profile in the past month, hiring Gross and agreeing to buy VelocityShares to expand in exchange-traded products.
 held talks to buy Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 to buy Snapchat for $3 billion.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Greece’s bonds rose, with 10-year yields dropping the most in almost a month, on speculation the European Central Bank will take steps to ensure it’s able to buy Greek and Cypriot loans as part of its stimulus efforts.
 In a short sale, an investor sells borrowed shares to bet on a decline, hoping to buy them back cheaper and pocket the difference.
 land drillers to buy from neutral today, saying a recent sell-off in stocks was “overdone” At $80 oil, “the rig count is flat,” she said in an e-mailed research note today.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Poland wants to buy cruise missiles from the US.
 Using options allowed Pershing Square to skirt rules requiring government approval to buy more than $75 million of a company ‘‘with an intent to influence control of the business,’’ Ackman told Bloomberg TV.
 Ackman said at the time that he was ‘‘helping facilitate a transaction between two companies for the benefit of the shareholders’’ Valeant, based in Laval, Quebec, wants to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 The company this year agreed to buy hotel and restaurant software company Micros Systems Inc.
 As stocks and some corporate bonds fell last week, some hedge-fund managers said higher capital requirements had curbed Wall Street trading desks’ ability to cushion the declines by stepping in to buy securities -- what is known as providing liquidity.
 Swiss Re in June agreed to buy the UK.
 Subscription Video Former Viacom CEO Tom Freston, an adviser to Vice, identified Internet-delivered video as the growth area for the media industry, saying Netflix Inc’s streaming service enticed consumers to buy subscription-based online video, he said.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Archer-Daniels-Midland Co, the world’s largest corn processor, agreed to buy a distributor of nut and fruit products for $170 million to expand its new food-ingredients business unit.
 “What’s My Line?” and “Name That Tune” joined a slew of shows that appeared in the ’50s as more people had the means to buy a TV set.
 One way of gauging market sentiment is to compare how much it costs to buy options that protect against losses in shares this month versus those timed to expire in 90 days.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Aaron Cowen, founder of Suvretta Capital Management LLC, said he likes shares of Liberty Global Plc because of its position in the German market and as competitors may seek to buy the company.
 Cowen told attendees that the burger company could continue to buy other franchise businesses to expand its global reach.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- SHV Holdings NV, a Dutch investment company, agreed to buy animal-feed maker Nutreco NV for about 27 billion euros ($34 billion), prompting some analysts to say a higher rival bid could be possible.
 “It’s going to be harder and harder to justify using that capital to buy back stocks at record highs,” Tim Courtney, who helps oversee about $13 billion as chief investment officer of Exencial Wealth Advisors, said in a phone interview from Oklahoma City on Oct.
 You don’t want to run it into the ground and then try and sell it because then nobody’s going to buy it.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Anadolu Endustri Holding AS, the owner of stakes in Turkey’s biggest brewer and Coca-Cola Co’s local business, offered to buy 4025 percent of Migros Ticaret AS in a transaction that values the second-biggest Turkish retailer at 46 billion liras ($2 billion).
 “Everybody will have their own saga as to why they should only cut from a more theoretical level, and I don’t think the Saudis are going to buy into that” OPEC isn’t engaged in a price war, according to the group’s Secretary-General Abdalla El-Badri.
 agreed to buy the project from EDF last month.
 “Declining demand in the paper market was already evident when BASF decided to buy Ciba,” said Lars Hettche, an analyst at Bankhaus Metzler, who rates the shares buy.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Ingredion Inc, a maker of high-fructose corn syrup, agreed to buy Penford Corp.
 “It might be too early to buy Macau casino stocks,” Yip said by phone.
 “You see pent-up demand for loans” The ECB has also said it plans to buy covered bonds and asset-backed securities to stimulate the European economy.
 Another accord, also signed last year, called for Rostekhnologii to buy as many as 100 Q400 turboprop aircraft valued at about $34 billion, based on list prices.
 “Given the way earnings are being downgraded, it may be too early to buy the stock,” Alan Richardson, whose Samsung Asean Equity Fund outperformed 96 percent of peers tracked by Bloomberg during the past five years, said by phone from Hong Kong.
 “Customers can push out a project, and it’s not a big deal for the customer, but it can be a huge deal for a supplier like EZchip” Lower Expectations Schreiner downgraded his recommendation on Yokneam, Israel-based EZchip to buy from strong buy on Oct.
 Danone added 29 percent to 5422 euros after agreeing to buy a 25 percent stake in Yashili International Holdings Ltd, a Chinese infant milk-formula maker.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV plans to spin off Ferrari to help raise about $47 billion needed to counter mounting debt, giving investors a rare chance to buy into one of the most storied names in the automotive industry.
 The company originally planned to spend 10 billion yuan ($163 billion) to buy 1,000 megawatts of solar capacity and now says it may buy as little as 500 megawatts.
 The company runs the Mycom portal, started last year to offer mobile games and communications apps to a global audience, and spent $147 billion last month to buy the remaining shares in VKontakte, Russia’s biggest social network.
 In 2012, a spinoff of Assya Compagnie Financiere enabled Leyne to buy out its asset-management business in countries from Switzerland to Monaco to Israel.
 rooftop developer agreed in June to buy Silevo Inc, a maker of high-efficiency solar panels for about $200 million.
 climbed 43 percent, as companies continued to buy updated machines for new employees or upgrade systems from older ones running Microsoft Corp’s Windows XP software, said Jay Chou, an analyst at IDC.
 agreed to buy DramaFever Corp, which offers Korean TV programs online for English-language viewers, adding to the Japanese carrier’s spate of online content acquisitions.
 With a wider choice of other beverages to buy, beer has lost some of its status.
 The company plans to boost profits further in 2015 after agreeing to buy more than 45,000 apartments this year.
 Medtronic in Minneapolis offered to buy the Dublin-headquartered device maker for more than $42 billion in June.
 The spread has averaged 81 percent since the company agreed in June to buy Covidien in cash and stock and shift its legal address from Minnesota to Ireland.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Visa Inc, the world’s biggest payments network, said it may have to pay more than $10 billion to buy Visa Europe Ltd.
 Telefonica in August agreed to buy Brazilian broadband provider GVT for about $9 billion, and last month completed the takeover of German wireless carrier E-Plus.
 The company is also looking for acquisitions in Asia after putting most of its physical assets in Russia up for sale in October, seven months after the Swedish billionaire agreed to buy the 44 percent stake of fellow Gunvor co-founder Gennady Timchenko.
 After a $52 billion deal to buy Shire Plc collapsed last month, approval of the drugs would help the company reduce its dependence on Humira, the rheumatoid arthritis injection that makes up more than half of its sales.
 An Ivanhoe venture last week agreed to buy Manhattan’s 1095 Avenue of the Americas, a 42-story office tower on Bryant Park, from Blackstone Group LP for about $225 billion, according to two people with knowledge of the transaction.
 agreed to buy a rival Mexican mobile-phone operator, solidifying the US.
 DirecTV, which AT&T is still waiting on regulatory approval to buy, has a 41 percent stake in Sky Mexico.
 agreed to pay $189 billion to buy 45 planes from companies including General Electric Co’s aviation services unit to enter aircraft leasing.
 Cheung Kong said in August it was seeking to buy planes from Terra Firma Capital Partners Ltd’s Awas arm to quickly build a major presence in the business.
 Cheung Kong agreed to buy 10 planes from Bank of China Ltd’s BOC Aviation Pte.
 4 that it had submitted a preliminary, non-binding proposal to buy planes from lessor Awas, without providing details.
 of China, is in talks with “relevant parties” to buy Dublin-based aircraft-leasing firm Avolon Holdings Ltd.
 Short sellers sell borrowed shares in anticipation of a decline in price that allows them to buy an equal amount of stock at a lower cost at some point in the future Sino-Forest Corp, a Chinese tree-plantation company, filed for bankruptcy protection in Canada in 2012 after Muddy Waters said in a June 2011 report the company overstated its assets.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to engage management and the board when they disclose their holdings in a filing with the US.
 Valeant could seek to acquire Zoetis if it can’t get Allergan, or it may try to buy both, the Wall Street Journal reported yesterday, citing people familiar with the matter.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- JBS SA, the world’s biggest meat producer, said it plans to increase exports to Asia after paying A$145 billion ($13 billion) to buy Primo Group, the largest producer of ham and bacon in Australia and New Zealand.
 Separately, JBS said yesterday it agreed to buy a Brazilian poultry business for $169 million.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Salesforcecom Inc, which has agreed to lease what will be San Francisco’s tallest office tower, now plans to buy its first building in the city to expand its headquarters.
 agreed to buy Conning Holdings Corp, adding almost $92 billion in assets under management.
 Aquiline struck a deal in 2009 to buy Conning from Swiss Re AG.
 Onex did manage to make its first major acquisition of the year in July when it agreed to buy York Risk Services Group Inc, which provides risk management, insurance claims and managed-care services for $133 billion.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Mercedes-Benz is reviving the Maybach name for a second time to challenge Rolls-Royce and Bentley for the world’s wealthiest auto buyers.
 Earlier this year, Blackstone agreed to buy Frankfurt’s MesseTurm, once Europe’s tallest tower, for about 250 million euros, according to a person with knowledge of the deal who declined to be named because the sale is private.
 Spending more to improve quality isn’t always an easy option, either: the average airline flight in 2013 made about enough profit per passenger to buy a sandwich, according to International Air Transport Association CEO Tony Tyler.
 GIC, Singapore’s sovereign wealth fund, agreed to buy about $100 million of stock in the company’s Hong Kong share sale, the people said.
 also agreed to buy shares in the offering, the people said.
 owner of single-tenant buildings, sued investment partner RCS Capital Corp, alleging it wrongly terminated an agreement to buy a business.
 RCS agreed to buy American Realty’s private-capital management business, Cole Capital, for at least $700 million then reneged on the deal, the real estate investment trust said in a complaint filed yesterday in Delaware Chancery Court in Wilmington.
 Ownership of put options conveying the right to sell an exchange-traded fund tracking retail stocks has fallen to the lowest since May compared with calls giving the right to buy.
 Bought Veritas AMG in April agreed to buy a majority stake in Veritas Asset Management LLP, a global equity manager with $17 billion in assets.
 Bangkok Air plans to use the money to buy 18 new planes, mounting competition for regional rivals like Thai Airways International Pcl and Singapore Airlines Ltd.
 While banks including Morgan Stanley and UBS AG recommended cheaper Shanghai shares after the exchange connect was announced in April, their discounts have vanished before most foreign money managers get the chance to buy.
 Robeco, which oversees about $250 billion worldwide, said in July it was using its quota under China’s Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor program to buy yuan-denominated A shares with dual listings in the consumer and industrial sectors.
 The $64 billion QFII program has allowed professional money managers to buy local securities since 2002, while a similar system using offshore yuan began in 2011.
 Salazar, a 28-year-old videographer in San Antonio, paid$8,000 in 2010 to buy his used HHR, which he said was good forhauling his film gear.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- JPMorgan Chase & Co, the biggest arranger of corporate debt this year, raised Eskom Holdings SOC Ltd’s debt to buy, saying the South African utility’s yields are attractive and betting its rating won’t be cut further.
 “We have already seen that recently in the oil services space” Halliburton Co, the world’s second-biggest oilfield services provider, this month agreed to buy Baker Hughes Inc.
 The team is looking at a lot of things” Old Mutual this year completed an initial public offering for its asset management unit in New York and agreed to buy UK-based Quilter Cheviot Ltd.
 and its power-plant holding company, TerraForm Power Inc, agreed to buy closely held First Wind Holdings Inc.
 agreed to buy Belgian health-products provider Omega Pharma NV for 36 billion euros ($45 billion), including debt, in a deal that will expand its presence in Europe.
 (1) agreed to pay $189 billion to buy 35planes from companies including General Electric Co’s aviationservices unit to enter aircraft leasing.
 Cheung Kong said in August it was seeking to buy aportfolio of planes from Terra Firma Capital Partners Ltd’sAwas arm to quickly build a major presence in the business.
 Bank of China Cheung Kong agreed to buy 10 planes from Bank of ChinaLtd’s BOC Aviation Pte.
 That’s $1 billion inAckman’s pocket, “waiting to be picked” Any investigation or penalty may not impede the ability ofAckman and Valeant to buy Allergan.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Antofagasta Plc agreed to buy Duluth Metals Ltd.
 He hoped this reverence would lead investors to buy the bonds that backed them.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- OAO Rosneft, Russia’s largest oil producer, agreed to buy Total SA’s 167 percent stake in PCK Raffinerie GmbH in Schwedt, Germany.
 Kaeser, who took over in August last year, is concentrating on the energy business as he seeks to catch up with the profitability of General Electric Co, which has agreed to buy France’s Alstom SA to expand its own energy offering.
 The sale of the hearing-aids unit will help fund the 68 billion euros Kaeser spent to buy Rolls Royce Group Plc’s energy assets and Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 The fund agreed to buy HSBC Holdings Plc’s headquarters in London, the Financial Times reported last month, citing unidentified people with knowledge of the matter.
 Saunders came on board after Actavis agreed to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 agreed to buy Mobil Corp.
 In 2009, the conglomerate’s offer to buy Daewoo Shipbuilding & Marine Engineering Co.
 Salus attempted to buy as much as $465 million of RadioShack’s senior loans last month, two people with knowledge of the discussions told Bloomberg at the time.
 Before that, it bought most of its cars from automakers that agreed to buy them back at a set age and price.
 “Does it make sense to buy equities because of the meeting? No.
 Fifty years later it disbursed $25 billion to buy the medical-nutrition unit of Roche’s archrival Novartis AG.
 Wirecard AG advanced 39 percent after agreeing to buy some assets from Visa Inc.
 is supposed to help Mercedes transfer some of the hipster aura of the electric-vehicle pioneer to the B-Class while avoiding the pitfalls of spending billions on a technology few may want to buy.
 Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, which this year agreed to buy Ranbaxy, lost as much as 41 percent.
 agreed to invest 612 million euros in Hertha Berlin and take a 97 percent stake in January, while Stuttgarter Nachrichten reported in July that Daimler AG was preparing to buy a holding in VfB Stuttgart, whose stadium neighbors its global headquarters.
 People should continue to buy interest sensitive stocks” Real-Estate Stocks The one-year deposit rate was lowered by 025 percentage point to 275 percent, while the one-year lending rate was reduced by 04 percentage point to 56 percent, effective tomorrow, the People’s Bank of China said on its website.
 decided to buy a $200 million North Dakota wind farm, a year after signing an agreement to buy power from the project.
 MDU’s Montana-Dakota Utilities signed an agreement in October 2013 to buy power from the project, about 100 miles (160 kilometers) south of Bismarck, from then-developer Wind Works Power Corp.
 “Werner is a wizard,” said Douglas Harmon, a broker at Eastdil Secured LLC who has worked with Werner on transactions including his $15 billion deal to buy 5 Times Square in Midtown.
 In August, a Werner partnership agreed to buy the Socony-Mobil Building across from Grand Central Terminal for $900 million.
 “I tried to slow him down, as a seller, and dampen his eagerness to buy,” Patton said.
 Werner wanted to buy it.
 After agreeing with the estate to buy a low-rise building on Church Street in Tribeca, Werner discovered information that warranted a price reduction, which one of his partners urged him to seek.
 and the Abu Dhabi Investment Authority to buy Time Warner Inc’s headquarters in Manhattan for $13 billion.
 ‘A Legend’ A stop-loss order is an instruction to buy or sell when a price reaches a certain level.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Twitter Inc’s recent debt deal, which raised about $18 billion, is set to make it more difficult for an acquirer to swoop in to buy the company.
 Schorsch, 53, hasn’t been involved in discussions about the dropped deal to buy ARCP’s Cole Capital unit or the litigation, said Andrew G.
 Terminated Offer Visteon announced an offer to buy the 30 percent stake it didn’t already own in the company in July 2012, then terminated the offer that same month, saying it didn’t receive sufficient offers to sell.
 “We’ll have to wait for the next statement from the company” and then “review what to do next” Shocked Banks Nordea Bank AB, which helped arrange the sale and had been urging clients to buy OW Bunker shares since Oct.
 said it has agreed to buy Range Royalty LP for C$699 million ($617 million) in stock and will raise its dividend after the deal closes.
 iron-ore producer announcedplans to use at least $11 billion of new debt to buy backportions of five of its securities.
 “There’s a lot of money that continues to buy Treasuries regardless of what’s going on, so it’s going to have a bid” Bloomberg’s dollar index, which tracks the greenback against 10 major peers, dropped 02 percent, after yesterday touching its highest level on a closing basis since 2009 in intraday trading.
 The stock jumped the most on record in Hong Kong after the company said it plans to buy CSSC Huangpu Wenchong Shipbuilding Co.
 Guangzhou Shipyard plans to issue 272 million shares to buy Huangpu Wenchong from their mutual parent, state-owned China State Shipbuilding Corp, the Guangzhou-based company said in a stock exchange filing Oct.
 and JPMorgan for its failed attempt to buyAstraZeneca Plc and move to the UK, while the British companyworked with Obama backer Blair Effron’s Centerview Partners LLCand Evercore Partners Inc, among other firms.
 The limited sales are another challenge because they’ve suppressed liquidity, leaving the gap between dealer offers to buy and sell as large as a half cent on the dollar at times, Simpson said.
 17, giving foreigners unprecedented access to yuan-denominated shares and allowing mainland traders to buy Hong Kong equities.
 Some money managers who already invest in China’s domestic markets through the Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor program may be able to free up some of that quota to buy securities outside Shanghai, said Adrian Mowat, the chief Asian and emerging market equity strategist at JPMorgan in Hong Kong.
 The link allows any global investor with an account at a participating Hong Kong brokerage to buy a selection of Shanghai shares, expanding access to the $42 trillion equity market from a small number of foreign institutional money managers.
 announced a deal in May to buy the satellite TV provider, a transaction that the deputies said they support.
 The share decline could be an enticement to buy more, said Smead.
 The company said a year ago that it had lined up $578 million in prepayment loans from Apple to buy equipment to make sapphire, which wasn’t included in the latest version of the iPhone.
 BNSF also plans to buy 330 new locomotives in 2015.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Publicis Groupe SA is in talks to buy Sapient Corp.
 The social network said in a blog post yesterday that starting next year, users’ news feeds will show fewer posts that prompt readers to buy a product, install an application or enter a sweepstakes.
 “Every day it becomes more and more clear that Facebook has abandoned social marketing, and is just a place to buy old-fashioned ads,” Nate Elliott, an analyst at Forrester Research, wrote in an e-mail.
 While building a global commodities platform, BTG agreed in July to buy BSI Group Inc.
 to buy TV production house All3Media.
 is in talks to buy Baker Hughes Inc.
 BNSF has worked to allay concerns about the safety of oil shipments by agreeing to buy 5,000 new crude tank cars with thicker steel than the models known as CPC-1232.
 “Spar’s like-for-like sales were a positive surprise,” said Abraham, who raised his recommendation on the stock today to buy from hold.
 agreed to buy in September.
 “It’s certainly not for funding settlements of shareholder suits targeting self-dealing within a company” Investors sued after Activision’s board agreed to allow Kotick and Kelly’s group, which included Chinese video-game publisher Tencent Holdings Ltd, to buy 25 percent of Vivendi’s Activision stock at the same discounted price Activision paid for $583 billion of the shares.
 The investors also said Kotick threatened to quit if directors didn’t allow his investment group to buy a sizeable chunk of the French conglomerate’s stake and then blocked Activision from considering alternative deals, according to court filings.
 rose the most in more than two months in Manila trading after Singapore’s sovereign wealth fund agreed to buy a stake in the brandy maker.
 agreed to buy 112 billion Emperador shares at 11 pesos each for a total of 123 billion pesos ($273 million), the Philippine company said in the filing.
 “We don’t have any target to buy Americana or some other brand or some other company,” Chairman Abilio Dos Santos Diniz said today in an interview in Abu Dhabi.
 The announcement today marks the second investment in Cheniere by RRJ and Temasek, which joined forces in May 2012 to buy shares in the company for about $468 million.
 Since then, Iliad SA also scrapped an offer to buy T-Mobile, the fourth-largest US.
 Investors sought to buy 84 billion euros of the securities.
 Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s asset management arm was lead investor in a deal to buy stakes in two older distressed-debt funds overseen by Crescent Capital Group LP in September.
 agreed to buy Africa’s Pepkor Holdings Pty Ltd.
 The $64 billion Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor program has allowed professional money managers to buy Chinese securities since 2002, while a similar system using offshore yuan began in 2011.
 Flaring Tempers Carrefour’s commitment is to buy 100 percent of the six main winter vegetables in France, said Jean Vepierre, the company’s director for fruits and vegetables.
 “They are tempted to buy into brands whether it’s beer, food products or clothing” Russian demand for Carlsberg’s premium drinks such as the Baltika 7 and Brewer’s Collection helped offset the impact of a weakening ruble and government regulation on the world’s fourth-biggest brewer.
 BB&T, North Carolina’s second-largest bank, agreed to buy the lender for a premium of about 39 percent over yesterday’s closing price.
 She helped oversee the country’s largest banking acquisition when Westpac agreed in May 2008 to buy St.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Brookfield Property Partners LP dropped plans to buy the shuttered Revel Casino in Atlantic City, New Jersey, in a new setback for the state’s shrinking gambling industry.
 The Toronto-based investment company won bankruptcy-court approval to buy the resort for $110 million last month.
 Stockton College recently reached an agreement to buy the former Showboat casino, which closed earlier this year, and reopen the property as a satellite campus.
 He previously had a rating equivalent to buy for Gazprom and neutral on Rosneft.
 “The buy-the-dip philosophy came back stronger than ever as everybody said the correction is behind us and the opportunity to buy stocks on sale is now,” Brian Peery, co-portfolio manager at Novato, California-based Hennessy Advisors Inc, said by phone.
 The biotechnology drug company will raise its dividend 30 percent in the first quarter 2015 and plans to buy back as much as $2 billion of stock through the end of next year.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Former Deutsche Bank AG salesman Shigeru Echigo withdrew his appeal of a 10-month suspended prison sentence for bribing a Japanese pension fund official to buy investment products.
 Lewis, which agreed to buy Ellerine’s Beares brand for 40 million rand, expects South Africa’s competition authority to give feedback on the deal this month and, if approved, the benefits will be seen from December, he said.
 International investors bought about 26 billion yuan ($4247 million) of Shanghai shares out of the maximum daily 13 billion yuan permitted under the link today, while mainland investors left unused 97 percent of their quota to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 life insurers have been diversifying away from individual annuities after the Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in March that pushed retirees to buy the product.
 insurers are ramping up their bulk annuities business to recoup lost revenue from government changes to the retirement system that no longer force retirees to buy an annuity.
 agreed to buy Cobalt Capital Partners, owner of 256 industrial properties across the US, for about $16 billion.
 Chief Executive Officer Kelly King said yesterday in a phone interview after his company announced plans to buy Susquehanna Bancshares Inc.
 agreed to buy OneWest Bank from parent IMB Holdco LLC for $34 billion.
 The company, which agreed to buy Belgian insurer Fidea NV last month, said Oct.
 Anbang agreed in October to buy the 83-year-old Waldorf Astoria hotel for $195 billion, after weighing a bid for Hong Kong’s second-largest family-run lender Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 The studios are also trying to reduce illegal downloads of films by making it easier for consumers to buy them and watch them anyplace.
 While debt has traditionally been brokered through conversations or in e-mails, an increasing proportion is moving to computer platforms as the biggest and smallest firms grow less willing to commit their own money to buying big blocks of debt from investors.
 Taipei-based Cathay Financial Holding Co’s life unit agreed this month to buy Conning Holding Corp.
 London Stock Exchange Group Plc agreed this year to buy Russell.
 The world’s largest distiller ended talks two years ago about the future of the Cuervo tequila brand, which it was said to have an option to buy.
 20 agreement to buy pesticide maker Arysta LifeScience Ltd.
 agreed to buy Scottish spirits company Whyte & Mackay from Diageo Plc.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP and financial publisher Euromoney Institutional Investor Plc agreed to buy market-data provider Dealogic Holdings Plc and related joint ventures for about $700 million.
 rallied 59 percent after Aviva Plc said it’s in talks to buy the company.
 Raiffeisen Bank International AG rose 23 percent after ING Groep NV raised its stock rating to buy from hold, and Metro AG increased 36 percent after a Macquarie Group Ltd.
 company to buy Tabelog last year.
 17 low after the central bank added to quantitative easing and the nation’s $11 trillion Government Investment Pension Fund pledged to buy more shares.
 ECB Stimulus Mario Draghi said the European Central Bank is open to buying a wide variety of assets for further stimulus as German and Spanish inflation data highlighted the struggle to revive the euro-area economy.
 Lukoil, Russia’s second-biggest oil producer, added 23 percent to the highest price since July 2008, after BCS Financial Group advised investors to buy the stock.
 The following year, Prudential agreed to buy a US.
 Aviva Plc lost 54 percent after saying it’s in talks to buy Friends Life Group Ltd.
 raised its rating on the bourse operator to buy.
 “The erosion of that barrier is clearly doing harm today” Levin faulted banks for stockpiling commodities at the same time they were engaging in “massive” transactions to buy and sell them and trade derivatives tied to oils and metals.
 Buffett uses the float, or premiums held at the businesses until paying claims, to buy equities.
 Julius Baer agreed in July to buy the European operations of Bank Leumi Le-Israel BM, including about 7 billion francs of client assets.
 “Your shares rise because there’s even an artificial demand from all the funds that mimic the IPC and want to buy your shares” Net Worth That’s good for Salinas, who’s reaping most of the benefits from being the gauge’s biggest gainer in the past six months.
 A parliament session starting next week will prove a key test for his reform agenda as he seeks to lift the cap on foreign investment in insurance, pass a new goods and services tax and make it easier to buy land.
 The victims, who believed their investments were used to buy securities, have been paid almost $6 billion by Picard since he started distributing the recovered funds.
 VimpelCom “worked with Takilant in the past” to buy frequency in Uzbekistan, the carrier said in an SEC filing last year.
 John Roberts, an analyst at UBS Securities LLC who attended the investor meeting, said in a note that he believes Dow is trying to buy Dow Corning.
 Corning in January closed on its deal to buy Samsung’s 43 percent stake in Samsung Corning Precision Materials for $22 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 agreed to buy Swiss juice-box maker SIG Combibloc Group AG for as much as 375 billion euros ($47 billion) as Canada’s largest buyout firm expands in Europe.
 Earlier this month, SunEdison and its power plant holding company, TerraForm Power Inc, agreed to buy First Wind Holdings Inc.
 That’s the code name Actavis’s investment bankers gave to the project to buy the maker of Botox wrinkle treatment, its filings on the deal show.
 The person declined to comment on a Korea Economic Daily report that said Hahn reached a preliminary agreement to buy the shares for about about 4 trillion won ($36 billion).
 The hope for resurgence in demand for wine from the Asian giant stems in part from Chinese investors still criss-crossing the Bordeaux region looking for chateaus to buy -- both as an investment and vacation homes.
 “They’d like just to buy a holiday country house in Bordeaux, because here for them it’s luxury,” Li said.
 “Chinese will start to buy Fronsac, Saint-Emilion Grands Crus classes,” she said.
 Mainland investors used less than 2 percent of their 105 billion yuan ($17 billion) daily quota to buy shares listed in Hong Kong today.
 The number of contracts to buy existing homes also roseless than forecast in September, signaling demand may plateauheading into the end of 2014.
 South Africa plans to buy more electricity from renewable sources and independent producers as a shortfall at state-run Eskom Holdings SOC Ltd, which produces 95 percent of the country’s power, caused blackouts and curbs economic growth.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Aviva Plc slid the most in a year and a half after saying it’s in talks to buy smaller British insurer Friends Life Group Ltd, reducing the value of its proposed offer to about 53 billion pounds ($84 billion).
 In contrast, Friends Life was the second-worst performer, hurt by government changes to the pension industry that scrapped rules forcing retirees to buy an annuity product.
 The company, seeking to add scale and market share, last year agreed to buy Tokyo Electron Ltd.
 Altice SA and its unit Numericable Group, both owned by billionaire cable billionaire Patrick Drahi, agreed in April to buy SFR from Vivendi for $23 billion.
 to buy online video platform 56com, Renren’s investor relations department said today, confirming previous reports from Sina Tech and Marbridge Consulting.
 It agreed to buy Concur Technologies Inc.
 Fairfax, run by value investor Prem Watsa, agreed this year to buy Pethealth Inc, North America’s second-largest pet insurer, for C$100 million ($88 million).
 International investors bought about 26 billion yuan ($4247 million) of Shanghai shares out of the maximum daily 13 billion yuan permitted under the link today, while mainland investors left unused 97 percent of their quota to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 Rexam, which in February agreed to buy a stake in United Arab Can Manufacturing Ltd.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Discovery Ltd, owner of South Africa’s largest medical-insurance administrator, agreed to buy the 25 percent of the UK’s Prudential Health it doesn’t already own for 155 million pounds ($246 million).
 The company this year agreed to buy French mobile-phone carrier SFR in a $23 billion deal to combine the asset with Drahi’s Numericable Group.
 Steinhoff International Holdings Ltd, South Africa’s biggest furniture company, agreed to buy closely held clothing retailer Pepkor for 628 billion rand earlier this week to expand in the discount market.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Wohnen AG said nine-month profit almost doubled after the German property investor took advantage of favorable financing conditions to buy more homes in cities including Berlin.
 Jefferies raised its rating on the stock to buy from hold, saying the company’s mobile-games business will help spur advertising sales.
 phone monopoly, entered talks to buy either Telefonica SA’s O2 unit or EE, the wireless carrier co-owned by Orange SA and Deutsche Telekom AG, two of the people said.
 After agreeing to buy Germany’s Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for 77 billion euros ($96 billion) last year, it acquired Grupo Corporativo Ono SA of Spain.
 Still, Liberty Global’s co-Chief Financial Officer Charles Bracken said last month regulators would probably give their permission if Vodafone tried to buy its German business.
 fell the most in more than seven months in Singapore trading after a tribunal ruled that its Myanmar partner has the right to buy its stake in a joint-venture brewery.
 retains the right to buy Singapore-based F&N’s 55 percent interest in Myanmar Brewery Ltd, the holding company said in an e-mailed statement Oct.
 Pigmentparty, a Chinese real estate company with an office in Lisbon, topped a bid by the Portuguese central bank’s pension fund to buy the former headquarters of Banco Santander in Lisbon for 73 million euros, the biggest deal at the auction that day.
 Then a French company bought two palaces located on two of Lisbon’s seven hills before a Russian outbid a Chinese investor to buy a century-old fire-department building in the capital for 3 million euros, almost twice the original asking price, said Antonio Furtado, a city council official at the sale.
 Portuguese investors managed to buy less than 2 million euros of properties out of the 216 million euros raised at the Oct.
 This year, ADM bought Switzerland’s Wild Flavors GmbH for $3 billion, announced a deal to buy Fargo, North Dakota-based Specialty Commodities Inc.
 While its bid to buy Sydney-based Graincorp Ltd.
 Payouts Preferred Dividends are preferable to buybacks for slow-growing, mature companies, so Western Union should scale back repurchases and instead raise its payout, said Susquehanna’s Stauff.
 Mainland investors used less than 8 percent of their 105 billion-yuan ($17 billion) quota to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 solar provider that just announced a second acquisition in a year, plans to buy two more companies in 2015, its chief executive officer said.
 “We want to buy two other companies -- that’ll put us up close to $100 million in revenue.
 Talvivaara Mining is seeking to secure enough money to buy the mining operations, associated assets and rights from the bankruptcy estate.
 In 2004, the island-state eased rules to allow foreigners to buy land for development on Sentosa, luring buyers from Australia to Russia.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Liberty Global Plc co-Chief Financial Officer Charles Bracken said that regulators would probably give their permission if Vodafone Group Plc tries to buy its German business.
 to buy about $700 million of non-performing loans.
 Former Arabtec Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik said in August he rejected an offer from Aabar to buy part of his 279 percent stake in the company.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Italy’s government bonds advanced for a second week, pushing the 10-year yield down to a record, amid speculation the European Central Bank will broaden its asset purchases to buy sovereign debt.
 25 and changed the range used to buy naira at foreign-exchange auctions to 168 per dollar, plus or minus 5 percent, from within 3 percent of 155.
 In April 2013, the opening of derivatives trading was delayed for three hours because of a computer breakdown, forcing investors to use a rival exchange operator in Osaka to buy and sell Japanese index contracts.
 GFI managers favor CME’s lower offer because they would be entitled to buy some of the business for themselves as part of the deal, Lutnick said in the statement.
 added 35 percent after agreeing to buy DSS Group Inc.
 “Young, urban upwardly mobile professionals are now able to buy a much wider range of lifestyle vehicles other than sports cars” BMW is boosting sales of its other vehicles even as the sports segment stagnates.
 That changed in the last year when firms with prominent consumer brands tried to buy companies overseas to reduce their taxes.
 In August, Burger King announced plans to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Waypoint Leasing, the helicopter lessor backed by billionaires George Soros and Michael Dell, agreed to buy 31 aircraft valued at more than $400 million to meet growing demand from the offshore oil and gas industry.
 agreed to buy market leader Milestone Aviation Group LLC for $178 billion.
 “It opens the doors to helicopter operation to those that typically wouldn’t want to own, can’t get access to equipment to buy, or are uncertain about their needs longer-term” Fragmented Market Another selling point for investors is a fragmented market where “there weren’t a lot of people doing this.
 The bank started coverage of Vipshop with a rating equivalent to buy.
 upgraded Barclays Plc to buy from neutral, citing that the Bank of England’s decision to set lower-than-expected minimum regulatory level means the lender is less likely to raise capital.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in March that pushed retirees to buy an individual annuity.
 At least 13 analysts who updated their ratings on Tencent yesterday reiterated recommendations to buy the stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The program permits international money managers to purchase a net 13 billion yuan ($21 billion) a day of Chinese shares, while also providing a route for mainland investors to buy Hong Kong equities.
 Drones are so easy to buy and fly that users don’t learn the most basic aviation rules used to keep planes from colliding, Michael Barr, who teaches aviation safety at the University of Southern California, said in an interview.
 In the past two years, he has also taken advantage of an Irish tax break to buy prime real estate in central Dublin.
 It’s as though a shareholder sold his stock and then used the proceeds to buy stock in the new company.
 He has also spent a combined 130 million euros ($163 million) to buy three of Dublin’s most central hotels: the Westin, the Trinity Capital Hotel and the Hilton Dublin, according to CBRE Global Research and Consulting.
 Orange agreed in September to buy Spanish broadband provider Jazztel Plc to offer the packages.
 households buy at least some of their telecommunications services together, up from 29 percent in 2005, when Telefonica agreed to buy O2, according to data from regulator Ofcom.
 One way to do that is by bundling phone, Internet and TV into one package, and that means providers need to buy whichever of the three they don’t have.
 was in talks to buy it.
 is in talks to buy the studio.
 are pushing management to be more aggressive with cost cuts and to buy back stock if the chemical maker can sell an Alberta oil terminal, people familiar with the activists’ positions said.
 Congress passed a sweeping patent law in 2011 and courts have ruled against companies whose sole business is to buy up patents and try to collect royalties on them.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Securian Financial Group Inc, the insurer formed in 1880, agreed to buy a majority stake in Asset Allocation & Management Co.
 agreed this month to buy Conning Holdings Corp, which focuses on insurance clients.
 It announced agreements in 2011 to buy two units from Munich Re and a life insurance business from Bank of America Corp.
 “You have to wonder what the overall gain is going to be in the end” By cutting 700 pounds Ford is able to lower the truck’s center of gravity and give a better driving dynamic and make other improvements that will also appeal to buyers, said Doug Scott, Ford’s truck marketing manager.
 Zoetis’s plan would allow shareholders to buy preferred stock at a discount if one investor takes a stake of 15 percent or more, the company said yesterday in a statement.
 Activist Plans Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to engage management and the board when they disclose their holdings in a filing with the US.
 mobile-phone carrier, was represented by Sullivan & Cromwell LLP in its deal to buy closely held Iusacell, the third-largest wireless operator in Mexico, from billionaire Ricardo Salinas.
 The acquisition will take place after Salinas closes a deal to buy the 50 percent of Iusacell owned by Grupo Televisa SAB, AT&T said in a statement.
 Allergan has been seeking its own deals, which might make it too big for Valeant to buy.
 That’s the real impact that all of these bottlenecks have on a company and corporations” The group may look to buy some assets being sold by Holcim Ltd.
 “Record production levels confirm contractors are making good operational progress” Genel today announced a deal with Iraq’s Kurdistan to develop Miran and Bina Bawi gas fields and agreed to buy OMV AV’s stake in Bina Bawi for $150 million as Turkey said the country plans to build a pipeline to import the fuel.
 We look at the best companies in both exchanges” Until the Hong Kong-Shanghai stock link starts, a Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor license, known as a QFII, or Renminbi Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor license, known as an RQFII, is needed for foreign asset managers to buy A-shares.
 Once the license is obtained, the investor also needs to submit an application to China’s State Administration of Foreign Exchange for a specific dollar amount of investment quota that they can use to buy mainland stocks.
 “Today the problem that people have for China is that when they want to buy, you buy what’s available in Hong Kong, it’s either old economy largely and things that have had their growth peak,” he said.
 In addition to their Dow director fees, Third Point is paying Miller and Milchovich $250,000 each plus a further $250,000 to buy Dow shares when they join the board, Third Point said in a Nov.
 It also got an additional $773 million in loans to buy out its partner on the property, Fortress Investment Group LLC, according to documents for investors in a bond offering linked to the complex.
 Valeant has said it’s seeking to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 “Certainly we’ve seen a lot of demand growth, and automakers have matched production to what people are willing to buy,” she said.
 “If you have a job, you’re more likely to buy a car.
 “Consumers are seeing that it’s marginally more expensive to buy a new car, and it’s hard to beat that new-car smell if it doesn’t come at a hefty premium,” Gutierrez said.
 Combined with the raises, that means “I’ll actually be able to buy a little something this year” for the holidays, Carpenter said.
 The fund, which plans to add more Japanese stocks and reduce local bonds, must be ready to buy more shares should Abe’s policies succeed, Tokihiko Shimizu, director general of GPIF’s research department, said in an interview yesterday.
 Even so, the company is still down 39 percent this year since the Chancellor Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in his 2014 budget that pushed retirees to buy an annuity.
 OUE Ltd, owner of Singapore’s Mandarin Gallery shopping mall, agreed to buy US.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Uday Kotak’s bank surged to a record in Mumbai stock trading after it agreed to buy ING Vysya Bank Ltd.
 Last week, Technip SA of France proposed to buy CGG SA.
 oil and gas exploration company, today agreed on terms to buy Salamander Energy Plc.
 agreed to pay $680 million to buy Prosensa Holding NV to add a potential treatment for Duchenne muscular dystrophy to its rare-diseases portfolio.
 agreed to buy Platinum Underwriters Holdings Ltd.
 Hedge-fund investors including Dan Loeb and David Einhorn have pushed into reinsurance in recent years to help gain access to premiums that they can use to buy securities.
 Hamilton Insurance Group Ltd, the reinsurer backed by hedge-fund firm Two Sigma Investments LLC, struck a deal last month to buy units from Fairfax Financial Holdings Ltd.
 in July terminated its offer to buy Aspen Insurance Holdings Ltd.
 An explicit announcement that the central bank is prepared to buy sovereign bonds is likely at the ECB’s Dec.
 About $6 billion was wiped off the UK’s insurance industry’s market value in March after Chancellor of Exchequer George Osborne’s budget scrapped rules that pushed Britain’s retirees to buy an annuity.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- DP World Ltd, the operator of ports from China to Peru, agreed to buy an industrial parks company for $26 billion in a deal that may help Dubai World pay debt five years after its near default roiled global markets.
 Shares of DP World closed 27 percent higher in Dubai after the company said in an e-mailed statement it agreed to buy Economic Zones World FZE, which operates the Jebel Ali Free Zone in the emirate.
 said last month it agreed to buy Integrity Bancshares Inc.
 Voya has agreed to buy $175 million of its stock, according to the statement.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- APM Terminals BV, the port operator owned by AP Moeller-Maersk A/S, wants to buy more ports in Turkey, a market where container volumes are growing twice as fast as the economy.
 Because Ukraine wasn’t able to buy gas from the EU and store it during the summer months when gas is cheaper, it lost about $800 million in potential savings, he said.
 In addition to hiring Gross, the firm recently agreed to buy VelocityShares LLC to expand in exchange-traded products, the fastest-growing part of the fund industry.
 offered to buy United Envirotech Ltd.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Howard Lutnick’s BGC Partners Inc, the interdealer broker that made a hostile bid to buy GFI Group Inc.
 In addition to hiring Gross, Janus recently agreed to buy VelocityShares LLC to expand in exchange-traded products, the fastest-growing part of the fund industry.
 investor conference in New York, said the investment pause didn’t include commitments for more broadband made as part of his company’s bid for regulatory permission to buy DirecTV.
 The company, which took on $10 billion in debt to buy Guidant, wrote down $27 billion tied to the deal in 2008.
 agreed to buy Internet provider Neotel Pty Ltd.
 “The fall in prices has predictably slowed selling activity at origin, while roasters take the opportunity to buy and continue to watch weather forecasts,” Volcafe said, referring to rainfall Brazil needs for the 2015-16 crop to blossom.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the SEC.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Greene King Plc agreed to buy Spirit Pub Co.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- BCE Inc, Canada’s largest telecommunications company, agreed to buy Glentel Inc.
 after some investors asked the companies to buy back the shares they held, the two companies said in statements today.
 Samsung Heavy had to buy back 9235 billion won of stock from shareholders opposed to the merger, according to a regulatory filing today.
 JCET will begin 30-day exclusive talks to buy the state investment company’s 84 percent stake in Stats ChipPac, said one of the people, who asked not to be identified discussing private information.
 That wealth was supposed to buy the island independence from Denmark.
 (RCAP) terminated anagreement to buy Cole Capital from American Realty CapitalProperties Inc.
 Those coming to Russia to shop include entrepreneurs from ex-Soviet republics, who used to travel to other European countries or Hong Kong to buy iPhones and then resell them in their own countries, according to Eldar Murtazin, an analyst at Mobile Research Group in Moscow.
 Local Demand Non-Russians working in the country are also opting to buy iPhones locally, whereas previously they bought them when visiting their homelands, said Alexander Malis, chief executive officer of Euroset, a handset retailer co-owned by mobile-phone operators OAO MegaFon and VimpelCom Ltd.
 Merchants on Tmall are encouraged to offer pre-orders this year to ease Internet traffic on Singles’ Day and also guarantee their ability to buy goods, said Brian Lee, who oversees distribution in China of Elle handbags and purses.
 “Discussion of the house will fade away bit by bit” Televisa House Rivera, 45, said she agreed in 2012 to buy the house built for her for 54 million pesos ($4 million) over eight years with a 9 percent interest rate.
 is in talks to buy the “Shrek” studio.
 organic food line that it agreed to buy for $820 million in September.
 Reduced interest among ARCs to buy bad loans is threatening to curb a pick-up in credit growth amid a decline in bank non-performing assets and signs of a recovery in the $19 trillion Indian economy under Prime Minister Narendra Modi.
 About 20 percent of parents plan to buy “Frozen” gifts for their daughters, the Washington-based trade group found in its annual study.
 Bolognesi has signed 25-year contracts to buy LNG from countries in the Atlantic basin, Rutzen said by phone.
 The San Francisco-based company is also known for turning down Steve Jobs, Apple’s late CEO, when he offered to buy Dropbox in late 2009.
 has agreed to buy towers across Nigeria and Brazil for more than $22 billion, furthering the US.
 Three days earlier, American Tower agreed to buy 6,480 transmission sites in Brazil for about $12 billion.
 Crown Castle paid $48 billion to buy or lease 9,700 AT&T Inc.
 “Institutional investors can still make money elsewhere even if yields on some of their bills they hold fall below zero, but for individuals, it doesn’t make sense to buy and hold two-year notes and lose money” Bank Deposits Interest on deposits at Bank of Tokyo Mitsubishi UFJ Ltd, a unit of Japan’s biggest banking group, has been held at about 002 percent since September 2010, according to its Website.
 “It is just difficult to buy now and think, ‘My goodness me there is a fantastic upside’” Exports Sputter The nation is also facing weaker demand from overseas.
 Roche-Intermune The largest such deal this year is Roche’s agreement to buy InterMune Inc, an unprofitable company that’s developing a treatment for a rare lung disease, for more than $8 billion in cash.
 agreed to buy Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 agreed in April to buy Biomet Inc.
 “When GTAT’s management expressed obvious concerns to Apple regarding the deal terms during the contract negotiations, Apple responded that similar terms are required for other Apple suppliers and that GTAT should ‘Put on your big boy pants and accept the agreement’” Apple originally offered to buy 2,600 sapphire growing furnaces, which would have been the largest order for the supplier, the executive said.
 Purchase Option The company offers tenants an opportunity to select a house they’d like to own and rent it for as long as five years before exercising their right to buy, giving them time to repair their credit or save for a down payment.
 DP World Ltd, which trades on Nasdaq Dubai, a separate gauge, rose to a six-week high, after the company, which operates ports from China to Peru, agreed to buy Dubai’s industrial parks operator Economic Zones World FZE and said it plans to delist from the London Stock Exchange.
 rewarded investors with a profit of about $254 billion for agreeing to buy the record $49 billion of bonds it sold in September 2013 as the price of the securities surged.
 venture agreed to buy a Manhattan office tower from Blackstone Group LP for about $225 billion, extending a surge of demand for prime US.
 Eight lots, including the Giacometti and the Modigliani sculptures, had guarantees, in which the auction house or a third party agrees to buy the artwork at a fixed price before the sale.
 The easiest way to gain exposure to peripheral euro-region markets in the short term is to buy Italian debt, which benefits from greater liquidity, she said.
 Abil first issued preference shares in 2005 in a private placement aimed at enabling black investors to buy a stake in the bank to make up for economic exclusion during apartheid.
 The bank was one of five gold and three silver members that participated in setting London fixings, benchmark rates used by mining companies, jewelers and central banks to buy, sell and value the metals.
 Largest Employer He stands out because he’s not among the Moscow-based oligarchs who made their fortunes by using government ties to buy state oil refineries and metals plants at bargain prices in the 1990s.
 There’s already a crowded field: Apple agreed to pay $3 billion to buy headphones and streaming-music service Beats Electronics LLC in May.
 Baker Hughes Inc, which Halliburton has agreed to buy, dropped 89 percent.
 Fivefold Increase India’s subsidy bill rose fivefold under Prime Minister Manmohan Singh as he implemented policies to buy farm produce at guaranteed prices, boost rural wages and distribute cheap food.
 Consumers rushed to buy weapons after shootings in Newtown, Connecticut, and Aurora, Colorado, fueled speculation that federal restrictions would increase.
 “Some people might prefer to see them concentrating on core markets and improving their profitability there rather than expanding into further new countries” After agreeing to buy the consumer-finance arm of Spanish retailer El Corte Ingles in 2013, Santander earlier this year moved to set up partnerships in 11 countries with Banque PSA Finance, the French car group’s lending arm.
 Santander said in September it had agreed to buy Canadian car-financing company Carfinco Financial Group Inc.
 Santander also agreed in June to buy GE Capital’s Scandinavian consumer finance arm for about 700 million euros.
 agreed to buy a 75-megawatt wind farm in Nebraska.
 Nutresa agreed to buy Aldage Inc, the company that controls El Corral, in an 830 billion pesos ($384 million) deal, according to the filing.
 The yield premium investors demand to buy Takata’s seven-year bond sold in March rose to a record high of 350 basis points on Nov.
 Any selling after a ratings downgrade would trigger hedge funds to buy, “because the hedge funds don’t believe Takata will ever file for bankruptcy,” Tsuchiya said.
 Investors are demanding a 43 percent rate to buy Takata’s bonds, the most on any bond sold in the country in the last two years.
 raised the company’s rating to buy from neutral.
 “To get that kind of money difference,” McCord said, “you have to touch a lot of areas” The Pentagon would cut 17 of the 343 F-35 fighters it planned to buy from Lockheed Martin Corp.
 13 to redeem a warrant that would have allowed him to buy shares at about a third of the market price, according to a regulatory filing today.
 Those have sparked megamergers, such as Comcast Corp’s plan to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 advised clients to buy the Russian oil producer’s stock, saying the “huge discount” to its biggest competitors isn’t justified.
 1 that it plans to buy back as much as 15 billion euros of its stock over the next three years.
 Mainland investors today used just 13 percent of their 105 billion yuan ($17 billion) daily limit to buy shares listed in Hong Kong today, while 54 percent of the 13 billion daily quota to buy shares in Shanghai was utilized, data compiled by Bloomberg showed.
 One priority is to buy direct competitors where it already operates, Telekom Austria said today.
 Earlier this year, Telekom Austria agreed to buy Macedonian fixed-line operator Blizoo.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- BGC Partners Inc, the interdealer broker seeking to buy GFI Group Inc, said it has resolved a UK.
 Comcast Deal Comcast is seeking FCC approval to buy No.
 More than half the economists in a Bloomberg survey expect the ECB to buy sovereign debt if it boosts stimulus, even as the central bank’s Governing Council is divided on the issue.
 24 the ECB will face legal obstacles to buying government bonds.
 may suffer a significant blow if the Supreme Court takes away subsidies that some Americans get to buy health insurance under the Affordable Care Act.
 The court said yesterday that it would rule on whether people in at least 34 states will be allowed to receive subsidies to buy insurance under the law, which has helped cut the number of uninsured showing up at hospitals.
 have said they’re unable to buy as many shares as they want because of the caps.
 of America Holdings agreed to buy Covance Inc.
 It agreed in May to buy Merck & Co’s over-the-counter drug business for $142 billion, and Dekkers also has expressed interest in acquisitions in veterinary medicines.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Aviva Plc said it’s in talks to buy Friends Life Group Ltd.
 Sales of individual annuities have slumped after the government scrapped rules forcing retirees to buy the product with their pension savings.
 There’s often a liquor mandate, compelling a customer who wants to reserve a table or cabana to buy anywhere from several hundred to several thousand dollars of booze -- deposits required.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s Embraer SA is shifting its jet-sales strategy in China by targeting startup regional airlines amid resistance from the country’s largest carriers to buying small aircraft.
 agreed to buy 10 E190-E2 planes.
 agreed to buy the Beares brand for 40 million rand on Oct.
 One priority is to buy direct competitors where it already operates, Telekom Austria has said.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Hungary’s central bank is setting up an asset manager to buy non-performing commercial real estate loans from lenders to speed up portfolio cleaning and support growth by boosting credit.
 The number of contracts to buy existing homes also rose less than forecast in September, signaling demand may plateau heading into the end of 2014.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date, and non-deliverable contracts are settled in dollars.
 “There was a little snow coming down and it motivated people to buy more coats” Lundgren, who visited the Macy’s flagship store in New York last night, said there was a diverse and international crowd of shoppers that exceeded last year’s number of 15,000.
 While he spent 68 billion euros ($85 billion) this year to buy Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s energy business and oil-and-gas equipment maker Dresser-Rand Inc, analysts say the performance of Siemens’s energy business was still disappointing in the fourth quarter.
 Execution Time As some competitors reduce spending plans for 2015, Encana plans to ramp up activity as it doubles the number of rigs targeting oil in Texas’s Permian basin, where it closed a $593 billion deal to buy Athlon Energy Inc.
 ‘Terrible Time’ Encana announced a deal to buy Fort Worth, Texas-based Athlon for $5850 a share in late September, a “reasonable price” according to RBC, and oil steepened its decline by another $20 a barrel over the next seven weeks.
 “Losing 30 percent of your cash flow overnight is definitely going to impact you” Deep Panuke While asset purchases and sales are no longer a focus for Encana, there may be opportunities for it to buy parcels of land to expand in regions it’s trying to grow, Suttles said.
 For a company whose restaurants are already on many American street corners, it now needs to buy the concept that shows up across the street in coming years.
 Diamond has done this before” Tisch’s company in 2009 struck deals to buy two rigs from bankrupt units of PetroMena ASA for a combined total of about $950 million.
 A separate report by the Conference Board yesterday showed an unexpected decline from October, which was a seven-year high, while a gauge of consumers’ willingness to buy appliances rose to its highest level since at least 2010 and purchase intentions for televisions were at a two-year high.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy GE Japan Corp’s residential-property business for more than 190 billion yen ($161 billion) to expand its apartment holdings in Japan.
 Blackstone also agreed to buy apartment blocks in Madrid after Spanish home prices tumbled.
 Bronner’s Magic Soap and Nutiva, an organic-foods company, agreed to buy their products.
 Valeant has said it’s seeking to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 12 interview on Bloomberg Television’s “Market Makers” Consumers are also willing to buy more expensive items.
 Oceanwide will offer to buy all of Harbour Ring’s shares for 5973 Hong Kong cents each, according to a joint filing to Hong Kong’s stock exchange yesterday.
 Emirates last week raised 11 billion dirhams ($299 million) in a club finance lease funding package to buy two 777-300ERs.
 “My hairline survived, but just barely” At Apple the next summer, “I finally decided, hey, this is the environment I’m going to find myself in for a long time to come, so I better learn” He biked to Target to buy some clippers, and still uses them.
 DiLucchio said in a telephone interview yesterday that the “goals of a law firm and the goals of a general counsel will never be totally aligned” “Just like when you go to buy a car, you and your car dealer will never be aligned,” he said.
 Nichii Gakkan soared 91 percent to 902 yen after saying it plans to buy back as much as 122 percent of shares for 6 billion yen.
 phone company has been eyeing options for growth and is in preliminary talks to buy either Telefonica SA’s O2 unit or EE, the joint venture owned by Orange SA and Deutsche Telekom AG.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- About $119 million of municipal debt for a power plant serving the shuttered Revel Casino in Atlantic City may be approaching default after Brookfield Property Partners LP dropped a plan to buy the resort.
 Revel Contract Toronto-based Brookfield, which won court approval to buy the resort for $110 million last month, withdrew last week because it couldn’t cut electricity payments, according to two people with knowledge of the matter who weren’t authorized to speak publicly and asked not to be identified.
 Revel had a contract to buy power and other utility services for about $3 million a month from ACR, a joint venture between South Jersey Industries Inc.
 Mainland investors today used just 15 percent of their 105 billion yuan ($17 billion) daily limit to buy shares listed in Hong Kong today, while 22 percent of the 13 billion daily quota to buy shares in Shanghai was utilized, data compiled by Bloomberg showed.
 A possible deal with Fishman, chairman and CEO of Travelers, to buy AIG’s personal lines of insurance businesses for $7 billion foundered because they were too financially entangled with other company properties, Willumstad said.
 Dave Goss of London’s Vape Emporium, a source of e-cigarettes, told consumers to buy equipment from trusted manufacturers and to check boxes carefully to make sure their purchases are authentic, according to the Guardian.
 “You’d be crazy to buy the bonds given the current market” In a country that is headquarters to more than half the world’s gold companies, producers such as Barrick and Kinross Gold Corp.
 Barrick took on debt to buy Equinox Minerals Ltd.
 For developers and borrowers, choosing between bank loans or export credit finance involves balancing repayment times with interest rates and considering the cost of materials they would have to buy from the country providing the credit, Crasson said.
 “An item could be more expensive in Europe than in China, for example, but the client would have to buy it from Europe to get lower interest rates or a longer repayment period thanks to the European funding.
 Yesterday, the Florham Park, New Jersey-based company announced a deal to buy animal health assets from Abbott Laboratories for $255 million.
 Zoetis plans to keep doing deals to buy assets, the company has said, and on Nov.
 Gulf of Mexico, plans to buy producing assets to bolster earnings.
 In addition, the company, which posted a $75 million net loss, cut its full-year sales forecast to 33,000 cars from 35,000, again citing the inability to make as many cars as people want to buy.
 Madrid-based Telefonica initiated consolidation in Brazil’s telecommunications market earlier this year by agreeing to buy Vivendi SA’s broadband unit GVT for about 7 billion euros ($9 billion).
 The number of contracts to buy existing homes also rose less than forecast in September, signaling demand may plateau heading into the end of 2014.
 raised its recommendation to buy from neutral and added it to its pan-Europe Conviction Buy List, citing the “recent sharp” decline in the shares.
 rose the most in five years after the Canadian producer of private-label soft drinks agreed to buy DSS Group Inc.
 Some funds can wait years before profiting from an investment and may be able to buy the assets “relatively cheaply,” he said.
 Unlike traditional jewelery, which is frequently purchased by men for their wives or girlfriends, the T collection is designed for women to buy it for themselves.
 TVN will continue to buy back shares next year and plans to pay out about 50 percent of its 2015 net income as dividend, it said in the statement.
 The amendments include giving the state the right to a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and to buy an unspecified additional share at an agreed price.
 Traders are paying a 655 percentage-point premium for options to grant the right to sell the ruble against the dollar during the next three months over those that give the right to buy the currency, according to risk-reversal data compiled by Bloomberg.
 iPhone Price Until yesterday, Apple too had refrained from putting up prices, meaning that the Russian price for an iPhone had been Europe’s lowest at about $700, prompting tourists from other countries to buy iPhones in Moscow.
 “What will happen? Would food, clothes or electronics get more expensive? Nobody is adjusting our salary for this” January Increases? Margarita Zobnina, a Moscow school professor who spends about 2,400 rubles a month on imported contact lenses, said she decided to buy a year of stock as she expects prices to rise by 30 percent because of the ruble’s devaluation.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Kellogg Co, the American producer of breakfast cereals and Pop Tarts, made a $127 million-offer to buy Egyptian confectionery maker Bisco Misr, outbidding competitor Abraaj Group.
 Dubai-based investment company Abraaj is offering to buy Bisco for 7391 pounds a share, valuing the company at $119 million.
 Encouraged by Apple’s decision to buy the factory and signs that the economy was turning around, Shelley Nikolich’s family decided to expand their pizzeria in July, buying a downtown building and renovating it for more than 60 seats.
 “They need more stores,” said Ann Paquin, a 37-year-old mom who had come from nearby Pembroke to buy soccer shoes for one of her four kids.
 ECB President Mario Draghi said yesterday the bank is open to buying a wide variety of assets for further easing.
 12 announcement that it agreed to buy Susquehanna Bancshares Inc, is focusing attention on underperforming lenders.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Marsh & McLennan Cos, the largest insurance broker by market value, agreed to buy SCM Strategic Capital Management AG as its Mercer unit expands in alternative investments.
 Zillow, which agreed earlier this year to buy Trulia Inc, already has a partnership deal with RealPage that allows the two companies to share apartment listings and some services.
 17 low after the central bank added to quantitative easing, the $11 trillion pension fund pledged to buy more shares and amid speculation Abe wouldn’t go through with the tax increase.
 At the same time, limited wage growth is reining optimism about finances and whether it’s a good time to buy as the holiday-shopping season gets under way.
 An investor group led by Macquarie also agreed to buy Louisiana electricity supplier Cleco Corp.
 rose 14 percent as the retailer plans to buy back shares.
 Rona, a Canadian home improvement retailer, rose 14 percent to C$1385 after disclosing a plan to buy back as much as 10 percent of its shares and to open new stores next year.
 plans to buy the 65 percent of Acucap Properties Ltd.
 Phone carrier Oi SA rose after Altice SA offered 7 billion euros ($88 billion) to buy its Portuguese telecommunications assets.
 government after agreeing to buy HBOS, which ran up bigger loan losses than any other UK.
 Last week, China Aircraft Leasing Group Holdings Ltd, the first Asian lessor to sell shares publicly, pledged to buy 100 Airbus aircraft valued at $10 billion.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Mondelez International Inc, the maker of Oreo cookies and Ritz crackers, agreed to buy a majority stake in Vietnam’s Kinh Do Corp’s snack business for $370 million, bolstering its presence in emerging markets.
 The transaction gives Mondelez 80 percent of Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam-based Kinh Do’s snack unit and the option to buy the rest after 12 months, the companies said in a statement.
 Valeant has said it’s seeking to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 The Geneva-based company agreed to buy the Welsh refinery in July, hoping to have it producing fuels within weeks of the deal being finalized.
 “SolarCity will be spending aggressively on sales and marketing to build out its portfolio,” The company provides residential and commercial solar systems, typically at little to no upfront cost to customers who sign long-term contracts to buy the output.
 - Draghi opens door to buying government bonds as stimulus tool.
 Hispania has reached an agreement with creditors to buy 50 percent of the loan for 313 million euros as long as the takeover bid is successful.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Abengoa SA, the largest developer of solar-thermal power plants, agreed to buy out its partner BrightSource Energy Inc.
 In a short sale, an investor sells borrowed shares to bet on a decline, hoping to buy them back cheaper and pocket the difference.
 The changes announced today by the government-owned finance firms specify when lenders would be asked to buy back flawed loans that were issued based on inaccurate data or misrepresentations of borrowers’ qualifications.
 President Barack Obama’s administration is pushing to unlock tight credit after banks were forced to buy back billions of dollars of loans issued before mortgage markets collapsed.
 RCS Capital Corp, a Schorsch company that called off a deal this week to buy American Realty’s Cole Capital unit, rose 32 percent to $1132.
 Geveran on Friday bought 256 million shares in Norwegian Property for about 256 million kroner ($38 million) and will offer to buy the rest within four weeks, the company said in a statement today.
 In November 2013, the company said it had lined up $578 million in prepayment loans from Apple to buy equipment to make sapphire, which wasn’t included in the latest version of the iPhone.
 upgraded Barclays Plc to buy from neutral, citing that the Bank of England’s decision to set lower-than-expected minimum regulatory level means the lender is less likely to raise capital.
 Cooper said the outlook for Imperial Tobacco has been boosted by an agreement this year to buy tobacco assets and the electronic cigarette brand Blu in conjunction with the merger of Reynolds American Inc.
 Kaeser is concentrating on the energy business as he seeks to catch up with the profitability of General Electric Co, which has agreed to buy France’s Alstom SA to expand its own energy offering.
 agreed to buy the South African clothes-retail business of Naartjie, boosting its childrenswear offering with a second acquisition in as many months.
 Chief Financial Officer Anthony Noto yesterday publiclytweeted about a plan he has to buy a company, including how hewanted to help make the deal happen at a meeting in mid-December.
 Investors willing to buy Takata’s bond can earn 43 percent, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Intesa, based in Milan, isn’t seeking to buy Fininvest’s stake in Mediolanum SpA, Messina said, adding that the bank wants “to buy something which we want to control” The lender may look at companies in Italy with more than 20 billion euros ($25 billion) of assets under management, he said.
 initially offered to buy the UK.
 And if you don’t have the technology, you have to buy it.
 If you have to buy it, you’re always late” He declined to provide examples of what a TAG Heuer smartwatch could offer.
 Rivera said she agreed in early 2012 to buy the house for54 million pesos ($39 million) over eight years with a 9percent interest rate.
 “There is a good opportunity at the bottom of the cycle to buy high quality businesses that will then later benefit from being part of our group and the inevitable economic uptake,” Jefferies said.
 A possible deal with Fishman, chairman and CEO of Travelers, to buy AIG’s personal lines of insurance businesses for $7 billion foundered because they were too financially entangled with other company properties, Willumstad said.
 The Ontario Power Authority has agreed to buy electricity from the wind farm under a 20-year contract.
 fell to the lowest level in more than a year in Hong Kong trading after the company agreed to buy a HK$24 billion ($310 million) stake in Huishang Bank Corp.
 The operator of physical stores and an e-commerce site selling home appliances agreed to buy 6325 million of Huishang Bank’s Hong Kong-listed shares at HK$380 each, 12 percent more than the last closing price, Beijing-based Gome said yesterday.
 “But it’s much harder to buy the third deal, fourth deal, fifth deal if you’re already underwater on your first purchases” Rental Demand American Homes 4 Rent, the second-largest landlord, sold $5284 million of notes yesterday with a weighted average coupon of 4395 percent versus 4418 percent for a similar issue in September, the company said in a statement.
 Private-equity firms, hedge funds and other institutional investors have spent about $25 billion to buy more than 150,000 single-family homes since 2012, seeking to benefit from low property prices and rising demand for rentals, according to New York-based Keefe Bruyette & Woods Inc.
 “If I can go out and buy the Invitation Homes or Colony or American Homes 4 Rent deal, why do I want to buy the multiborrower deal? It’s taking a somewhat complicated unproven story and adding another layer of complexity on to it” Demand for rentals has increased with the US.
 The Istanbul-based group is borrowing almost 90 percent of the cash needed to buy the company from Blackstone Group LP and PAI Partners SAS, compared with an earlier plan to use loans for 40 percent and the remainder from its own reserves.
 To restore profits, he’s been selling discount wine fridges to encourage drinkers to buy more bottles and clear retailers’ stock; increasing marketing spending 50 percent; and stripping Treasury’s brand list down to a core of 10 to 15 labels.
 Spain’s Telefonica SA, owner of the Vivo brand in Brazil, in August agreed to buy local broadband provider GVT for about $9 billion.
 The duo plan to invest as much as $1 billion to buy soured loans and troubled assets in the world’s second-largest economy, a person told Bloomberg News then.
 doesn’t need to buy assets from America Movil SAB to be successful in Mexico after agreeing to acquire a rival mobile-phone operator in the country, according to Chief Executive Officer Randall Stephenson.
 The GE lessor signed a letter of intent to buy as many as 10 C919s at the Zhuhai Airshow in 2010.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Seplat Petroleum Development Co, a Nigerian oil producer that raised about $500 million in a share sale this year, is looking to buy natural-gas assets to take advantage of higher prices in Africa’s biggest economy.
 “This has had a marked impact on the relative performance of Toyota against Hyundai” He recommends selling the South Korean currency to buy dollars.
 For travelers hungry for a different kind of distraction,e-purchasing at every seat allows customers to buy magazines,small electronics and neck pillows without moving an inch.
 Atthe United terminal, passengers will also be able to buymerchandise from OTG-operated stores and duty free, featuresthat aren’t available at LaGuardia or JFK.
 Dividend Plans Genel also agreed to buy OMV AV’s 36 percent stake in Bina Bawi for $150 million, paying $20 million at the completion of the deal and the rest when gas output, due from 2018, begins.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Olam International Ltd, a commodity trader controlled by Singapore’s state investment company, said it’s in talks to buy or sell assets after the stock exchange questioned a gain in its shares.
 is in talks to buy the studio.
 added 13 percent as it agreed to buy the Duracell battery business from Procter & Gamble Co.
 is in talks to buy the company in a deal that would combine two of the largest and oldest names in the energy business as plunging oil prices send the industry into a downturn.
 Nordea Bank AB, which helped arrange the sale and had been urging clients to buy OW Bunker shares since Oct.
 While some investors rely on economic data for cues about whether to buy or sell, “oil has the upper hand for now” Oil Debate Saudi Arabia is cutting prices, the US.
 The debate is whether falling oil prices are good for economic growth or not, because it makes stuff like gas cheaper for consumers to buy.
 Last month, Safra Group and Brazil’s Cutrale Group agreed to buy banana producer Chiquita Brands International Inc.
 “There’s nothing else to buy” Current seven-year note yields fell two basis points to 194 percent at 11:34 am.
 “They already know that Norway is important in terms of energy supplies, but it could strengthen that understanding” State-owned Cnooc and its Canadian subsidiary, Nexen Inc, are looking into buying seismic data from Norway covering an area of the Barents Sea, according to a Sept.
 mobile-phone carrier, agreed to buy Grupo Iusacell SA from billionaire Ricardo Salinas for $25 billion to expand further into Latin America.
 The acquisition will take place after Salinas closes a deal to buy the 50 percent of Iusacell owned by Grupo Televisa SAB, AT&T said yesterday in a statement.
 The May agreement to buy DirecTV -- a deal that’s still awaiting regulatory approval -- marked AT&T’s first push outside the US.
 In April, Vivendi SA snubbed Bouygues’s offer to buy SFR, France’s second-largest phone operator, agreeing instead to sell it to Altice SA in a deal valued at more than 17 billion euros.
 The government debt agency will offer to buy securities due in October 2015, February 2016 and October 2016 in exchange for the same nominal amount of bonds due in 2021 and 2023.
 BT said this week it is in talks to buy Telefonica SA’s O2unit or another mobile-phone company to expand its wirelessoffering in the UK.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- A Chinese company offered 434 billion kroner ($640 million) to buy REC Solar ASA, one of the last makers of solar panels in Western hands, a move that may help circumvent trade disputes in the US.
 The bank has continued to commit capital to buyout funds this year through a structure allowed under the new regulations, one of the people said.
 Since receiving compensation in May from Argentina for the nationalization of YPF SA in 2012, Repsol has been seeking to buy companies or assets in developed countries including the US.
 hoping to buy items such as a bag and a basketball-style top.
 For those who weren’t able to buy online from H&M, products such as the wet-suit black dress were available on e-Bay at more than twice their suggested retail price.
 It has a similar investment strategy to Pimco’s $36 billion Enhanced Short Maturity fund, but appears more inclined to buy riskier debt, Nadig said.
 Users of Disney Movies Anywhere, the film studio’s cloud-based movie ownership service, will be able to buy movies from Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 While their bullish calls on Sina were wrong, investors who followed the analysts’ recommendations to buy Baidu Inc.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- BT Group Plc, seeking to buy a UK.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- BB&T Corp, North Carolina’s second-largest lender, agreed to buy Susquehanna Bancshares Inc.
 agreed to buy OneWest Bank from parent IMB Holdco LLC for $34 billion.
 The Winston-Salem, North Carolina-based firm said in September it planned to buy Bank of Kentucky Financial Corp.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Shandong Gold Mining Co, China’s third-largest producer by value, surged by its daily limit after it revived a plan to buy and develop reserves worth 505 billion yuan ($822 million).
 It’s the second attempt by the Jinan, Shandong-based miner to buy the assets after it scrapped a similar plan on Dec.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Worldwide spending on medicines will reach almost $13 trillion by 2018, as new treatments for hepatitis C and cancer come to market and as people around the globe use rising incomes to buy pharmaceuticals.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to engage management and the board when they disclose their holdings in a filing with the US.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Lenders from London to Qatar are hunting for African banks to buy.
 Nigeria’s Asset Management Corp, set up in 2010 to buy bad loans from lenders amid a banking crisis that began in 2009, sold Mainstreet Bank Ltd.
 The purchase followed PTTEP and PT Pertamina’s deal last year to buy Hess’s Indonesian assets for $13 billion.
 The acquisition would be the second multibillion-dollar deal this year for Drahi, after the Franco-Israeli businessman also agreed to buy French wireless carrier SFR for about $23 billion.
 The changes may reduce the number of preferred shares that may be issued to General Retail Holdings LP, the Standard General affiliate that agreed to buy one of RadioShack’s loans last month, by as much as 10 percent, the Fort Worth, Texas based company said today in a filing.
 Bouygues SA advanced 39 percent to 2997 euros after Altice SA’s chief executive officer said it would be open to discussing a deal to buy all of Bouygues Telecom after completing its acquisition of local mobile-phone company SFR.
 The oil explorer active in Africa agreed to buy London-based producer Salamander Energy Plc in an all-stock offer.
 “We actually get a bit embarrassed going into jewelry stores” Pandora is focusing on delivery times, after-service and wrapping to make it easy for men seeking gifts for their significant other, according to the CEO, who used the company’s online service today to buy a birthday present for his partner.
 To contact Bloomberg News staff for this story:Eduard Gismatullin in Hong Kong at egismatullin@bloombergnet Photographer: Brent Lewin/Bloomberg Hong Kong Exchanges & Clearing Ltd’s chief executive officer, Charles Li, has said that China’s capital-markets regulators may widen the range of assets permitted to trade over the link, opening the way for mainland investors to buy Hong Kong-listed ETFs that track Nasdaq’s indexes.
 Read More Close Open Photographer: Brent Lewin/Bloomberg Hong Kong Exchanges & Clearing Ltd’s chief executive officer, Charles Li, has said that China’s capital-markets regulators may widen the range of assets permitted to trade over the link, opening the way for mainland investors to buy Hong Kong-listed ETFs that track Nasdaq’s indexes.
 “I was bumming couches from friends so I wouldn’t have to buy gas for the extra trip,” he said yesterday.
 Instead, Arizona residents got “false representations and omissions” that lulled them into buying more GM cars that lost value as they were recalled, he said.
 SolAmerica Energy LLC, an Atlanta-based developer, is building the projects and Southern Co’s Georgia Power unit has agreed to buy the electricity, Guelph, Ontario-based Canadian Solar said today in a statement.
 Foreign investors using the unprecedented access under the Shanghai-Hong Kong connect to buy yuan-denominated A-shares will be “temporarily” exempt from capital-gains tax starting Nov.
 The exchanges agreed in April to allow a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border purchases, opening up the mainland market further to foreigners while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 Among stocks that moved on corporate news, Bouygues SA climbed 44 percent after Altice SA’s chief executive officer said the company would be open to discussing a deal to buy all of Bouygues Telecom.
 The market still underestimates the potential for gains in the stock” Ruble’s Plunge Petropavlovskiy, whose recommendations on Uralkali have produced the best returns over the past year among the analysts who cover it, raised the stock to buy from hold on Oct.
 “There is no question that Iron Mountain should want to buy Recall,” James Santo, a special situations trader at Aviate Global LLP in Sydney, said by phone.
 The exchange operator agreed to buy the company from Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co.
 The number of contracts to buy existing homes also rose less than forecast in September, signaling demand may plateau heading into the end of 2014.
 Internet company signed a 10-year contract to buy the entire output of the farm to power a 600 million-euro ($750 million) data center it’s developing in Eemshaven, it said today in a posting on its Europe blog.
 In April, it agreed to buy 407 megawatts of wind power from Warren Buffett’s MidAmerican Energy Holdings Co.
 An option is a contract that grants the right to buy or sell an asset at a set price.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Sona Petroleum Bhd, a company with no assets or track record, won approval from the Malaysian Securities Commission to buy a stake in two Thai oil and gas blocks, a person with knowledge of the matter said.
 Sona, which raised 550 million ringgit ($164 million) in an initial public offering last year, agreed in June to buy 40 percent of London-based Salamander Energy Plc’s assets in the Gulf of Thailand for $281 million.
 Ophir said in an exchange filing today Salamander accepted its all-stock offer to buy the company.
 Sona is trying to buy a stake in the Bualuang oilfield, which has been operating since 2008 and is expected to produce an average of 11,000 to 14,000 barrels of oil daily this year, according to Salamander’s website.
 Spring, which intends to hold an initial share sale this year, doesn’t plan to buy more aircraft for the leasing operation and will rely on the airline’s order book for now, Tian said.
 said yesterday it agreed to pay $189 billion to buy 35 planes from companies including General Electric Co’s aviation-services unit to enter the aircraft-leasing business.
 to buy an additional 15 aircraft for $7335 million.
 The company bid in August to buy a portfolio of planes from Terra Firma Capital Partners Ltd’s Awas arm to build up the leasing business.
 The carrier plans to buy a maximum of nine Airbus Group NV A320 aircraft and three A320 simulators, according to its preliminary IPO prospectus.
 The Canadian company has said it’s seeking to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 India last month decided to buy Israeli anti-tank guided missiles and launchers, shunning a rival US.
 A month later, it approved a 32-billion-rupee deal to buy 8,356 Spike anti-tank guided missiles and 321 launchers built by Rafael Advanced Defense Systems Ltd.
 In addition to hiring Gross, the firm recently agreed to buy VelocityShares LLC to expand in exchange-traded products, the fastest-growing part of the fund industry.
 Fortress, which is in exclusive talks with the Milan-based bank to buy UniCredit Credit Management Bank SpA along with 25 billion euros ($31 billion) in soured loans, is working out legal details of the deal, said two people who asked not to be identified because the matter isn’t public.
 Prelios, the Italian asset manager that has teamed up with Fortress on the transaction, has an option to buy 25 percent of the new company’s equity from Fortress when the deal goes through and may sell the stake to a third party, one of the people said.
 Fortress has joined Anacap Financial Partners LLP and other global private-equity firms that are negotiating to buy at least 7 billion euros of Italian bad debt, according to data from PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Kumar Mangalam Birla said he is open to buying overseas cement factories in a deal similar to his $58 billion acquisition of aluminum maker Novelis Inc.
 “There is no desperation to buy international or Indian assets.
 UltraTech agreed last year to buy Jaiprakash Associates Ltd’s cement factory in Gujarat state for an enterprise value of 38 billion rupees ($620 million).
 The month-long parliament session will prove a key test for Modi’s reform agenda as he seeks to lift the cap on foreign investment in insurance, pass a new goods and services tax and make it easier to buy land.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the SEC.
 agreed to buy OneWest Bank from parent IMB Holdco LLC for $34 billion.
 The Winston-Salem, North Carolina-based firm said in September it planned to buy Bank of Kentucky Financial Corp.
 and may seek to buy more.
 That company agreed in September to buy Glimcher Realty Trust for about $2 billion to create a diversified retail property owner.
 Frigid weather may spur John Kinsey to buy shares in gas producers after five years largely on the sidelines of North America’s gas market, which has featured depressed prices thanks to vast supplies from shale.
 While debt has traditionally been brokered through conversations or in e-mails, an increasing proportion is moving to computer platforms as the biggest and smallest firms grow less willing to commit their own money to buying big blocks of debt from investors.
 China Market Essilor is looking to buy small businesses in Asia, Africa and Middle East that sell sunglasses, manufacture lenses and have online operations, Sagnieres said on a conference call on Oct.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Hungary is in talks to buy lenders from foreign owners and expand domestic control of the banking industry to at least 60 percent, Prime Minister Viktor Orban said today.
 DirecTV, which AT&T is still waiting on regulatory approval to buy, has a 41 percent stake in Sky Mexico.
 Istanbul-based Yildiz, which also has investments in finance, will pay close to 21 billion pounds to buy the UK-based biscuit company from Blackstone Group LP and PAI Partners SAS, the person said, asking not to be identified because the information is confidential.
 That issuance, and the resulting frenzy to buy the debt, drew scrutiny from US.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Plains All American Pipeline LP agreed to buy Occidental Petroleum Corp’s 50 percent stake in a conduit that brings crude oil from the Permian Basin in West Texas to Gulf Coast refiners for $108 billion.
 “However, should it become necessary to further address risks of too prolonged a period of low inflation, the Governing Council is unanimous in its commitment to using additional unconventional instruments within its mandate” Still, Bundesbank President Jens Weidmann, a long-running opponent to buying government bonds, today highlighted the positive consequence of low oil prices.
 Altice, which holds a stake in France’s largest cable provider Numericable Group, would be open to discussing a deal to buy all of Bouygues Telecom after completing its $23 billion acquisition of local mobile-phone company SFR from Vivendi SA on Nov.
 “I want to reiterate that anything that’s transpired was not related to any operating basis at our firm or any performance of any product” RCS last week ended a deal with American Realty Capital Properties to buy Cole Capital, a private-capital management business.
 agreed to buy the Duracell battery business from Procter & Gamble Co.
 about a possible order after pledging to buy 100 Airbus Group NV airliners valued at $102 billion to support expansion in its home region and beyond.
 Sainsbury has the right to buy back the issue after three years if its shares rise to 30 percent or more above the conversion price for a pre-set period, according to the statement.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Diageo Plc, the world’s largest distiller, said it doesn’t plan to revive talks with the Beckmann family to buy the Cuervo tequila brand as it gains control of Tequila Don Julio.
 Adama, which was taken private by ChemChina in 2011 after it purchased a majority stake from Koor Industries Ltd, was marketing itself to investors amid a slump in grain prices that has sapped farmers’ appetite to buy the herbicides and fungicides that are the core of the company’s sales.
 fell the most in 15 months after the biggest developer of solar farms reported lower third-quarter profit and said it wouldn’t form a separate unit to buy its power plants.
 Consumers already use Twitter to discuss what they want to buy and testing these features will help decide the right products to make money off that behavior, said Nathan Hubbard, head of e-commerce for the San Francisco-based company.
 BBVA, Spain’s second-biggest bank, said it’s seeking to buy as much as 149 percent of Garanti from Turkish billionaire Ferit Sahenk’s Dogus Holding AS.
 “There’s big global demand for this deal,” said Duch, whose firm oversees about $12 billion and has orders to buy the new offering.
 agreed to buy Baker Hughes Inc.
 “Investors won’t enter the markets to buy shares at such levels now” While the link has “huge” potential, one concern that may be curbing participation is a requirement for international investors to deliver stocks to a broker before markets open if they plan to sell in Shanghai, said Nick Ronalds, the managing director for equities at the Asia Securities Industry & Financial Markets Association.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- BT Group Plc is in talks to buy Telefonica SA’s O2 unit or another mobile-phone company to expand its wireless offering in the UK.
 “They will be sensitive on the pricing of ABS and will be looking to buy at cheaper levels rather than just being a price taker of whatever is available” ECB President Mario Draghi has put ABS at the center of his plans to stimulate the euro-area economy because the securities allow the transfer of risk from banks to investors, which may encourage lenders to offer more credit to companies.
 10 that policy makers will be ready to buy ABS as of next week.
 As Wall Street strategists advise that the tightly correlated returns of recent years are breaking down and the art of picking individual stocks is due for a comeback, companies loved by both analysts and short sellers seem like a perfect place to start shopping for shares to buy or sell.
 By only displaying to the market the total number of shares available to buy and sell, the bourse will enable big asset managers and pension funds to transact large blocks of shares without giving away their intentions, Brian Schwieger, said in a phone interview.
 The cost of offering to buy or sell 100 shares will fall to 7 cents.
 Exchanges started paying electronic trading firms to provide standing orders to buy and sell securities at the much smaller increments.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Cliffs Natural Resources Inc’s proposed note sale and offer to buy back some of its debt will bolster the largest US.
 for 200 million rand and Lewis agreed to buy the Beares brand for 40 million rand on Oct.
 “There is a risk in not holding Japanese shares, and those that sold them off will have to buy them back” Macquarie Securities Ltd.
 Grupo Bimbo won an auction to buy the Beefsteak bread brand, beating an initial bid by Flowers with a $319 million offer.
 The company lined up $578 million in prepayment loans from Apple to buy equipment to make the material, which wasn’t included in the latest version of the iPhone.
 Investors are validating a strategy set in 2010, when Chief Executive Officer Gary Kelly agreed to buy AirTran Holdings Inc.
 The program, designed to remedy a shortage of affordable housing, has provided hundreds of thousands of payments to Chileans who didn’t own property to buy homes.
 MYV Mutuos Hipotecarios allows borrowers to buy units anywhere in Chile developed by its approved construction companies.
 (CF),Canada’s largest non-bank brokerage, plans to buy a UK.
 The company is looking to buy a “bolt-on” wealth-management operation in the UK.
 to buy new narrow-body planes amid a fleet makeover to reduce its reliance on unprofitable regional jets, people familiar with the matter said.
 Almost half of respondents in a NRF survey said they planned to buy video games, books, CDs or DVDs.
 plans to buy Maravest Group for 450 million rand ($41 million) to add low-fee private schools around Johannesburg and Pretoria to its offering of independent education services in South Africa.
 Beginning today, investors will be able to buy and sell futures on the Chicago Board Options Exchange’s 10-Year US.
 The events sometimes featured contests where attendees would identify stocks to buy and others they expected to underperform.
 Until now, Britain’s telecoms market has been unusual in Europe because most companies do not yet provide the full range of telecoms services -- Internet, mobile, television and home phone -- preferring instead to buy in services that they don’t have from competitors.
 Supporters of the one-year pilot program, including lawmakers in Congress, say it will encourage market makers to buy and sell shares by making each transaction potentially more profitable.
 Opponents including Fidelity Investments say investors will have to pay more to buy and sell shares of small companies.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Solar Power Inc, a renewable-energy developer backed by China’s LDK Solar Co, agreed to buy a 22-megawatt project in Japan.
 Halliburton, the second-biggest oilfield services provider, agreed to buy No.
 There’s a lot of money that continues to buy Treasuries regardless of what’s going on, so it’s going to have a bid” Capital Goods Orders for non-military US.
 When you open a web page, information such as age, sex, location and search history are zapped to buyers vying for your attention.
 Some agencies are poorly connected to exchanges and can’t respond to a first auction in time, allowing middlemen to buy and flip within the same market, they said.
 In September, it agreed to buy Concur Technologies Inc, a maker of software that helps companies manage expense reports, for $74 billion and SAP has made smaller deals this year.
 China started the program in 2011, allowing investors holding the currency overseas to buy domestic bonds, stocks and money-market instruments.
 has agreed to buy 35 million tons of LNG a year for two decades from Houston-based Cheniere Energy Inc’s Sabine Pass terminal in western Cameron Parish, Louisiana.
 As a result, the Russian price for an iPhone has been Europe’s lowest at about $700, prompting tourists from other countries to buy iPhones in Moscow.
 29 -- this week pulled out of a deal to buy American Realty Capital Properties’s Cole Capital private-capital management unit.
 In April 2013, the opening of derivatives trading was delayed for three hours because of a computer breakdown, forcing investors to use a rival exchange operator in Osaka to buy and sell Japanese index contracts.
 New York-based Apollo is in late-stage talks to buy PetSmart for about $8 billion following an auction process that has been underway for weeks, said one of the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are confidential.
 While the retailer could take on debt to buy back shares, a bigger payout could come from a merger with rival Petco Animal Supplies Inc.
 Private Equity Black said this month that Apollo doesn’t plan to expand its private-equity business, which uses debt and equity to buy companies and sell them later.
 The New York Post earlier reported that Apollo was close to buying PetSmart and may have beaten KKR & Co.
 Proceeds of the sale will be used to buy the unnamed 300-megawatt solar power plant.
 Chipping In With the unexpected war taxing the military over the past 10 months, thousands of Ukrainians have chipped in cash to buy socks and gloves, boots and helmets so soldiers can continue to fight on the field.
 14 a plea for help to buy and deliver white fleece head covers to soldiers.
 Village Help During one foray into a village to buy food -- not provided by the unit -- an old woman offered his uniformed companion a sweater, asking, “‘How do you guys fight a war wearing stuff like that?’” he said.
 The soldiers pulled together whatever money they had in cash, borrowed from families and withdrew money on debit cards to buy tools and spare parts such as filters and fan belts.
 It was after that trip that he established a fund called Peace and Order, raising millions of hryvnia from citizens and business associates to buy bulletproof vests, helmets, socks and underwear.
 A tanker pulled forward so she could inch inher 72-foot rig and ease down the 135 feet to the ground to buydinner before hitting the sack in her jeans and long-sleevedpink T-shirt.
 Carlyle, with Warburg Pincus, reached an agreement on Monday to buy Canadian credit rating company DBRS Ltd; said yesterday it would acquire Italian elevator maker Sematic Group; and agreed to buy a stake in Asia Satellite Telecommunications Holdings Ltd.
 Carve-Outs In the two months that followed the Ortho Clinical agreement, Carlyle struck a $32 billion deal for Illinois Tool Works Inc’s industrial-packaging unit and a $19 billion agreement to buy Tyco International Ltd’s fire and security business in South Korea.
 “The kinds of companies we’re putting in our portfolios today are health-care businesses, carve-outs where we feel like we can actually drive real efficiencies, technology-driven businesses and businesses that do not have a lot of capital expenditures” In July, Carlyle agreed to buy Acosta Sales & Marketing Co, the largest US.
 BC Partners agreed this month to buy PetSmart Inc.
 spurred a third day of gains for a gauge of capital goods after the government yesterday issued an ordinance, or executive order, making it easier for companies to buy land.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Headwinds faced by billionaire Uday Kotak after his $24 billion deal to buy ING Groep NV’s local unit show how workers’ unions may deter potential mergers and acquisitions among Indian lenders.
 firm agreed to invest A$150 million ($123 million) in National Lifestyle Villages Pty, which develops manufactured retirement communities in Australia, and also agreed to buy GE’s residential business in Japan for more than 190 billion yen ($16 billion).
 This is not the yearly priority” Airbus is instead determined to persuade more airlines to buy the existing version of the A380, with a a Neo variant sporting new engines likely only “later on” and a stretch model adding more seats possible in the “very long term” Production Challenge Bregier said his chief challenge is to ramp up production of the A350 as fast as possible, with no new delivery slots available before 2021.
 Treasury market makes it harder for investors to buy and sell bonds when news events cause prices to move, according to the Bank of Canada.
 That means automated trading narrows the difference between prices to buy and sell bonds.
 The money invested was used to buy stakes in private companies, meaning it’s locked up for years until the businesses are sold.
 unexpectedly dropped plans to buy the company.
 17 that they had agreed to buy First Wind Holdings Inc.
 and billionaire Ted Turner’s renewable energy company agreed to buy a First Solar Inc.
 Bank of Montreal said it plans to buy back as many as 15 million shares, or about 23 percent of its outstanding stock, between next February and January 2016.
 “We do not want free electricity; we want to buy” ‘Balancing Act’ In the biggest deal ever from an overseas investor, Bengaluru-based GMR Group said Sept.
 “Investors will begin to buy the stock at a comfortable level after the big retreat from the August peak” Shilla, run by Samsung Chairman Lee Kun Hee’s daughter Lee Boo Jin, said in e-mailed reply to questions from Bloomberg News that it will “aggressively” pursue operating rights at Incheon in the auction.
 Qatar Investment Authority and Brookfield Property Partners LP yesterday offered to buy Songbird Estates Plc, which controls the Canary Wharf financial district.
 Qatar yesterday agreed to buy as much as 9 percent of Brookfield via $18 billion in exchangeable preferred equity shares.
 Brookfield owns 22 percent of Canary Wharf Group after attempting to buy the company in 2004.
 drugmaker, agreed this week to buy Cubist for $84 billion, a vindication for the smaller company, which toiled for two decades on an area largely neglected by the rest of the industry.
 12 that it agreed to buy Susquehanna Bancshares Inc.
 “If you do want to buy the energy sector, it’s always good to layer in your trades” Daniel Straus, an ETF analyst at National Bank Financial in Toronto, said investors may see the broader energy ETF as a more attractive option after being burned by individual holdings.
 refining surge is lifting tanker rates to the highest in at least three years as demand accelerates for vessels carrying the processed fuels to buyers in Latin America and the Caribbean.
 The bid to buy Rio de Janeiro-based Tim, which is 67 percent owned by Telecom Italia SpA, would be made by Grupo BTG Pactual acting as a financial vehicle, the people said, asking not to be identified because the discussions are private.
 Oi agreed to sell its Portuguese assets this week, paving the way for it to buy part of Tim.
 Portugal Sale Billionaire Patrick Drahi’s Altice SA agreed this week to buy Oi’s Portuguese assets for 74 billion euros, unraveling Oi’s merger with Portugal Telecom.
 If you have a lot of untapped money to invest, “it’s a great time to buy,” he said, adding that Washington-based Carlyle has about $7 billion to spend in energy.
 The ruble is on pace for its first weekly gain in a month as policy makers pushed exporters to sell foreign currency revenue and lowered ruble liquidity, cutting off some investors from the local currency needed to buy dollars.
 As part of the plan, Harbinger will retain a 4445 percent interest and will have the option to buy 3 percent of the new LightSquared.
 Cooler weather, meanwhile, is inspiring shoppers to buy coats and boots -- a boon for Gap Inc’s Old Navy and PVH Corp.
 Chief Executive Officer Fred Smith said tie-ups at West Coast ports have depleted some retail inventories, causing some holiday shoppers to buy gift cards instead of merchandise.
 Momentum alone is reason to own stocks because each time the index rises, it means more fund managers fall behind and need to buy so they can catch up, a phenomenon sometimes referred to as chasing beta, according to Lee.
 “In times like these and with a volatile index, everyone wants to buy a hedge,” said Carsten Hilck, who oversees about $4 billion at Union Investment Privatfonds GmbH in Frankfurt.
 suffered a blow after the Irish firm rejected a bid from the Chinese company to buy a majority stake.
 24 submitted a bid to buy a 51 percent stake in Avolon and was planning to pay in cash, the state-owned Chinese company said in a statement to the stock exchange today.
 The financing arm of Chinese aircraftmaker AVIC disclosed in August it’s in talks to buy Dublin-based Avolon.
 “This is a great time to buy,” Rubenstein said at Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s financial-services conference in New York.
 The accounting flaws were found in August, five months after the e-commerce company founded by billionaire Jack Ma announced plans to buy a 60 percent stake in the film company to gain rights to TV dramas and English Premier League soccer.
 Stimulus Jigsaw Programs to buy covered bonds and asset-backed securities started in recent weeks, and the next piece of the stimulus jigsaw is a second round of long-term loans to banks linked to their real-economy lending.
(Bloomberg) -- Olam International Ltd, the commodity trader controlled by Singapore’s state investment firm, agreed to buy Archer-Daniels-Midland Co’s cocoa business for $13 billion to become a top-three processor of the bean.
 While the trader already has the world’s largest bean sourcing network, the addition of ADM’s unit will give Olam processing capacity, allowing it to sell directly to buyers including Nestle SA and Hershey Co.
 The government sold 20 percent of SAA in 1999 to Swissair, which pioneered the concept of an alliance anchored via minority stakes, only to buy the shares back in 2002 when the European carrier went bankrupt.
 The deal has drastically reduced Kinder Morgan’s borrowing costs, and unified the pipeline empire under a single stock ticker that can be used as currency to buy rivals.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Lubrizol, the chemical-additives business at Warren Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc, agreed to buy two units from Weatherford International Plc for at least $750 million after the seller was squeezed by lower oil prices.
 to buy Baker Hughes Inc.
 Gagfah SA jumped 13 percent as Deutsche Annington Immobilien SE agreed to buy the German property company.
 A380 Cap Etihad has no plans to buy more Airbus Group NV A380s beyond the 10 on order, Hogan said at the unveiling of the carrier’s first superjumbo in Abu Dhabi, alongside the first of 71 Boeing Co.
 Fitch Ratings said last week that oil’s plunge may be an opportunity for Asia’s national oil companies to buy assets more cheaply.
 “The key drivers for value creation in the market are mergers that create economies of scale” Deutsche Annington Immobilien SE, Germany’s biggest residential landlord, offered to buy competitor Gagfah SA in a 39 billion-euro deal announced on Dec.
 Repsol agreed to buy Calgary, Canada-based Talisman for $83 billion as it seeks to boost crude reserves and production.
 Investors from outside the six-nation Gulf Cooperation Council aren’t allowed to buy shares directly and have to access the market through equity swaps and exchange-traded funds.
 17, gives foreign money managers greater access to Shanghai-traded equities and offers mainland investors a route to buy Hong Kong shares.
 agreed last month to buy the rights to the vaccine and work with Ames, Iowa-based NewLink to develop it.
 Also today, the GAVI Alliance, the biggest provider of money for vaccines sent to developing countries, said it will commit as much as $390 million to buy Ebola shots and support their use in an effort to stop the West Africa outbreak.
 Freddie Mac will begin in March to buy 3-percent down mortgages to borrowers with below-median earnings.
 While 3 percent down loans will appeal to buyers who haven’t saved enough money for a larger deposit, borrowers will probably still need to have a high FICO credit score.
 Many of the same investors who negotiated the pact sued the same trustees in June, saying they failed to invoke their rights to force the sellers to buy back faulty mortgages or act against servicers, causing billions of dollars in losses.
 The company may also be able to buy new drilling rigs at a “significant discount,” and there may be companies available for sale at a low prices, he said.
 “The government has understood that the Indian mentality is that when you restrict something, we tend to buy more and more,” said Kothari, who is also the vice president of the Indian Bullion and Jewellers Association.
 In January it agreed to buy servicing rights on $39 billion of loans from Wells Fargo & Co.
 At least three energy-related companies, including C&J Energy Services Inc, postponed deals this month as lenders demand more yield to buy risky debt.
 The notes’ indentures require the company to buy them back at 101 cents if a so-called change-of-control provision is triggered.
 Trafigura paid $8853 million to buy back shares from the senior managers and more than 600 employees that own the company, according to its annual report.
 A private-equity unit of JPMorgan and Ajay Singh, who quit as a director of the airline in 2010, plan to buy the entire stake held by majority shareholder Kalanithi Maran, said the official with direct knowledge of Singh’s plans.
 He paid 74 billion rupees to buy a stake from Wilbur Ross in 2010, and invested a further 56 billion rupees, according to the airline.
(Bloomberg) -- Prices paid by American consumers dropped in November by the most in almost six years, providing a boost to buying power that will propel economic growth.
 Before that, it bought most of its cars from automakers that agreed to buy them back at a set age and price.
 Russia could also keep using its hard currency to buy rubles on the open market, in hopes of stabilizing the exchange rate.
 agreed to buy asset manager IndexIQ, pushing into exchange-traded funds and adding offerings for retail investors who want to copy hedge-fund approaches.
 is giving up trading physical precious metals less than a year after the commodity house started a business dedicated to buying and selling gold.
 “The bargain hunting is done largely by the local investors who see opportunities to buy into these stocks,” he said by phone today.
 Zhao, the Shanghai resident, plans to buy her parents presents this year, even though they don’t observe the holiday.
 The exchange operator said in June, when it agreed to buy Frank Russell for $27 billion, that it would conduct a “comprehensive review” of the unit, which manages about $275 billion in assets.
 “If we didn’t have the auction, distributors would be forced to buy energy in the spot market, which is currently very volatile,” said Frederico Rodrigues, superintendent of Brazil’s energy regulator Aneel.
 ‘Favorable Prices’ “Today’s auction allowed distributors to buy energy at more favorable prices,” Savoia, said in an e-mail.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- APA Group agreed to buy a pipeline supplying BG Group Plc’s Australian liquefied natural gas project for about $5 billion, adding to a system that already carries half the nation’s gas.
 “This is a great time to buy,” Rubenstein said today atGoldman Sachs Group Inc’s financial-services conference in NewYork.
 9, Mobius says increased volatility is creating opportunities to buy mispriced shares.
 agreed to buy Allianz SE’s Fireman’s Fund unit serving wealthy clients to expand insurance of luxury homes, yachts and art collections as the seller narrows its focus in the US.
(Bloomberg) -- Repsol SA, Spain’s largest energy company, agreed to buy Talisman Energy Inc.
(Bloomberg) -- Talanx AG offered to buy all shares of Chilean insurer Inversiones Magallanes SA for about 180 million euros ($221 million) as Germany’s third-biggest insurer continues to expand in South America.
 The German company reached an agreement to buy the stake of the majority shareholder of Inversiones Magallanes, it said in a statement today.
 The two former employees who sued yesterday, one a Virginia resident who worked at Sony from to 2004 to 2007 and the other a California woman who worked at Sony from 2000 to 2002, say they have had to buy identity-theft protection and have spent as much as 50 hours safeguarding themselves against any possible harm from the stolen information.
 Teva’s trying to protect a drug that generated $43 billion in sales last year to buy more time to shift patients to the longer-acting version.
(Bloomberg) -- Public Service Enterprise Group Inc’s solar unit agreed to buy a 129-megawatt energy facility in Maryland from Juwi Solar Inc.
 “When you’re building condos in a market where people don’t live, you have to convince people first to live there, and then, to buy in your building,” he said.
 They faced a choice between building “a reasonable rental or a very-profitable condo,” and concluded that the area’s current renters would embrace the opportunity to buy, said Tien Vominh, a principal at Long Island City-based Ascent.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Highbridge Capital Management executives are in talks to buy the firm from JPMorgan Chase & Co, according to Institutional Investor.
 Gallery Owner Gagosian Avoids Perelman’s ‘Popeye’ Suit Art gallery owner Larry Gagosian won dismissal of a lawsuit accusing him of tricking billionaire Ronald Perelman into buying a $4 million Jeff Koons sculpture called “Popeye” Perelman, ranked 54th in the Bloomberg Billionaires Index with a net worth of $152 billion, alleged that Gagosian “took advantage of his position of trust” as a longtime friend to induce him to buy the granite sculpture of the cartoon character, according to court filings.
 Gagosian sued Perelman the same day, accusing him of reneging on an agreement to buy two pieces of art for more than $23 million and offering less money and other works in exchange.
 Santander Brasil The deal Santander is weighing for Santander Consumer could resemble an offer in October to buy up to a quarter of its Brazilian unit, another subsidiary with a lackluster stock price, one of the people said.
(Bloomberg) -- UltraTech Cement Ltd, controlled by billionaire Kumar Mangalam Birla, rose the most in more than two months in Mumbai after agreeing to buy two of Jaiprakash Associates Ltd’s cement plants in central India at an enterprise value of 54 billion rupees ($851 million).
 In September 2013, UltraTech had agreed to buy a Jaiprakash cement plant in the western state of Gujarat with 48 million tons of capacity for 38 billion rupees including debt.
 Reuters reported earlier this month that Washington-based Carlyle and Warburg of New York were in talks to buy DBRS.
 Oil Prepayments Even prior to sanctions, Rosneft’s main instrument for repaying loans to buy TNK-BP, the BP Plc venture that was Russia’s third-biggest oil producer, has been advance payments for oil supplies.
 Morgan Stanley Sechin, who denied speculation last week that the company had been selling rubles to buy dollars, said today that the company may get state support from the National Wellbeing Fund.
 A deal to buy Morgan Stanley’s oil trading business won’t burden its finances.
 The company agreed this week to buy Archer-Daniels-Midland Co’s cocoa business for $13 billion to become a top-three processor of beans.
 for about $640 million in cash, helping marketers that want to buy video ads on PCs and devices.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Namibia said it will consider raising the capacity of a water desalination plant it offered to buy from Areva SA once the transaction is completed.
 Negotiations with the government, which has offered to buy the plant, are under way and would probably be wrapped up in 2015, Mbako said.
 CP Group agreed to buy Itochu stock as part of the tie-up while the Japanese company said it will purchase a 25 percent stake in CP Group’s Hong Kong-listed unit.
 “Now is a good time to issue as the window is gradually closing before the Christmas break” Paris-based Publicis, which agreed to buy Sapient for $37 billion last month, said the acquisition will help boost revenue by 2 percentage points above the industry average each year from 2016, according to a statement Dec.
 GE has owned Bank BPH since it agreed in 2007 to buy the business from UniCredit SpA to take advantage of economic growth in eastern Europe.
 Rents are climbing as many residents remain unable to buy properties, and banks’ reluctance to fund purchases of fixer-uppers offers institutions a niche that’s inaccessible to individual buyers.
 Apollo doesn’t plan to expand its private equity business, which uses debt and equity to buy companies and sell them years later.
(Bloomberg) -- OAO Rosneft said its deal to buy Morgan Stanley’s oil-merchanting business ended after failing to win regulatory approval.
 There are lots of litigation issues out there, and that’s why you get to buy it at a really good price” Deutsche Bank is also struggling to revive profit at its corporate banking and securities unit.
 Export-Import Bank this year halted a study into funding the plans to ship gas from Yamal, or End of Earth in the native Nenets tongue, to buyers around the world as President Barack Obama’s administration imposed sanctions on Russia.
 Walgreen agreed to buy the 55 percent of Boots it doesn’t already own for $153 billion in August and elected to forgo the tax-avoidance strategy of moving its legal residence abroad.
 Hedge Fund Employees Carl Goldsmith and Scott Klein struck a deal to buy Post Advisory’s hedge fund business from Principal, and added asset management contracts in early 2009.
(Bloomberg) -- Barclays Plc agreed to buy a 50 percent stake in a Spain-based insurance business from CNP Assurances for 453 million euros ($555 million).
 TransCanada, the nation’s second-largest pipeline operator, agreed to buy 30 megawatts of Canadian Solar projects in October for about C$182 million, increasing its total investments in solar power in Ontario to almost C$400 million.
 phone monopoly, entered talks to buy either Telefonica SA’s O2 unit or EE, the wireless carrier co-owned by Orange SA and Deutsche Telekom AG, two of the people said.
 After agreeing to buy Germany’s Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for 77 billion euros ($96 billion) last year, it acquired Grupo Corporativo Ono SA of Spain.
 Still, Liberty Global’s co-Chief Financial Officer Charles Bracken said last month regulators would probably give their permission if Vodafone tried to buy its German business.
 agreed to buy The Pantry Inc.
 Talisman rallied 48 percent as Repsol SA agreed to buy the oil-and-gas explorer for $83 billion.
 Repsol SA, Spain’s largest energy company, agreed to buy the company for $83 billion, ending a months-long search for acquisitions to help boost crude reserves and production.
 Some drillers have relied on debt to buy drilling rights and rent rigs, doubling energy bonds’ share of the high-yield market to 17 percent since 2008, according to an Oct.
 SunEdison, a solar developer based in Maryland Heights, Missouri, last month agreed to buy wind energy developer First Wind Holdings Inc.
 Xiaomi may need to buy or license portfolios from othercompanies, said Kiranjeet Kaur, a Singapore-based analyst atInternational Data Corp.
 Gold retreated earlier today before rebounding in London after Swiss voters rejected a move to force its central bank to buy more of the precious metal.
 “The Kremlin’s call on exporters to buy rubles was apparently very well heard and accepted,” Slava Smolyaninov, chief strategist at UralSib Financial Corp.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Siemens AG Chief Executive Officer Joe Kaeser said his 68 billion-euro ($84 billion) outlay to buy companies that help extract and distribute fossil fuels wasn’t ill-timed even as the oil price slumped to its lowest in five years.
 “Who got rich from gold? Those discovering the gold or those supplying the shovels?” Siemens agreed to buy Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s energy assets in May and Dresser-Rand in September.
(Bloomberg) -- Atos agreed to buy Xerox Corp’s information-technology outsourcing business for $105 billion, almost tripling the French computer-services provider’s business in the US.
 TeliaSonera deal to buy Tele2 AB’s Norwegian business for $687 million faces opposition from the country’s competition watchdog, which said the sale may harm competition.
 TDC paid 138 billion kroner in October to buy Norwegian cable company Get AS.
 after a rating downgrade, Canso always tries to buy when it thinks the rest of the market is getting something wrong.
 That money can then be applied to buying the vehicle.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Nakumatt Holdings Ltd, East Africa’s biggest retail chain by outlets, expects a “strategic” investor to buy a stake by mid-2015 as it looks to expand in the region, the head of strategy and operations said.
 In October, the utility holding company bought a project in California from First Solar, with the panel maker agreeing to buy back a minority stake.
 “There’s notthe rush to buy we saw last year” To contact the reporter on this story:Kathleen M.
 “The transaction is fully financed and the decision made to temporarily delay the term loan B process in no way impacts our ability to finance or complete the deal” Bond Deal C&J said in June it agreed to buy Nabors’s completion and production services business in the US.
 The rates attracted floods of solar applications, so much so that utilities who are required to buy the power for their transmission grids say they are being overwhelmed.
 customers are rich enough to buy luxury cars whatever the cost of a tank of gasoline.
 They want it because it’s a status symbol or for the performance or they are very eco-conscious and just don’t want to consume fossil fuels, regardless of what they pay for the fossil fuels” The seven-day selloff should be seen as an opportunity to buy the stock at a discount, said Ben Kallo, an analyst with Robert W.
(Bloomberg) -- Line Corp, the mobile-messaging application owned by South Korean search portal Naver Corp, said it agreed to buy Microsoft Corp’s MixRadio streaming service as it seeks to speed up user growth.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Singapore’s GIC Pte agreed to buy IndCor Properties Inc.
 Spain’s Repsol SA, early today agreed to buy the Canadian producer for $83 billion.
 is in late-stage talks to buy builder John Holland from Leighton Holdings Ltd.
 30 to buy a majority stake in Nevs and finance the company’s operating costs until the deal is complete early next year, the Trollhaettan, Sweden-based company said in a statement today.
 with a possible offer to buy the Lloyd’s of London company for about 25 billion pounds ($39 billion).
 agreed last month to buy Platinum Underwriters Holdings Ltd.
 RCS earlier this month agreed to pay ACRP $60 million to settle a lawsuit over a canceled deal to buy the REIT’s Cole Capital unit.
 Co-Operative Bank was forced to raise an extra 400 million pounds ($623 million) after plugging a capital shortfall of 15 billion pounds, which was uncovered after its failed attempt to buy branches from Lloyds Banking Group Plc.
 insurer revealed plans to buy Friends Life Group Plc for 56 billion pounds ($88 billion).
 Aviva this week agreed to buy Friends Life for 394 pence apiece in an all-stock transaction, set to be the UK.
 HCC agreed in September to buy Producers Ag Insurance Group, which is larger than the Deere unit by sales, for $110 million.
 The proposals include 190 billion rupees for submarines, a 158 billion-rupee purchase of artillery -- the first acquisition of large-caliber guns since the 1980s -- and a 32 billion-rupee deal to buy 8,356 Spike anti-tank guided missiles and 321 launchers from Rafael Advanced Defense Systems Ltd.
(Bloomberg) -- French billionaire Xavier Niel is to buy carrier Orange Switzerland for 28 billion Swiss francs ($29 billion), as he turns his attention back to Europe after a failed bid for T-Mobile US Inc.
 Haitong Securities, China’s second-largest brokerage by market value, surged 12 percent in Hong Kong on talks its unit is in discussions to buy Banco Espirito Santo de Investimento SA, according to a Hong Kong exchange filing yesterday.
 To Patrick Moonen of ING Investment Management, that doesn’t mean it’s a reason to buy.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Cliffs Natural Resources Inc’s bonds fell to a low after the company canceled an offer to buy back some of its notes and delayed a refinancing plan amid higher borrowing costs.
 He says stocks most linked to economic growth will continue to perform better, and a cheaper valuation for European shares isn’t a reason to buy them.
 The retailer reiterated its commitment to buying smaller rival Family Dollar Stores Inc.
 “This will be a year to get the electricity sector back on track” The worst drought in decades has forced utilities to buy more expensive energy on the spot market, selling that power at a loss because of government-capped retail prices.
 In November, Dronina decided to buy an apartment in Shchyolkovo, a town near Moscow, and got approval for a mortgage with a maximum rate of 1375 percent from Sberbank.
 Consumers can find it at Google Play, YouTube Videos and other websites at a price of $599 to rent or $1499 to buy.
(Bloomberg) -- The Indian government issued an executive order to make it easier for companies to buy land and eventually replace a law that has hindered manufacturing and constrained economic growth.
 23 allowing the Deposit Insurance Agency to buy stakes in banks before they face bankruptcy proceedings to keep the system stable.
 Cargo also secured an option to buy the remaining stake from Minezit in 2017-2021 for a minimum price of 40 million euros minus any dividends paid by AWT to Minezit.
 “About 30 percent of the company’s capex is the equipment it has to buy from abroad with dollars.
(Bloomberg) -- BP Plc is in talks to buy a direct stake in an East Siberian oil producer from OAO Rosneft, the Russian oil producer facing US.
 He has also tried to buy claims at a discount until the US.
 and Cuba could lead to an increase in prices for premium cigars if more Americans are able to buy them to smoke, the head of Imperial Tobacco Group Plc’s Spanish unit said.
 The underwriters have the right to buy an additional 13 million shares as well as an extra $375 million of the convertible bonds.
 Exor SpA, the holding company of Italy’s Agnelli family that controls Fiat Chrysler, reiterated yesterday that it plans to buy convertible securities to maintain its 31 percent stake in the carmaker.
 Sentiment has reversed since October, with options to buy European shares costing the most in more than four years relative to bearish puts, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Investors are waiting to see what Walgreen does next after in August it agreed to buy the 55 percent of European health and beauty chain Alliance Boots GmbH that it didn’t already own for $153 billion.
 waste-management company, agreed to buy a unit of Tervita Corp.
 The Fairfield, Connecticut-based manufacturer agreed in June to buy most of the assets for 124 billion euros ($152 billion), GE’s biggest acquisition ever, and the purchase should close next year.
 Actavis instead agreed to buy Allergan for $66 billion on Nov.
 OUE Ltd, owner of Singapore’s Mandarin Gallery shopping mall, agreed to buy US.
 is in talks to buy four properties from Blackstone Group LP and other owners to defer tax payments from its $195 billion sale of New York’s Waldorf Astoria hotel, according to two people with knowledge of the talks.
 Hilton, majority-owned by Blackstone, is looking to buy resorts and high-end urban hotels with proceeds from the sale of the Waldorf on New York’s Park Avenue to China’s Anbang Insurance Group Co, Hilton Chief Executive Officer Christopher Nassetta said on a third-quarter conference call with analysts in October.
 “For short sellers they have to buy shares to cover their positions.
 - Repsol agrees to buy Talisman Energy for $83 billion.
 17 that they had agreed to buy First Wind Holdings Inc.
 A full absorption by Saint-Gobain that would recognize Sika’s growth would be another possibility to reverse the value loss, the company said, adding that Sika’s board and management is “receptive to other proposals” Citing conflicts of interests and the lack of upside for minority shareholders, Sika’s management has threatened to quit after Saint-Gobain agreed to buy a 161 percent stake owned by the Burkard family that will give the French building-materials supplier 524 percent of voting rights.
 reported fiscal fourth-quarter revenue that topped estimates as the software maker pushes deeper into delivering programs via the Web to expand its business, an effort bolstered by a deal to buy stock-photography provider Fotolia LLC for about $800 million.
 Treasury market makes it harder for investors to buy and sell bonds when news events cause prices to move, according to the Bank of Canada.
 That means automated trading narrows the difference between prices to buy and sell bonds.
 Jefferies struck a deal in 2011 to buy Bache’s Global Commodities Group from life insurer Prudential Financial Inc.
 rose 43 percent after a group led by BC Partners agreed to buy it for $83 billion.
 The bank “has other channels, like continuing to buy dollars,” to counter deflation without the risk of aggravating the housing bubble, Klein said.
 “Investors and traders over the last number of years have been conditioned to buy on the dip,” said Quincy Krosby, a market strategist based in Newark, New Jersey, at Prudential Financial Inc, which oversees $1 trillion in assets.
 “There’s somewhat of a perfect storm to buy the dip this year,” Skip Aylesworth, a portfolio manager at Hennessy Funds in Boston, where he helps oversee about $5 billion, said by phone.
 Crystal Amber is seeking to convince other activist investors to buy Sainsbury shares as it isn’t in a position to force any major changes on its own, the Sunday Telegraph said.
 Aviva Chief Executive Officer Mark Wilson struck a deal this month to buy UK.
 Walgreen agreed to buy the 55 percent of Boots it doesn’talready own for $153 billion in August and elected to forgo thetax-avoidance strategy of moving its legal residence abroad09:00 in New York.
 Katara Hospitality, owned by Qatar’s sovereign-wealth fund, is in talks to buy “iconic” hotels in London and Rome as it seeks to more than double its properties by 2030, Chief Operating Officer Christopher RJ.
 “In recent years, the burden of stamp duty has increased on low- and middle-income families trying to buy a new home, as prices have risen” Foxtons Drops Foxtons Group Plc, a property broker focused on London, fell as much as 63 percent after Osborne’s announcement.
 in its deal to buy Cubist Pharmaceuticals Inc.
(Bloomberg) -- Providence Equity Partners is in talks to buy Clarion Events, organizer of the London International Horse Show, for about 250 million pounds ($391 million), people with knowledge of the matter said.
 His mother tried to buy canned tomatoes from a wholesaler, who waved her off, saying he only sold to other vendors and that she could buy what she needed at a shop down the street.
 As sales grew, within a few months he was able to bypass wholesalers to buy directly from their suppliers -- and start turning a profit, he says.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- The GAVI Alliance, the biggest provider of money for vaccines sent to developing countries, will commit as much as $390 million to buy Ebola shots and support their use in an effort to stop the deadly outbreak in West Africa.
 In 2011, he curbed its ability to foreclose on homeowners as a condition to getting approval to buy another company, then installed a monitor there after a surprise audit in 2012 found Ocwen hadn’t complied with the terms.
 The Chicago-based real estate investment trust, which in June acquired Blackstone Group LP’s stake in the luxury Hotel del Coronado near San Diego, is seeking to buy additional resorts in areas such as California and southern Florida, he said.
 The German carrier is open to buying Orange’s BT shares in the future to increase its stake and allow a full exit by the French partner, said the people, who asked not to be named because the deliberations are confidential.
(Bloomberg) -- British Airways owner IAG SA said an offer to buy Aer Lingus Group Plc that would have consolidated its dominance at London’s Heathrow airport was turned down.
 The Spanish company’s $13 billion deal to buy the Canadian producer was the cheapest among the five largest oil and natural gas purchases on the continent this year, including debt.
 Lawsuit News Cubist Patent Loss Shouldn’t Have Adverse Effect on Merck Deal Merck & Co’s deal to buy Cubist Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 pulled out of a deal to buy a stake in Israel’s offshore Leviathan field amid unclear regulatory policy.
 agreed to buy one of his holdings, Cubist Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Both funds beat 97 percent of the competition over the past five years Merck agreed to buy Lexington, Massachusetts-based Cubist to add products to help fight the growing threat of drug-resistant bacteria.
 Yildiz Holding AS, maker of Godiva chocolates, agreed to buy United Biscuits Plc for $33 billion last month, to increase the countries it operates in to 100.
 Oyak Group, a military pension fund manager with interests in carmaking and cement production, aims to buy some of the assets of divestments from the merger of Holcim Ltd.
 With inflation slowing and the Bank of Israel lending rate at a record low, investors will continue to buy Israeli assets, he wrote in a report.
 to buy back the company’s stake in its Nook business.
 As a result, she had to buy CDs of the music and copy it onto her laptop before syncing with her Nano, she said.
 The New York-based companies -- who share a chairman, Nicholas Schorsch -- had been at odds after RCS last month pulled out of a roughly $700 million deal to buy ARCP’s Cole Capital unit.
 Bankruptcy Judge Robert Gerber in Manhattan let GM exit bankruptcy using government money to buy its predecessor’s best assets.
 A whole warrant entitles the holder to buy one share at an exercise price of $110 for five years.
 “We’re seeing large flows pushing around the major currencies less on fundamentals and more on liquidity and risk aversion” The franc weakened against all of its 16 major peers as the Zurich-based SNB introduced a negative deposit rate for the first time since the 1970s, saying it was prepared to buy unlimited foreign currency to shield the 120-per-euro cap and take further measures if needed.
 agreed to buy the UK.
 RPX Acquires Rock Star Patents Assets to License Defensively RPX Corp, the San Francisco-based defensive patent licensing entity, said it acquired a portfolio of 4,000 patent assets from Rockstar Consortium LLC, a group of companies set up to buy intellectual property from defunct Canadian phonemaker Nortel Networks Corp.
 Disney announced a deal to buy Marvel Entertainment in 2009.
 A $1 billion share buyback announced in August is 65 percent complete and a decision on continuing to buy back shares will be made around next March when the current program ends, Kalmin said.
 “We are not going to hoard cash for the sake of hoarding cash or we’re not going to buy something for the sake of having a bigger company,” Glasenberg said.
 It is certainly a bit frustrating and confusing” More job growth and a pickup in wages will give Americans the means to buy.
 The deal follows Amazon’s announcement in August that it had agreed to pay $970 million to buy Twitch Interactive Inc, an online forum that lets users discuss gaming and watch others while they play.
(Bloomberg) -- Russian stocks rallied the most since 2009 as government steps to bolster the ruble emboldened investors to buy shares of OAO Megafon and steelmakers, taking advantage of the RTS Index’s cheapest valuations in five years.
 His rise at the company dates to the drugstore chain’s decision to buy a 45 percent stake in Alliance Boots in 2012, an agreement that gave Pessina 76 percent of Walgreen stock.
 The amount of credit extended to investors to buy stocks climbed to 1 trillion yuan ($161 billion) as of Dec.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- At $15 billion, a plan by three Brazilian mobile-phone companies to buy and split a major rival, Tim Participacoes SA, is set to meet resistance from its owner.
 Portuguese Pact Oi agreed to sell its Portuguese assets this week for more than $9 billion, proceeds it can use to buy part of Tim.
 KKR agreed in July to buy a 25 percent stake in Houston-based BlackGold, which makes credit investments in energy-related companies and assets.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Hedge fund manager and teddy bear collector Paul Greenwood was sentenced to 10 years in prison after pleading guilty to swindling investors out of $554 million dollars, some of which he used to buy the stuffed toys.
 For-profit college operator Gaec Anima Educacao SA increased after agreeing to buy Whitney do Brasil Holding Ltda.
 29 that it agreed to buy the 50 percent it doesn’t own in the South Stream development venture from Italian, French and German partners.
(Bloomberg) -- A Carlyle Group fund agreed to buy General Electric Co’s stake in Asia Satellite Telecommunications Holdings Ltd.
 Carlyle will seek to use compulsory acquisition rights under Hong Kong’s Takeovers Code to buy all the outstanding AsiaSat shares in the event that holders accept its offer for at least 90 million shares, AsiaSat said.
(Bloomberg) -- Advent International Corp, the Boston-based private-equity firm, and the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development agreed to buy Austria’s Hypo Group Alpe Adria, one of the largest banks in the former Yugoslavia.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Haitong Securities Co, China’s second-largest brokerage by market value, surged to a record in Hong Kong stock trading on talks to buy Portuguese investment bank Banco Espirito Santo de Investimento SA.
 Sinovel’s bondholders in September rejected a plan to allow its Jiangsu unit to use as much as 700 million yuan to buy back some of its 2016 bonds.
 said it was in “initial contact” with Germany’s largest utility EON SE to buy its Italian coal electricity assets for about 150 million euros ($185 million).
 A private-equity unit of JPMorgan and Ajay Singh, who quit as a director of the airline in 2010, plans to buy the entire stake held by majority shareholder Kalanithi Maran, said the official with direct knowledge of Singh’s plans.
 in its deal to buy California-based Avanir Pharmaceuticals Inc.
(Bloomberg) -- OAO Gazprom, the world’s biggest natural-gas exporter, agreed to buy the 50 percent it doesn’t own in South Stream Transport BV from Italy’s Eni SpA, Electricite de France SA and the Wintershall unit of Germany’s BASF SE.
 is offering to buy the shares it doesn’t own in Brookfield Incorporacoes for 160 reais each, it said in a Dec.
 At the same time, a faster pace of hiring and a pickup in wages are prompting Americans to take advantage of low borrowing costs to buy cars.
 Dominion Resources Inc’s North Carolina Power unit agreed to buy electricity from the solar plant under a 15-year contract.
 Their shares have rallied at least 96 percent over the past month on a jump in share trading and the increased use of leverage to buy stocks.
 have said they’re unable to buy as many shares as they want because of the caps.
 and Development Bank of Japan Inc, SMBC has agreed to buy a majority share in Solar Power Kitakyushu Corp, a unit of Sumitomo Corp.
 The fund plans to buy shares in other solar power companies located in Japan from Sumitomo, according to the statement.
 8 it has been approached by a number of parties including Repsol about “various transactions” Repsol, which is seeking to deploy about $10 billion in cash via acquisitions outside its home market, dropped a plan to buy all of Talisman in August after conducting due diligence on the company, people with knowledge of the matter said at the time.
 London-based SABMiller failed in September in trying to buy Heineken NV, a deal that would have helped shield itself from getting bought.
 The company pledged to buy back bonds at market prices and provide more consistent financial reporting after the selloff, and has met with more than 700 investors in recent weeks to win back confidence, Sanchez Ortega said.
 The Pentagon asked Congress for the money to buy 100 Tomahawks, which played a high-profile role in the military intervention in Libya.
 Two European Central Bank officials familiar with deliberations said policy makers will consider a proposal to buy sovereign debt at its next meeting.
 Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-biggest oil and gas producer, scrapped an agreement to buy a quarter of Leviathan for as much as $26 billion in May.
 Jefferies LLC is underwriting the offering and will have an option to buy 450,000 extra shares, according to a filing yesterday.
 agreed to buy California-based Avanir Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 The State Administration of Foreign Exchange in May 2013 ordered banks to adjust currency positions so that foreign-exchange loans were kept at a certain proportion of deposits, pushing lenders to buy more dollars at a time when the yuan was strengthening.
 “There’s a very strong commitment behind that today” Amazon Threat Eric Schmidt, Google’s executive chairman and former chief executive officer, has said that Seattle-based Amazon is Google’s biggest competitor in search because many consumers visit the e-commerce service first when they want to buy items.
(Bloomberg) -- The Indian government issued an executive order to make it easier for companies to buy land and eventually replace a law that has hindered manufacturing and constrained economic growth.
 agreed to buy closely held logistics firm Genco, a specialist in handling product returns, as e-commerce operations expand at the operator of the world’s largest cargo airline.
 Big Purchase “Now is a good time to buy a car and confidence is high,” said Jessica Caldwell, a senior analyst at Edmundscom.
 That isn’t stopping the 33-year-old from borrowing again to buy a new car next year.
 Din, who plans to buy a Mazda3 sedan with a new bank loan, isn’t concerned, either.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- India wants to buy more rough diamonds directly from mining companies as the world’s biggest polisher of the gems seeks to bypass traditional dealers.
 The South Asian nation has signed three long-term agreements to buy from OAO Alrosa, the world’s biggest producer by volume, in addition to nine existing deals, according to Andrey Polyakov, vice president of the Russian company.
 De Beers, the diamond producer owned by Anglo American Plc, currently sells diamonds through sightholders, a group of clients who conform with the company’s criteria in order to be permitted to buy the diamonds.
 Zimmer Holdings Inc’s agreement to buy Biomet Inc.
 This year it agreed to buy Lumina Copper Corp.
(Bloomberg) -- Technip SA, Europe’s largest oil engineer, plans to expand the range of service it offers energy companies after a bid to buy French seismic surveyor CGG SA failed.
 Portugal Expansion Altice won antitrust approval in October to buy French wireless carrier SFR for $23 billion, with a plan to combine the phone company with cable provider Numericable Group, and in June agreed to buy smaller carrier Virgin Mobile in France.
 You’re able to buy coffee throughout next year today, if you want to” To contact the reporters on this story: Marvin G.
 Oi, which agreed this month to sell its Portuguese assets to Altice SA, wants to buy Tim through a financial vehicle and keep 25 percent of the company, with the rest being split between Telefonica and America Movil SAB’s Claro, people familiar with the matter have said.
 “That means it may be a good time to buy for a long-term investor, who expects a rebound in oil prices and believes the market turmoil will encourage authorities to find a solution to the Ukraine crisis” Gilyazitdinov says he is considering buying Lukoil and OAO Novatek, as well as Russian steel producers and telecommunications companies.
 In September, 2013, UltraTech had agreed to buy a Jaiprakash cement plant in the western Gujarat state with 48 million tons of capacity for 38 billion rupees including debt.
 China’s Anbang Insurance Group in October agreed to buy the Waldorf Astoria, the 83-year-old Art Deco building occupying an entire block in midtown Manhattan.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Qatar Investment Authority and Brookfield Property Partners LP increased their bid for London Canary Wharf owner Songbird Estates Plc, and the Qatar fund agreed to buy as much as 9 percent of Brookfield.
 Merck & Co’s $84 billion agreement to buy Cubist and its stable of antibiotics was a vindication for the smaller company, which toiled for two decades on medicine to fight a new generation of bugs even as major drugmakers fled to more profitable areas, like heart disease and cancer.
 Home Prices Home prices will rise more slowly than rents because fewer investors are competing to buy a smaller supply of discount-priced foreclosures, while the inventory of non-distressed properties is growing as prospective home sellers gain equity with appreciating prices, Olsen said.
 As Scandinavia’s biggest lenders, including Nordea Bank AB and Danske Bank A/S, turn to additional Tier 1 debt to help build their capital buffers, investors can also opt to buy the notes from community banks at a much higher coupon.
 “I think opportunistic investors will look to buy the dips and play potential scenarios, but our gut feel is Greece is going to be quarantined from rest of Europe this time” Weekly Decline Greece’s 10-year yield rose six basis points, or 006 percentage point, to 915 percent at 4:30 pm.
 Charney, 45, is working with private-equity firm Irving Place Capital on a deal to buy American Apparel that would involve the executive returning to American Apparel in some capacity, a person with knowledge of the matter said earlier.
 used a warrant to buy 84 million shares of Restaurant Brands International Inc, the parent company for the Burger King and Tim Hortons fast-food chains.
 The contract allowed Berkshire to buy about 175 percent of the fully diluted common shares of Restaurant Brands.
 There will be opportunities for investors to buy energy stocks at “fire-sale prices,” Pelletier said.
 The fund, known as ADIA, agreed to buy the equivalent of 49 percent of Citigroup in 2007, before share issuances during the financial crisis eroded the value of its holdings.
 Banks underwriting the funding have the right to buy an additional 13 million shares as well as an extra $375 million of the convertibles.
 Agnelli family holding company Exor SpA, which controls FCA, agreed to buy $886 million of the convertible bonds to preserve its approximately 30 percent stake in FCA, according to the statement.
(Bloomberg) -- China Citic Bank Corp, a unit of the nation’s largest state-owned investment firm, agreed to buy Banco Bilbao Vizcaya Argentaria SA’s holding in a financial-holding unit for HK$816 billion ($105 billion).
 “The time to act is now” Garcetti said he’ll add money in next year’s budget to buy 7,000 cameras, enough to equip all Los Angeles police officers, by July 2016.
 The Pentagon asked Congress for the money to buy 100 Tomahawks, which played a high-profile role in the military intervention in Libya.
 I disagree with the speed that they’re getting there” Some investors would rather the technology industry raise funds for acquisitions and investments in new products or manufacturing than use debt to buy back shares, said Kim Forrest, a fund manager at Fort Pitt Capital Group Inc.
 Sure they can service it, but they’ve been adding debt in order to buy back shares,” said Mike Shinnick, a fund manager at Wasatch Advisors Inc.
 Hungary agreed to buy money-losing MKB in July for 55 million euros ($68 million) from BayernLB as part of Prime Minister Viktor Orban’s agenda to boost domestic ownership in the country’s banking industry to above 50 percent.
 The government is looking to buy more banking assets after two acquisitions this year, Orban said in a Dec.
 climbed 31 percent after Goldman Sachs upgraded the shares to buy from neutral, saying Europe’s largest mobile operator will benefit from deal activity in the sector.
 ended talks to buy T-Mobile US Inc, and Twenty-First Century Fox Inc.
 phone monopoly, entered talks to buy either Telefonica SA’s O2 unit or EE, the wireless carrier co-owned by Orange SA and Deutsche Telekom AG, two of the people said.
 After agreeing to buy Germany’s Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for 77 billion euros ($96 billion) last year, it acquired Grupo Corporativo Ono SA of Spain.
 Still, Liberty Global’s co-Chief Financial Officer Charles Bracken said last month regulators would probably give their permission if Vodafone tried to buy its German business.
 The agreement, announced in May, for Sunac to buy HK$63 billion ($812 million) of shares from Greentown founder Song Weiping, his wife and the company’s chief executive officer has faltered as Song said last month the two companies “don’t blend” and that he was wrong to sell the stake.
 sued a company it accuses of using its name to scam customers into buying hundreds of dollars in support services to fix nonexistent bugs, then stealing personal information or installing malicious software.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 “Firms that are able to get ahead of a change in the environment promptly and to adapt to the economy in an expanding equilibrium will become the winners of the competition and enjoy prosperity in the new era” The remarks underscore Kuroda’s bid to get companies to buy into efforts by the central bank and Abe administration to shake Japan out of two decades of stagnation.
 31 to expand already-unprecedented monetary stimulus, which gives the BOJ leeway to buy from the market every new bond issued by the finance ministry.
 While the Italian unit’s earnings climbed 10 percent in the first nine months of this year, Schaeppi said that if he had the choice to buy a company like Fastweb now he wouldn’t do it.
 “We’ve had four or five families come in already today because they realize that the game is over, and now it’s time to buy,” said Levine, whose Tivuch Shelly agency is marketing a 69-unit project in the Har Homa neighborhood.
 Ran Levy, an electronics engineer, said he had put off plans to buy a home in the northern city of Haifa while he waited for parliament to approve the zero-VAT program.
 BT Group Plc yesterday agreed to enter exclusive talks to buy EE for almost $20 billion, favoring the wireless provider over Telefonica’s O2 unit.
 jumped the most on record in Hong Kong on talks to buy Portugal’s Banco Espirito Santo de Investimento SA.
 Apple has argued that Noll’s theory is “implausible,” saying in a court filing that RealNetworks, which isn’t a party in the case, was a minor player and there’s no evidence consumers were locked into buying an iPod.
 Potential customers who had downloaded music from RealNetworks would be disinclined to buy iPods, he said.
 Will Wait “Investors may not rush in with money to buy now as the ordinances are temporary measures,” Megha Vazkar, head of institutional dealing with Mumbai-based Maximus Securities Ltd, said by phone today.
 Correction Warning The People’s Daily said on its micro-blog yesterday that some investors aren’t acting rationally, citing examples of people selling properties to buy stocks.
 Halliburton Co, the second-biggest oilfield services provider, agreed to buy No.
 That prompted tourists from other countries to buy iPhones in Moscow.
 Japan Post plans to use funds raised through the sales of the banking and insurance arms to buy a portion of its own shares held by the government to boost its corporate and stock value, according to the statement.
(Bloomberg) -- If consumers can be persuaded to buy new sweaters, jackets, and pants every month, can’t they be persuaded to do the same with bedroom linens and bath towels? Spanish retailer Inditex SA -- which operates more than 2,050 Zara stores in 88 countries, and is the world’s largest retailer -- is extending a fast-fashion sensibility to home goods.
 TSB could look to buy smaller banks as a way to increase its reach because it has excess capital, said Ian Gordon, an analyst at Investec in London.
 “That’s on the basis it’s easier to buy something small than it is to buy something big” Fiona Cornes, a spokeswoman for Shawbrook Bank, said the bank is “focusing on our controlled yet prudent growth,” declining to comment specifically on possible deals.
 No Reason “I can see no news that would give any reason to buy oil at the moment,” Christopher Bellew, senior broker at Jefferies International Ltd.
 17 low, buoyed by the BOJ’s easing and the $11 trillion pension fund’s decision to buy more local shares.
 The extra yield, or spread, investors demand to buy Venezuelan debt fell 424 percentage points yesterday, according to JPMorgan Chase & Co.
(Bloomberg) -- Manulife Financial Corp, Canada’s largest life insurer, agreed to buy New York Life Insurance Co’s retirement plan services business in a deal that will boost assets under administration by about $50 billion.
 In September, he struck a deal to buy Standard Life Plc’s Canadian business for about C$4 billion ($34 billion).
 Treasuries fell to a 20-month low in October, as yuan appreciation of 04 percent against the dollar indicated less of an impetus to buy the government securities.
 The turnaround is testament to a market in which volatilityis fueled by fluctuations in oil prices and attempts by banksand brokerages to offload stocks to pay back some borrowed moneythat was used to buy them, according to Abu Dhabi-based Nabil Rantisi, managing director of Mena Corp.
 agreed to buy Charter Brokerage from Arsenal Capital Partners as Chairman Warren Buffett extends bets in energy as oil prices tumble.
 1 that it agreed to buy two units from Weatherford International Plc for at least $750 million after the seller was squeezed by lower oil prices.
 “Another reason is that they give diversification for Nordic customers” The cost to buy protection on Tesco’s bonds has more than doubled this year, soaring 1107 basis points to 184 basis points on Dec.
 The number of Russians registered through Christie’s International Real Estate to buy homes in the city dropped by 70 percent in a year, said Giles Hannah, the broker’s senior vice president.
 Money Worries “You’ll also see a reduction in those trying to buy yachts and smaller items because they’re nervous about their money,” Hannah said.
 The Denver-based firm hired Gross from Pacific Investment Management Co, manager of the world’s biggest bond fund, and recently agreed to buy VelocityShares LLC to expand in exchange-traded products, the fastest-growing part of the fund industry.
 The clients are getting a chance to buy a six-year bond in Uber that will convert into equity at a 20 percent to 30 percent discount to the company’s valuation at the time of an initial public offering, said people with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be identified because the details are private.
 sank 5 percent after the drugmaker agreed to buy California-based Avanir Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Atlas Mara agreed to buy Gaborone, Botswana-based BancABC, for as much as $265 million in April in the company’s first African acquisition.
(Bloomberg) -- Sumitomo Mitsui Financial Group Inc’s main lending arm agreed to buy Citigroup Inc’s Japanese consumer-banking business to expand services for wealthy individuals in the country.
 “That at least is what the Saudis are counting on, and to us it appears a reasonable bet” Hall’s strategy in the past has often been to buy so-called long-dated oil contracts for delivery years into the future.
 In 1981, the firm was large enough to buy the investment bank Salomon Brothers.
 analysts led by William Katz raised their rating on the stock to buy from neutral, the equivalent of hold.
 After the accounting disclosure, RCS canceled a deal it had with ARCP to buy its Cole Capital business, which also sponsors nontraded REITs.
 “The quality of Brazil’s public schools is terrible, so that’s the top priority for families making a little more money,” said Marco Gregori, a former for-profit college executive who’s seeking $23 million for a fund called Eduinvest to buy private elementary and high schools.
 Gregori owns two schools and wants to buy eight more before taking the company public.
 Another trade idea would be to buy shares of retailers and similar companies that target lower-income consumers, Hartnett wrote.
 agreed to pay $189 billion to buy 45 planes from companies including General Electric Co’s aviation services unit to enter the aircraft leasing business.
 The Macau Monetary Authority ordered jewelry stores and pawnshops operating on casino floors to remove their UnionPay card terminals, making it harder for bettors to buy expensive items that they exchange for cash to gamble with.
 This month, Line agreed to buy Microsoft Corp’s MixRadio streaming service for an undisclosed amount as it seeks to speed user growth.
 Ochoa at Interacciones raised his recommendation to buy from hold on Sept.
 Buying Spree Companies are set to buy about 15 billion euros of German apartments in 2014, including Deutsche Annington’s 39 billion-euro acquisition of Gagfah, almost matching the 2013 record of 158 billion euros, according to data compiled by Jones Lang LaSalle Inc.
 Supplying LNG to buyers that typically haven’t been able to sign long-term contracts presents an opportunity for traders, Hallouche said.
 “The new opportunities will come from buyers who are more price sensitive than before, buyers who have been unable to buy LNG in the past on a long-term basis,” he said.
 plans to buy back as much as $10 billion of stock and pay out more cash to shareholders as the biggest US.
(Bloomberg) -- Royal Philips NV agreed to buy Volcano Corp.
 OAO Rosneft rallied 25 percent after it repaid $7 billion in debt and said it’s generating enough dollars to meet the obligations taken on to buy TNK-BP last year and become the world’s largest traded oil producer.
 Spanish energy company Repsol said today it agreed to buy Calgary-based Talisman for $8 a share, valuing Icahn’s stake at $6085 million.
 Boosting Reserves Repsol, Spain’s largest energy company, said today it agreed to buy Talisman, ending a months-long search for acquisitions to help boost crude reserves and production.
 Cleveland-based Cliffs this month canceled an offer to buy back some of its bonds and delayed a refinancing plan, citing difficult market conditions.
 The Fairfield, Connecticut-based manufacturer agreed in June to buy most of the assets for 124 billion euros ($152 billion), GE’s biggest acquisition ever, and the purchase should close next year.
 Following the strategy told investors when to buy or sell nine ETFs, the SEC said.
 sued a company it accuses of using its name to scam customers into buying hundreds of dollars in support services to fix nonexistent bugs, then stealing personal information or installing malicious software.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Aviva Plc, Britain’s second-largest insurer by market value, agreed to buy Friends Life Group Ltd.
 Cowdery Pay Friends Life, led by Andy Briggs, had been hurt after the British government scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity, threatening a key source of domestic profit growth.
 Resolution, which was designed to buy up ailing insurers, later scrapped that strategy and renamed itself after Friends Provident, one of its operating businesses.
 They want it because it’s a status symbol or for the performance or they are very eco-conscious and just don’t want to consume fossil fuels, regardless of what they pay for the fossil fuels” The seven-day selloff should be seen as an opportunity to buy the stock at a discount, said Ben Kallo, an analyst with Robert W.
 agreed to buy the Aliso Viejo, California-based drugmaker for about $354 billion to gain treatments for neurological conditions.
(Bloomberg) -- The back-up bidder for Revel AC Inc, now having the right to buy the shuttered Atlantic City, New Jersey, casino, wants the bankruptcy judge to cut the $954 million purchase price by $84 million in view of alleged improprieties in the auction process.
 Revel decided to proceed with a sale to Polo North after Brookfield Property Partners LP terminated a contract to buy the property for $110 million.
 When the bankruptcy court in Camden, New Jersey, approved the sale to Brookfield, the judge anointed Straub as the backup bidder to buy the project at his last offer of $945 million if the higher sale fell through, which it did.
(Bloomberg) -- Volvo Car Group is shifting its focus from auto shows, where carmakers vie for influential eyeballs in an atmosphere of glamor and glitz, to market more directly to buyers instead.
 Avoiding Hassle “We know from research that more and more of our customers are ready to buy online,” Visser says.
 “The reason why they are willing to buy is not to get a cheaper price, but to avoid the hassle around negotiating the deal” Chinese billionaire Li Shufu’s Zhejiang Geely Holding Group Co.
 Jefferies struck a deal in 2011 to buy Bache’s Global Commodities Group from life insurer Prudential Financial Inc.
 The money manager at Manulife Asset Management, who helps oversee about $269 billion and plans to invest in mainland shares through the bourse link that started last month, says he has a team of analysts that interviews company managers, analyzes supply chains and models earnings prospects before deciding to buy a stock.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- NextEra Energy Inc, North America’s largest generator of wind and solar power, agreed to buy the Hawaiian electricity company that has been losing customers to renewable sources for $263 billion in cash and stock.
 Under the proposed transaction, Hanwha SolaOne will issue 7402 million American depositary shares to buy Q Cells.
 Among stocks moving on corporate news, CGG SA sank 29 percent after Technip SA said it walked away from a bid to buy the French seismic surveyor.
 Still, the Edison Electric Institute, a trade group representing America’s investor-owned utilities, recently announced that its members will help to encourage electric vehicle use by spending $50 million annually to buy plug-in service trucks and invest in car-charging technology.
 is offering its solar and storage systems to buyers of electric cars from Audi AG and rebates for solar-panels to Ford Motor Co.
 The Chinese companies aren’t the only ones in the industry seeking economies of scale: Earlier this year Siemens, Europe’s largest engineering company, unsuccessfully tried to combine its train operations with Alstom’s transport business as part of an asset swap to buy the French company’s energy assets.
 A total of 18 cornerstone investors agreed to buy about $133 billion of stock, according to CGN Power’s prospectus.
 and Air Canada to buy from underperform, saying airline shares don’t fully reflect oil prices remaining low longer.
 were changed to buy from neutral.
 Money-market rates dropped after cash locked up to buy new shares returned to the banking system.
 “With IPO-related funds returning to the market and the fiscal funds transfer, liquidity risk in the next couple days is small” Brokerages have led Chinese stocks to a world-beating rally over the past month amid speculation a surge in trading and increased use of leverage to buy stocks will boost earnings.
 said Nelson Peltz’s Trian Fund Management got approval to buy as much as 13 percent of the firm’s outstanding shares after the activist investor stepped down from the board.
 “It seems that the struggles in the supply chain have also affected sales, so people have been going to Bang & Olufsen stores and not been able to buy what they came for because it wasn’t on the shelf” The board and management are starting “a review to identify strategic and structural options to increase scale and further reduce complexity,” Bang & Olufsen said.
 “China is fast emerging with mega deals such as Alibaba and it seems some investors even sold their bonds to buy the mega issues.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Evotec AG rose the most in almost 2 1/2 years after the German drug-development company entered talks to buy French pharmaceutical maker Sanofi’s research operations in Toulouse.
 Oi, which agreed to sell its Portuguese assets to Altice SA last week, wants to buy Tim through a financial vehicle and keep 25 percent of the company, with the rest being split between Telefonica SA and America Movil SAB, people familiar with the matter said last week.
 Rival BT Group Plc’s talks to buy one of Britain’s two biggest wireless carriers only adds to his urgency.
 The acquisition would be the second multibillion-dollar deal this year for Drahi, after the Franco-Israeli businessman also agreed to buy French wireless carrier SFR for about $23 billion.
 Swisscom AG fell 79 percent after French billionaire Xavier Niel’s private holding company agreed to buy Orange Switzerland.
 They are now limited to buying a product called condensate, an ultra-light oil that accounts for about 8 percent of US.
 The rights offer was Deutsche Bank’s largest since raising about 10 billion euros in 2010 to buy Deutsche Postbank AG.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- India’s antitrust regulator cleared Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd’s $53 billion proposal to buy Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
(Bloomberg) -- Kennedy Wilson Europe Real Estate Plc agreed to buy 180 UK.
 will announce an agreement to buy Citigroup Inc’s Japanese consumer-banking business as soon as next week, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 firm earlier gave Sumitomo Mitsui the right of first refusal to buy the business.
 It is also in advanced talks to buy a Chinese Internet finance company, he said without naming the target.
 A decline in oil prices since June has hurt energy holdings of private equity firms, while also presenting an investment opportunity to buy at cheap prices.
 But at these prices, there are some pockets of value in specific companies” Atos advanced 62 percent after agreeing to buy Xerox Corp’s information-technology outsourcing business for $105 billion, almost tripling the French computer-services provider’s business in the US.
 agreed to buy the Crown Building on Manhattan’s Fifth Avenue in partnership with New York landlord Jeffrey Sutton to build its presence in the world’s most-expensive retail district, two people with knowledge of the negotiations said.
 Steinhoff sold 182 billion rand of stock in August and three months later South Africa’s biggest furniture company agreed to buy Pepkor Holdings (Pty) Ltd.
 Instead, AT&T has committed more than $50 billion to buying Mexican wireless carrier Grupo Iusacell SA and DirecTV, which has a stake in satellite-TV service Sky Mexico.
 “AT&T is in no rush to buy America Movil’s assets in the short term,” Gregorio Tomassi, an analyst at Banco Itau BBA, said in a phone interview from Mexico City.
 announced plans to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 It then agreed to buy Iusacell, Mexico’s third-largest wireless carrier, for an equity value of $18 billion.
 Balance Sheet AT&T has the means to buy America Movil’s assets and extend its reach further in Mexico.
 “I don’t think there are a lot of players that are in a position to buy the America Movil assets, so I don’t think AT&T has much competition,” Novosel said in a phone interview.
 The brokerage also upgraded China Galaxy to buy.
 The French company, which will focus on train operations, has said it plans to use as much as 4 billion euros to buy back shares, and another 1 billion euros to 2 billion euros to reimburse bonds early following the GE deal.
 28 that it agreed to buy 35 Airbus Group NV A320neos and is leasing another 28 of the narrow-body aircraft to complement its fleet for domestic long-haul flights.
 of using “the tactics and ethics of a hacker” with a program allowing consumers to buy music, circumvent Apple’s digital rights software and play it on iPods.
 Apple called this theory “implausible,” saying in a court filing that RealNetworks, which isn’t a party in the case, was a minor player and there’s no evidence consumers were locked into buying an iPod.
 Even worse, the script writes over the erased hard drives with a random pattern of ones and zeros, making data so difficult to recover that it is more cost-effective to buy new machines and toss the hacked ones in the trash.
 co-founder Bill Gross in September and agreed to buy VelocityShares LLC to expand in exchange-traded products.
 It began investing in Kabel Deutschland after Vodafone agreed to buy the company in July last year.
 Baroka Tribal Mining (Pty) Ltd, a community-owned company, made the offer and is also seeking to buy Amplats’ 225 percent indirect stake in Atlatsa Resources Ltd, its joint venture partner, Reuters reported, citing a bid document.
 hedge fund manager, agreed to buy US.
 In 2004, a suggestion by Josep-Lluis Carod-Rovira, a separatist leader, that Catalans shouldn’t support a bid by Madrid to host the Olympic Games helped spark a revolt by cava drinkers in other parts of Spain who switched to buying bottles from other regions such as Extremadura or Valencia.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Japan’s central bank is in such a hurry to buy exchange-traded funds that it broke a four-year habit yesterday.
 already scrapped an agreement in June to buy a stake in Leviathan, citing concerns over the regulatory atmosphere in Israel.
 Sumitomo Mitsui Financial Group Inc, the country’s second-largest lender by market value, rose 07 percent after agreeing to buy Citigroup Inc’s Japanese consumer-banking business.
 He also got a warrant to buy common stock of 175 percent of the combined business, or about 84 million shares, at a penny a piece, according to a filing that month.
(Bloomberg) -- The naira fell to a record low as oil held near $60 a barrel and traders rushed to buy dollars before the central bank’s final foreign-exchange auction of 2014.
 agreed to buy Savola Group’s packaging unit for 910 million riyals ($242 million) in a rare example of a deal between two listed companies in the country.
 buyout firm TPG Capital are nearing a deal to buy a majority stake in Saudi Arabian fast-food chain Kudu, two people familiar with the matter said in August.
 More than half the economists in a Bloomberg survey expect the central bank to buy government bonds if it expands its stimulus program.
 rose 24 percent after Aviva Plc agreed to buy it for about 56 billion pounds ($88 billion) in stock.
 He steered the firm into buying exceptionally large blocks of stock from a bank or pension fund and selling it in whole or pieces to other institutional investors.
 “It would heighten the need for consolidation among the western manufacturers” Europe’s biggest engineering company Siemens this year unsuccessfully tried to combine its ailing train operations with Alstom’s transport business as part of an asset swap to buy the French company’s energy assets.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Solar Power Inc, a renewable-energy developer backed by China’s LDK Solar Co, agreed to buy a 99-megawatt project in New Jersey for an undisclosed sum.
 In October, PGNiG agreed to buy stakes from Total SA in three fields already producing oil and in one that’s being developed, bringing a 60 percent production increase outside Poland.
 Eighteen anchor investors agreed to buy about $133 billion of stock before the sale, according to CGN Power’s prospectus.
 “Russia’s political turmoil may give Strauss the ability to buy new assets at attractive prices,” Golan said.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Kemper Corp, the insurer formerly known as Unitrin, agreed to buy Alliance United Group to add sales of auto coverage in California, the biggest US.
 Apollo, which agreed in September to buy insurer Tranquilidade from Novo Banco, plans to submit an indication of interest for the whole bank, according to a person briefed on the matter who asked not to be identified because the plans aren’t public.
 private-equity and hedge funds that raised money in the wake of the 2008 financial crisis to buy distressed assets in Europe.
 The program allows overseas investors without qualified foreign institutional investors status to buy as much as 13 billion yuan of stocks listed in Shanghai each day.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Patrick Drahi’s cable company agreed to buy Oi SA’s Portuguese phone assets for 74 billion euros ($91 billion), expanding the billionaire’s telecommunications empire in Europe.
 In the UK, BT Group Plc is in talks to buy Telefonica’s O2 unit or Deutsche Telekom AG and Orange SA’s EE to expand its wireless offering and complement its broadband network, the largest in the country.
 24 at Google Play and other websites at a price of $599 to rent or $1499 to buy, in addition to limited release in independent theaters.
 agreed to buy Cubist Pharmaceuticals Inc.
(Bloomberg) -- InterContinental Hotels Group Plc, owner of the Holiday Inn and Crowne Plaza brands, agreed to buy Kimpton Hotels & Restaurants for $430 million, gaining a boutique chain with high-end properties in cities across the US.
 While a timeline for such a move is as yet unclear, it would allow Sherritt to buy American mining equipment, sell nickel and cobalt in the US.
 climbed 12 percent to C$2241, a two-week high, after agreeing to buy New York Life Insurance Co’s retirement plan services business in a deal that will boost the insurer’s assets under administration by about $50 billion.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- NextEra Energy Inc, North America’s largest generator of wind and solar power, agreed to buy Hawaii’s biggest electricity provider in a bet it can reduce the nation’s highest rates by using more renewable energy.
 Terra Firma agreed to buy a majority stake in Tank & Rast for about 1 billion euros in 2004.
 Woodside has been seeking acquisitions after its $27 billion plan to buy back shares from Royal Dutch Shell Plc was blocked by investors.
(Bloomberg) -- Anadolu Endustri Holding AS, the owner of stakes in Turkey’s biggest brewer and Coca-Cola Co’s local business, agreed to buy 4025 percent of Migros Ticaret AS in a transaction that values the second-biggest Turkish retailer at 64 billion liras ($27 billion).
 16 by pushing exporters to bring money back into the country and by creating a credit crunch that cut off some investors from the local currency needed to buy dollars.
 Lawmakers rushed legislation through the lower house of parliament the next day, allowing the Deposit Insurance Agency to buy stakes in banks before they face bankruptcy proceedings.
 agreed to buy a power-transmissions business from Emerson Electric Co.
 Emerson said it would use the proceeds from the sale to buy back shares in fiscal 2015.
 “Builders will turn their attention to the bottom half of the market, as millennial buyers begin to buy entry-level homes en masse after years of delays,” he said.
 Family Dollar directors are improperly refusing to negotiate with Dollar General executives about the Goodlettsville, Tennessee-based retailer’s $80-a-share bid to buy the second-largest US.
 The company agreed in January to buy EagleView Technology for $650 million to add an image library of US.
 Cowdery, who personally owns a 39 million-pound stake in Friends Life, said he “absolutely” plans to hold Aviva shares after the company yesterday agreed to buy Friends in a 56 billion-pound all-stock takeover.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Capital Power Corp, which owns more than 26 gigawatts of generating capacity in North America, agreed to buy Element Power US to increase its renewable energy portfolio in the US.
 are among more than a dozen companies seeking to buy a majority stake in Poland’s second-largest television network, TVN SA, TVN Chief Executive Officer Markus Tellenbach said.
 “We are delivering fairness for savers” Osborne overhauled pensions and savings regulation in his March budget by removing rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity and increased the tax-free allowance on ISAs to 15,000 pounds ($23,565) a year from 11,520 pounds.
 “A transformed Publicis will allow us to streamline costs and increase our profitability” The company, which in May abandoned a $35 billion merger with Omnicom that would have created the world’s largest ad company, last month agreed to buy Sapient for $37 billion.
 Thai Union, which owns Bumble Bee’s competitor Chicken of the Sea, entered a binding agreement to buy all of the San Diego-based company’s shares from Lion Capital LLP, Bumble Bee said in a statement.
 Amazon, which has added grocery deliveries and Sunday deliveries in recent years, is working to lock in customers to buy things online that they need immediately rather than rushing to the store.
 in bull-market mode, it is hard to convince investors to buy emerging markets,” Leopold Quell, a co-fund manager at Raiffeisen Capital Management in Vienna, said by e-mail.
 offered to buy all the Hong Kong-listed shares of Hunan Nonferrous Metals Corp.
 offered to buy the Hong Kong unit’s shares at HK$420 each, representing a 69 percent premium to the last closing price, the two companies said in a statement.
 Toronto-based Brookfield Property Partners LP won court approval to buy the now-shuttered resort for $110 million in October, beating out Polo North.
 The Fairfield, Connecticut-based manufacturer reached an agreement in June to buy most of Alstom’s energy assets for 124 billion euros ($156 billion), GE’s biggest acquisition ever.
 Until now, Britain’s telecoms market has been unusual in Europe because most companies do not yet provide the full range of telecoms services -- Internet, mobile, television and home phone -- preferring instead to buy in services that they don’t have from competitors.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Annington Immobilien SE offered to buy competitor Gagfah SA in a 39 billion-euro ($49-billion) deal that would be Germany’s biggest-ever real estate acquisition.
 APA Group -- Australia’s largest gas pipeline owner -- agreed to buy the pipeline, which supplies BG’s liquefied natural gas project in the country.
 BT said yesterday it’s in exclusive talks to buy EE, which is jointly owned by Deutsche Telekom AG and Orange SA.
 Goldman Sachs clients are getting a chance to buy a six-year bond in the mobile car-booking company that will convertinto equity at a 20 percent to 30 percent discount to Uber’svaluation at the time of an initial public offering, said thepeople, who asked not to be identified because the details areprivate.
 The software maker reported sales that topped estimates and agreed to buy stock-photography provider Fotolia LLC for about $800 million.
 Minto plans to buy 1,600 acres (650 hectares) in the Daytona Beach area next year, building on the success of the 2,400-acre Isles of Collier Preserve in Naples, which has sold 120 units at an average price of about $650,000 since opening in February, Belmont said.
 unit agreed to buy two Chinese solar developers to expand project-operating business.
 Apollo originally offered to buy the US.
 Calgary-based Talisman rose 18 percent to C$597 at the close in Toronto, giving it a market value of C$619 billion ($531 billion), after Spain’s Repsol SA was said to be nearing a bid to buy the company.
 The market today is quite expensive from a valuation standpoint, so if a correction occurred we would probably accelerate the investment” Power Deal In addition to the PetSmart deal, the Caisse also announced an agreement to buy 15 percent of AES Corp’s IPALCO Enterprises unit for $244 million.
